I'm a left-of-centre passionate Remainer, obviously enough given the tweets here. Corbyn has utterly lost my respect & support. NO #Brexit. 
We need a centrist grouping committed to stopping the lunacy of #Brexit. We will get it, & we will prevail: as sound good sense always does. 
Ok: time to take action to rescue our beloved country from the insanity of #Brexit. Let's do it.  
Brexit is basically the Phantom Menace. Long awaited, a fuck up of colossal proportions, and mostly about trade agreements. 
Grenfell, LDN bridge, Westminster, Finsbury Park, Manchester, Police killing Edson, Acid attacks, Brexit, No government.. it's a lot. 
The Tories are a shamblesLabour are a shamblesSNP shamblesLiberals shamblesBrexit shamblesThe EU is looking stronger everyday. 
When Farage is backing your Brexit stance you are seriously in the wrong place.  
Corbyn: Hey fellow kids, thanks for your votes. I want to reassure you I'm working hard to ensure that hard Brexit you don't want happens. 
#Labour badly split on #Europe. 50 backed .@ChukaUmunna  amendment on #QueensSpeech with #LibDems and Nats. Vast majority back hard #Brexit 
announce Camilla Thurlow as brexit negotiator 
Question Time audience particularly baying Brexit mob types tonight - can't listen to any other view points. Actually quite sad 
Big mistake was allowing Little Englander racist dimwits who hate foreigners to vote in a referendum #brexit #bbcqt 
Wrong. Labour is supporting a hard Brexit strategy - there's nothing nuanced about it. They betray the young and a majority of Labour voters  
The Norway model equals #remain. That'll do nicely. #Brexit  
I am working with @acgrayling and @the48andbeyond in the next few weeks on some #Brexit related film. #StayTuned 
When Corbyn said "The real fight starts now!" over Brexit, we just didn't realise it was with the rest of his party. 
I promise I'm a socialist but I WILL allow a severely damaging hard Brexit and I love trident.Gies peace, Jez  
Philip Stephens: How Britain’s Brexiters lost control of Brexit  
Younger voters listened to Labour leadership, but Labour leadership hasn't listened to them; generally they don't seem to want 'any' Brexit.  
He's betrayed millions who voted for Labour merely to unseat the Tories and weaken their mandate for Brexit. Democracy is now deaf to truth. 
People do realise this entire Brexit debate would not be happening were it not for English ethno-nationalist supremacism, don't they? 
A lot of misinformation about todays amendment votes. I proudly voted against the Tories and DUP hard Brexit - and will continue to do so.  
Theresa May should quit by end of next year and allow new Tory leader to complete Brexit, says Nicky Morgan  
May & Corbyn's Hard Brexit strategies explained: #bbcqt#Corbyn#StrongAndStable#QueensSpeech 
#Brexit results 2016 compared to areas of Mad Cow Disease outbreak in 1992...  #EUcitizens for #indyref2 #MOOforEU 
These rebels should form a new Remain party ☞ These are all the Labour MPs who just defied Jeremy Corbyn over Brexit  
The day after the EU referendum I saw Billy live and he told me and others to "get stuck in". Today he's saying this. Pathetic.  
The threats of Brexit are serious, and I will not be politically posturing on the issue - we need to unite as the official opposition 
fighting against a Brexit that attacks our employment rights, our environmental laws, our trade relations and our common European values 
This call for referendum  
Andrew Neil is wrong. @jeremycorbyn's position is nothing like Theresa May's on #Brexit. #JC4PM #bbctw #bbcsp #bbcdp 
Number of EU nurses registering to practice in UK down 96% since Brexit #BBCQT  via @LondonEconomic 
Vast majority of people in the UK are balanced, caring, charitable, and hard-working, yet we are hostages to 2 extreme tribes set on Brexit.  
'oppose Extreme Brexit' a phrase crafted to attract opposites: Remainers and Soft Brexiteers, yet repels both, taking the unintended meaning  
So Labour coming out now against Brexit would achieve what for those people? Without a Commons majority Labour cannot stop Brexit. 
A Call For Referendum Is never A Call For War, Nigeria Is Only Misleading People - IPOB  
Ireland says dozen City firms and banks to set up in Dublin over Brexit | Politics | The Guardian  
Because we cannot end Brexit until the Tories split, as they surely will. They lost last 3 PM's to EU and about to lose 4th. #ToryKryptonite 
Oops ...EU businesses start to replace British suppliers ahead of Brexit  
Portillo on @bbcthisweek concedes that the Tory party is at breaking point on #brexit. He is right, and I'll be vindicated for leaving it 
WATCH: Owen Jones DESTROYED on BBC for saying that ‘momentum is growing’ for Jeremy Corbyn  via @Your Brexit 
MELTDOWN: Corbyn loses CONTROL of frontbenchers during Queen’s speech vote  via @Your Brexit 
I've never supported #Brexit facilitator #CorbynAs an opposition leader he's been direUsing whips to prop up May's hard Brexit#Remain 
Aboriginal Health #IVoiceUluru Referendum : Federal Government to receive ultimatum on Indigenous Recognition  pic.twitter.com/hnGNAXo3Ic 
You were elected on the back of this letter to voters, promising to be an "anti-Brexit MP", then blanked the @ChukaUmunna amendment. WTF. 
Good old Corbyn! Defying his party and young fans by being solid on Brexit - wanting to leave the EU like he always has   
Oops ...Ireland says dozen City firms and banks to set up in Dublin over Brexit  
Deafening silence from moderate Leavers is a thing.Millions voted Leave but not for Hard Brexit & CU exit etc.Tail is wagging the dog. 
One of the better reasons to vote no in any referendum will be to watch the utter shock on the faces of journalists at the count.  
The manifesto was equivocal on single market & did not mention customs union. Tonight Corbyn confirmed supports a Tory hard Brexit, 
Corbyn's whip shows his true Brexit colours and what a numbskull he is.He's urging the country to economic ruin in Brexit. 
My vote did the trick of keeping Tory majority down. If @UKLabour thinks it will get it again with its stance on Brexit it can think again 
Because White folks believe Black Africans in Nigeria have not right to use referendum to solve their problems. @MatthewTPage 
Joined LDs last year because of your parties stance on Brexit. Election result = country needs a Macron En Marche candidate & new party 
Two biggest factors fuelling the Scottish independence movement are Tory cruelty and Labour incompetence. Brexit situation perfect example. 
Sturgeon shelved plans for a second independence referendum because she believed we could push for a soft Brexit. Corbyn's nuked that option 
The only upside to Corbyn going for a hard Brexit alongside the Tories is that it validates once more the need for IndyRef2. 
Jon Snow I find it hard to believe that teens cried  to you about the referendum I find it hard to believe anything you say about anything 
Travel barriers after Brexit risk a return to 'medieval age' - Thomas Cook CEO  
There is a #brexit collective madness driven by hatred of foreigners. Facts do not matter. These people are zealots driven by xenophobia 
Brexit is like Father Christmas. A lovely childhood fantasy and MPs still don't think we're quite old enough to be told the truth about it. 
#NigelFarage: I want #Brexit and I want it now! 17,410,742 AGREE with YOU @Nigel_Farage!  #BBC #SKY #UK #EU #TORY 
WE DONT NEED JOBSWE DONT NEED TRADEWE CAN JUST STAND UNDER THE UNION JACK AND TALK ABOUT TWO WORLD WARS WE NEVER FOUGHT IN #brexit 
#BBCQT It was #Leave campaigners who first said we should stay in the #SingleMarket if we #Brexit  
History GCSE question, 2035. Why did Labour supporters & members not rise up against their support for the Conservative's disastrous Brexit? 
Politicians on #bbcqt talking about how trade deals work *a year after the Brexit vote*. 18 months to make a deal? You're having a laugh. 
Fox is despicable: simply lies about what's available post-Brexit. Balls to pretend EU is barrier to trade with China etc @bbcquestiontime 
What is this madness? The referendum was advisory. The 4% Brexit result was skewed by huge, demonstrable lies. Let's just not do it. #bbcqt 
The audience tone of most Brexit debates I've seen seems far nastier than during the indyref. Divisive nationalism? #bbcqt #brexit #indyref 
You want an open trading agreement with Europe? Mr Fox, you had that, until Cameron called his vanity referendum #bbcqt 
If a party tells you that they oppose both a Hard Brexit & Freedom of Movement, they are either mistaken or lying. My bet is on the latter. 
'Just get on and LEAVE the EU!' Peter Bone calls on  Prime Minister @theresa_may  to deliver Brexit 'NOW'  
Splitter. Canary person calls for 2nd referendum - hasn't got message Corbyn is pro-Brexit. @bbcquestiontime 
Zanny M-B's remarks on the #EU & #Brexit epitomise why I junked The Economist over 5 years ago. #bbcqt 
#BBCQT is stuck in a time loop in June 2016, endlessly debating the same #BRExit arguments and never learning anything. 
Braying thick old people screaming to be released from the customs union and single market, no idea of consequences #bbcqt #brexit 
The Face of Brexit, Part 436.#bbcqt 
I don't want a soft Brexit. I want a Hard Remain. Rational self determination means rational self determination.#bbcqt 
Three Labour frontbenchers have been sacked for backing a call to stay in the single market after Brexit.  #bbcqt 
.@stellacreasy says that the public need to know that politicians scrutinise the details to ensure the UK gets the best Brexit-deal #bbcqt 
"Remain in the Single Market" = subverting Brexit. Stella Creasy is lying through her teeth #bbcqt 
Election rules review after students ‘openly boast of voting TWICE’ for Corbyn’s Labour 
Katie Hopkins praising Corbyn.Does anything more have to said about Corbyn's betrayal of Labour?#StopBrexit #Remain #Brexit #CorbynOut 
Philip Stephens: How Britain’s Brexiters lost control of Brexit  
The only time JC has used the whip is to impose Brexit. Not for Trident or austerity or NHS cuts or DWP cuts. Only for Brexit. 
These are all the Labour MPs who just defied Jeremy Corbyn over Brexit  
No polite way to put this; Labour & Tories are two cheeks of same hard #Brexit British nationalist erse! #GoEurope  
Brexit Britain   
Corbyn sacks MPs for opposing hard Brexit. For seeking to protect jobs/exports etc post-Brexit. Whaaat? Is that what young voters wanted? 
That disgraced & disgraceful #LiamFox should be able to make a political comeback tells you all you need to know about Brexit Britain #bbcqt 
It's a hard Brexit which means a hard border - support designated special status if u don't it'll be too late when custom checks emerge  
If 80-something percent of us support Brexit, why the terrible fear of asking us directly in a second referendum? 
We were told that the GE was all about Brexit, it never was for me. My vote was for JC for anti austerity our NHS Social Care and Schools 
I genuinely don't understand Corbyn's hard Brexit stance. It's going to devastate the UK economy. I thought he cared about living standards. 
I have never denied I am for no Brexit at all. and I am convinced despite lack of leadership in HoC that is where we will end. People know 
He brings shame to the office he holds it's like living through a never ending bad dream at the mo with Trump and Brexit 
We're never going to be at ease with ourselves as a nation on Brexit until our elected representatives on all sides can vote as they see fit 
'Everyone conspired against Thatcher, she lasted 10 years!' Rees-Mogg backs May on Brexit  
Let's be clear: staying in the Single Market means staying in the EU in all but name.It would be an utter betrayal of the EU referendum vote 
The progressive position is to back an international and outward looking UK. That means opposition to #Brexit no compromise on this #Corbyn 
Voting #Labour to stop #Brexit!  
I increased the Labour majority because I wanted to weaken hard Brexit RT if you did too?  
because their opposition to brexit is solely down to the threat it represents to their economic interests and cosmopolitan identity 
Proof Corbyn is wrong on #Brexit  
I, like many, voted for Catherine West in the knowledge she voted against Brexit. Don't tell me what my vote meant. Ta.  
Okay - one for Jeremy Corbyn supporters only - do you actually want a hard Brexit? 
True face of Corbyn: backing May's extreme Brexit and sacking decent, pro-European Labour MPs who defy him. He has betrayed his voters 
Tom Watson on fox/sky Murdoch deal and Labour's Brexit split  via @krishgm 
Been staying out of this butNot interrupting the Tories while they destroy themselves with Brexit seems a smart long game to me. 
Jez, you're on a perfect trajectory to become the hero of a generation by vanquishing the Tories. Just...don't push the Hard Brexit button.  
always made clear to my constituents I would fight Tories' extreme destructive Brexit & support Single Market/Customs Union 
Nuanced disagreement...I worked in party comms for 3 years and I'd have been embarrassed to use that line. Not much nuance in a hard Brexit  
Blocked by my own MP for asking why she failed to oppose a hard Brexit when she expressly canvassed our votes as an anti-Brexit candidate  
So depressing to see so many Labour members now supporting a Hard Brexit just because Saint Jeremy endorses it. 
Current #Brexit mood  
Both the Tories and Labour in supporting hard #Brexit are on a self destruct mission. Nobody win. Everybody gets poorer 
Vote Labour get Tories.Vote Labour get Hard Tory Brexit.Vote Plaid get Plaid. 
I voted for @TulipSiddiq not because she was Labour, but because she was anti-Brexit. Labour is not homogenous. Strength and flaw, that.  
This EU Brexit transparency gig is so organised, efficient & considered that it frankly dictates both the gameplan & the state of play.  
Farage and Hopkins both cheering on Corbyn's Brexit stance. Labour members must be feeling so proud right now. 
Making opposition to a hard Brexit a sackable offence is like outlawing intelligence. 
And 52% are wrong. Brexit will be a disaster for the economy and the country 
Corbyn fought election campaign being all things to all people. Now showing true colours. Hard Brexit unmasked.  
This. With every daily helping of Brexit news.  
If you have been let down by the hard-Brexit Labour Party tonight, join the @LibDems: 
Today's House of Commons - filled with yes people and cowards - befits a nation in terminal decline. #Brexit 
.@UKLabour needs to realise that much of their support is on loan. People wanted to reopen the conversation on Brexit. 
German CDU think tank urges solving of #Catalan issue before "it’s too late"  via @catalannews #Catalonia #referendum 
Brexit would be over already if the mainstream media were reporting the realities...2017 Q1 GDP: - Germany 0.6% - Eurozone 0.5% - UK 0.2%  
What sort of Brexit deal will different politicians get us?  
Every night, catching up on UK political events, I'm struck anew by the political, economic & cultural impoverishment Brexit is imposing. 
The utter state of everything right now. I'd vote for anyone with a pulse as long as they were anti Brexit, centrist & offered some hope. 
So opposing a hard Brexit now gets you sacked from Labour's frontbench. Is that what young people voted for?   
Many people voted Labour *despite* their position on Brexit, not because of it.  
A theory: Brexit is going to continue f##king both the major parties in turn until one of them comes out against it. 
Farage backs Corbyn on Brexit.  
I love how some people can explain brexit with one simple picture!  
It's been a real pleasure to discuss #Brexit issues this evening with Carwyn Jones @fmwales @ No6 Convent Place in #Gibraltar Many synergies 
A major achievement and legacy of @jeremycorbyn may well be that he got Leave to win & #Brexit to happen 
Myth that Corbyn favours 'Hard Brexit' keeps being trotted put  by Lib Dems-like 'you have to vote for us to get Tories out' during election  
…hard Brexit, that this viewpoint has such scant parliamentary representation, thanks to the FPTP system.  Democracy is in a dreadful state. 
Feels like we've gone up a gear in Brexit chaos this evening. Politicians flailing about, with no plans. Public has no clue. Terrible mess  
If today shows us anything it's Labour's Brexit fudge can't hold. Worked for 'em this election, don't know if it'll see 'em through another. 
Jeremy Corbyn forced to sack three front-benchers as 49 MPs rebel over Brexit  
Great to meet @FabianPicardo to discuss the shared challenges & opportunities posed by #Brexit  
Utter rubbish. Brexit will ruin this country labour should be opposing it at every turn. Most labour voters voted to remain. 
Corbyn's Labour shows it true colours on Brexit: less than 1 in 5 Labour MPs voted against the Conservatives to...  
Tonight both Nigel Farage and Katie Hopkins tweeted praise to Corbyn for his Brexit stance.Shame on you all Corbynistas 
5/ on doorsteps all over working class Britain saying "Brexit will happen" was key to getting a hearing 
4/ All talk of Labour supporting "hard Brexit" is disingenuous bullshit - read Corbyn amendment... 
Time to admit there's no deal 'like' single mkt/ customs union, EU27 been v clear @Keir_Starmer Why not lead a fightback to reverse Brexit? 
If he's keeping his powder dry for anything, then it's for enthusiastically selling a Hard Lexit. Not for opposing Brexit at all. 
Corbyn. Is. Pro. Hard. Brexit.  
Labour's manifesto: "Freedom of movement will end when we leave the European Union." Anyone who voted Labour to stop hard Brexit is a fool.  
I voted remain.I detest this Govt and it sleazy DUP deal.Brexit is a disaster for the UK.I want Labour to commit to single market and CU. 
Labour's Brexit shambles deepens as dozens of MPs defy Corbyn policy  via @MailOnline 
I'm sure the youth vote will be very forgiving once it realizes it's been completely stitched up by Labour supporting a hard Brexit. 
The referendum is 4independence, but it doesn’t mean that on the 26/9 we r going 2declare independence. It is the start of a long process./3 
TMay is pushing ahead with a Destructive Brexit to keep 140 rabid backbenchers happy to stay in No 10. Btw this is what she knows to be true  
Corbyn's #Brexit outside the Customs Union & Single Market would mean Britain grovelling to plutocrats and multinationals for investment. 
Philip Stephens: How Britain’s Brexiters lost control of Brexit  
My vote for Labour wasn't really Brexit related. I figured if Brexit goes ahead, I'd rather be under Labour than Cons. 
More Boost To Biafra Agitation As Igbo Professionals Write Osibanjo, Demand Referendum  
Parliament in the grip of a madness. Good MPs of all parties must resist the hard Brexit cliff edge. It will shred Tories and Labour alike. 
So if people voted labour in hopes of avoiding a hard brexit (staying in the single market) they voted incorrectly? 
.@Plaid_Cymru will stand up for all those who are left feeling let down on Brexit. Join us to make us stronger:  
Throwback to this gem. #Brexit #CorbynYouth 
Corbyn's attempt to force MPs to support damaging Tory hard #Brexit looks increasingly misguided. We need cross-party alliance to block it  
No nuance. Chuka's amendment was clear & Corbyn whipped Labour to vote against & for a hard brexit. Don't spin it, you're better than that. 
Corbyn is obsessed with hard Brexit ☞ Four shadow ministers forced to quit for voting for soft brexit  
So Labour in a bigger mess than Tories over #Brexit. Three sackings and one resignation as Labour abstain on single market. 
Supporting the Tories' Hard Brexit is not compatible with Labour's manifesto commitment to "prioritise jobs and living standards"  
Labour position still the same as it was, get a Brexit with benefits equal to singe market membership. Chuka an irrelevance 
I voted LibDem to stop Brexit and look where we are now with @vincecable Time for a new, progressive, pro-Euro social democratic party? 
Hey @theresa_may , how did we end up in this crazy situation?Because of you, your choice of belligerent and hard Brexit.  
A question for Labour Remainers: when you voted Labour on 8th June what did you expect? Because Corbyn was pretty clear about Hard Brexit. 
Astonishing that not a single Scottish Labour or Tory MP voted for membership of Single Market - huge damage to scotland without it #Brexit  
Some political anorak may be able to tell you a slight difference between Labour & Tories position on Brexit.To everyone else it's the same. 
Young voters should feel betrayed by @UKLabour 's support of government on #Brexit with today's @HouseofCommons single market vote 
Don't tell me you're surprised by Labour's game-playing on Brexit. Past behaviour is the best predictor of future behaviour #C4News 
They dared oppose Corbyn's hard Brexit and have paid the price. The British political elite really has lost its mind.  
You won't find any of those newly elected Labour/Tory Scottish MPs on that list, but there's alot of SNP MPs #brexit  
Labour MP: All those who sang "Oh Jeremy Corbyn" at Glastonbury might be surprised by his position on Brexit. That place is Remain Central. 
It’s clear which side have done their homework for #Brexit negotiations. Astonishing that in 27 v 1 its the 27 that speak with one voice.  
Lib Dems are viable and have lots of new members. Will pick up more votes in face of Con/Lab hard Brexit position. 
Remember, kids, when it comes to Brexit Corbyn and Farage are on the same page. Always have been. He didn't mention that at Glastonbury.  
The children were stunned. How could the Dear Leader vote for hard Brexit?They consoled themselves taking pleasure from kicking a hedgehog.  
LMFAO at all my Corbyn voting mates (wealthy, educated, London , Remoaners) who told me it was the only way to stop May's hard Brexit. 
That feeling when you're a remainer that was worshipping Jeremy Corbyn last week at glasto but a week later he supports a super hard Brexit  
"The Conservatives are all over the place on Brexit, with ministers contradicting each other"Jeremy Corbyn who just saw 49 Labour MPs rebel  
There's no such thing as 'soft' Brexit. It's a media concoction devised to give the impression that clean Brexit, a (real) Brexit is 'hard'!  
Cos we made clear to our constituents, John, that we would fight Theresa May's extreme destructive Brexit & back Single Market/Customs Union 
For those asking how we keep Single Market membership after #Brexit - the speech I gave last year on fair movement:  
Worth repeating: on the substantive issues that actually matter there is virtually no difference between Corbyn's Brexit and May's Brexit 
Corbyn 'had 49 of his own MPs openly rebel on Brexit, forcing him to take an axe to his already depleted frontbench' — Harry Cole. 
The politics of backlash are causing whiplash. Brexit to Corbyn, Trump to what? My column in the Democracy Post.  
A Conservative Queen's Speech passed. @ChukaUmunna amendment to stay in single market & customs union defeated & divides Labour on Brexit. 
Labour's Brexit troubles are just beginning. Will Corbyn next defy his own Manifesto?  
Corbyn is one of the main reasons we got Brexit - whole swathes of Labour voting N England saw his lack of  support for EU and voted leave 
Here we are 12 months into Brexit and not ONE politician bothered to explain to the public what the Single Market is  
May, Farage & Corbyn - the coalition of Brexit chaos  
So I think we now understand @jeremycorbyn stand on Brexit. His ambivalence makes me trust him less.  
All those new "young voters" who backed #Corbyn because they thought Labour was anti-Brexit are gonna feel somewhat shat on today... 
Getting bored of Brexit bullying   
Yes, 20 of 49 Labour rebels on Chuka Umunna Brexit amendment are MPs from London  
So @jeremycorbyn - Imagine. You end up PM, pushing your hard Brexit for the few, but unable to deliver any of your policies for the many. 
Ireland says dozen City firms and banks to set up in Dublin over Brexit  
Jeremy Corbyn sacks Labour shadow ministers for defying him over Brexit vote  
Well done @ChukaUmunna @davidlammy @danielzeichner & other sensible politicians for standing against #brexit. #wewillremain 
If you believe Corbyn is just supporting Brexit to wrongfoot the Tories and would U-turn once in power, I have a £350m bridge to sell you. 
An explanation of why the #SingleMarket issue matters if we #Brexit (via @InFactsOrg ) 
Jezza is sacking Labour MPs who tried to undermine Brexit by voting to allow the EU to continue to dictate our trade policy.#OhJeremyCorbyn 
For months fantasy-peddling pundits have bigged up idea soft/bogus Brexit was an option.  HoC vote today shows idea 2b nonsense #crapPundits 
Jeremy Hard Brexit Corbyn is a secret hero of the eurosceptic movement. (Me for Reaction giving away Leave secrets)  
"Hello Glastonbury! I'm fighting for a fairer society by pushing hard #brexitI'm building bridges by sacking my MPs and supporting May"  
Corbyn at Glasto:"Next week I'll sack any MP who votes for free movement across Europe!" YEEEAH!"As I now support full Brexit!" YEEEAH! 
Political Jobbers Crying Wolf As #Biafrans Planned To #BoycottAnambraElection Until Referendum Date Is Given To Them  
BREAKING: Government to tackle Brexit farming job crisis by giving all unfilled fruit-picking jobs to George Osborne. More soon ... 
Took Corbyn & Labour a total of 3 weeks to piss away the goodwill they had from anti-Brexit voters esp. in England. Normal service resumed. 
Lab today confirming they with Tories as a party of #HardBrexit with today's #Commons abstention. Lucky Scotland has lifeboat "Referendum" 
It was a Conservative Queens Speech, but it generated a Labour rebellion on Brexit & mass sackings by Corbyn. #chaos 
bae: come overCorbyn: I can'tbae: I'm up for a proper hard BrexitCorbyn:  
Sacked for acting in the National interest. Leaving Single Market and Customs Union makes UK poorer, we demand Brexit truths @UKLabour . 
And so Corbyn turns a decent week of proper opposition on pay cap and Grenfell into a story of sackings and splits over Brexit 
Corbyn showing his true Brexit colours. He's almost a proper chap.  
Corbyn showing that he stands with Murdoch, Dacre, Farage & the Tory Right. A traitor to everything Labour stands for.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
BREAKING Jeremy Corbyn sacks frontbench rebels after 49 Labour MPs defy him over Brexit -  
The failure of the Lib Dems to properly frame Corbyn's hard-Brexit stance in the election is a strategic failing on a par with May's. 
Andy Slaughter confirms he has been sacked from front bench by Jeremy Corbyn after voting for Chuka Umunna amendment on Brexit 
Corbyn fires up to six Shadow Ministers for supporting the pro Single Market/Customs Union amendment. Labour solidly a Brexit Party now. 
All you young voters who are against Brexit and trusted Corbyn, he has let you down. We need a new party that represents the future 
Where #Corbyn stands on #brexit is becoming increasingly clear. And it's not where vast majority of his voters stand.  
Is it me, or did I miss the bit at Glastonbury when Corbyn told the adoring crowds "...and if my MPs oppose hard-Brexit, I'll sack them!". 
CRUSHED: MPs vote against staying in Single Market and Customs Union. Let's get on with Brexit! 
What's the White Stripes riff for "actually wants a hard Brexit"?  
Jezza showing strong leadership of the opposition against opponents of the government and saboteurs of Brexit. #LOLabour 
I hope all those people who told me that @UKLabour was fighting for a softer Brexit finally got the message today: they're not! 
Wow, massive Labour split over Brexit amendment to the Queen's speech. 
Whipping Labour MPs to abstain against conscience & national interest - Brexit imposition by the few, at expense of the many @jeremycorbyn 
Real shame to see Labour whipping abstention on amendment by @ChukaUmunna. Best hope for economy & public services is Single Market #Brexit 
Only 49 out of 262 Labour MPs were prepared to vote for a Labour amendment in favour of single market membership.  Where's the soft Brexit? 
Those pro-Chuka Umunna Brexit amendment votes in full:49 Labour 34 SNP12 Lib Dem4 Plaid1 Independent (Lady Hermon)1 Green 
Jeremy Corbyn suffers major Brexit rebellion: 49 Labour MPs defy his 3 line whip to vote to stay in EU's single market. #QueensSpeech 
JEREMY. CORBYN. IS. SUPPORTING. A. HARD. BREXIT. WHICH. WILL. BE. CATASTROPHIC. FOR. BRITAIN. #DailyReminder 
It is heartening that Umunna’s anti-Brexit amendment was overwhelmingly rejected, writes @BrexitCentral's @isaby 
Written by @Wok_Chi_Steve and produced by me, this is Born British - a Trainspotting nod to what Brexit means: 
Good news for Brexiteers: 21 fewer MPs just backed @ChukaUmunna's anti-Brexit amendment than voted against A50  
Brexit means Brexit  
Sounds like none of Remain minded Tories voted for Brexit amendment 
Dozens of Labour MPs defy Jeremy Corbyn to back Chuka Umunna's Brexit amendment  
Corbyn has betrayed millions of his voters by refusing to back single market amendment. We'll keep fighting to oppose Govt's extreme Brexit 
United Kingdom has just voted against the Single Market ... #Brexit will be hard or the embarrassment of the U turn massive. #OldEmpire 
.@AamAadmiParty leaders are wooing Muslim votes by asking for Referendum in Kashmir! Are these leaders the agents of Pakistan? @BJP4India 
Britain needs change Britain Needs Nigel Farage 
The Labour front bench abstaining on a Labour amendment opposing a hard Brexit. This is what it's going to be like. 
Corbyn is protecting May's back by making it clear that he would help her put down a Tory Remainer rebellion #CorbynOut #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Very disappointed that my MP @vickyfoxcroft has apparently backtracked on her promise to oppose hard Brexit. Won't be getting my vote again 
I want Brexit and I want it now!  
As UK economy stumbles, sentiment in Euro area reaches 10-year high. Reminder again of Brexit's utter pointlessness  
You are speaking for the many who did not vote Tory in 17 election  due to Hard Brexit stance. Thank you 
Leading cyber expert to Senate Intelligence C'ttee: Russian active measures in Brexit "should be examined". What is UK intel doing? Anyone?  
Pound tiptoes ever closer to $1.30 on a 7th consecutive day of gains  
The supposedly secretive/unelected @EU_Commission is being more honest & transparent with me on #Brexit than my own Government is @DExEUgov 
Every credible economic body reports #brexit is already injuring the economy. Businesses left aghast at the lack of understanding. #Remain 
The Independent's view: The Tories are making a habit of U-turns – Brexit will be next 
Open season on Treasury after the magic money tree returns. Cabinet differences on Brexit. Gvt caves in on first backbench amendment of Pt - 
.@jeremycorbyn the movement you're building will shatter if you don't stop #Brexit Surge of votes that backed you in GE were Remain votes! 
Welsh remainers waking up to what Corbyn wants from Brexit. Two weeks ago you were angry at us for voting #PlaidCymruYou reap what you sow 
NEW: 10. 'A Crown Prince Catastrophe' - The Saudi succession, Iran & Brexit ethics...  via @YouTube 
Watch @OwenPaterson explain why, through embracing the latest technology, the environment will benefit and farming will thrive post-Brexit  
Voted Labour to stop a hard Brexit? You appear to have been badly misled!You can't trust Corbyn on Brexit!  
1/3If UK was run as a business,Brexit would be shelved tomorrow until someone came back with a fully costed plan with clear, upsides. 
Brexit has never been more popular says @asabenn 
BREXIT BOOST: Rolls-Royce invests £150m in UK operation and secures 7,000 jobs. 
Brexit commentary described in a tweet.  
Level of EU preparedness for Brexit extraordinary. Nothing like this from UK so at v least shape of negs driven by EU. Taking back control?  
Absolutely clear now that the Labour Leadership is the biggest ally Theresa May has in delivering an extreme brexit 
But... but... #Brexit >>  
Over last 72 hours I have engaged with MEPs from Greece, the Czech Republic, Latvia, Cyprus & Croatia on BREXIT & its implications 4 Ireland  
Mussolini had an airforce with no engines. Khrushchev painted tree-trunks in Cuba to look like missiles. May pretends to have a Brexit plan. 
This will be interesting. Are Labour in favour of #SingleMarket membership, or not? #Brexit  
Good grief. They have as well.  UK being heavily outclassed here in the Brexit information and transparency war.  
May's Tory critics have a common goal: stopping Brexit  
Now that's what I call a referendum. December 1990 Slovenia, turnout: 93%, Yes to independence:88%. SNP have some way to go yet.  
Wake up people! Why are they now calling the Tory Brexit an "extreme" Brexit? To make Labour's own Hard Brexit position sound "softer".  
Team @MichelBarnier have published a whole load of new position papers for the #Brexit negotiations  
Labour will soon be forced to make clear its stance on Brexit, writes @JolyonMaugham 
After David Davis says Moon landing was easier than negotiating Brexit, critics suggest blasting him into space instead. 
How UK is treating its resident EU-citizens is quite probably the most shameful part of the Brexit debacle  
My legal analysis of what lies ahead: The Repeal Bill: Legal and Practical Challenges of Implementing Brexit  
Freedom of movement was a central part of the Lib Dem manifesto, and we will fight for it throughout the brexit process. 
Labour set to sell out Remainers by abstaining on LD Single Market amendment tonight. You can't trust Corbyn on Brexit. 
Seriously? Bad Move! Thousands lent their votes to @UKLabour @jeremycorbyn we helped u break May, now help us break brexit!  
As ever, a cogent and thoughtful piece from @JolyonMaugham on the dilemma facing @UKLabour on the next stages of the UK's Death by #Brexit.  
INVESTMENT: Aussie DIY outfit Bunnings to create 1,000 new jobs in Brexit Britain.  
I counted 14 good reasons on this lorry why I feel the UK will get a #Brexit trade deal.  
Vast majority of Catalan mayors will sign a manifesto next Saturday 1 July in support of holding the independence referendum on 1 October  
Who says Brexit dominates the political agenda? My attempt to ask a #PMQ tieless has roused traditionalists from their slumber. Revolution! 
From the UK's general election fallout, to the latest #Brexit developments, catch up with our weekly briefing  
BBC #Brexit bias needs tackling, says @andrew_allison 
No matter how disastrous David Davis bungles Brexit negotiations, Corbyn will whip Labour MPs to vote through the deal/ no deal. 
Almost all major EU nations want their own referendum - smart!  
The level of jealousy and disdain from #Remoaners & rabid pro-#EU Continentals towards the Brits as they near #Brexit is quite extraordinary  
There isn't a gnat's hair of a difference between a Labour Brexit and a Tory Brexit now.  
#Deloitte’s #German unit study 'hit to German #carmakers from a “no-deal”, will be traumatic'   #BREXIT #BBC #SKY #EU 
So Osborne IS actually good at economics then ? Was the post Brexit economic armageddon just made up then George? 
We're going to stop #Brexit: then Leave will have a genuine reason to blame us.  
Well done and thank you to the @LibDems MPs, keeping up the fight against Brexit one step at a time #QueensSpeech 
Brexit just in time! Merkel reveals Franco-German plot with Macron for more EU integration  
All Labour MPs  This cannot be said enough "many of us through tactical voting" gave our vote to get you elected. We Do Not support BREXIT 
Blackford warns May not to ignore Scottish Government on BrexitWill she be hounded and bullied as well?  
Rolls Royce makes £150m commitment to Brexit Britain with job security for 6,000 in Derby  @theresa_may @DavidDavisMP 
This goes out to all the Corbyn supporters in my mentions telling me they trust Corbyn on Brexit  
Watching #Brexit is like watching a train crash in slow motion.You'd like to say "I told you so" - but some of the cargo onboard is yours. 
Seeking a fudgy 'soft' #Brexit is asking for 'reduced privileges, same obligations, but no rights to a say.' Absurd. Only No Brexit will do. 
All 12 Lib Dem MPs have signed cross-party amendment to #QueensSpeech on preventing an extreme Brexit and staying in single market  
Corbyn must ensure today's single market amendment is backed by "the many not the few" - Lib Dem Brexit Spokesperson @ThomasBrake 
Here's how Davis went down in City meeting on Brexit last year. Use of word "opined" is particularly telling  
EU farming subsidy claimants will be feeling the pinch once brexit hits. Expect UK Taxpayers to foot any shortfall. #bbcdp #ToriesOut #wato 
Hey @DJSnM. Fancy taking a crack at Brexit?  
Igbos Should Have Their Country , “ So Be It” – Sen. Jibril Calls For Referendum – IgbereTV News  
Igbo professionals call for national referendum  
Labour's Brexit split surfaces: amendment backing single market membership chosen for debate.  
Just arrived in Gibraltar to discuss common #Brexit priorities with @FabianPicardo 
Pleased that our Amendment to the Queen's Speech against a job destroying Brexit has been selected for debate in Parliament this afternoon  
The UK has taken 'lots of legal advice' that says it can reject the EU's Brexit bill  
Tories - post Brexit we will build a 'capitalist utopia'Labour - post Brexit we will build a 'socialist utopia'Me - utopia is overrated 
Arrest of islamic extremist Tarik Chadlioui again confirms U.K. security against terrorism will be much improved by Brexit.  
Even the grubby Daily Fail acknowledge that #brexit could end up being a bad idea. Whatever next?  via @ThisIsMoney 
Frustrating there's no Glastonbury next year for Jeremy to explain to 100,000 people why Labour are in favour of hard Brexit. 
The EU sneered at our offer to europeans in the UK after brexit but in Spain you can´t get help even if you were starving on the street. 
Brexit is this, but for "sovereignty"  
Murdoch won't be pleased. It's been claimed he wanted Brexit because weak £ v $ would make this takeover a lot cheaper for him.  
Henry Kissinger: Brexit Can Strengthen Britain's Relationship with America and Its Standing as a 'Security Leader'  
If you had a vote today, how would you vote? #EUReferendum Remain IN the EU?Or respect Brexit vote?Please share FAR & WIDE 
Who would sacrifice EU citizenship for life in a country we now know could turn on us at any moment? #Brexit #Remain 
Labour’s Brexit stance betrays its voters, says @OliverKamm  
Glad that @ChukaUmunna's cross-party amendment also selected today. I'll be voting to reject an extreme #Brexit & a Britain close to Europe. 
Referendum is not war. Its humanrights.@NkirukaNistoran 
Hey @RahulKohli13 Who farted?The world demands an answer before BREXIT reverses.  
This is interesting. Official stats on Brits in Spain. Twice as many of us there than of them here. #Brexit  
We think Tom Brake should run as Lib Dem Leader on a strong Anti-Brexit ticket if @vincecable doesn't support FM 
Jeremy Corbyn pledges to 'open discussions' with Nicola Sturgeon over second independence referendum  
Swiss leader said voters wouldn't tolerate being ruled by foreign judges, they now wait to see what deal Britain gets after Brexit. 
It gets lonely on the edge of Europe: my piece on #Poland and #Brexit in this week's @spectator: 
Labour have the opportunity to put the national interest before the ideology of Jeremy Corbyn. They would be wise to grasp it. #Brexit  
.@oflynnmep writes on the hypocrisy and ignorance of @PhilipHammondUK, and how he threatens #Brexit negotiations:  
On Brexit, the nation now looks to @jeremycorbyn, says The New Statesman. Will he rise to the challenge? 
If you like probability distributions, you'll like this Brexit analysis:  via @business and @simonjkennedy 
Imagine being one of the 171 staff UoM sacked a few weeks ago due to 'Brexit fears' watching this....  
Iraqi Kurdistan will hold an independence referendum Sept 25. Baghdad, neighbors and the West oppose it. My column.  
Labour is looking to exploit Tory divisions over #Brexit in the final round of Commons votes on the #QueensSpeech 
Correction: You're the man who got brexit wrong"Globalisation is bad" *Introduces global britain" 
Labour's gonna have to come clean with the electorate about which way it faces on Brexit. And soon. Here's why  
'Everyone conspired against Thatcher, she lasted 10 years!' Rees-Mogg backs May on Brexit  
Another vote of confidence in a post-Brexit Britain: Rolls-Royce plans new test plant for Derby  
I'm a Corbynist and I don't want Brexit 
Following hundreds of letters and emails to MPs and a 38,000 strong petition, we've got brilliant news on Brexit...  
Brexit, conceived to heal a rift in the Tory party, may now bury Britain  
Most likely #Brexit outcome is a Norway-style deal, where UK must abide by EU rules but has no say - @fromTGA 
Corbyn says we've had enough of austerity. Leaving the Single Market as he wants will make austerity worse. #Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain 
Jeremy & Labour calling on MPs to support a 'jobs first' Brexit as the party looks to influence the UKs EU exit deal 
I realised that I was not welcome at what I call home for 18 years when TM declared me Brexit #BargainingChip in July 2016. 
Aha! Not just that. The six geo-political zones are not recognized in the constitution. So fraudulent in everything. Referendum pls! 
EU citizens leaving"We understand that our rights in Theresa May’s offer could be revoked post-Brexit at any time"  
Either Labour have a very cunning plan, or they don't have a clue what they're on aboutA good Brexit is impossible 
I want a unreservedly anti #brexit party. Cable becomes leader I'm off. Greens I guess. 
As Brexit complexities become clear, people will be asking 'isn't this too much bother?'  My @theipaper column: 
Kissinger: Brexit Will Bring UK Closer to USA, Improve Standing as ‘Security Leader’  
By opposing Freedom of Movement @vincecable is opposing everything the @LibDems should stand for. #Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain 
Next leader #Conservatives #Tories Who would you trust and vote for? #GE2017 #ukip #Brexit #bbcnews #skynews RETWEET after you vote. 
On #Brexit Corbyn is in bed with Farage, Murdoch, Dacre, Rees Mogg et al.He is betraying all Labour stands for. #StopBrexit #Remain 
If Brexit creates fresh economic shock then the implications for tax take and thus public finances are ominous: you won't see that on a bus. 
in despair at the impractial dogmatism of some Lib Dems; you know guys, we can still oppose all Brexit while working to stop hard Brexit 
An extreme Brexit means heavy job losses! @UKLabour must support amendments pressing for UK to remain in the single market & customs union 
Great speech!"The Government’s Brexit policy is basically one of trying to fill a swimming pool with a teaspoon."  
The majority of Labour voters voted remain and the basis of the slim win for Leave was based on lies. Corbyn’s pro Brexit stance is baffling 
Has there ever been a better example of being completely out of touch with an increasingly awakening electorate?  
Labour commitment to Brexit is a dreadful misjudgement, didn't Jeremy C. learn anything from Glastonbury experience?  
Corbyn has always wanted Brexit. He's wanted Brexit for 40 years. Labour are selling us down the river to appease their leaders ideology.  
Davis is a dangerous driver of the Brexit bus, writes @jennirsl  
Friday night is is for the partyyy! A very close vote..but not as close as the EU Referendum   
Off to a business meeting to discuss #Brexit. Real concerns building given lack of coherence from and division in U.K. Gov. 
Schrodinger's Brexit: both with and without tariffs at the same time.  
We’re witnessing the last thrashing about of a dinosaur called ‘Exclusion’. Brexit is its offspring  
What if the will of the people is now for a second referendum on Brexit? | Karan Bilimoria  
It's Brexit for breakfast as we get proceedings for #Seafest 2017 underway with a discussion on fisheries with industry and stakeholders 
Yet another election post-mortem saying Tories must reconnect w young & social liberals while pursuing Brexit & getting into bed with DUP. 
Anguished Letter of the Day from a Citizen of Nowhere on Brexit @FT 
We're beginning to see what UK has been propping up as EU faces post Brexit spending cuts  
How Britain’s Brexiters lost control of Brexit  via @FT 
RESTRUCTURE REFERENDUM Anything...WE CANNOT CONTINUE LIKE THIS  
Another (small but symbolic?) effect of #Brexit?  
Scotland's Brexit minister Russell makes clear Holyrood agreeing LCM is "not a given" (From HeraldScotland)  
What do we want? Andrea Leadsom for Prime Minister! When do we want it? In our distopian mega Brexit patriotic world where everyone dies. 
German Finance Minister hopes UK will realise "mistake" on Brexit. Yes. That we didn't leave sooner!  
53% of people say that there should be a second vote on Brexit. TMay only interested in keeping backbenchers happy.  
EU to soften position over ECJ role in citizen’s rights | ‘Lots of legal advice’ to reject €60 billion 'Brexit bill'  
My latest piece for Brexit Central - why the Chancellor is wrong to say leaving the EU with no deal would be "very, very bad".  
Hundreds sign petition against Derby university accommodation becoming asylum seeker centre | Derby Telegraph 
Kanu Rejects Calls For Restructuring, Insists On Referendum #PowerBelongsToBiafrans #NoBiafraReferendumNoElection 
It's time for the pussyfooting to stop. No-one with any knowledge of the realities wants #Brexit. Just stop it & get back to normal.  
The Archbishop of York wants Brexit to help the poor. It will if we use it to cut food tariffs and energy bills.  
"Brexit will leave EU with £20BILLION budget blackhole"  
If you think Brexit is somehow sticking it to the rich and powerful, you really need to think harder  
Nigeria said there's no 'Referendum' in their constitution; so I ask, where's 'Restructure' in their constitution?@Amaka_Ekwo @NkemdiMary 
Merkel, Bundestag: "Priority for us" is not Brexit but our own future as 27. 
I've said it once and I will say it again. Brexit is Austerity re-branded. 
Let's be clear, saying that EU nationals can regularise their status post Brexit is insulting. All EU nationals are here legally already.  
READ | German Finance Minister still hopes UK will change its mind on Brexit. These clowns have learnt nothing! 
In the Concert Hall in Copenhagen - getting ready to talk on science journalism and Brexit. #ECSJ2017 
Here are 12 things Brexit has well and truly already ruined  
Scotland's economy is teetering on recession due to SNP neglect, FAI report makes clear that this is nothing to do with Brexit or Oil.  
The real economic levers - fiscal and monetary policy - lie in the hands of Westminster and the Bank of England.Not to mention Brexit. 
Different bodies and #thinktanks in #Brussels interested in the #1Oct Catalan referendum.  
EU citizens living in the UK - find out how #Brexit will affect you:  #citizensrights 
If ever there was an oxymoron, it's 'Good Brexit'.We need to embolden moderate Tories to stand up for what is right for UK & #StopBrexit 
Surprised @BBCBreakfast can't find a weathergirl who can blame the rain on Theresa May, Brexit or Ulster Unionists. 
So, Mr Corbyn, you seem very popular with Remain-backing young people. What's your position on Brexit?  
Brexit under scrutiny as Corbyn seeks to exploit May’s minority Government. People gave Mandate to Leave Single MKT!  
One year on from the referendum, a look back at why people voted for Brexit. Read @jrf_uk's analysis:  
Estonia’s e-residency offers EU bolthole to Britons facing Brexit:  
Remember when we were promised an easy Brexit? @Nick_Clegg does  
BFE: Referendum Anniversary WKNDR! #5 Devon For Europe Sea The Tide Has Turned! @Devon4Europe @16MillionRising #StopBrexit #nomandate 
Good piece by brilliant colleague @Lord_Bilimoria What if the will of the people is now for a second referendum?  
Business finally brought to the Brexit table with the formation of a new Government advisory group -  
Davis is a dangerous driver of the Brexit bus  Denial about economic impact of Brexit exposed #onetoread 
If done badly, Brexit will bankrupt many, lead to a brain drain and leave the UK a tax haven with dubious factories.  
Arewa "intellectuals", use emerging media to educate and sensitize the masses. Explain the new terms, i.e. referendum and restructuring. 
Nnamdi Kanu Rejects Calls For Restructuring, Insists On Referendum | Independent Newspapers  
你好 (ni-hao), comrade. How is the weather in Peking?In a 1975 referendum, 97.5% Sikkimese voted to join India.It's called democracy.  
Brexit could blow €20bn hole in EU budget, warns European commissioner  
Steve Bell’s If ... Theresa May and David Davis a bright Brexit future  
N.B., UK: This Ukraine-Canada free trade deal took 7 years to set up. Still - 1 year less than a Moonshot, eh? #Brexit #Bridiocy 
Has anyone provided any evidence of a single industrial or finance job created in anticipation of Brexit? 
Theresa May =  = Hard BrexitJeremy Corbyn =  = Hard BrexitVince Cable =  = Hard BrexitNicola Sturgeon= Remain 
It's not like these guys have much respect for democracy: cancelled elections, denied presidential referendum & annulled National Assembly. 
This one picture did massive damage to the Remain campaign, to many the word Schengen was meaningless & still is. Brexit lies Mr Farage!  
lets get real and build what alliances are possible bit by bit to defeat Brexit. Cable is seeking to do that. Let's have some pragmatism. 
BrexitCredit Ratings Agency Moodys Says Isle Of Man Economy Faces A Nietzschean Abyss As A Result Of Brexit#iom 
I never trusted in this leadership of Jeremy Corbyn & John McDonnell: They secretly wanted Brexit for their socialistic plans going forward.  
Dear @jeremycorbyn a Job First #Brexit means cancelling Brexit - just come out & say it. Get off the Brexit fence!  
Labour seeks to exploit Tory divisions over Brexit  
US @VP Vice President Mike Pence reading a @sikhsforjustice leaflet promoting Sikh Referendum for Independence of Panjab from Hindutva India  
Biafra Agitators Demand Equity, Call For Referendum • Channels Television  
Scots Shower Trump With Glorious Scottish Insults After His Brexit Tweet  via @9GAG  
Hard to believe Britain is charging towards disaster based on the lies of two clowns, Farage and Johnson.It's not too late.#Brexit. 
The #Brexit Effect: Salvaging Investment into #UK #Startups  #biotech 
Why Brexit really does mean Brexit: Three signs that Theresa May will get tough on EU immigration  via @TelegraphNews 
Brexit likely to have 'catastrophic' effect on UK, the good news is with concerted effort it's unlikely to happen.  
#CLIMATE #p2 RT  UK risks becoming 'dumping ground' for plastic after Brexit  #tlot #ccot 
#FreeWestPapua march in #London 15 August demanding a new #Referendum for #WestPapua after the #NewYorkAgreement  pic.twitter.com/7Oc1JOoMZ3 
David Davis: #Brexit 'as complicated as moon landing'  Somehow this was not the impression given by leave campaign... 
The Folly of Procrastination  #tweetni #RevivalKey #Ulster #Reformation #Equality #Respect #Brexit  
Barry Sheerman Tory Ministers sleep walking zombies over their disastrous deal with EU #Brexit#MayMustGo #Newsnight #JC4PM 
"Our cancer survival rates [in the UK] are among the worst in Europe" - but never mind funding for cancer treatment, let's blow it on Brexit  
It took a year to start the Brexit negotiations while Saudi Arabia and sidekicks finished Qatarexit in days. That's Arab efficiency for you. 
German finance minister hopes UK 'will realise #Brexit mistake'  
David Davis says that Brexit will be harder than landing on the moon.That's one small step for Brexiters, one giant leap for Remainers. 
The word on the streets is that brexit has got about 6 months to live. So 1) cons fall 2) Lab/LD coalition 3) stay in SM, FOM, #stopbrexit pic.twitter.com/s7PctE51Vw 
How much more of this are we meant to take? 'EU children may have to apply to stay in UK after Brexit-leaked report'  
If you want to know how out of touch Tories are on Brexit, here's David Jones MP...@EvanHD:"What planet are you on?!"#Newsnight 
Please RT if you believe protest against Brexit at the Conservative National Conference is needed! Ohhh.. Please join!  
Massoud Barzani: the Kurdistan independence referendum in Sept will be "binding". A non-binding one in 'O5 got 98.8%  
Former Brexit minister David Jones argues that 80% of people voted for parties wanting to leave the EU in the election #newsnight 
Leaks and semen: premature release is not what EU #brexit team wants. We publish Thursday papers sent today to member states, as always.  
If you're in Calgary and would like to learn more about the unity agreement & referendum, please come to our townhall tomorrow night.  
The chaos of #Brexit was all down to internal Tory politics. How can anyone still believe the Tories put country before party? #newsnight 
Last one out turn off the lights! "More than 1 million foreign workers are preparing to leave UK because of #Brexit"  
Tories trying to say all those who voted Labour & Tory are pro Brexit is a grotesque manipulation of truth  #Newsnight 
"Brexit could slow access to new medicines" 
Evan Davies just hit the nail on the head Theresa May is now merely pawn between the hard/soft Brexit factions in her party #Newsnight 
What if the will of the people is now for a second referendum on Brexit? 
'EU desperately needs Britain' Brussels urged to offer UK access to markets after Brexit  
Removal of Freedom of Movement won't affect the rich and powerful. It will be a restoration of privilege.#Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain 
Couldn't do it for Brexit but we know that if Johnny and Tyla could couple up there'd be one vote that would unite Britain #loveisland 
TONIGHT: Former education secretary Nicky Morgan says Tories should consider replacing Theresa May once Brexit deal is on the table  
I voted @LibDems for the 1st time. If under @vincecable anti-Brexit policy changes, that's me gone. 
THIS IS WORSE THAN BREXIT RESULTS DAY #LoveIsIand 
A Storm is coming 
Very upsetting to see the Brexit bung so effortlessly provided while our NHS creaks.  
Tories are out of control, moved from covert manipulation of elections and referendums to outright bribery and paying for votes #ToriesOut 
May's immigration obsession is wrecking the UK's place as a destination for Indian students to the benefit of other countries.#Brexit  
When asked *So you would be totally against Brexit then?* Ed Davey said *Yes* Simple honest effective reasoned. It's what @LibDems should be 
This is all so very very depressing - there is no political party prepared to stop this ridiculous #Brexit farce!!@BrexitBin @peterwalker99 
When more MPs rediscover their consciences and reappraise the true impact of Brexit then, at last, the UK be free to fly again within the EU  
Germany hopes UK will realise #brexit is a mistake as it sees EU continue to prosper. 
UK always had "freedom to play a positive role in the world". That freedom restricts on Brexit... and desperation leads to Saudi arms deals.  
Why is NGR govt @ProfOsinbajo threatening war against peaceful #Biafra that only demand #Referendum @UN is selfdetermination a call for war? 
Brexit inflation is worse than you think when you factor in Shrinkflation. Britain can't afford the price of Brexit. #StopBrexit 
Who paid for the leave vote? #Brexit should be halted until we know | George Monbiot  
EU children may have to apply to stay in UK after Brexit, leaked analysis says  
David Davis says Brexit is "as complicated as a moon landing". Relax. We've got our best team on it.  
Brexit Fact #39'Over the next ten to 15 years, 90% of world demand will be generated outside Europe.' — the European Commission.  #EU27 
EU children may have to apply to stay in UK after Brexit, leaked analysis says  
Must be a bit like saying 'the Emperor has no clothes,' but I dare someone on either front bench to say 'Brexit isn't ever going to work.' 
I think voters would be wise to choose that once they see the details of a Brexit deal, which cannot possibly be as good as EU membership  
It's looking like Brexit will consume itself and disappear down a dark hole, just as uncomfortably and unconvincingly as it first landed.  
#Sweden And The #EU Move To Protect #ISIS In Europe..@JunckerEU And .@SwedishPM Are Insane!!#Brexit #EuropeIsDead 
My favourite line in @Andrew_Adonis speech..."Government’s Brexit policy is basically one of trying to fill a swimming pool with a teaspoon" 
Chris Patten: Should Britain have held a sovereignty referendum in Hong Kong? #HongKongHandover 
Do you ever get the feeling that people are more are prepared for a zombie invasion than for Brexit? #StopBrexit 
Tour de Brexit: "OK, route planners, we start in Dusseldorf. Then we get as far away from the UK as we can, and we stay there." #TDF2017 
It's my democratic right to oppose moves that will damage the country and citizens as much as Brexit will, and I intend on doing so. 
Mark Carney suggests interest rates may rise soon, sending the pound soaring  
Karan Bilimoria, Chairman of Cobra Beer calls for referendum on Deal vs Remain.More support for @LibDems policy 
Brexit is just the beginning of seismic constituional changes in the UK. It’s time England had its own voice  
UK risks becoming 'dumping ground' for plastic after Brexit  
"Ignore doom-mongers, Brexit can be done on UK terms" — ex-RE officer + diplomat Adrian Hills: 
Just want to go back to a more innocent time. Before #Brexit, before #Trump, before I knew what cladding was. 
All the best Brexit coverage.  
European Council on Foreign Relations moves from London to Berlin due to Brexit  
European Financials hit a 23-month high, up 58% from their post-Brexit lows. $EUFN 
German diplomat Peter Ammon is “unnerved” by the Brexit divorce debate   
#Brexit-who paid for it? 
The wonderful Brexit negotiating doc on animal semen and oocytes. We salute the eu lawyer who drafted this.  
Only two days left to make June the end of May. Ok, let's aim to make July the end of #Brexit and all its insane acolytes.  
I'm a lib dems member.I won't vote for anyone who supports brexit for lib dems leadership!!!  
Semen, bulls and Brexit - I enjoyed writing this  
Brexit must mean ending EU judges control, Britain helped draw up EU law but then they got out of control with aims of forming a Superstate. 
Dear @GuyVerhofstadt please let your colleagues and friends know that #McrStillLovesEU and we are fighting #Brexit! We will #Remain! 
No lift of nurses pay cap. ->unhappy,stressed nurses ->impacts on patient care ->nurses leave ->Brexit forces more out ->Mid-Staffs #2  
HUMAN RIGHTS FARCE: Criminals CAN'T be sent back as jail cells in Romania are TOO SMALL 
UK Government's offer to EU citizens and their families in the UK:  #brexit #citizensrights 
'Just get on and LEAVE the EU!' Peter Bone calls on PM to deliver Brexit 'NOW'  
German finance minister hopes UK 'will realise Brexit mistake'  
David Davis: Brexit will be "as complicated as moon landing"  
My vote for Labour was a 'stop May' vote. If Labour keep on pushing exactly same Brexit as Tories, my next vote will be 'stop May + Corbyn'. 
Poll Free movement of EU citizens into the UK must end when we #Brexit.77% Agree22% Disagree  1% Don't Know  409 votes  Final results 
Ministers are looking at creating a new body to oversee EU citizens' rights in the UK #Brexit  
Moon landing took 8 years and thousands of the world's most brilliant scientists and engineers. Brexit has 2 years and David Davis.  
But not long ago Davis said #Brexit would give UK "exact same benefits" as being in the EU ...  
European Commission Planning EU-Wide Taxes to Fill Post-Brexit Black Hole  
What Brexit, Trump, and the tide of nationalism really mean for business.  @PankajGhemawat 
Plans for ID cards for EU nationals will prove controversial in Brexit talks, says MEP  
You didn't seem to worry when EU gave Spain veto over UK Brexit deals involving #Gibraltar thus turning its people into #bargainingchips. 
Labour Against Brexit will be proud to march with fellow Remainers as we all step up our campaign to #StopBrexit 
David Davis has said Brexit will be harder than landing on the moon.It is official: Brexit is beyond lunacy. 
The EU says Brexit is going blow a hole in its budget and stretch it to breaking point  
And on the DUP deal. Country wants stability; Prime Minister gets that and we will get on with delivering BREXIT as we are sent here to do.  
David Davis's assertion that Brexit is harder than the moon landing ignores the fact that Britain never actually managed a moon landing 
IMPORTANT REPORT out tomorrow from the Rec on post Brexit immigration policy.Keep a look out huge issue for employers & recruiters alike 
Clueless man tells clueless party that leadership contest to depose clueless leader could damage clueless Brexit negotiations.*sigh*  
'We are moving from a choice between Hard or Soft Brexit to one of Soft Brexit or no Brexit at all.' That's why we need ppl 2 have final say  
The EURef #Remain campaign was far too focused on fixing the EU's failings, not on its vastly greater benefits.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
MP 'flabbergasted' as government can't say how many treaties need renegotiating after Brexit 
EU is already making public plans to fill the budget deficit caused by Brexit. Meanwhile the UK gazes at its navel pondering idle fantasies. 
Watch our CEO Philippa Stroud tell @matthew_elliott how Britain can become a global trading partner and build a strong economy after #Brexit  
Now it's clear- 28 members but we contribute 16% of the EU budget. No wonder the EU don't want us to Leave. #Brexit  
48k votes and 78% of respondents would vote remain a year on from the referendum... of   
The truth is that inevitable British success post-Brexit will damage the credibility of the so-called (and totally disharmonious!) EU. 
The level of jealousy and disdain from Remoaners and rabid pro-EU Continentals towards the Brits as they near Brexit is quite extraordinary. 
If the @LibDems do not oppose #Brexit there will have to be a new #Remain party which will take away most of their votes. #StopBrexit 
I've just joined. If, under @vincecable, we don't carry on opposing Brexit, I'll leave. @LibDems @BromleyLibDems 
'Remainers can't even decide what 'Hard Brexit' means' - Lord Lamont  
The idea that we can become an exporting power house simply by leaving the customs union is another Brexit delusion  
A "jobs first" Brexit?Sorry, Brexit has already hit our reputation and currency first. Jobs is a mere third on the hit list. 
Public fury is inevitable if Theresa May fudges Brexit.  
Just once i'd like to hear the positive case for eternal London rule & brexit from unionist leaders, instead of how rubbish the FM & SNP are 
Tories:£6m pay rise for Queen £1bn DUP bribe £70bn brexit fee £200bn trident renewal Lifting public sector pay cap  #scrapthecap 
Great to meet @SebDance to discuss EU and UK proposals for 4.5m EU nationals' #citizensrights on both sides of the channel post #Brexit  
I want a "Sod Brexit"  
Great meeting with @GuyVerhofstadt talking protection of 3m EU nationals #citizensrights in UK & for @BritishInEurope post #Brexit  
Now is not the time for a new PM or another election. Brexit full steam ahead. Watch in full here for @TipTVPolitics  
The #brexit "no deal" option will stop the UK economy in it's tracks. Stop pretending it is ok @daviddavis @theresa_may @BorisJohnson #pmqs 
"annoying that they decided the outcome when it won't affect them..."Like the elderly population that voted for Brexit? 
.@Andrew_Adonis: "Brexit is a revolution that devours its children"  
German finance minister Wolfgang Schaeuble says he hopes EU develops so well that the British people realise they made a mistake with Brexit 
Brexit bill boost: Brussels 'doesn't have a leg to stand on' with £88bn demand say lawyers  
I can't quite equate Scottish Labour's position that an independent Scotland working with EU is bad but staying part of Brexit Britain good. 
Thread.  I was in Belfast soon after referendum and everybody asked: why were we forgotten?  
Representatives of @The3Million and I are worried that the UK is using EU citizens as bargaining chips. #Brexit  
Why not conduct a referendum and give them their Biafra so that the rest of us can hear word? Abeg give them their Biafra biko...  
Friends! Another Brexit disaster!As EU outsiders, Britons will be unable to participate in paying these new taxes.  
Britain is paying dearly for the incompetence and stupidity of an elite which is insufficiently challenged by social mobility.#Brexit  
The rest of Europe is recovering and economies growing. If it were not for #Brexit we would be in for 4/5 years of economic boom. 
I agree with @Feorlean re Brexit not happening. "Soft" Brexit  = more "Brussels rule." Impossible for Tories 2 sell  
#Brexit will expose Britain to bullying by the multinationals which the EU works to protect us from #StopBrexit 
Good to see Chairman of Cobra Beer Karan Bilimoria backing our call for a referendum on final Brexit deal 
Brexit is not a poker game: How political metaphors mislead us  
@UN Still Happenin At #Nnamdkanu Home Town 28th June 2017,Power Belongs To The People Not The Govt' It's All about #Referendum Not About War  
Kickstarter for A Brexit Bedtime Story. I've had a read of this and it is simultaneously lovely, funny and savage  
Brexit: Ex-EU Judge Accuses Brussels of ‘Imperialism’ as Negotiations Stumble  
5 - Brexit was always just the will of some people. And even that has changed. The will of the majority of Britons now is to Remain. 
UK will fund Joint European Torus plasma fusion experiment beyond Brexit @fusionenergy #FlashPhysics  
When they say "SOFT BREXIT" they mean "BUSINESS BREXIT". They want the free movement of goods and capital, but not peopleIt's impossible 
If Britain cannot escape meddling foreign judges, some will wonder what the point of Brexit really was  
WATCH: Jacob Rees-Mogg DESTROYS European Court of Justice and Brussels in House of Commons  via @Your Brexit 
If Vince Cable is foisted on @LibDems members, the party is finished IMO. We need fresh No Brexit voice. @LibDemPress would do well to heed. 
Britain would still vote for Brexit:  Poll – Westmonster.           #ma4t 
Brexit will collapse under the weight of its absurdity. And the problems revealed during the inevitable transitional period. 
Patrick Harvie demands a referendum NOW!Good plan, he could hoover up a lot of fucking nutters to join the greens. 
We Remainers do not want an old Brexit appeaser like @vincecable in charge of the LibDems. We want a young, passionate Remainer like Macron. 
#IPOB Led By #Nnamdikanu Satisfaction Is To Give Indigenous People Of Biafra #Referendum To decide Their Future Generation, #Biaframustgo 
The remoaner Hammond is still trying to keep us in the EU.Thank goodness we have David Davis as the Brexit secretary. 
The Brexit plague: this week's cover ...  
Brexit: The scale of lies & deceit means that the electorate have been denied informed consent.  
Brexit: You voted for it, you pay for it. Tax increases for everyone, not just the many or the few. #MagicMoneyTree #StopBrexit 
Brexit is a policy that will damage the UK globally, make us all poorer and further empower extremists. 
No 10 insists Hammond and Johnson are “on the same page” regarding Brexit negotiations, but admit they have book upside down. 
By moderates he means those who don't want a crippling Hard Brexit.  
#Brexit can & will be stopped. 
EU citizens should get MORE rights than Britons, says Labour 
UK risks becoming 'dumping ground' for plastic after Brexit  
#Brexit : We now know that  a) Leave Lied b) Brexit is National Suicide c) Brexit is evil in it's impact on people. We must then : 
UK’s Brexit negotiators claim they have had “lots of legal advice” suggesting that the €60 billion Brexit bill shouldn't be paid to Brussels 
Could “Stay” have stuck better than “Remain” in last year’s referendum vote?  
With my @Plaid_Cymru colleague @BenMLake discussing #Brexit with @BritishVets VP John Fishwick. Look forward to further discussions soon. 
Who paid for the leave vote? Brexit should be halted until we know | George Monbiot  I have to say I agree 
Hung Parliament gives different responsibility for Brexit plan - @YvetteCooperMP 
"To deny people their human rights is to challenge their very humanity. Referendum now. #inTirol #youth #FreeBiafra 
Exit from #Brexit is the decent thing to do. This nonsense must stop. We are making fools of ourselves and wasting everybody's time. 
Does Sturgeon’s decision to “reset”  #indyref2 leave Scotland as the only EU country without a vote on Brexit? 
Here's a first look at this week's magazine cover: The Brexit plague. Subscribe here:  
Save BIAFRANS from genocide and extermination under the brutality of Nigeria government .Referendum now. #FreeBiafra 
What if the will of the people is now for a second referendum on Brexit? | Karan Bilimoria  
European Commission Plans EU-Wide Taxes to Fill Post-Brexit Financial Black Hole:  
You can make it 7 or even 21 groups but it won't change the fact that Brexit has got no benefits whatsoever.  
Jeremy Corbyn MP: My vote for Labour was NOT a vote for Brexit - Sign the Petition!  via @UKChange 
To prioritise the economy in #Brexit talks, we need to stay in the Single Market, as our pamphlet makes clear  
If Britain cannot escape meddling foreign judges, some will wonder what the point of Brexit is, says @RupertMyers 
Brexit will leave a £5.3 billion black hole in the EU budget  
Self-determination is our inalienable right. let #Biafra decide through #referendum @UN forward ever backward never 
Also, @openDemocracy are crowd-funding further investigation into where Brexit money came from. Please chip in!  
New poll shows the public want to prioritise the economy in #Brexit negotiations, ahead of immigration #LeaveWatch ? 
UK risks becoming 'dumping ground' for plastic after Brexit  
Jings today is anniversary. Support still entirely there when needed, indyref off the table for now, but brexit remains very much on it.  
Huge moment as Downing St confirms public sector pay cap effectively under review. Fallout from what was supposed to be the Brexit election. 
#Brexit will not bring regulatory sovereignty. Regulatory standards are set by the EU, USA & China. #StopBrexit #Remain #LeaveLies 
EU exploring invisible border in Ireland post Brexit 
Spot on by @GeorgeMonbiot: 'Who paid for the leave vote? Brexit should be halted until we know'  
From today's @FinancialTimes #EUcitizens #Brexit  
'Brexit has become the black hole at centre of our politics.' Every word of this is true, isn't it? From today's Guardian  
We want referendum, not war, says IPOB 
The EU May Need to Introduce a Bloc-Wide Tax After Brexit  
Here's what the British Social Attitudes survey found out about people's views on Brexit and immigration #pmqs  
3 working groups will examine Brexit issues such as citizens' rights, Theresa May says  #PMQs 
"We know the plan we've got. The party that doesn't know what its plan for #Brexit is... is his party" - May slams Labour during #PMQs 
The Tories are lying over Brexit. They are lying over the costs, the effect, the impact. But so are Labour. They are both lying to us. 
Now view that leaving EU is only option has been undermined & it is time to start talking about no #Brexit at all  
UK risks becoming 'dumping ground' for plastic after Brexit  
All this faux outrage about 'Scotland alone not being given a vote on Brexit' - Scotland isn't a member state of the EU. Member states vote. 
Question from Gavin Newlands on "affront to democracy" of Ian Duncan's elevation to Lords. Demands place at Brexit talks for ScotGov #pmqs 
I'm happy to let Labour be Labour but they'll soon lose my respect if they start telling us to shut up over Brexit and get on with it 
Henry Kissinger says Brexit will bring Britain closer to the US  
Meeting at the EP with @The3Million & @BritishInEurope to discuss #Brexit and citizens rights with @GUENGL 
Want to know more about our ideas #Brexit & future of #EUbudget? Here is the reflection paper:  #EUaddedValue 
Wow wow ! The voice of the people is the voice of God. The people have spoken! #Biafra #Referendum  
Put it n your diaries. Time to kill #Brexit stone dead.  
Sorry, but this Brexit amendment should contain a ref on the final deal. It's useless without it. Labour has let down Remainers once again  
Here's cross-party list of MPs *genuinely* fighting Tories hard #Brexit.NO to leaving single market/customs unionYES to vote on final deal  
I am ambitious & realistic: #Brexit gap needs financed by cuts&more money, new tasks with fresh money. Will be mix. #EUaddedValue #EUbudget 
did the psychographics run by Cambridge Analytica alter the Brexit referendum? @BBCNewsnight investigates 
Spanish police questioned Catalan government officials on the preparations for the independence referendum  
'A great backstabber!' Patriot Lord Tebbit HITS BACK at QUISLING  Heseltine's attempts to derail Brexit  
What Boris Johnson should have done after the referendum was say the result was split, the nations are divided, and so it can't be done. 
.@BBCRealityCheck answers your questions on #Brexit citizens’ rights  
I have signed amendment to Queen's Speech on no deal Brexit, vote on final deal, transitional arrangements, CU & Single Market, EU Citizens  
Most likely outcome now is Corbyn keeps hard line on Brexit, Tories will soften to survive and Labour recovery ends 
It's still happening 28th June 2017 at Umuahia #IPOB & Motivation self Determination across Biafra land still remains the same #referendum  
Cabinet split over Brexit as Hammond has a dig at Boris Johnson by Dave Simonds - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
You put the finger right where it hurts most. This used to be home, all 28 years. Now just sadness and sense of loss. #EUNationals #Brexit 
Such a weak & pathetic argument it makes me weep. I will not be forced into accepting Brexit based on this level of idiotic reasoning.   
#Brexit Facts: How much NORWAY pays for EU SM access with NO VOTING POWER & OBLIGATION TO ADOPT EU rules & regulation #StopBrexit #remain pic.twitter.com/dAjlIXK2ec 
The Sun admits that it lied about Brexit purely to make Murdoch richer.Clarifications and Corrections: there is no evidence of this.  
David Simonds take @EveningStandard on the Cabinet battles over Brexit  
And we're done! Last Seanad #Brexit meeting, report agreed & will be launched next week  
Imagine the present crowd of Biafrans in #Ohamadike 1 of Biafra hometown  @Amaka_ekwo @potus #Referendum 
Things UK govt can afford:£1.5 bln DUP bribe£6 mln pay rise for Queen£70 bln Brexit feeThings UK govt can't afford:Fireproof cladding 
PM has already let us down by continuing benefits for EU citizens in UK after #Brexit & extending Freedom of Movement til 2021#Disgraceful 
Whatever the merits of Brexit in principle (and am neutral on that) difficult to see how it survives any costs-benefits analysis. 
#Brexit can be summed up as the process whereby we pay a fortune that we do not have for an inferior version of what we already have. 
The stars over Oxford are European…   (And my analysis of Brexit 1 year after the vote) @ecfr @CER_Grant 
When it comes to Brexit, I will 'snipe' at any party putting its leaders ideology before the best interests of the country. But thanks  
I like Corbyn, but tweets like this are off-putting. The mandate for IndyRef2 still stands and it will be necessary in the wake of Brexit. 
Britain is now more Eurosceptic than ever, so public fury is inevitable if Theresa May fudges #Brexit #premium 
Just over a year ago we voted for #Brexit  I am starting to get concerned we won't get the Brexit we voted for...  
If anyone spots errors of fact on Brexit or EU from any politician (either side), let me know as I am sure they will want to get it right. 
"Brexit is terribly simple - goodbye". Lord Tebbit tells @EmmaBarnett how he thinks May's cabinet should be handling the talks #5liveDaily 
May appoints Minister for Contradicting Brexit Ministers  
Am delighted to assist @DanielJHannan when he errs on Brexit and EU detail.Important that debate based on accurate information.  
Anna Soubry calls out Theresa May over Brexit and shows why she is one of the few Tory MPs who I respect. 
SNP Brexit Minister @Feorlean says the UK Govt is excluding devolved governments from Brexit, had no briefing on last week's negotiations. 
Who paid for the leave vote? Brexit should be halted until we know:George Monbiot #Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain 
the brexit version of being drunk and shirtless in the street shouting "she's turned the weans against us"  
Scotland's Brexit Minister @Feorlean tells committee he offered other parties talks on Scotland's priorities two weeks ago....no response. 
In Brussels, Scotland seen as the 'common sense' voice in the UK on EU/Brexit @FionaHyslop tells @SCER_eu @StrathIPPI 
Proposals for EU citizens’ post-Brexit rights worry universities  via @timeshighered #brexit #brexittalks 
Remember Anything is possible if enough decent people are prepared to stand up against the Establishment 
Brexit must mean ending EU judges’ control over us  
Watch Secretary of State David Davis in the @HouseofCommons, talking about the need to work together for a successful Brexit  
It takes a special kind of Lunatic Retweet if you Agree 
FFS stabbings every day bad cladding everywhere will we get  a hard Brexit, trains full up weeks see doctor rubbish TV horrendus MPs 2017  
Colonel Richard Kemp warns there are MORE than 23,000 potential Jihadists in the UK - Your Brexit  
The Brexit Elite don't care about UK. They just care about how much the can rip off our nation.  
Who paid for the leave vote? Brexit should be halted until we know | George Monbiot   ISSUES IDENTIFIED VERY WORRYING 
Scotland's Sturgeon postpones second independence vote until after #Brexit  More updates  
Periodic reminder: You can think EU is dangerous centralisation project but better than dimwitted nativist catastrophe of Brexit. 
After #Brexit the UK will be reduced to yelling from the sidelines at an EU which continues to exert considerable influence over us#Remain 
Europe’s populist tide has turned – leaving Brexit Britain washed up | James Newell  
"Foreign business investment will halt if we vote for Brexit" the Remainers said."Rubbish" we said.Who's right?   
NICOLA Sturgeon’s referendum fudge didn’t have many takers at Holyrood yesterday.  
I'm Scottish and I want another independence referendum. For an Englishman to tell me I DON'T want that is #gaslighting and #problematic. 
Well, Yes, Obviously - Brexit Leaves EU Scrambling For Money  
Boris Johnson was sacked by his editor for fabricating quotes as a journalist. Now as Foreign #brexit Secretary, he does it with impunity.  
So is it just possible that #Brexit is not such a good idea?  
Most MPs know very well that #brexit is a disaster. But they are too afraid of the billionaire media to speak up about brexit.  
Passport to Pimlico is the ultimate anti-Brexit film + an allegory of why it might just not be feasibleHere's why:  
Bloomberg now echoes the German Finance Minister.The City of London will thrive after #Brexit  
This is actually where Britain's Brexit leverage is, not silly things like EU citizens or security threats:  
Nicola Sturgeon isn't really backing away from independence she's waiting for Brexit to do her job for her  
Watch out for Tory misinformation as their Brexit collapses. From today's @ScotNational #buyapaper 
Like Brexit, the promises made before the Boaty McBoatface vote do not live up to the reality.  
Can the City survive Brexit? Yes, says Bloomberg. Not all doom & gloom for financial services after all.  
Clearest evidence of what we know from BSAC re Brexit demographics: Over-55s outvoted under-55s during #euref ... under 45s in particular... 
The @CityAM DEBATE: Is the Tories’ £1bn DUP deal a fair price to secure Brexit? YES: meNO: @vincecable 
New British Social Attitudes Survey - much on declining tolerance of austerity - fascinating on Brexit too: 
I find it annoying/insulting how these people think everyone who supports corbyn and voted remain thinks he will stop brexit  
The EU should have zero control over UK after Brexit!!! Come on May get on with it!! The people spoke!! 
Extraordinary, it's almost as if two big statements from the FM on #indyref2 ended up distracting attention from #Brexit over the past year  
Brexiteers cannot understand the psychological effect that Brexit has had on us.It has changed everything in terms of how we feel being here 
May’s magic money machine would suffer from a hard Brexit, writes @vincecable for today's Red Box  
Investigate Russia's impact on #Brexit - US Senate Intelligence Committee hearing expert testimony (at approx 3:30)  
What's the latest #Brexit news? Catch up with our weekly briefing  
Who paid for the leave vote? Brexit should be halted until we know.   
Yes, yes, yes! Public inquiry desperately needed into referendum 'dark money' says George Monbiot.  
The whole Brexit shambles is a lie, funded by dodgy money from unknown sources, routed through unknown accounts to buy lies on buses. 
Jeremy Corbyn's magical, socialist paradise #brexit is as infeasible as Johnson's cake-and-eat-it and May's red, white and blue brexit. 
The last argument left for Brexit is....we've started so we should go through with it  
It's Brexit all over again  
What was the role of Cambridge Analytica in the EU referendum? @ggatehouse asked the company's CEO Alexander Nix 
SACK HIM: Philip Hammond just can't stop undermining Brexit. 
European Arrest Warrant (EAW) used to arrest terrorist suspect in UK wanted in Spain. Will the EAW survive the PM's disastrous #Brexit ? 
Theresa May faces trouble at the top - plus the rest of Wednesday's Brexit headlines  
Politicians saying they don't like austerity while their parties back Brexit is like saying they don't like cold while living in Antarctica. 
House prices bounce back despite Brexit uncertainty  
There is no scenario - zero - in which Brexit is a good development for UK workers.  
Ultimately, however many people do or don't want Brexit now is irrelevant. The facts are immutable. Wanting something won't make it good. 
Don't agree with Hammond on  going ahead with Brexit. But here he is talking like a statesman compared to the likes of Davis/Johnson  
Hard not to be struck by the irony of seeing all these Brexit newspapers today praising a great European institution  
This doesn't look good at all: EU businesses start to replace British suppliers ahead of Brexit  
From being at the heart of Europe, to kissing the arses of despots in 12 short months. Isn't Brexit marvellous? 
Together with @BritishInEurope we have met with Italian #brexit negotiators to talk protection of #citizensrights both sides of the channel 
He's going for a homeopathic Brexit.  
At Aburi in Ghana, OJukwu and Gowon ate from the plate for restructuring. Nigeria ate her cake and wont have it. #BiafraExit #Referendum  
Who paid for the leave vote? Brexit should be halted until we know  
READ | Tory Philip Hammond is STILL trying to water down our Brexit. Will he ever accept the will of the people? 
'Judicial imperialism' Ex EU judge slams bloc for demanding ITS court oversees Brexit deal  
What a mess. Looks like over one year on there is still no plan for #brexit.  
Any politician that tries to sell you Brexit is conning you - wanting to make you worse off than you are, for their own ends. 
The branding agency that designed Brexit  
Philip Hammond at odds with David Davis over Brexit transition  
Jezza says #Labour "..will deliver Brexit for the many" This is bollocks..any Brexit will deliver #Brexitpoverty..'for the many'. #BinBrexit 
Chris Patten: A craven Britain has demeaned itself with China, Brexit will make it worse  
Nicola Sturgeon isn't backing away from independence – she's waiting for a terrible Brexit to do her job for her  
Wait lads, the 'Comedian' has a Brexit plan.What a fucking handpump.  
Part of an excellent thread on the consequences of one aspect of a no deal #brexit. No deal was option in the Tory manifesto. #Remain  
This week's column: Who paid for the leave vote? #Brexit should be halted until we know. 
Thank you @MarcoPiantini and @PlgDelia for Italy's strong support of EU #CitizensRights in Brexit negs @The3Million 
Cracks are appearing in Theresa May's Cabinet over the Brexit transition  
Now that Scotref is on hold maybe the Scottish media pack will start to cover brexit and ask a few questions. 
Bias on Channel4 News has been ridiculous recently, anti-Brexit, anti-Trump, anti-Tory, pro all things PC.  
Looking at the papers today, I've a real sense Britain is finally coming to its senses on Brexit. 
"Put simply, Theresa May sought a mandate for hard Brexit and didn’t get it." Perhaps it's time to think again.   
Brexit could have 'catastrophic' effect on access to new life-saving drugs for decades  
George Monbiot raises some disturbing questions about the funding of the Leave referendum campaign and the role of the DUP. @guardian 
Enda Kenny: #Brexit tip to UK"Generally you've got a better chance of getting some of what you want,if you know what you want."@thetimesIE 
Yesterday evening I met with Gibraltar Deputy Chief Minister and liberal leader Joseph Garcia: #Brexit means instability for the region.  
Brexit must mean ending EU judges’ control over us – says STEPHEN POLLARD  
PM says UK must avoid cliff edge for business if customs barriers suddenly erected, so how can "no deal be better than a bad deal"? #Brexit  
Unashamedly delivered to us by the world's 5th largest economy, EU not to blame for this, exiting is just a smokescreen for Tory policies. 
May had a year to sort this out, but 10 years wouldn't have been enough. #Brexit is not a rational option for Britain. @theipaper 
Has a lot to do with y'all turning a hurricane into a referendum on Florida and Florida fans.Trust, I'm enjoying our guys beating y'all's.  
Chris Patten: A craven Britain has demeaned itself with China, Brexit will make it worse  
There needs to be a childrens' book about #Brexit so parents can explain to future generations exactly why they decided to make them suffer. 
From Madrid to Riga, the U.K. seeks to reassure EU citizens on Brexit  
German businesses plan for Brexit blow  
Frankfurt welcomes bankers fleeing Brexit — and their cash  
Post clean Brexit, UK & Japan can have an exclusive Free Trade Agreement not subject to the EU regime. @BillionIndian @MiraGhoshal 
Laughing stock. #Brexit  
Tory divisions emerge over Brexit as Ministers row over plans to leave the EU  
To d awusa /foolani #terrorists & vampires & yorobber criminals& cowards #Selfdetermination is a call to #War& #Referendum is #hate speech. 
Theresa May made David Davis Brexit Secretary... Please watch this if you are not aware just what an idiot he is.  
Excellent thread on the turmoil into which Brexit throws Northern Ireland. But, hey, as long as Home Counties are happy, who cares, right?  
Stupid fool. We don't want Brexit. Not at all !!!  
This bond committee has dedicated many hours to building a referendum for our students and community!  #katyisd #buildlegacy 
Chancellor Philip Hammond calls for different Brexit saying UK has an 'ardent wish' to remain at heart of Europe   
Sturgeon isn't really backing away from independence – she's waiting for a terrible Brexit to do her job for her  
Well worth listening to the view of Professor A.C. Grayling on Scotland and #Brexit  
Found the brilliant purveyor of Brexit metaphor @MrsMGoddard - her work the Brexit pic [ sent by John Clarke. RIP ] 
Brexit: Inflation is adding £1133 a year to the average household shopping bill  
19) above thread as blog - Why is Corbyn pro hard #Brexit?How can he be happy with the downturn that follows?#IN 
 Twitter is the greatest. #Brexit  
Government says no guarantee of extra funding. It's all earmarked for Brexit and the DUP. I fucking told you so.  
8) for example think of the Car industry.  A Corbyn style economy would step in if a manufacturer pulled out of the UK due to Brexit. 
Tory civil war deepens as Philip Hammond at odds with David Davis over Brexit transition  
Cabinet Brexit tension in the open as ministers stake out ground  via @FT 
"Brexit" in less than 2% of Corbyn tweets. Shocker. Yet Remainers I speak to think he's a Remainer Revolutionary  
Why doesn't Labour start being an opposition instead of adopting the Daily Mail's Brexit policy @mcashmanCBE @KevinBrennanMP @jeremycorbyn 
Liberals, social democrats, moderate labour & tories: we need to work together to oppose #Brexit – we can stop this. Macron inspires 
#vinb Bin charges the future of water charges if #FG & @campaignforleo get their own wayWhere is the Referendum on #IrishWater ? 
This is a total scandal. And Theresa May BOASTS that by 2021 no CHILD will have to do this. But Brexit in 2 years   
IPOB: Members says it does not want war, calls for referendum  
Lesley riddoch and her snp chums say we should get a vote on brexit after negotiations. Will that be the same if snp ever got independence? 
William Dalrymple on the Koh-i-Noor diamond, colonialism and Brexit  
Chart shows how hated architects of Brexit have become  
everyone needs to sober up and recognise Brexit for what it is: an unmitigated catastrophe. Why is Labour adopting what was Tory infighting? 
There are some good and decent people in the Cabinet, but they do not have a clue about how to do Brexit. One year on.  
Tory divisions emerge over Brexit as Ministers row over plans to leave the EU  
A rallying cry from hardline Remainers to subvert the referendum result  
And when argument fails, Leavers (some of them) threaten violence. Such threats must not be rewarded. #Brexit must be stopped.#StopBrexit. 
How completely true - #Brexit turning into the endless muddled re-creation of what already exists (& works better)  
So today we have Davis and Hammond saying opposite things about #Brexit in public. Imagine it in private around the cabinet table! 
All out war in Tory Government over May's disastrous extreme #Brexit. All responsible MPs must work together to put nation's interest first  
That is one question. Another is: 'Did Cambridge do illegal & undeclared work for 5 different Leave campaigns during referendum?' 
What was the role of Cambridge Analytica in the EU referendum? @ggatehouse speaks to CEO Alexander Nix #newsnight 
The EU’s willingness to take on Google shows just how stupid Brexit is, says @JaspJackson  
No good will come of this project, the only question is what will collapse first, the party, the UK, or Brexit?  
“A referendum should be seen as an insurance policy in Scotland” in case of exit from single market – @IanBlackfordMP #indyref2 #newsnight 
- to resist #Brexit.  
Brexit won't kill you or rape your kids or cut your genitals off or throw gay people off tall buildings. Islam will! @AMDWaters 
The Moon landings inspired a generation. Brexit has only inspired ridicule. 
Scottish independence referendum is on hold until "the terms of #Brexit are clearer" says @NicolaSturgeon 
DUP to demand £460m in tax cuts to keep Theresa May in power after Brexit   via @telegraphnews 
Things we can afford: £1.5 billion DUP bribe £6 million pay rise for Queen £70 billion Brexit fee We can't afford:Fireproof cladding 
Beefing up of @ecfr Berlin operation post-Brexit great news for Berlin think tank scene.  
No country polices its own international commitments. History shows us why. UK needs a better deal to protect citizen rights after #brexit  
Brexit: Theresa May can 'walk away from talks without paying a penny' | UK | News |   
The Brexit you were promised v the Brexit you're getting  
.@theipaper front page says it all - not even the Cabinet can decide what #brexit means  
Marcel should negotiate brexit 
Nicola Sturgeon isn't really backing away from independence – she's waiting for a terrible Brexit to do her job4 her  
Better than the summer of hate (towards EU nationals) that the Tories ushered in last year thanks to the Brexit vote.  
To all good parliamentary men and women true, red or blue. Raise your voices against Brexit. The people's will has changed #StopBrexit 
Wednesday's i: "Cabinet chaos on Brexit" (via @MsHelicat) #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
BBC on Cambridge Analytica, whose insidious role in #Brexit and Trump exln all but forgotten about in US media.  
"People say we didn't vote for Brexit to be poorer. Well, *we* did!"  
Government has taken on Brexit without a clear strategy, without a costed plan, no consensus, little expertise and no capacity to deliver.  
I think it's a bit soon for a BBC reporter to tell Cambridge Analytica CEO: 'You said you worked on Brexit & it now turns out you didn't...' 
Reminder: From @Reasons2Remain - 10 reasons to Remain in the EU#Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain 
Brexit.  
TONIGHT: What was the role of Cambridge Analytica in the EU referendum? @ggatehouse speaks to CEO Alexander Nix 
Marcel diffusing the situation. They need to send him to NEGOTIATE BREXIT  #LoveIsland 
Steve Bell on the second Scottish independence referendum – cartoon  
The difference is that the moon landing followed a clear plan and was performed by experts.  @Scientists4EU #Brexit 
REVEALED: How Osborne & finance Remainers used BIASED model to predict pessimistic Brexit  
#Brexit is just what the most cynical members of the tax-dodging super-rich & corporate elite would want #StopBrexit 
Brexit is like a dying Soviet leader. Everyone must be patriotic and pretend he's fighting fit and rumours of I'll health denied #Brexitopov 
The one and only thing May has ever said that has any genuine content is, “Brexit is Brexit”, says @acgrayling 
All big Non-EU economies now say they want free trade deals with the #UK on Brexit. All of them. No exceptions. The World buys into #Brexit!  
Bloomberg: City Safe Despite Brexit  
Half of Britain's highly skilled EU workers "are considering leaving in next 5 years"  
Good to see the official line on our negotiating aims & objectives on Brexit is crystal clear then... Meanwhile, Brussels watches...  
Boris Johnson said this in Nov 2014, it accurately describes him and the government he serves.#StopBrexit #Brexit #Remain. 
West's fate depends on outcome of titanic battles now raging in UK and US over both Brexit and President Trump  
That awkward moment when Andrea Leadsom doesn't understand we still have to eat & we are having to spend much more due to Brexit inflation.  
Corbyn wants more red tape , more regs.Blairites want things to stay the same.Tories want less red tape,  less regs, more will die. #brexit 
Philip Hammond at odds with David Davis over Brexit transition  
Some Leavers say the EU is undemocratic. This is a lie, the EU has more democratic safeguards and checks than Britain.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
Landing on the moon is more tangible, and unlike Brexit a moon-landing has been achieved in our lifetime. 
Is 'threaten to become a cross between Belize, Singapore & the film The Road' still central to the government's Brexit negotiating position? 
ANARCHY IN THE UKa mis judged referendumthere goes the European uniona mis judged electionthere goes the...  
But UK did not, and now EU law and policy so deeply embedded in UK, almost impossible to imagine how Brexit could be done less 5-10 years. 
If you're aged 17-34, tell us how you feel about Brexit  
Ress-Mogg Slams 'Colonial' EU Plan to Keep Court Power in UK After Brexit  
There is no recognition before declaration.We expected such reactions. We continue our way,no return in Referendum. Recognition afterwards 
OptionsRevoke art 50: lose rebate,opt-outsSoft Brexit: lose political power in EUHard Brexit: economic disasterNo Deal: economic suicide 
The point of this account for a year has been "Brexit is not going to be easy".That has hardly been an influential point of view, has it? 
'There will be CONSEQUENCES' German industry chief issues warning shot to Merkel on Brexit  
Brexiteers call it useless red tape, but without it people die says @pollytoynbee  #healthandsafety #Brexit  
CNN busted. SNP busted. Hammond vs Davis over Brexit! Let's talk....  
So what has the EU ever done for us? Not much, apart from:#Brexit #Remain #StopBrexit 
The sheer, staggering gall of RD. It's almost impressive. The Tories shackled Scotland to Brexit, & now expect Sturgeon to simply accept it.  
The Sun's tiny apology for it's '600,000 benefit tourists' story. #Brexit - built on #LeaveLies#StopBrexit #Remain 
The EU contribution to employment rights in the UK. #Brexit #Remain #StopBrexit 
If @UKLabour had any sense they would come out and oppose #brexit. Not only would this add to support. It also means 100% blame on Tories.  
Did Cambridge Analytica really swing the Brexit vote?   
Trump as president .....!!! Brexit ..... !!!! But finally the world is back to normality ..... England lose on penalties to Germany ..... 
The Alternative Vote - on which we had a referendum - would have delivered an even less proportional parliament than FPTP in 2015 #AVisnotPR 
Both Britain and the EU will lose out unless a Brexit deal is reached, BMW's CEO says  
#Bangladesh will keep duty-free access to #Britain’s market after #Brexit  
WATCH: Jacob Rees-Mogg DESTROYS European Court of Justice and Brussels in House of Commons  via @Your Brexit 
Many are concerned with #Brexit. Their interests will be best served by staying in  Single Market and Customs Union.  
CONFIRMED: UK will be OUT of EU customs union and single market by March 2019  via @Your Brexit 
Theresa May is as weak and pathetic as Anthony Eden after the 1956 Suez Crisis.  #brexit, #Tories 
Philip Hammond mocks Boris Johnson over Brexit in front of German audience  
May 15: Almost half of European businesses have started looking to replace British suppliers with EU ones #Brexit 
pssst, pssst @RuthDavidsonMSP we're having a referendum..... 
Absolutely nothing in this to remove the perception of Sturgeon threatening another referendum when she "judges time is right". Mistake  
For decades the UK has subsidised EU farms & increased the costs of our food. Post Brexit we need our own farming system.  
"Brexit for the many" Labour don't deserve our votes.  
You seem to have a problem with facts when it comes to Scotland. We don't want Tory Brexit facilitating, WMD supporting #Labstainers 
Costly (unnecessary) general election; impoverishing #Brexit obsession; £1bn bung to #DUP. #TheresaMay is one helluvan expensive PM. 
Much of your manifesto is already in force or in process of being enacted up here thanks to #SNP #Brexit will bring independence in time. 
"But scientific research will stop if we vote for Brexit" the Remainers said. "Bollocks" we said. Look who was right.  
If Theresa May is still in power and the UK is heading for a no deal Brexit will you still campaign for the Union like you did last time? 
Now why do the ultra-rich Brexit backers and their Tory chums want out of the EU?  
Brexit only makes sense once you realise it has nothing to do with the EU. 
Conduct Referendum, Allow Those Tired Of Nigeria To Leave - Yoruba Leaders  
Agree with you on 99% of issues JC but not on this one. The democratically elected Scottish Parliament voted for a 2nd Referendum #RespectIt 
#brexit Daniel Doll-Steinberg is an entrepreneur, who lives in London. He gives us his 5 reasons to come in #hautsdefrance on business. 
I enjoyed presenting a positive case for Brexit and small businesses in Oxfordshire this afternoon. Thanks for the discussion!   
Hammond's fears accurate.In my experience businesses & individuals delaying investment decisions & becoming more risk averse due to Brexit.  
Wanker:Shameless millionaire behind Brexit campaign uses Grenfell Tower fire picture to flog insurance - Mirror  
I think Scotland will realise just how bloody necessary it is once Brexit takes hold. 
Corbyn appears to have gone from being open to a second Scottish independence referendum to branding it "unnecessary". 
Henry Kissinger says Brexit will bring Britain closer to the US  
Tory plans for literally everything except Brexit and staying in office by whatever grubby means possible have been scrapped.  
Scotland said No to Trident, No to Brexit & has a triple mandate for indyref2. We need only to look to Wales to see what a Lab Gov does.   
Your occasional reminder that all those post-Brexit free trade agreements  we get to have ain't all that.  
Nigeria's Unity Is Negotiable, Conduct A Referendum - Yoruba Leaders Tells FG » Ngyab  
Asked the PM a question on Brexit. Mr Bercow described it as "an interesting hors d’oeuvre". I'll be delivering the main course before long.  
A visual explanation of Brexit.  
Must have missed the Vote Leave bus which admitted that #Brexit would be "as complicated as a moon landing"  
Which moon landing will Brexit be like under the Tories? I'm going for Apollo 13  
'Judicial imperialism' Ex EU judge slams bloc for demanding ITS court oversees Brexit deal  
Scotland needs a Labour Government. My statement in response to Sturgeon shelving @theSNP's plans for an unnecessary independence referendum  
'There's far more that unites us on Brexit' says @BorisJohnson 
The Brexit madness continues to damage our nation and it people. It's time to take back control and #StopBrexit 
British expats blast UK’s ‘lacklustre’ offer on Brexit rights  via @IntAdviser @suewilson91 #stopbrexit 
The Tories et al trying so desperately to spin that SNP haven't shelved plans for referendum shows that they've nothing else to talk about. 
A small price to pay to ensure Corbyn doesn't get anywhere near the #Brexit negotiating table or get access to HM Treasury.  
Theresa May royally screwed up the general election and made Brexit a mess, but she has beaten Nicola Sturgeon hands down to end #indyref2. 
Hard Brexit = Social Cleansing 
Pragmatic and smart positioning by Nicola Sturgeon on #Indyref2 - build momentum, let Brexit do its horrible work, then the time'll be right 
Introducing our new Deputy Leader: @HayteratLords, elected unopposed by Labour Peers Group. Dianne also continues as Shadow Brexit Minister 
Nicola Sturgeon "reset" fine with me. Let Theresa tie herself in Brexit knots & focus on independence the goal not #scotref the tactic 
We are being knackered right now...we'll be all washed up come any sort of Brexit. If #NoBrexit it'll take years to get back to normal! 
This is a man smuggling messages out of a place of captivity. The message is 'Stop #Brexit!'  
It turns out that "taking back control" means transferring jurisdiction over EU-UK issues from one supranational court to another. #Brexit  
All big Non-EU economies now say they want free trade deals with the UK on Brexit. All of them. No exceptions. The World buys into Brexit. 
Want to understand the Hammond plan for Brexit, read this from @CER_Grant 1/ 
This is the guy Trump personally called in April to congratulate him on winning his referendum. You are judged by the company you keep. 
EXPRESS POLL: 60 per cent still want to leave EU a year after referendum  SO GET ON WITH IT AND GIVE US BREXIT 
1 Dumb Brexit:  The EU Single Aviation Market(A long thread on the the EU Single Aviation Market follows) 
According to Tories, Scots shouldn't have any representation during Brexit talksBut totally fine having DUP pulling the strings 
Delighted to have been re-elected unopposed as leader of @LibDemLords for the new Parliament. Top priority to fight harsh #Brexit 
Hammond is talking only of damage limitation for Brexit. There is no longer any pretence of advantages. So why then? 
Brexit Fact #37Scottish exports, 2015£48.0bn to Rest of UK£15.2bn to Rest of the World£11.6bn to EU27 (down 16% on 2014)MoneyWeek 
I have yet to hear a cogent argument as to why Scots should not have a choice on the future of their country once terms of Brexit are known. 
Scottish Conservative leader @RuthDavidsonMSP criticises Nicola Sturgeon for not ditching plans for a second independence referendum.  
Brexit could have 'catastrophic' effect on access to new life-saving drugs for decades, warns expert  
Here's the First Minister's statement today - people of Scotland should be given a choice over future after outcome of #Brexit talks clearer  
Conduct Referendum, Allow Those Tired Of Nigeria To Leave – Yoruba Leaders  
UN human rights boss attacks May's plans to deport terror suspects as 'regrettable' 
Experts confirm that Britain can WALK AWAY from the EU without paying A SINGLE PENNY  via @Your Brexit 
The EU’s willingness to take on Google shows just how stupid Brexit is, says @JaspJackson  
Labour's shadow Brexit secretary @Keir_Starmer admits 'no deal' would be bad for the EU 
Millionaire behind #Brexit campaign uses #Grenfell Tower fire to flog insurance 
8m in poverty, 1m at foodbanks, Europe's lowest state pensions as % of GDP, Europe's lowest wage growth, NHS in crisis. Why Brexit, again? 
Slightly hysterical coverage of govt's plan for "Brexit ID cards". It's an EU proposal.  
DUP have formally signed up to Tory austerity agenda & given a blank cheque to the Brexit catastrophe.  via @youtube 
The SNP's position on when to hold a referendum really hasn't changed... An incredible number of commentators don't seem to understand that. 
I am very happy with the Flexibility the FM has built into the #indyref, allowing us to make an informed decision on the #Brexit outcome  
At last it’s clear: Tory Brexit Secretary David Davis is against identity cards – except for EU nationals  
Great towhall on the unity referendum in #Lloydminster last night, & visits to St. Paul & Vermillion yesterday. 
Philip Hammond: Brexit petty politics must not hinder ‘economic logic’  
All four of these countries seek bespoke bilateral free trade agreements with the United Kingdom post-Brexit.  
Pleasure meeting you and conveying the deep concerns of millions of people affected by #Brexit Their rights must be preserved 
Higher education sector particularly at risk from Brexit - Anderson  via @MEPStandingUp4U 
Depressing how many Tory civil libertarians - so loud against Blair/Brown - are nodding along with illiberalism because, you know, Brexit.  
The UK will be out of the customs union and single market after March 2019, @DavidDavisMP has suggested #Brexit  
Philip Hammond risks major cabinet row as he sets out 'soft Brexit' plan  
Great meeting @Xavier_Bettel & sharing with him the determination to carry on EU reforms and Brexit that puts EU citizens first.  
Sad day when speaking to our Portuguese nurse. Who has finally had enough of Brexit and looking to move elsewhere. Cites fact they don't 
Tory whips must be incandescent with rage!Credit where it's due, kudos to @Anna_Soubry for her honesty. #Brexit 
#UPDATE Scottish leader Nicola Sturgeon says she would "reset" the timetable for holding a referendum by spring 2019  
This Poor man lives in a 7 Bedroom house 
Brexit: Being born in UK no longer a guarantee of automatic citizenship 
.@SuellaFernandes: 'Brexit is an opportunity to grasp, not a crisis to be managed!'  
Really excellent meeting w/ @unitetheunion reps & @TheProgressives colleagues this afternoon discussing how to protect industry post-Brexit  
I now think it important that Mrs May stays as PM till after Brexit is done. Any further major upheaval risks exploitation by Remain ultras. 
Simple question: post-Brexit, how can someone in the UK prove that they do *not* need to show an ID card if asked for it?#brexitshambles 
It seems the hacking attack on Parliament was successful. They had to pay £1.5 bn to the hackers to get Brexit back online. 
Iain Duncan Smith asks @Keir_Starmer what Labour's Brexit policy actually is  
The Treasury got it wrong during the referendum on a massive scale  
No, doing the job your colleagues in @GovUK should be doing - talking about issues in #Brexit that need to be resolved for sake of business 
UK firms increasingly uneasy on what Brexit negotiations will bring  
Nicola Sturgeon says the Scottish Government will "reset" its plan for a second independence referendum at the end of the Brexit process.  
Does having a minority govt at HR give you the right to have a referendum? Here's someone with a different view:  
Oh dear, snowflakes everywhere are going into meltdown:)  Brexit is underway, the coalition deal with the DUP is agreed and signed  
It's time to #TakeControl of that famous slogan on the bus... put your own slogan on the bus side! #Brexit  
We don’t want war, we want referendum –IPOB 
.@NicolaSturgeon says she will “reset” plans for a second independence referendum and won't “immediately” seek to introduce legislation.  
FM @NicolaSturgeon says IndyRef2 could still be held in this Parliament but she will judge that when there is greater clarity on Brexit 
Excellent first meeting with new EU Minister @HMcEntee today on #Brexit #FutureofEurope #Erasmus #bluestar & so much more 
My business had a 3-year contract "paused" the day after the referendum and hasn't yet been "unpaused" due uncertainty over #brexit 
Sturgeon sticks firmly with the policy of an independence referendum at the end of the Brexit negotiations:  #ScotRef 
How does anyone expect the Tories to negotiate a good deal over Brexit when the DUP got a billion quid out of them?! 
EU citizens to carry ID cards after Brexit to prove they're entitled to vital public services, PM's serious about taking back control. 
IndyRef2 is a must win for Yes. To have it before the Brexit facts are known risks losing it, having it after guarantees victory. 
All @NicolaSturgeon has wanted to do is offer a choice at end of Brexit negotiations. How can you argue you don't want a choice? 
Chancellor says he discourages colleagues talking about "cake" in Brexit negotiations:  
Exactly. A wise and pragmatic move by Nicola Sturgeon. Let the horrors of Brexit sink in before any #indyref2 date. 
Scottish Chambers of Commerce backs FM's call for SG role in Brexit negotiations.  
The real Brexit debate: do you pronounce it Breggsit or Brecksit?  
The only thing that has been postponed today is the legislation to set a fixed date for #indyref2; not necessarily the referendum itself. 
Here's what you need to know about @NicolaSturgeon's statement on Scotland's referendum.  
Indecisive voters in Scotland discuss #ScotRef timetable as Brexit begins to appear.  
A Scotland poised to quit the UK is incredibly damaging to the Tories brexit negotiating position. The EU know this. 
Nicola Sturgeon shelves second independence referendum  
So far Tories are accepting the need for immigration, a supranational court, and easy access to single market. Can't we just scrap #Brexit? 
Schrodinger's referendum. Neither on the table nor off. Maybe back later, it some stuff happens. Gift to tories. 
FM: ''In Scotland we have a history of deciding constitutional matters by referendum.'' We did that in 2014, the answer was no. 
"Why are you talking about a referendum, Ruth? I'm talking about getting best we can from Brexit." will now be FM's comeback to every jibe. 
Brexit Britain: 3m plus to be second class citizens who are fingerprinted, registered, issued ID residence permits but can't vote for an MP.  
Are you aware of ALL the ways Brexit will harm the NHS? This, by @mikegalsworthy, covers it nicely: 
Defence Secretary defends £1bn DUP deal, saying it will protect Gov't from being "ambushed" on Brexit & other issues  
 @NicolaSturgeon has today made a statement on Scotland's future and #Brexit. You can read it in full here.  
Austerity was ideological not practical, the cost of Brexit and Tories suddenly finding £1b for DUP completely expose this fact.  
 @NicolaSturgeon addresses @scotparl on Scotland's future, #Brexit and giving people a choice about the future direction of Scotland.  
So, No change then. It's exactly as we said as before. After the terms of Brexit is fully understood, The Scottish people will decide. 
Shameless millionaire behind Brexit campaign uses Grenfell Tower fire picture to flog insurance 
Let's just recap that @Daily_Express #Brexit poll again shall we? #YeahRight Not #FakeNews but an outright #LIE 
Now look at another key finding in the Deloitte report on post-Brexit vote attitudes that they chose NOT to focus on.  (1/2)  
Always said holding ScotRef any earlier than 2020 would be a mistake. Sadly, we need the full facts about Brexit to fight a solid campaign. 
This is what getting your country back looks like. #Brexit  
The Latest: Scottish leader delays legislation that would have sought a second independence referendum.  
Tories confirm that no matter  the damage it does to Scotland they will back their bosses hard brexit & dodgy deals no matter what #shameful 
Nicola puts #Scotref right in the middle of Brexit's table 
Nicola Sturgeon says there will not be another independence referendum 'until terms of Brexit are clearer'  
I despair watching these Members of the Scottish Parliament laughing and sneering at the idea of @scotgov having a place at Brexit talks.  
..their choice to have our courts have j'diction over them! Will the EU give UK Courts j'diction over UK citizens in the EU post-Brexit. .. 
Sturgeon backs off from an early independence referendum. The people spoke at the election and told her to get lost 
Nicola Sturgeon says she will "re-set" her timetable for indyref#2 until "end of Brexit process" 
#indyref2 was never off the cards regardless of what Ruthless and her cohorts try to say. Brexit is a shambles!!  
Sturgeon: "There are people who don't want another referendum ever..."Opposition MSPs: "The majority!" 
FM: "We face a Brexit we did not vote for, and in a form more extreme than most would have imagined just a year ago." 
FM: “It remains my view that at the end of the Brexit process, the people of Scotland should have a choice about our future.” 
Wetherspoon tycoon and Brexit-backer Tim Martin ploughs £13.2m into expanding his business…within the EU  
'It's colonialism!' Commons in rapturous cheers as Rees-Mogg REJECTS Brussels ECJ demands  
At same time Brexit Secretary said he's aiming to take UK out of customs union on 30 March '19, ie not part of transition...Chancellor says:  
Bank of England  suggests that retail banks set aside £11bn to cover default in consumer debt as Brexit shove GDP down. A witches brew. 
Sky news says Nicola is going to park a second independence referendumSky news talk shite 
The danger of Trump and Brexit is the tipping point in time where it becomes normal. 18-24 months from zero and it's done. They all know it. 
"We've lost three quarters of our staff  -all EU citizens- due to Brexit. We've tried to recruit but have had few responses" #bargainingchip 
Philip Hammond has just made a Brexit joke *in German* at a speech in Berlin. More paranoid Leavers will presumably see that as trolling.  
Hammond also strongly hints that he wants UK to stay in the single market and customs union during the post-Brexit "transition period". 
Hammond calls for "a customs agreement that will minimise friction at the border" after Brexit. How about staying in the customs union? 
Dear @jeremycorbyn I don't support your #BrexitForTheMany Any #Brexit will damage jobs, industry, finance and public services. #StopBrexit 
I would personally favour paying £70m now for Keita if he's JKs first choice target.In a year of Brexit talks, that £50m will be €70m anyway 
I am not a #Brexit #bargainingchip @The3Million #EnoughIsEnough 
Davis: transition Brexit deal will have no real content; still thinks EU/UK trade deal can be done in 17 months. When do the fantasies end?  
She still misses the point of the vote for Corbyn.Not every1 obsesses with Brexit, he focused on domestics, May didnt. He is human, May isnt 
Tories called election to get mandate for their Brexit approach, and now say their failure to get a majority is irrelevant?  Arrogant much?  
#EU fines Google for billions while Tory gov't encourages Google tax avoidance for billions tells you who will benefit from Tory #Brexit 
Politicians who dare To Defy the majority of the people Will pay the price at the Ballot Box 
2nd edition @EveningStandard covers EU record fine for Google. How we match EU's muscle in competition cases will be big Brexit challenge  
When a #repealthe8th referendum is called, putting up posters with actual facts will break the 1995 abortion info act FFS 
The real Brexit debate: do you pronounce it Breggsit or Brecksit?  
EU MEMBERSHIP looks like the BEST trade DEAL the UK could ever get! #Brexit #StopBrexit #remain @UKIPNFKN @nickreeves9876 @BrexitBin #GE2017 
- It is interesting/important David Davis assesses that his/ PM's approach to Brexit played no part in the Conservative's loss of majority 
David Davis: "nearly all upside from Brexit comes from global markets". > Would love to see government analysis on this. #TimesCEOSummit 
"What rights will EU citizens lose?" @BBCRealityCheck answer this and your other questions on the Brexit deal 
To those who claim "the people have spoken":1975: 67.23% remainYou re-ran the referendum until you got the result you wanted. 
If EU citizens move to the UK after Brexit, they will be relinquishing all these EU rights.  
How about Brexit for nobody? Or just for people who REALLY want it? In other words, how about Nigel Farage & Aaron Banks go somewhere else?  
May will stay PM. Brexit will happen. The election result is not such a big deal after all.  
Hearing Frank Field bleating on about the plight of EU nationals infuriates me. He campaigned for Brexit! #bbcdp 
EU citizens should not receive any benefits after #Brexit.Why aren't @UKIP saying this?@Nigel_Farage @prwhittle @AMDWaters @oflynnmep 
Scottish Parliament has legal power to reject major Brexit bill, Tories admit  
On post-Brexit migrant abuse, here is the then Met Chief's view based on all the data. We can debate the view, but stop denying the facts.  
The Scottish Greens have called on Nicola Sturgeon to press ahead with her plans to hold a second independence referendum. #indyref2 
Can we all now accept that the people are much better informed and have democratically decided they don't want Brexit after all? #StopBrexit 
Confirmed: Nomura has picked Frankfurt for its post-Brexit HQ  via @BIUK_Finance 
I acknowledge the referendum vote was in favour of leaving the EU. However I cannot respect a vote that was ill informed & based on lies. 
Great news from @GregClarkMP, @CBItweets to participate in new Brexit Business Advisory Group, biz has lots to offer  
Can #Brexit be stopped?"...at the precipice, staring into an abyss, we can always step back..."says @Freedland 
FM Frick discussed current developments in #EFTA, #Brexit, third country relations with ministerial colleagues in Longyearbyen (NOR)  
Reducing Parliament to a spectator of Brexit negotiations puts our economy at risk. Our amendment would change that:  
Yoruba Assembly Demands Referendum, Says Nigerian Unity Negotiable  
"Money talks and BS walks"...German company invests in UK property despite #Brexit. 
The Brexit stand-off:This sorry situation may force us to change  via @FT 
Bloomberg, which gave a big donation to Remain in referendum, says City safe after Brexit. Another welcome convert. 
It is vital that after Brexit, in response to the excesses of globalisation, that we cooperate more with like-minded countries, not less. 
Check out our #Brexit debate with @RCorbettMEP #Manchester Uni, July 1st - Free tickets here:  @McrJMCE #StopBrexit 
John Holman, President @RoySocChem: we'll need an [post-brexit] immigration system that welcomes people from across the world #LinksDay17 
Cost of holding EU Referendum: £142Million General Election: £143 MillionDUP Coalition: £ 1 BILLIONBrexit's damage to Economy: Priceless  
Wow. This tweet is the very definition of brass neck. Were it not for his unbelievably stupid referendum, this would not be happening.  
I stand firm in my commitment 2 represent pro-Remain views in D&WN my speech in Queen's Speech debate on Brexit here  
BFE: Referendum Anniversary WKNDR! #3 Manchester's Gone "Mad for it!" (The EU, that is!) @Mcr4EU @16MillionRising #StopBrexit #nomandate 
God save our Queen and Country from Brexit. #Resist #Bresistance #Fightback 
Get your business ready for Brexit with @Entirl's #Brexit SME Scorecard, a free online planning tool. Go to:  
Brexit bill BOMBSHELL: Theresa May CAN walk away without paying a penny to EU, experts say  
Low-wage EU migrants ‘to be told they cannot bring families to the UK’ under Brexit policy   
.@stephen_dorrell: “New Parliament must challenge Brexit” “Democracy is a process, not an event” #LONDON4EUROPE 
I'll be guest of the day on the @daily_politics today, talking about Brexit, the new government and - surprise surprise - trade unions. 
If @UKLabour supported STAYING IN the EU and saving us £billions would you vote Labour today? #Brexit #GeneralElection #Tories 
GE17:Mrs May lost her majorityMr Corbyn lost the electionBoth want BrexitThe will of the people must be respected & heard#StopBrexit 
Google hit with record EU fine over Shopping service - The power of collective action. #Brexit makes no sense!  
#Brexit is not a done deal. The Brexit lies are breaking on the rocks of reality. Article 50 is revocable. We can #StopBrexit.#Remain 
BREXIT: Like a Simpson’s joke writ large.  
We have launched a new series of short explanatory videos on key Brexit negotiation topics #turbotalks 
Relatives of EU migrants will be forced to undertake tough immigration tests after Brexit  
Serious concerns about impact of Brexit being expressed on behalf of Italian and Spanish scientists based in UK. #LinksDay17 
Brexit news Jacob Rees-Mogg's strident rejection of ECJ 'colonisation' of UK wins cheers  
wouldn't it be nice if  today our govt  agreed to something which will benefit the BRITISH people in Brexit just for once PUT US FIRST 
Google hit by 2.4bn Euro fine for  anti-competitive practices. The EU is protecting us against giant multinationals#Brexit #StopBrexit 
Are we never going to get Scotland sorted out? Have a feeling that th time consuming indy2 programme​ will b replaced by a hate brexit one.. 
How will Britain's economy cope with Brexit? Mark Carney is talking now  
Japanese bank Nomura has officially picked Frankfurt as its post-Brexit HQ and will move jobs - Business Insider UK  
The views of Catherine Day, former SG of EU Commission, on the #brexit negotiations are worth reading.  
Today's twitter poll: Is Conservative pact with DUP necessary for stable govt during the crucial Brexit time, or should it've stayed alone? 
Ireland to LEAVE the EU? DUP MP urges Britain’s closest neighbours to follow Brexit  
Excellent piece.  Of course, headline could equally be "All rights UK citizens in EU will lose after Brexit" [if UK govt proposals accepted]  
'We will have to REJOIN' Europhile Lord Patten predicts humiliating Brexit backdown to EU            
Got a question about EU citizens' post-#Brexit rights? @lisaocarroll will be answering them at 11. Send them here 
The way British mainstream media is undermining #Brexit it's safe to assume that the EU is paying hacks in UK for anti--Brexit propaganda. 
The real reason for Brexit.  So filthy rich elite get UK out of EU before EU Tax Avoidance Crackdown commences.  Sigh... 
Forget the doom-mongering, here are twelve reasons to be excited about Brexit.  
UK includes #Gibraltar in key #Brexit document. How it should be: Britain looks after British citizens.Why is a foreign state wary about it?  
If I work abroad I have to pay that countries taxes but I can't claim benefits.Why should that be different for EU citizens after #Brexit?  
Nicola Sturgeon to address Scottish parliament over independence referendum plans - live updates  
The DUP deal shows the Tories will do anything, destroy anything, pay anything to get their #Brexit & maintain party unity#MagicMoneyTree 
May's slogans ("Magic Money Tree" "Strong and Stable" "Brexit means Brexit") are invariably counter-productive.A special political talent. 
Brilliant from @acgrayling on why, if Brexit happens, Scotland must become an independent country in the EU.  
Prince Charles will ‘use his friendship with world leaders’ to boost British trade after Brexit  
Although employment is rising, real wages have stagnated and fallen in the year since the Brexit vote  
It's worth remembering exactly what mandate the Scottish parliament gave Sturgeon in March. It was specifically linked to a Hard Brexit.  
Today @Anna_Soubry is a much quoted because the media expect her to be critical of the PM and of the Brexit policy of the government 
Kissinger: On Brexit, at first I was for Remain. But outside EU, UK can help forge new & necessary trans-Atlantic alliance @CPSThinkTank 
EXPOSED: 'Economic experts' Brexit forecasts were "overly pessimistic". Their credibility is shot!  
Working with MPs from across @UKLabour + SNP, Plaid, Greens today to put amendment to Queens Speech on #Brexit - told Lib Dems support too.  
Think about it. DUP would have voted with the tories anyway. May's given away £1bn for nothing. And these idiots are running Brexit? 
I really hope this has more to it than just the interminable referendum saga  
What the U.K. is offering EU citizens after Brexit  
"A Brexit fair for all, free at the point of use. A vibrant, modern Brexit, fit for purpose. A shining Brexit on a hill. A People's Brexit."  
#Brexit gets the #MontyPython treatment in “Theresa May and the Holy Grail” #UKpolitics 
Brexit Fact #36All three of the world's largest economies want bespoke bilateral Free Trade Agreements with the UK:AmericaChinaJapan 
The DUP deal may be a small price to pay if it means we get on with the Brexit process.  
Another excellent Journey to Yes from @PhantomPower14: philosopher @acgrayling, for whom Brexit changes everything. 
Very pleased that MPs are crossing party lines to oppose an extreme #Brexit:  
Hilary Mantel answering questions after Reith Lecture: Brexit is a shameful failure of voters' imagination and ability to examine evidence. 
Do you think @jeremycorbyn ever wondered why every EU socialist/left of centre party think @Brexit is a mistake. But fascist parties love it 
On Law in Action, R4, 4pm @DLidington gives first interview as Lord Chancellor:  judges, prisons, courts, Brexit, Grenfell Twr @BBC_CurrAff 
Brilliant news! Japan becomes the sixth World Top Ten Economy to seek a post-Brexit Free Trade Agreement with the UK. Daily Telegraph. 
36 countries now seek post-Brexit Free Trade Agreements with the UK, includingUSAChinaJapanIndiaBrazilCanadaS KoreaAustraliaMexico 
Is the Brexit hard border here? Irish immigration officials have gotten on the express Belfast-Dublin bus two mornings in a row to check ids 
Stunned. A Labour politician talking total sense on #Brexit "Staying in the single market is remaining in the EU in all but name."  
I fully support the promotion of Hull's fishing history and would like to see some elements of the fishing industry return post-Brexit.  
Just for a little perspective..... #Brexit @Independent 
Hugely worrying but inevitable consequence of Govnt's Brexit stance. Is there a plan to address huge skills gap?  
Ever wondered why all the hard right populists in the world love #Brexit and why all liberal/social democratic friends think it's a mistake? 
Brexit Britain must look to Hong Kong for a powerful blueprint for success  
Britain’s imperial ghosts have taken control of Brexit  via @ConversationUK #twitterhistorians 
A report is warning of a post-Brexit brain drain that will damage the UK economy.Let's stop this madness! @Labour4EU  
Behind the soundbites, @theresa_may's  #Brexit plans will take away EU citizens’ rights - it’s as simple as that  
All the rights EU citizens in the UK are set to lose after Brexit  
Could be the key to the revenge of the young for Brexit  
News industry in such dire straits how journos report Brexit news tells us how their editor/producer voted last year, not what's coming next 
In #May proposal on #brexit #EUcitizens: If Brit spouse & I (EU) move abroad for period, I lose way back, despite settled in UK for 27yr+. 
Give yourself a break. Avoid the news for a year & you won't miss a thing. Trump'll still be tweeting & Brexit talks just getting underway. 
Brexit can offer a wealth of global opportunities for the North of England, says Stephen Purvis of @PolicyNorthUK  
Restructure what?Who are the we?#FantasticallyCorrupt Nigerian politicians? Let the people decide. #Referendum 
Apart from anything else the ONE BILLION POUND deal doesn't really scream 'ace negotiating skills,' does it? #Brexit #imminentcatastrophe 
May sets out guarantee of "settled status" for EU citizens living in the UK | Tories secure DUP backing for Brexit  
New restrictions for EU migrants bringing family to the UK. Brexit Britain with stronger borders!  
Labour need to grow a pair and be honest with people. You know, and we know, that Brexit was sold to us as diamond, but it's a turd. 
Brexit bill BOMBSHELL: Theresa May CAN walk away without paying a penny to EU, experts say  
EU expats condemn #TheresaMay 'pathetic' offer on #Brexit rights  
#TimesCEOSummit people voted to "take the country back" at Brexit vote,  by how many years do you want to take it back to, asks Enda Kenny 
More than one million foreign workers are preparing to leave Britain because of Brexit  
Europe’s Brexit negotiator urges U.K. to show ‘more ambition’ on EU citizens’ rights  
Brexit will leave British universities on their knees.  We will be as Internationally relevant & competitive as say Malta. 
A Lab MP who has listened to her own constituents on the EU and is now constructively engaging with Brexit. Bravo @CarolineFlintMP 
Official estimates on the economic impact Brexit would have on the U.K. were misleading and “overly pessimistic,”   
wouldn't it be nice just once to hear broadcaster say something positive about the UK and Brexit!  
Grateful to GinaMiller for challenging it in Court&forcing Parilament to do just that.Brexit now written into law & ensured.Ironic, huh?  
Theresa May has said EU citizens must bring family over before Brexit or face immigration rules. Is this fair?  
Jeremy Corbyn MP: My vote for Labour was NOT a vote for Brexit - Sign the Petition!  via @UKChange 
Dare to Dream Nigel Farage speech with fitting music at the end of the EU referendum>>  
MPs should put the national interest first & back our amendment to stop Theresa May's extreme damaging #Brexit  
Food banks, disabled people dying, the DUP, Brexit fiasco but if you write Harry Potter on Facebook a wee wand appears.Life's great 
EU citizens 'bitterly disappointed' with post-Brexit rights offer  
It is excruciatingly obvious how disastrous #Brexit is. One vote in Parliament could stop it & restore sanity. 
We‘ve just briefed MPs on why they must put animal welfare on the agenda in #Brexit talks. Read our latest blog here  
After #Brexit EU citizens in UK should not be able to claim benefits and freedom of movement should end on #Brexit dayTory Gov is too soft. 
Both Britain and the EU will lose out unless a Brexit deal is reached, BMW's CEO says  
GB sends £19.2m to the DUP every week. Why not spend that on democracy instead? #Brexit #BungParliament 
Free movement of EU citizens into the UK must end when we #Brexit. 
Letter of the Day @FT - sorry for repro quality but well worth reading #brexit  
UK Government's offer to EU citizens and their families in the UK:  #brexit #citizensrights 
Britain's consumers are feeling just as gloomy as they were after the Brexit vote a year ago  
The dilemma now faced by Corbyn.. stick to his Hard Brexit stance or act in the interests of his young power base.  
Chilling to hear James Jeffrey, ex US deputy national security adviser, say on @BBCr4today Assad probably played role in 'Brexit disaster' 
And the man who meddled in the Scottish Referendum in breach of civil service rules.  
Whatever new process of registration - there should be #NoFee. We lived here legally and had no vote for #Brexit 
After #Brexit EU citizens should not be able to claim any UK benefits. 
It's not a magic money tree they'll need to fund Brexit - it's a f***ing huge enchanted forest. The Tories have wrecked our country! 
'grubby' DUP deal, Queen gets huge pay rise, people die in flats, Brexit. I wonder what it would take to make us all rise up say 'enough!'. 
WHEN WILL YOU ACCEPT THAT THERE IS NO BREXIT FOR THE MANY  
.@anna_soubry you're wrong - #Remainers are NOT resigned to #Brexit. We'll continue to fight it. Please help us halt the disaster. 
I despair at the impact of Brexit on the vulnerable. I despair at how Labour connives in it. And at how its superfans turn a blind eye. 
I despair at how a Tory gerontocracy burned the crops of the young with the shape of its austerity. Then salted the earth with Brexit. 
Brexit Britain means 3m 2nd-class citizens fingerprinted, issued ID documents and with no vote in general elections  
Fintan O’Toole: Ireland must be tough to avoid being sold out in Brexit deal  via @IrishTimesOpEd 
Brexit bill BOMBSHELL: Theresa May CAN walk away without paying a penny to EU, experts say  
Wealthy Remainers now need to fund a campaign to inform real Brexit  facts..NOW! @JolyonMaugham @richardbranson @acgrayling @campbellclaret 
Theresa May tries to reassure EU citizens living in Britain their lives will not be disrupted by Brexit.  
There you have it. We'll be better off.Policy Exchange: By 2030, UK per capita GDP will 'be higher than it would have been without Brexit' 
The Treasury’s economic models have grossly overestimated the cost of Brexit.  
Tory summers- last June:@ScotParl will get more powers after #Brexit, this June:@scotgov will get more money after DUP deal.  Next June? 
From Brexit to Grenfell: why the Left prefers the poor when they're tragic and vulnerable.  
Ireland to LEAVE the EU? DUP MP urges Britain’s closest neighbours to follow Brexit #Brexit #dupdeal  
Great and heartfelt speech about Europe & the EU by @gonzalezpons #Brexit #remain 
BBC News - Fox warns colleagues: 'We didn’t say we would part-leave the EU'  BRILLIANT 
I was in London a couple weeks ago, and was there during the Grenfell fire. it was sooooo clear to me that Brexit was about xenophobia 
Make no mistake. This is a referendum on our morality.  
Fintan O’Toole: Ireland must be tough to avoid being sold out in Brexit deal  
Sikhs are protesting outside white horse during @narendramodi visit to US. They are demanding referendum 2020 for free Khalistan.  
UK Will Allow 3 Million EU Migrants To Stay After Brexit  
Yes: The Ongoing Story of the 1967 Referendum explores the journey of Australia’s most successful referendum  
Is the economy taking on a more important role when it comes to Brexit?  
Here we go again. Brexit happened, armys. Global warming, armys.  
If the Tories are this bad at negotiating, now much will Brexit cost ? 
Looking forward to discussing the new survey findings @ @aspenideas Deep Dive on Trump, Brexit and a New World Order tomorrow #AspenIdeas 
Theresa May tries to reassure EU citizens living in Britain their lives will not be disrupted by Brexit  
IT IS. Brexit who? US election where?This is the only thing that matters.  
Can we stop this nonsense and have that 2nd referendum and get back to normal....please. 
If the DUP can stiff the Tory amateurs for a billion, imagine what the EU negotiators will do to them. #Brexit 
More than one million foreign workers are preparing to leave Britain because of Brexit  
What we need now is a bigger poll, across all 4 countries. We could call it a referendum. It doesn't have to change things just be advisory 
£100m of Scots taxes are going to fund a new Tory/DUP gov it didn't vote for, to push us over a hard Brexit cliff it also didn't vote for... 
Jeremy Corbyn:  This country needs a new approach to Brexit... May’s proposals for EU citizens living in the UK “too little, too late”  
There are some issues so important they become a referendum on our values. This is one of them. #BCRA #CBOSCORE  
So must Labour. Stop #Brexit altogether.  
Yesterday I said indyref2 should be after brexit today I want it on Thursday I've changed my mind. There will be nothing left in two years  
Thank you all. If I'm not laughing now something's not right. Oh yeah, #brexit But then still gotta laugh - even in the face of disaster.  
Bizarre to watch May & Corbyn battle passionately over who can deliver a better Brexit... when most Brits now think it's a shit idea anyway. 
The United Kingdom includes #Gibraltar in #Brexit proposal.   
Penny is dropping among the public that #Brexit will be a disaster.Don't suppose someone in power could whisper in the ear of May & Corbyn 
The tax havens can only be tackled through international cooperation, and that makes the EU a threat to the tax-dodging super-rich.#Brexit 
The irritating thing is that it would only take a few politicians with conviction to end #Brexit then we could deal with our real problems. 
I am so happy to be Scottish and EU citizen.  Don't want this taken away from me by an advisory referendum caused by Tory party squabble  
AC Grayling thinks this Brexit mess has gone far enough -  #GoogleAlerts 
Tax evasion is basically what Brexit is about for the top tier.If it was really about immigration they had ample opportunity to limit it. 
The tax-dodging #Brexit press barons have every reason to want to escape a EU clampdown on tax havens #StopBrexit 
THERE. IS. NO. SUCH. THING. AS. BREXIT. FOR. THE. MANY. There is no socialist utopia on the back of Brexit either, Mr Corbyn. Get real.  
No amount of disenfranchisement by Nigeria govt,will stop #IPOB agitation led by #Nnamdikanu until they give Biafrans date for #Referendum  
Daily Express, you're normally so interested in EU migrants (see below), but not so tmrw. So I thought I'd help you out. #EUcitizens #Brexit  
This weight of economic data cannot be ignored @jeremycorbyn @Keir_Starmer. Brexit facts @UKLabour called are here. 
Some clueless numpties in politics take a bow Clegg and Blair. Yes we remember. #brexit  
The absolute absurdity of #brexit... All this fuss about immigration could have been avoided if we merely followed EU rules.  
VOTE in our exclusive Brexit Referendum II poll – would you still vote to leave the EU?  
The Tories, robbing the young of EU identity & freedom of movement and burdening them with ever more government debt. #StopBrexit #Brexit  
'Why are we not supporting her?' Caller demands UK gets behind Theresa May for Brexit  
When yer da says he now supports Brexit  
‘He would negotiate the WORST deal with the BIGGEST bill!’ May condemns Corbyn over Brexit  
Which should come first? RT for another EU referendumLike for Another General Election Or simply tell me to fuvk off#YourChoice 
Brexit bill BOMBSHELL: Theresa May CAN walk away without paying a penny to EU, experts say  
Election costs:2010 Election: £113mEU Referendum: £142mDUP Deal: >£1bnCan't we just have another election? 
Brexit news Jacob Rees-Mogg's strident rejection of ECJ 'colonisation' of UK wins cheers  
Back off! David Davis warns Holyrood against disrupting Brexit legislation  
Gerry Adams welcomes extra money but slams DUP deal as 'blank cheque for Tory Brexit'  
What does the decline of Yorkshire football reveal about the divisions of Brexit Britain, asks Anthony Clavane @LUFCPromised for Blizzard 
Journey to Yes #17 @acgrayling was a leading intellectual voice against independence but Brexit changes everything  
'Continuous' motorway queues without customs deal, shipping boss warns #Brexit  
Citizens' rights: EU chief Brexit negotiator calls for more clarity from UK  
9 nasties hidden in the small print of Theresa May's Brexit deal for EU citizens  
When someone says they voted for Brexit but it wasn't about immigration  
Irony of May's £1bn for DUP is she'll have to pay same amount every 2-3 years post-Brexit just to cover lost EU funding for Northern Ireland 
The hung parliament is a rejection of her, her government, and her Brexit.  
Tories simply vandals. Brexit destroys UK, dodgy DUP deal risks destroying decades of peace in NI. And for what exactly? 
Brexit and the tories are like the genital warts of the modern age 
My impression is: trolling back to EUref levels. Reason, I think, is that Brexit trolls are realising that opposition to Brexit is growing.  
After brexits done I reckon we should have a referendum to see if we still want to be part of the commonwealth just for a laugh. 
Brussels is unimpressed by Theresa May's offer on EU citizens' rights after Brexit  
We can't risk Brexit without a deal. The best deal is staying a full member of the EU. Let's take back control and #StopBrexit 
Brexit bill BOMBSHELL: @theresa_may @DavidDavisMP  CAN walk away without paying a penny to EU, experts say  
Sadiq out, you bloody hypocrite ! COWARD ! @SadiqKhan #London #Manchester #UK #Brexit #CurrentYear #SadiqKhan #FireTheLiar #SadiqOut 
We're a global embarrassment with a corrupt dysfunctional Govt devoid of empathy.#Brexit#ToriesOut#DUPCoalition 
Breaking - Ireland will block #Brexit deal if #MayDUP deal goes ahead  via @skwawkbox 
One year after the Brexit vote, Britain's relationship with the EU is unlikely to change. Here's why  @washingtonpost 
About to speak in Queen's Speech debate on Brexit, climate change, trade justice and refugees - all in 4 minutes! 
We criticise Tories when they chase the UKIP vote but aren't @UKLabour doing same by promising to restrict immigration/ carry out #Brexit? 
One step at a time. First get rid of the Tories then reversing Brexit will be easier. 
The youth of Britain just want to be part of a revolution There is a revolution going on....It's called brexit 
Despite the bs analysis of the crappy commentariat, I've a sense govt is now on course towards a sensible Brexit. 
If 10 MPs can squeeze £1bn out of Theresa May in 2 weeks, the EU27 should have no trouble getting their 60bn€ by 2019. #DUPCoalition #Brexit 
Brexit could halve Danish agrifood exports to UK according to Univ Copenhagen model analysis  
Will be on @questCNN in 20 minutes to discuss Brexit, May's less-than-generous "offer" to citizens - and the DUP 
Brexit is all but dead, flapping around, a scattergun of misjudged cliches and fabrications, barely believable, wholly implausible, sinking.  
Why don't they get Levy to negotiate Brexit? 
Watching this Brexit programme on the BBC, I have come to the absolutely objective view that Liam Fox doesn't have a fucking clue. 
Britain would still vote for Brexit  
We can stop this madness, we owe it to our children and grandchildren.Brexit will damage their futures and limit their opportunities.  
"TO REGULARISE MY STATUS", how so if I am here LEGALLY?Jebus wept#3million #brexit  
Thrilled @business has won the @PressClubDC "breaking news" award for our Brexit coverage  
2. Care to name a specific, tangible, certain benefit to be had from brexit for the man and woman in the street? 
EU citizens 'bitterly disappointed' with post-Brexit rights offer  
‘He would negotiate the WORST deal with the BIGGEST bill!’ May condemns Corbyn over Brexit  
SHAMBOLIC TORY BREXIT SHAMBLES!!  
The only positive from Brexit that I've heard is that the EU would be better off without the Empire obsessed UK with a veto. 
UK’s Brexit negotiators only starting to understand EU – Catherine Day  
EU citizens living in the UK - find out how #Brexit will affect you:   #citizensrights 
Brexit: EU citizens living in UK will have an ID register, reapply for settled statusArm badge not compulsory yet 
Trade with Germany will motor on after Brexit, order books for Audi, BMW & Mercedes overflowing with UK buyers, they won't put that at risk. 
Labour 46%Conservatives 41%Corbyn - The People's PMMay - HidingBrexit - Watch it collapseThe smell of right wing fear spurs me on ()  
.@GuyVerhofstadt on May's proposal on citizens' rights after Brexit: protect EU citizens' rights in UK, no degradation, no discrimination pic.twitter.com/sp5cwvokK0 
Is it LEGAL to buy votes to prop up a failing political party driving through hard Brexit that voters showed they didn't want? #DUPBribe 
Brexit.  
I do so wish that the EU27 leaders had burst out laughing when May told them that 80% had voted for Brexit. That was abuse of office. 
Gerard Lyons: "Brexit could be one of the best things to ever happen to the UK economy - provided we do it right!" #IeaBrexitUnit 
So, 10 Irish DUP MPs get £1billion for NI from Theresa May and 13 Scottish Tories get nothing, not even a seat at the Brexit table #teamRuth 
Theresa May has cost the UK tax payers £1BN over #DUPCoalition You ain't seen nothing yet!Wait till you see what she pays for #Brexit !  
ONE MILLION online followers! Thank you for your continued support. We'll keep going until we all have the Brexit we voted for!     
Am sick of people saying @UKLabour & Tory #Brexit will be the same.Rubbish.Labour will protect worker & environmental rights for starters.  
Today we remember the Tory voters in Scotland who delivered 13 MPs, and thus a coalition of chaos with the DUP and hard Brexit- thanks guys. 
U.K. Prime Minister Theresa May: "No families will be split up" by Brexit  
Exclusion of UK migrants from #Brexit vote if resident abroad for 15+ years is contrary to their rights under the ECHR. (@acgrayling) 
#DUP spent £425,000 on pro #Brexit campaign & admit money came via shady group with links to Saudi intelligence. 
How do we know the government knows Brexit is a disaster? Simple. Anyone could take May's job. No-one wants it. 
Farage defends the #DUPCoalition because it will stop "career politicians overturning Brexit." Ridiculous hypocrisy #FarageOnLBC @lbc 
Tories flinging cash at DUP but no extra money for Scotland/Wales yet now they're asking for permission for Brexit repeal act? Hmmm... 
#FarageOnLBC @LBC EU migrants in UK should not be entitled to any UK benefits after #Brexit UK Government is being too soft. 
#Brexit: is Ireland headed for trouble at the border? Watch Hans von der Brelie's new report via @euronewsreport  
You turd. You worked for Theresa May and David Cameron. Do you have Brexit and Grenfell on your CV now?  
UK Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn slammed Prime Minister Theresa May's handling of Brexit negotiations  
Brexit will happen. @iealondon 
£1Billion for 10 votes? EU Brexit negotiators will be bricking it.#DUPCoalition 
if Corbyn were serious about supporting grime he'd start referring to his shadow Brexit secretary as Starmzy, pass it on 
EU citizens 'bitterly disappointed' with post-Brexit rights offer  
It's £552.18 for every man, woman, and child in Northern Ireland.  Making them absolutely the only people in the UK to benefit from Brexit.  
Anyone who is a @PC_Alberta member by July 12 can vote in the unity agreement referendum. Sign-up to have your say!  
Let's not forget a lot of Tories chose May over Leadsom last year because they thought she'd deliver a sane Brexit & stability. #justsaying 
Brexit means ID cards for The Others. Struggling to think of an historical comparison... really, I am...  
#Brexit Sec of State confirms he's no idea of the cost to British business and jobs of leaving the Single Market and Customs Union. Clueless 
Theresa May says she'll guarantee no EU citizen living legally in Britain will have to leave the UK after Brexit  
Brexit secretary gives clearest satement yet that "Great Repeal Bill" will need Legislative Consent Motion approved by Holyrood. 
No point SNP ditching indy2 and replacing it with brexit moans.. . SNP need to sort out the mess their neglect of the country has created... 
Not really. To be able to feel reassured and valued we will like the @Conservatives to accept the EU offer that is already on #Brexit table.  
..... they're aching for Brexit to fail. 
Jacob Rees-Mogg's strident rejection of ECJ 'colonisation' of UK wins cheers in the Commons. #Brexit  
Or you could pay attention to the shift in public mood, cancel Brexit, and save us all national embarrassment and financial suicide. 
"I'm not a #Remoaner - I'm an active opponent of #Brexit!" @euromove's @stephen_dorrell explains why we need to #StopBrexit #London4Europe 
How on earth can Scottish Tory MPs vote through a #QueensSpeech that privileges Northern Ireland and locks-in hard Brexit @RuthDavidsonMSP ? 
The people of Scotland should have a choice at the end of the Brexit process.  
Translated: 'We reject Brexit and wish to keep the UK in the EU.'  
The only "#Brexit for the many" is one that impoverishes many & reduces their life chances. Have the guts to reject #Brexit! 
If the govt are looking for a tough negotiator to do the Brexit deal, might i suggest Arlene Foster? 
Ps if anyone says 'oh, we'll get a soft brexit with DUP' They don't know what they're talking about. DUP want a "British" hard brexit. 
@antonioguterres if we dont get a referendum on Biafrans Independence there will be no election in Biafra #Nnamdkanu tell DW interview 
I wish all Labour MP's had the same integrity. It makes me cringe watching remainer MP's dressing up a 'no brexit' as a 'soft brexit' 
My leadership campaign was based on empowering grassroots members to decide our future. We are following through with a referendum on unity.  
Petition: We should get behind the government on Brexit!  
Spend £142m on EU referendum. Spend £113m on snap general election. Spend £1billion on DUP to counteract results of both #magicmoneytree 
It wouldn't be just another #LeaveLie to wind up some national paranoia just when it's needed, now would it?#Brexit #Remain #StopBrexit 
“Theresa May and the Holy Grail.” This wins the internet today. Tomorrow. And Wednesday. by @rabbitandcoffee #Brexit  
Japan wants to strike free-trade deal with Britain as soon as possible to take advantage of Brexit  
The DUP deal provides "a blank cheque for Tory #Brexit which threatens the Good Friday Agreement" says Sinn Féin President @GerryAdamsSF 
Working 50 hours or more a weekUK: 12.7%US: 11.3%France: 8.2%Germany: 5.3%Ireland: 4.2%Canada: 3.9%(OECD) #0urWorld #Labour #Brexit 
"We reject a hard-right Brexit and defend the single market" | statement by over 50 @UKLabour MPs, MEPs and peers  
Under no circumstance post Brexit can EU law prevail over UK law.  
Jeremy Corbyn destroy "Dead Woman Walking" Theresa May, over her chaotic #Brexit performance so far.#DUPCoalition 
If they negotiate the same terms with Europe, brexit is going to cost 47 trillion 
Farage the NEGOTIATOR? DUP pushes for ex-Ukip leader to be given role to protect Brexit  via @News Bison 
Imagine if Jeremy was against Brexit? I long for the Labour party to stand up and yell “STOP THE MADNESS." 
Would DUP pact collapse if there's no Brexit deal, as DUP committed to frictionless border with RoI? Sub-text of @ChukaUmunna question 
.@Theresa_May has no mandate at home and no mandate abroad. She is unable to negotiate Brexit. Labour would deliver a Brexit #ForTheMany. 
UK Government's offer to EU citizens and their families in the UK:  #brexit #citizensrights 
Just asked the PM about #Horizon2020 - she admits universities are already adversely affected because of #Brexit  
Introducing @yourbrandhero, the company who helped bring you Brexit... but whose office appears to be an empty house  
This. Totally this. The EU side is doing more for citizens' rights - even for Brits! - than the UK side is. Merci Michel! #Brexit  
EU's Brexit negotiator not impressed with Theresa May's offer on EU citizens in UK says has to do more...  
Ignoring Brexit would be “bollocks,” @UKLabour’s @CarolineFlintMP tells a @ProgressOnline conference 
Government finds £1bn for DUP but can only find £23m for Cornwall post-Brexit. Yet the Cornish line up to vote for Tories. Quite astounding. 
May's offer to EU nationals does not go far enough, says EU Brexit negotiator - Politics live  
In the Labour manifesto they commit to ending Freedom of Movement. Ending FofM means leaving the Single Market. That's hard Brexit.  
#Brexit | Read our position paper on essential principles on citizens' rights:  #Article50 
Lord Buckethead is a gift that keeps on giving #Brexit   
This is Brexit Britain...  
A staggering number of children in this country depend on Medicaid. This is not a bill; it's a referendum on our moral fiber as a nation.  
Labour’s nonsensical Brexit position is perfect opposition politics, says @katyballs 
Any EU national who wants to stay in post-Brexit UK will have to live under UK law. If they don't like it, they're free to leave anytime.  
‘He would negotiate the WORST deal with the BIGGEST bill!’ Prime Minister@theresa_may condemns Corbyn over Brexit  
They're just planning to walk out and blame you for the failure. Don't give an inch and let them walk out. The HoC won't allow hard Brexit. 
Let us know if #Brexit proposals solve your situation eucitizenstaskforce@gmail.com @catherinemep @Claude_Moraes @GreenJeanMEP @SebDance 
Outrageous betrayal' Free movement continues for TWO YEARS after Brexit under PM plan . What poor thought out crap  
EU citizens living in the UK - find out how #Brexit will affect you:  #citizensrights 
'It's a relatively small price to pay for the additional stability which this agreement brings, with the DUP committed to Brexit'. 
Farmers concerned at impact of Brexit - @M_AndersonSF 
Brexit Britain.  
With these negotiating skills Brexit should be a breeze!  
Good day for Brexit: 1 DUP deal strengthens Brexit position 2 First substantial deal offer - settled status for EU citizens. Steady as we go 
'Brexit is NOT a challenge to NATO' General HAILS UK's EU exit as GOOD for the alliance  
BREAKING: Irish citizens living in the UK will NOT have to apply for "settled status" post Brexit.  
I opposed Brexit. I was wrong. Finally I can see why it was all worthwhile. #DUPCoalition 
Did our PM just spend £1bn buying a government that is weaker than the one she already had? To strengthen her brexit negotiations? 
.@theresa_may has told EU citizens they must bring family members over to Britain before #Brexit  
Brexit referendum: £142.4mGeneral Election: £170mCoalition with DUP: £1bnHaving Theresa May as a strong and stable leader: priceless 
UK Paper includes case studies of who gets to stay where and with what rights post Brexit: Sarah, Lukas, Agnieszka, Christophe, & Andriana  
VIDEO: We Are Not Free, If No Date For Referendum No Election Here, Kanu Tells DWTV  
Just asked PM why people in #Wales being treated as 2nd class citizens? Billions found for NI but no guarantees for us #Brexit @WelshLabour 
This won't end well. "Brexit: EU citizens living in UK will have to apply for special ID card"  
What is on offer for EU nationals after Brexit: the key points  
So 3,200,000 EU citizens in UK will each have to APPLY for their settled status with a 5 year qualifying period. How bloody generous #brexit 
Japan seeks early free trade talks with UK amid Brexit fears  
WATCH: Prime Minister-in-waiting Jeremy Corbyn destroys "Dead Woman Walking" Theresa May, over her chaotic #Brexit performance so far.  
David Cameron held referendum to stop people "banging on about Europe": v. successful, barely been talked about since, what even is a Brexit 
EU citizens must bring family over before Brexit or face tougher immigration  
Hoots of derision from the labour benches when Theresa May says 'there is no extreme Brexit. No hard Brexit....no soft Brexit.' 
May: "There is no extreme Brexit. There is no hard Brexit and there is no soft Brexit." 
Erasmus students have rights that shld be settled at the start of Brexit talks, not later.Discussing it now with the Estonian presidency  
This is one step away from wearing a patch on your sleave☞ EU citizens in UK must have special ID cards after Brexit  
Sinn Féin President Gerry Adams says Government's deal with the DUP provides "blank cheque for Tory Brexit which threatens peace agreement" 
Corbyn didn't cause Brexit, but for the last year he's been better positioned than anyone to slow or stop it, and he's supported it. 
If it gets us Brexit, I'm happy  #DUPCoalition 
"This country needs a new approach to #Brexit" - Labour leader @jeremycorbyn  
ONLY vote if you RETWEETShould we have another general election(GE) & proportional representation(PR) after #Brexit #followback #yourvoice 
UK Prime Minister Theresa May says that no EU citizen currently in the UK lawfully will be asked to leave after Brexit  
Keir Starmer has been appointed to the Privy Council. Can now be briefed by David Davis on Brexit deal in private. 
Corbyn: "The PM wanted a landslide and then she lost her majority, now her  Brexit mandate is in tatters." #Brexit  
A vote for Labour wasn't necessarily a vote for Corbyn. It was, in many cases, a vote against Tory Brexit.  
EU citizens living in UK must apply for special ID card after Brexit  
EU citizens living in UK after #Brexit under "settled status" to have same rights as Britons to bring family to UK  
"We want you to stay": EU citizens lawfully in Britain would be treated as British citizens after #Brexit, explains PM @theresa_may 
Saddening that @guardian columnist Matthew d'Ancona hasn't the imagination to see that #Brexit can be stopped. Another defeatist columnist. 
.@theresa_may: "We want to build a new, deep and special partnership" between the UK and the EU #Brexit  
Theresa May is addressing Parliament with an update on Brexit talks  
It was great to exchange ideas with leading women in sports law at the  @WISLaw_ event regarding the impact of Brexit on UK sports #WISLaw 
Thanks to Maria Patsalos @MishconSport for hosting our #WISLaw lunch talk on Brexit & Football in London!  
Ten things wrong with #TheresaMay's "offer" to EU citizens >>   #Brexit  
Read the testimonies of the EU (and Brit) citizens caught in limbo by Brexit and May's inexcusable dithering.  
The Tory Gov has finalised its deal with the DUP.Ten DUP MPs now have more influence over Brexit negotiations than 5.2 million Scots 
I love all of the Brexit Shorts videos but my goodness Penelope Wilton is a wonderful actress  
Lately it feels like we're having some kind of horrifying national referendum on whether or not Americans believe that human life has value. 
Japan seeks early free trade talks with UK amid Brexit fears  
The hypocrisy of demanding that the "mandate" from referendum must be obeyed but the election means nothing, is breathtaking. 
New on @LSEEuroppblog : Catalonia’s referendum: Four views on whether the #Catalonia vote should go ahead 
Time to re-write the Brexit bus again:#MagicMoneyTree #DUP 
Tories have basically bribed some Protestant fundamentalists £1 billion to push through Brexit which will impoverish the UK#DUPCoalition 
The DUP deal doesn't bode well for Brexit negotiations: May gave them everything they wanted, got no concessions and still vulnerable...  
Theresa May should now confirm to the EU that Britain people fully support #Brexit by having a second referendum. That'll show them 
EU Brexit team absolutely delighted to see Tories out-negotiated by DUP for a billion quid | NewsThump 
David Davis threatens Brussels with Brexit 'WALK AWAY' if EU tries to 'PUNISH or DELAY'  
Just remember, this is £1 billion just for a basic confidence-and-supply thingAnd these people think they can negotiate a good Brexit deal  
DUP boost for BREXIT government. And to keep out that traitor Corbyn. Time for a glass of bubbly. 
Meeting of national parlamentarians within #EPP in Brussels  - we are talking with @MichelBarnier about #Brexit  
Expensive price to pay for Tory hubris in the last few years - Brexit and £1B bribe to the DUP 'National interest' yer arse  
Peace of mind for Pensioners.Confidence of Brexit delivery.IRA supporters kept out of Government.You can see why the BBC hates the #DUP 
Damian Green: Government can now proceed, and more confident that the Bills we need to make [Brexit] a success, will proceed  
Hard Brexit could halt Heathrow expansion plans, experts say  
NEWS! EU Brexit team absolutely delighted to see Tories out-negotiated by DUP for a billion quid  
Thank you @adamboultonSKY for giving EU nationals time on your program to talk about #citizensrights post Brexit - #ALLOUTPOLITICS 
Free trade deals with the poorest countries will continue post-Brexit, Haiti confirms in a statement about Britain. 
Interesting thread, linking to an interesting paper, on the ECJ or alternative UK/EU dispute settlement post-Brexit. Two points however 1/  
With the Gov. now in place, let's focus on securing the jobs, prosperity, trade & good int'l relations that Brexit can bring @Conservatives 
Let's see. The DUP want to see a complete Brexit. They want to see the Union flourish. They want to see Pensioners protected. BBC weeping. 
Our point exactly #Brexit  
Schäuble: Brits were 'endlessly lied to' about Brexit  
After today's statements, MPs will debate #Brexit and #ForeignAffairs in day two of the #QueensSpeech debate 
There you go...Brexit is so successful!Govt arranges for money to grow on trees in N.I. So send in your requests, Scotland, Wales & all... 
Leftism- There is no place for hatred in our society, unless directed at Tories, white blokes and people who voted Brexit, then it's fine. 
I suggested that Jacob Rees-Mogg and Farage would make good brexit negotiators. I suspect they would do as well as our leaders. Push for it. 
£1.5bn to prop up #May. NE England, Cornwall, Wales, Scotland must be so pleased that #Brexit can now be driven through. Well done !  
Consensus among government and Tory Leavers on "clean Brexit with a soft landing", time-limited interim period >>  
And no seat at the Brexit table. You'll have had your tea, Scotland.  
.@campbellclaret says don't have a referendum about anything. @Anna_Greenberg says the sky has not fallen so it's weird argument #QandA 
In case you haven't seen it, a really clear explanation of our post-Brexit options.  
Less austerity, likelihood of softer/no Brexit, weak Govt that can't do controversial stuff, strong opposition. Did election get it wrong? 
Leave Tories Support Time-Limited “Soft Landing” Brexit | Interim Implementation Phase Lasting 2-3 Years  
It's our patriotic duty to stop Tories imposing Brexit on us.@acgrayling @JolyonMaugham @SocialistVoice @IanDunt @jeremycorbyn @MarieAnnUK 
Irish PM has vowed to vote against #Brexit if #MayDUP goes ahead. Irish Green Party have served Gov papers of intent b/c of breaking #GFA 
BREAKING NEWS: Arlene Foster from #DUP has seen the #MagicMoneyTree !#CoalitionOfChaos #JC4PM #MayMustGo #Brexit  
The politician who called a referendum on a fundamental issue, thinking he could not lose or preparing for loss......calls for stability.  
£1bn to buy the DUP to prop up the Tory govt. £50bn for Brexit. Yet the NHS is "running on fumes", rail failing, local govt cut off... 
History will not remember you kindly, Cameron. "I'm ending health and safety culture" gave us Grenfell. Your vanity gave us Brexit. 
The Tories and DUP off to negotiate Brexit  
In the context of a hung Parliament & the threat of #Brexit isolating & bankrupting the country. Is this squalid deal the best we can do?  
Labour have yet to define their Brexit position says Larry Elliott  
So £1bn for #DUPCoalition : £100m/vote. You can't accuse the #Tories to do corruption like amateurs. Only 3 weeks of £350m Brexit Bus money! 
£1 billion. The price we pay to shore up a Prime Minister her own party doesn't believe in, to force a hard #Brexit most people don't want.  
surely ditching the hubris and forming a cross party coalition - if only for Brexit - would have been more in the national interest? 
And this while we're getting poorer because of #Brexit.  
... but further £130m of funding had been put in doubt by Brexit and it was on hold - appears this funding has now been replaced by the deal 
part 1} Igbos quit notice in Northern Nigeria is approaching,Arewa youth urge Nigeria gov to allow #Biafrans to go in peace by #referendum  
The Conservatives are keeping May as PM due to the Brexit talks, but they don't understand the long-term damage she is doing to the party. 
Here's a thing !In the C&S agreement DUP (EU Leavers) will support Govt on #Brexit votes.How do they represent NI ?NI voted to *remain* 
The big money for DUP support is spread over next two years, long enough in theory to get through Brexit. & then another general election? 
Jeremy says build bridges not walls. brexit is a wall. 
Small beer compared to what you and your lying  colleagues cost us as a result of the EU Referendum. 
'Why are we not supporting her?' Caller demands UK gets behind Theresa May for Brexit  Prime Minister @theresa_may 
Someone should remind Nick Clegg that the first major party leader to demand the In/Out referendum he now rails against was, er, Nick Clegg. 
Theresa May makes deporting foreign criminals a key Brexit demand  
NHS crisis. Policing crisis. Housing crisis. Schools crisis. Austerity Britain. Debt. #Brexit ruinous. Tories destroying UK. BUT £££ for DUP  
.@JamesMcGrory – DUP must stay true to their manifesto promises & stand up against hard Brexit  
PM says the DUP will support the Conservative Govt on votes on the Queen's Speech, the Budget, legislation relating to Brexit and security 
Tories just paid £1bn for 10 votes that would've gone their way anyway. Great negotiating. Brexit will be a breeze. (PS: magic money tree?) 
The reality of #brexit is the EU powerhouses of Germany & France are set to sweep up opportunities across Europe, as the UK looks on in envy 
Michael Gove could use Brexit to shelve key plan to protect the environment, critics fear  
Summary of the DUP confidence and supply deal in five tweets: an agreement to support government's Budget, security and Brexit legislation  
the people negotiating brexit would struggle to negotiate the return of a cardigan to marks and spencers with the tags still on 
Such is Sturgeon's hatred of the English, tht she wants brexit t fail.She has No desire for Scotland and UK to have good,fair, negotiations. 
The end of @UKLabour fantasy that @jeremycorbyn will be PM - time to make #brexit work - Country B4 Party  
Don't let Sturgeon have any say in brexit. She has nothing constructive to offer, therefore is of no value. Only desire is to disrupt..... 
Time to pull together and get the best Brexit deal for Britain. 
Shami Chakrabarti, shad attorney general, says they will back free movement post-Brexit. Another Labour figure in denial over immigration 
Tory recklessnessEconomy- DebtDefence- CutsLaw & Order- 4 terror attacksSafety- GrenfellBrexitNI Peace -DUP coalition#EnoughIsEnough 
BREAKING: Theresa May agrees to deny the negative effects of Brexit AND evolution in power sharing deal with the DUP. 
Good friday agreement in tatters. Ireland blocking any brexit negotiations. General election in 6 months. Corbyn PM 
Conservative/DUP deal is a new low for democracy and human rights. WE will not allow women to pay for Brexit and will fight for equality 
How will Brexit affect staffing, the cost of drugs and medical research? Dismally. This 12-min podcast explains why. 
 @NicolaSturgeon: It’s in everyone’s interests for the UK to get the best Brexit deal possible.  
I mistakenly tweeted the wrong version of the many public documents on Brexit published by the EU.  This is the preferred version.  Sorry.  
Wetherspoon's owner, Tim Martin, is so confident of Brexit, he's investing £13m in a hotel and pub... in Ireland. 
Unelected Baroness takes it upon herself to change Labour's manifesto post-election and challenge the referendum result. Beyond farcical.  
Am not opposed to Brexit in principle, but the misinformation and misdirections from UK side is now torrential.  Nothing reliable is said. 
The DUP is now in government. Help us investigate who gave it £425k to secretly fund Brexit:  
For the govt, Brexit is all about slashing regulation and creating a small-state, low-skill economy with a race to the bottom on environment  
"We do have an issue of gender balance up here," notes Conor Brady as he introduces media editors panel at @iiea Brexit seminar pic.twitter.com/drDDMsxiIc 
I still reckon Brexit is needlessly catastrophic, but if you're saying a Lab Brexit would be the same as a Tory one, I think you're lying. 
The effect of Brexit on the UK film industry. The good, the bad and the analysis  
#Article50 talks: The EU's first priority is to protect the rights of EU citizens in the UK and UK citizens in the EU. #Brexit  
EVERYTHING they say we can do after brexit is EXACTLY the same as what we can already do in the EU. 
Brexit Fact #35When we Brexit, we'll still be in:WTOG7G20OECDFSBNATOUNSCUNEPUNECEISOILOCodexInterpolFive EyesCommonwealth 
Siri, create the most Brexit tableau imaginable  
Don't forget to get your copy of BREXIT magazine, the magazine for TRUE PATRIOTIC BRITS. Out now. (Price tbc as the pound keeps slipping)  
Thanks to Brexit we'll be able to deport 2-3k EU prisoners. EU law means we can't now if sentence under 2yrs  
After #Brexit, @theresa_may keen to exclude #EU criminals fm UK. Helps to know who they are, by having access to & checking EU databases. 
If there is another general election this year, should Labour run a campaign promising a second EU referendum? 
British ministers stated they wanted to create Empire 2.0 after Brexit. Here's Britain's new aircraft carrier in time for gunboat diplomacy.  
Tory plotting ‘will lead to bad Brexit deal or no deal’ as SNP demands seat at negotiations to protect Scotland  
And Corbyn is backing them 100% when it comes to hard Brexit. He wants to end Freedom of Movement. He wants to exit the Single Market.  
Those vicious remoaners, viciously asking 'name one good thing about Brexit' for an entire year. @BrexitBin 
How can Britain win £1.2 trillion ? Just by cancelling Brexit and see the Pound surge to its pre Brexit value   
Has the way young people abroad see the UK changed since the Brexit vote? Read the results of our latest survey:  
David Davies, Brexit negotiator extraordinaire. Who needs preparation, ideas or talent? #BrexitShambles 
Meeting senior Austrian politicians to talk Trade & Brexit. Austria has £4bn exports to UK, vs £2.6bn imports. Need to keep it barrier-free. 
Outrage as David Davis refuses to say how Brexit will affect Hogwarts Exchange program with Beauxbatons and Durmstrang. #HarryPotter20 
Half a million children born or raised in UK will not get automatic citizenship after Brexit  
Brexit could destroy the UK's food and farming industry – or be the making of it | Felicity Lawrence  
Read this wondering when on earth I wrote this then saw the date: last year! Still true now, Brexit is against our interests.  
Archbishop of Canterbury suggests #Brexit 'in fascist tradition'  
Thanks To Brexit, We Can Celebrate A Year Of Economic Success, writes @TiceRichard 
THIS WEEK: Our Brexit book is released(@IntersentiaUK) edited by Prof Dougan w/ contributions from leading academics 
Big political challenge of Brexit is to find creative language to obscure major capitulations. "Grace period" sure to be first of many.  
500,000 children raised in UK will battle to get passports after Brexit | The Independent  
New update: on Grenfell, Uber, Workers' rights and Brexit  
Dire consequences for #economy can no longer be ignored in #Brexit debate (via @InFactsOrg ) 
‘Back soft Brexit,’ unions urge Labour. Amazing news! Unions and bosses agree! We need to stay in the single market! 
#Brexit gamble: EU can wait until UK ‘shoots itself in the foot’ (Op-Edge)  
Deafening silence on UK food policy in Brexit. Essential to debate Great Food Transition needed. Brexit is stupid deviation from bigger task  
Leavers in Government must not use #Brexit to justify inaction on protecting our environment #LeaveWatch 
Off EU go! Theresa May to deport foreign criminals after Brexit as part of EU migrant deal  
Michael Gove could use Brexit to shelve key plan to protect the environment, critics fear  
Islamophobia, conspiracism, integrated threat: a study of Brexit psychology  Might be the first of many such papers 
Wait. The British Brexit negotiating team has done something clever and interesting? No, this cannot be, when Britain is useless/doomed.  
1. The government publishes its Brexit proposals on citizens' rights today.Be mindful of spin and over-simplification. 
Brexit zealotry and unwillingness to face up to the dire risks for the people of this country step firmly over a line into the immoral. 
Senior political correspondent @BethRigby outlines the Govt's plans for Brexit, as well as what EU leaders want secured as part of the deal  
Seen a lot of threads about how young people didn't realise Labour's manifesto backed Brexit. Young people aren't morons. 
"Mr. Hammond, after careful consideration, I've decided not to endorse your Brexit."  
POLL: If referendum were held now, Britain would still vote for Brexit!  
The UK's Brexit plan to pull out of euratom will have 'chaotic fallout' for UK's nuclear facilities warn experts (£)  
The real tragedy of Brexit is we'll lose a decade fixing something that wasn't broken while ignoring important issues that affect lives...  
Funny thing is had Scotland voted for independence in 2014 ... the imperialistic hangover would never have had the #Brexit ref :))  
Casual anti-Brexit bias on Today Prog quite something today. Brexit repeatedly trashed by people on to talk on other stuff (Macron, myths). 
Brexit. The fun hasn't started yet.  
ICYMI: Our chairman @RolandRudd on why it's absolutely right that we continue to debate the type of #Brexit we need for the UK. Please RT:  
May says Brexit will allow her to deport EU criminals. Last year the Home Secretary admitted she can already do it.  
Dear news media. You were wrong on Brexit. You screwed up on this election. Please don't sit on a public safety scandal, you can help. 
Mrs May has a majority to press forward with #Brexit. There can be no more delay. Listen to the EU responses & be prepared to challenge them 
Why are so many of my pro-EU friends and contemporaries refusing to question Corbyn's hard-Brexit stance?It won't make you disloyal.  
"VOTE in our exclusive Brexit Referendum II poll – would you still vote to leave the EU?": I just did  
BREXIT: British tourists to continue getting free health cover on holiday to Europe. Another Remain lie busted!  
Labour need to take a lead on this. With so many Tories favouring Remain, Labour could lead a 'rebellion' to end this Brexit nonsense.  
Pleasure to arrive in Vienna, for Trade & Brexit discussions with Austrian Government, companies and politicians - strong friend of UK! 
A great piece by @lawrencefelic laying out the issues around Brexit and food.  
... and nothing has changed since then. Referendum was still advisory and Parliament can still kill Brexit.  
Me in @thetimes today, on The Case for a Softer Brexit:  
David Lammy MP urges Parliament to reject EU referendum result: 'We can stop this madness'  
SECURITY: Brexit Britain to start deporting dangerous EU criminals. Finally!  
You know what you should do then? Push for a 2nd referendum and strengthen the Leave mandate.Go on. I dare you. 
Labour won over young voters. But it is betraying them on Brexit | Vince Cable  
Why we shouldn't have another referendum on Brexit - or any other referendum, ever again.  - by @davidallengreen 
Brexit simplified.  
"We want to 'kick out terrorists' but don't realise the ECHR (which handles that) is not the ECJ & we will still be part of it post-Brexit."  
Possibly because Corbyn is a hypocrite who backs hard Brexit and keeping Tory welfare cuts but wants to spend on middle class giveaways.  
‘Stop immigration’ is no longer the Tories’ Brexit rallying cry | Matthew d’Ancona   
Catalonia’s referendum: Four views on whether the vote should go ahead   
Brexit Fact #28The Top Three most popular countries for Brits living abroad are all outside the EU27:#1 Australia#2 America#3 Canada 
Yoyo, the fast-growing British mobile payments app, has raised £12m as fintech defies Brexit fears  
Fed up of politicians on both sides and the media trying to force Brexit on us, knowing it will damage the UK and make us poorer. #nobrexit 
NHS doctor moving back to France because of Brexit abuse  
Brexit Fact #34Agricultural subsidies were paid to UK farmers from the 1920s, but the 1947 Agriculture Act formalised the system. 
What British values? Play with EU migrants like bargaining chips? Accuse journalists of being unpatriotic if they dare discuss HMG Brexit?  
Brexit Fact #33The UK contributes €6bn a year towards the EU Common Agricultural Policy (CAP). Our farmers receive back €3bn from the EU. 
If Corbyn really wants to be next PM he should back hard remain, not soft brexit 
5. And then the key question: how are these rights interpreted and enforced post Brexit? 
4 .  This bundle of rights follows EU citizens as they move in EU.  EU27 citizens in UK. UK citizens in EU27.  Horribly complex post Brexit. 
'BBC suffers from REMOANERISM' Rees-Mogg rips into corporation for 'anti-Brexit coverage'. Peston is Common Purpose. 
This thread can not be real...if it were you'd think the people of this great land could do something as stupid as vote for Brexit! 
Journalists: #Brexit's a shamblesLeadsom: Shut up. Be patriotic.Doctors: The NHS is failingHunt: Shut up. Be proud.Tories#r4today 
Off EU go! Prime Minister @theresa_may  ‘set to kick out thousands of European criminals after Brexit’  
Brexit boom as business confidence reaches 18-month high as negotiations begin  @DavidDavisMP @theresa_may 
If we've learned one thing in GB, it's that a straight binary referendum is a terrible idea. 
Correct we don't want a cross party Brexit team. We want our elected government to do the people's will and get us out of this mess.  
We can't wait for Brexit these jihadists could kill again at any moment. We must derogate from whatever laws prevent deportation.  
Yoyo raises £12m as fintech defies Brexit fears  
Germany!Is this how you want to live?Massive police force at every holiday.Your country isn't safe. #Brexit #AfD #PVV #Trump #FN 
Post #Brexit UK can have own HumanRights protections AND make sure CRIMINALS canNOT abuse those rightsMainly Criminals use/benefit ECHR 
Women against sharia.Children against invasion.#GayAgainstShariaAll against lsIam.#Brexit #Nexit #Trump Dismiss #EU #merkel 
UK’s ‘grace period’ a novel way to tackle Brexit challenges  
May aims to throw out European inmates after Brexit  
OSCE/ODIHR final report on Turkey’s referendum recommends reviewing legal framework to secure rights and freedoms  
PM spells out 'settled status' plan for EU nationals in UK after Brexit  
Brexit: a year of learning#Brexit  
Recall, if you will, the Tory press promising Brexit would keep the UK armed forces safe from "activist human rights lawyers".  
I expect laughing stock Brexit Britain to come up on Aussie equivalent of @bbcquestiontime tonight #qanda 
Leaked document shows ‘secret’ government studies into impact of ‘hard’ Brexit  via @LondonEconomic 
Just arrived Australia. Seems Brexit Britain a laughing stock here too Theresa May and Holy Grail - Insiders - ABC:  
Margaret was such a role model.Ask any Brexiteer to name one TANGIBLE benefit of #Brexit and they go straight to abuse.So handbag them  
Farage Vows Return to the Frontline of Politcs if 'Brexit Doesn't Mean Brexit' -   
Good luck to our European Fellows with the #Brexit conference tomorrow. Should be a great program in London!  @IAFL_FamLaw  
Er.....there was a referendum? Have you forgotten?!   
Brexit gamble: EU can wait until UK ‘shoots itself in the foot’ (Op-Edge)  
We need liberal tolerant values right now. Not the UKIP Tories. Not the hard left CorbynThe @libdems offer hopeOppose #Brexit 
My country has become shameful, unwelcoming & xenophobic #NHS doctor moving back to France because of #Brexit abuse  
If the Brexit referendum was held today how would you vote? My answer: To remain in the EU. What do you think?  
Sigh. Repeat after me. Access is meaningless. North Korea has access. #brexit #lies dressed as fact 
Labour Remainers#Brexit is not inevitable, therefore please send a messageIf you agree, please sign and RT 
@jeremycorbyn Take note Jeremy - "brexit" is a scheme created by racists,fascists, fantasists and liars. Why on earth are you supporting it? 
No.UK doesn't need a "more consensual" Brexit.UK needs the understanding that remaining in EU is the only right thing to do.  
Brexit poll Express, shown only to Express readers needs more representative views, you know what to do Pls R/T  
Hey Lakitu from Mario Kart, you've always given me great advice. What do you think we should do about Brexit?  
LYING #Remoaner gets busted on the vile lie that #Brexit caused a spike in #hatecrimes. The scare stories never stop 
#Brexit does none of those things.The best you can hope for is it won't be as bad as it could be.Economically there is NO upside.None  
Me: Brexit means Brexit.My boss at the Oxford English Dictionary: You're fired. 
David Lammy is spot on. The referendum was not the will of the people because it was only advisory.  An opinion poll  
NHS doctor moving back to France because of Brexit abuse  
POLL: 60% now want to Leave EU 1 year after referendum.Majority of voters still believe #Brexit was right decision. 
#PestononSunday Angela Eagle MP thinks we need a more consensual Brexit. Well I don't give my consent for any form of Brexit. #StopBrexit 
Last week over 1600 Albertans joined @PC_Alberta! Help make history by joining to vote in the unity referendum:  
We have written an open letter regarding our Party's position on Brexit. Please sign and RT 
So far 60 of the Kippers' claims made for Brexit have been tested for compliance with truthfulness, and there has been 100% failure rate. 
Chris Patten: Brexit = result "calamitous errors of 2 Tory PMs trying to manage unmanageable English nationalist right-wing of Tory party" 
Brexit: What Brexiters claim they are getting compared to what they will actually get.  
There has been an undercurrent of this, these so called 'Brexit benefits' actually things we can do, right now, as EU members. 
No fan of the Royal Family but this is a bit harsh. But that's Brexit for you.  
One year on and the Barcelona room is no more, smh look what Brexit has done  
Corbyn's views on Trident could be popular. We the public have never been asked our opinions on Trident. Referendum?  
Why is she STILL in Number 10?Non stop chaos and crisis and Brexit shambles.#MayMustGo 
Me: how should we tackle BrexitKing Solomon: cut the baby in half!Me: you cant...its not...that was right that one time 
Brexit Fact #26The UK runs trade surpluses w/ USA, Japan, Brazil, S Korea, Australia, Malaysia, S Africa. We run a deficit with the EU27. 
The U.S. considers Britain our family.  WE are OF YOU. I was so happy about Brexit ~ it meant no longer will non-Brits determine your future 
Seeing #Grenfell tower forlorn and hollow of life, angers me beyond control.  #Brexit #TheresaMay 
'Thanks to Gina Miller there's no going back!' Brexit now enshrined in law, says Rees-Mogg  
THE TIMES FRONT PAGE: 'Foreign criminals to be thrown out after Brexit' #skypapers 
Brexit Fact #29The EU28 isn't Europe. It's 43% of Europe's land mass, 56% of Europe's countries, and 68% of Europe's people. 
Labour need to be explicit, hard Brexit yes or no. No waffling, just an answer. It will determine a lot of votes next election. 
The dilemma facing the Tories. #brexit  
This Vote Leave campaign advertisement on the #NHS £350m - Such a grotesque lie. There should be prosecutions.#Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain 
Brexit Fact #27There are more Americans living in the EU (1.0m) than there are Brits (0.9m). There are more Brits in Australia (1.3m). 
Britain's financial power is already seeping away  
By now we should have an effective govt with a working majority, opposed by an effective opposition. Difficult when they both want Brexit. 
Lord Buckethead on Brexit: 'A mouldy pain au chocolat could negotiate better than Theresa May'  
Sturgeon postpones #indyref2 plans to focus on soft Brexit following catastrophic #GE2017Nice excuse Nicola  
It's far worse than Suez. Suez was about feeling a loss of power. Brexit means abandoning real levers of power, and getting poorer too.  
Why is the Archbishop of Canterbury giving political opinion on Brexit?We don't tell him how to run his sky fairy racket?  
I'm not a Lib Dem. But although Labour's is a different version of have-your-cake-and-eat-it Brexit to the Tories', both are pure fantasy. 
Unions are joining Labour leading figures to demand an official soft Brexit stance from Labour. Good stuff.  
Brexit has poisoned the UK, undermined our values, damaged our relationships and destroyed our reputation.  
Another balanced & depressing thread on Brexit negotiations   
Brexit Fact #25The UK ran a trade surplus with the EU (EEC) before 1973, yet have run a trade deficit with it ever since (except in 1975). 
Labour's Brexit stance not identical to the Tories': Prioritise economy, not immigration; unilateral citizens' guarantee; reject "no deal". 
#Brexit Britain be a better, kinder nation than required by the EU, which often behaves as a selfish giant (h/t @owenbarder) 
Labour votes were not Brexit votes. They were votes to kick out the Tories.  
Have encountered many #Brexit Brectums in the past year.  
Davis is Brexit's heavyweight ballast. His failure will absolutely sink the ship. In this strictly limited sense I'm a Davis fan too. 
Schäuble: Brits were ‘endlessly lied to’ about Brexit  
Labour in a much better position on Brexit than the Tories. Can literally evolve to just about any position imaginable but Tories stuck. 
15.  This a depressing thread to write, I wish it was otherwise.  Remain a fan, but this not a good way to approach the Brexit deal./ends 
As formal negotiations on Brexit begin - a view @wellcometrust of what science needs in order to continue to thrive  
NHS doctor moving back to France because of Brexit abuse  
Brexit Fact #23Since '95, the WTO (World Trade Organization) has worked relentlessly to reduce global tariffs. They're now way down on '73 
Justin Welby backs cross-party approach to Brexit to 'draw out poison'  
Brexit Fact #22The UK is the World #2 professional services exporter. There is no Single Market in Europe in services. 
Brexit Fact #21No other EU country exports less to the EU as a percentage of its total global exports than the UK. And that % is shrinking 
How things change! He'll want a second referendum next!  
Spotted in #Manchester! Someone out there is getting busy with these anti #Brexit posters! A #StopBrexit #Banksy? #Remain #mcr4eu 
William Hague, who was against brexit cashes in anyway  
Brexit:W r o n gW r o n gW r o n g!R i g h t?  
Brexit leaders promised so much. With @Theresa_May so weak, are we on track for #LAMEDUCKBREXIT? 
Nigel Farage SLAMS Jeremy Corbyn over Glastonbury appearance  via @Your Brexit 
45 seconds to expose Tory Brexit chaos and their plots to replace May. A dangerous cocktail for the country...# MayMustGo pic.twitter.com/JGg6u1tw58 
Huge Poll, Please VOTE FOLLOW RETWEETHow do you feel with #Tory as the leading party and EU #brexit #yourvoice #followback 
#Catalonia: Could an independence referendum actually happen?  
Brexit Fact #20The UK economy is larger than all other trade blocs worldwide other than NAFTA and the EU27. We do not need to be in a bloc 
#brexit 1 year on!@Nigel_Farage 
“It would be helpful if broadcasters were willing to be a bit patriotic”@andrealeadsom to @maitlis Brexit questionspic.twitter.com/i5gtaiQx9t 
Lord Wolfson @OpenEurope calls for slower, open Brexit outside SM/CU with interim arrangements. Think most Leave Tories wld be ok with that. pic.twitter.com/aHiiR4kfJa 
JPMorgan seems keen on Dublin after Brexit - it's believed to want even more office space  
Simon Wolfson is right to decry squabbling over "hard" or "soft" Brexit - both sides should agree on an open Brexit.  
500,000 children raised in the UK are waiting anxiously to hear if they will gain citizenship after Brexit  
Brexit Shambles- the new hit from the guys who brought you the Poll Tax, BSE and salmonella chicken. (& the Miners strike and Hillsborough) 
1649 England executed a king, declared a Republic. 1660 changed mind, brought back a king. All decisions are reversible, especially Brexit! 
Brexit Fact #15Grimsby was #1 global fishing port in '73. Just 15 UK trawlers use the port now. Brexit will trigger 100,000 fisheries jobs 
Nigel Farage: If Brexit doesn’t mean Brexit, I'll head for the frontline again.  
'Thanks to Gina Miller there's no going back!' Brexit now enshrined in law, says Rees-Mogg  
Royal Bank of Scotland to cut over 400 jobs, plans to move many of them to India. Brexit impact or india cheaper   
FT View: It’s crucial to make swift progress on residency rights and start thrashing out a broader Brexit deal.  
A Brexit Britain will be a powerful force for freedom and prosperity on the world stage—and robust ally for the U.S.  
."I get that you may be bored of Brexit. But the important stuff hasn’t even started yet". 
Another lie from @RupertMyers. .@jeremycorbyn's position was very clear: remain & reform. Blame for #brexit is on the @Conservatives!  
Brexit Fact #14International co-operation between university research departments is a global phenomenon, not a regional EU one. 
Brexit Fact #13Non-EU27 countries are participants of the Erasmus student programme:IcelandMacedoniaNorwayTurkeyUK will participate 
Yes that's exactly what I'm thinking - I'm willing her to stagger on until Brexit utterly fails. Otherwise Labour will try it & get blame.  
Better to bring back proper representative democracy. But a ref on terms could drive a stake through brexit's heart. 
BFE: Referendum Anniversary WKNDR! #1 Perth For Europe! Out and about across the city for EU! @perth4europe #StopBrexit #manifestoforeurope 
Lord Buckethead on Brexit: 'A mouldy pain au chocolat could negotiate better than Theresa May'  
The @LibDems should fight to stop #Brexit and so become the real opposition to the Tories, Farage, Murdoch & Dacre.@timfarron @nick_clegg 
Japan's biggest brokerage has chosen Frankfurt as its EU base after Brexit, sources say  
I just informed this hamster Italian food will get more expensive after Brexit  
A SHAMBOLIC TORY BREXIT SHAMBLES!!!The  rich will get RICHER&The poor will get POORER!!!  
Oh, I think worse: not having lifted a finger during the campaign, not fighting Brexit & yet basking in adoration of youth vote (Remainers).  
Brexit Fact #10UK youth unemployment was lower in the 20 years before we joined the EU in 1973 than it has been in the most recent twenty. 
How likely will the UK be able to get a free trade deal with the EU? #brexit #yourvoice #followback @LiveEUDebate @DavidDavisMP 
Gove says no Scottish Government seat at Brexit table – Europeanscom.eu | Shut up and eat your cereal Scotland   
If we could have re-run the 'entry' referendum, we would have never joined...hey-ho indeed.  
Today on my blog: One year after the British referendum, a stronger European Union  
#Brexit is not only an insane mess, a tragedy, it's also an absolute bloody disgrace, an attack on rights, democracy and the people. 
Brexit Fact #8The Rotterdam Effect: UK goods exported to the Rest of the World and transhipped via EU ports are logged as exports to EU27. 
On a dozen fronts this is now true - NHS, education, privacy, tax, Brexit, fire safety, security, jobs, benefits, police & council cuts....  
Metal-Organic Frameworks take center stage with Ross Forgan (Glasgow) emphasizing the importance of diversity in science.  May Brexit perish  
NHS doctor moving back to France because of Brexit abuse  
Kanu doesn't want a referendum.Kanu doesn't want Biafra.Kanu doesn't want Igbo emancipation. Kanu wants the FG to call him to settle.  
Lets all play our part to ensure the Brexit future is bright and sunny, writes @TiceRichard 
rudderless country in depth of crises unseen since WW2 as Tory made disasters flap home to roost  Brexit & austerity  
Labour should stop undermining the country. This is more important than party loyalty. Brexit will make poor people poorer. What's to like? 
Brexit is in peril because people are starting to realise it's a terrible idea 
The breakdown of total research grants and funding for HE institutions shows how they are funded and who by #Brexit  
Brexit and Trump's election offer sliver of hope for Anglosphere and west – but this will vanish if either fails  
Ousting @Theresa_May would be catastrophic for #Brexit says @DavidDavisMP. What an excellent idea! Please share:  
The reason why #DavidDavis might want to keep a weakened May as PM is b/c he gets to do what he wants with #brexit  
Alan Johnson refused to work with Momentum in the referendum campaign. Looks a huge mistake now, given their impact in the general election 
Wolfgang Munchau: "Look to #Greece for lessons on how to negotiate #Brexit"  #Varoufakis 
Chart shows how hated architects of Brexit have become  
I didn't see the interview so I've just heard David Davis thinks the Brexit transition will be 1-2 years.Good luck with that, mate 
UK government bangs on about promoting electric car manufacturing, but its #Brexit policy means Jaguar will develop electric cars in Austria 
'Thanks to Gina Miller there's no going back!' Brexit now enshrined in law, says Rees-Mogg  
UK choice is hard Brexit or turning backStop to think about ‘transitional arrangements’ and ‘soft Brexit’ pic.twitter.com/Y1W5vW0Hu2 
& their offshore tax avoiding propagandists #Brexit is for tax avoiders & deregulators nobody else benefits #remain  
Stop supporting the Tories on brexit. Stop betraying the young people who want to remain in the EU. Stop pushing to make people poorer.  
Any reversal of Brexit should not be done by a referendum. What is needed is for UK to reassert itself as having a representative system. 
“Just one more referendum and this will be the very last one, honest” is the sort of phrase best left to addicts and gamblers. 
Rather than trying to derail Brexit I suggest you turn your focus to the worldwide slaughter of Christians.@JustinWelby 
HSBC is advising government on brexit. William Hague is lobbying government for HSBC on brexit  
People tell me that in accepting Brexit, Corbyn is respecting democracy. I therefore assume he'll be voting in favour of the Queen's Speech. 
How can you speak to your country in Hausa and expect People not to seek for a referendum?Anyway we deserve what we Sow. 
*sees "Controls On Immigration" on a mug*OMG RACIST*end of FoM, increased restrictions, ideological hard Brexit*Th...thank you comrade 
Have a 1973 DUP poster. Well Brexit.  
This is what Europe thinks #Brexit should look like  
If you don't like Labour's Brexit stance, don't worry. Another one will be along shortly. 
Parliament has to rewrite Britain's entire legal framework before Brexit, but the Tories want 12 weeks off to prevent a leadership contest.  
This idiot is leading the UK's Brexit negotiating team... OH F__K!  
He now stands in front of all these young people as the hope for their future. Brexit will inflict so much damage to that future.  
Democracy didn't end last June. Yesterday @BathforEurope marked a year since the EU referendum vowing to fight on against a brutal Brexit.  
Now people know more about Brexit, people can change their minds Jeremy @jeremycorbyn, you should respect that too. 
The Imminent Doom Facing Nigeria Unless Biafra Is Given A Referendum#NoBiafraReferendumNoElection In #Biafraland 
Theresa May must change direction on Brexit, Labour's Keir Starmer says  
...while waving through a hardline Brexit that will harm most of those in the #Glastonbury2017 crowd and millions more besides. 
With politics turned on its head, Labour sticks to Brexit ambiguity  
Many are coming together cross-party to stop the hard Brexit of the hardliners...  
I confess myself a bit gutted not to be at the most leftwing political Corbyntastic Glastonbury ever when I endured Brexit Glastonbury 
Remarkable how Corbynistas shrug off Brexit, which will make the last seven years of austerity look like a picnic. 
.....  Brexit & other important National Issues to fail. 
Corbyn is a nostalgic who ran on a regressive manifesto and did little to stop Brexit, which will screw workers, young people & immigrants. 
Parallel headlines here in the US... Brexit, austerity, AHCA, all will create misery #CriptheVote 
- We'll all lose from BrexitYOU LOST!- UK will be poorerYOU LOST!- Prices are risingYOU LOST!- You might lose your jobTRAITOR! LOSER! 
We're fast approaching the tipping point when people will change their mind about #brexit. #StopBrexit #RemainEU 
.@LibDems on Brexit negotiations: "David Davis inspires as much confidence as a drunken trapeze artist."I think that's a bit generous.  
We're more ill prepared for #brexit than we were for war against Nazi Germany in 1939 b/c of self serving ministers like #DavidDavis. #marr 
Corbynites can argue all they want that politically it is the best choice even though a lot of the Labour core vote prob wants a soft Brexit 
Right, I doubt this will get me any fans but: I'm quite tired of Corbyn being given a special pass to essentially back a hard Brexit. 
Brexit-News-David-Davis-says-UK-will-walk-away-from-European-Union-punishment-deal.  
This week’s Daily Mail Cancer List:Mo) Glastonbury mudTu) ArcheryWe) Red onionsTh) CatsFr) ToesSa) ISBN numbersSu) Questioning Brexit 
Disabled Brits could 'slide back into nursing homes' as a result of Brexit  
Scotland trying to bail before Brexit  
.@OireachtasNews Committee on GFA launched our report on Brexit this week. Report to be launched in Belfast soon too. Read online.  
"Those who voted for Brexit didn't know what they were voting for" it's said. But the same applies to those who voted Remain. 
We need a leader who will state unequivocally that Brexit is a disaster. Oh look, here's Ed Davey. 
.@DavidDavisMP has admitted he's "not 100% sure" of a #Brexit deal  
Archbishop of Cantebury makes plea to Theresa May over 'poisonous' Brexit talks  
Post hoc revised T May #GE2017 message: 'Every vote for me *or Jeremy Corbyn* is a vote to strengthen my hand in the Brexit negotiations'  
The Tories should send the DUP to negotiate Brexit. They'll come back with a few billion in ready cash and France. 
Britain is turning to the world's poorest countries as Brexit creates uncertainty for trade  
Catalonia | Independence referendum details to be unveiled on 4 July 2017  #ReferèndumCAT #1Oct 
If you think Brexit that could result in deportations, cliff edge no deal and so on is like a football game you're even worse than I thought  
David Davis threatens Brussels with Brexit 'WALK AWAY' if EU tries to 'PUNISH or DELAY'  I am getting tired of words 
COMING UP NEXT >> National STOP BREXIT Day - #StopBrexit. 
If another referendum was held today, Britain would still vote for the exit door, Dr Fox says  
Why should we still pay your MEP salary just so you can promote Donald Trump, xenophobia and an economically disastrous Brexit? Outrageous.  
This is the real reason Tories & Labour won't guarantee EU citizens' rights through the ECJ. Because they plan to CUT UK rights post Brexit  
Surely this is nothing but an acknowledgement that UK citizens will have LESS rights after Brexit. 
I'm thinking that the public has woken up. Just need a leader of courage to speak out and articulate the mood. Brexit is over.  
Sleepless, anxious, depressed: EU citizens in the shadow of Brexit  
NEW: Priti Patel: Labour's role on Brexit is to support the Government  
Justin Welby backs cross-party approach to Brexit to 'draw out poison'  
The Imminent Doom Facing Nigeria Unless Biafra Is Given A Referendum  
So hard-right hard-Brexit dunce David Davis thinks HE might FAIL to get us a Brexit deal. Who'd have thought it.#Marr 
All of that is gone. Thanks to Brexit the next generation of young people will never see the UK like I did. Instead it will see a closed, 6/ 
The joke is on us.   #Brexit  
One wider impact of Brexit has not really been addressed: how does Brexit make young Europeans (& young people elsewhere) view the UK? 1/ 
#brexit is the Conservative Party's #iraqwar it will consume a generation of the Conservative Party and split it. 
For years the UK mocked our neighbours’ ‘unstable’ governments. Now, with Brexit, the joke is on us:  
'BBC suffers from REMOANERISM' Rees-Mogg rips into corporation for 'anti-Brexit coverage'  
Sad thing is that we're finally having the debate over Brexit now that we should have had over a year ago. 
Nigel Farage has pledged to return if Brexit is betrayed  
If you want to reverse Brexit then do so by substantial means, and not by a supposed legal technicality. 
Just remain. Why temporise? #Brexit is so completely obviously a folly.  
Davis 'not certain' of Brexit deal as he warns against ousting PM  
Whilst you prepare your flimsy arguments, perhaps you'd like to read about the real reason for brexit  
May made her name synonymous not just with uselessness, but also Hard Brexit. Voters have rejected both her and it.  
Imagine: #Brexit stopped, huge relief, back to normal. Or: Brexit folly continues, damaging wasted years, until we rejoin EU. Choice? 
Britain's Brexit secretary warns against plotting to overthrow PM Theresa May  
- Brexit is shitWE VOTED FOR IT!- It'll make us poorerWE VOTED FOR IT!- People don't want itWE VOTED FOR IT!- Can we vote on it?NO!! 
My holiday in Spain, identical to last year, 20% ++ more expensive due to Brexit-driven exchange rate. Suspect I'm not alone. 
Do we remember #DavidDavis  sleazy leadership bid? #marr Do we REALLY want this slimy cove representing us at #brexit table? I don't!  
EU's deals with poorest countries will continue after #Brexit. And new deals too! Excellent news.  
Dear Brits, please enjoy the Australian Broadcasting Corp's take on May's Brexit quest & other one-Knight stands.  
The pound has gained against just 6 out of 150 currencies since the Brexit vote  
Government pledges improved post-Brexit access to UK markets for world’s poorest countries. #GlobalBritain @LiamFox @DFID_UK 
Andrew Rawnsley’s A to Z of Brexit  
Sleepless, anxious, depressed: EU citizens in the shadow of Brexit  
Tommy Robinson Man of the peopleIF You Agree Retweet Disagree Fav 
Big problem emerging with our #brexit negotiation team: pretty clear that David Davis, deep down, just doesn't really understand the EU. 
Please Support @UKLabour @jeremycorbyn our votes were NOT supporting Brexit but to #StopBrexit  
No Brexit is better than a bad Brexit  Rememebr we don't have to go through with this madness #NoBrexitIsBetterThanBadBrexit 
According to Theresa May, "Brexit means Brexit." What does Brexit really mean?  
. @DavidDavisMP threatens Brussels with Brexit 'WALK AWAY' if EU tries to 'PUNISH' UK  
David Davies performance on BBC Marr Show this a.m. was dire, truly dire. Whither UK's Brexit prospects now?  
Next boss Lord Wolfson calls for 'smooth' Brexit  
People who demand support for Brexit cos it is "patriotic", and those who demand support for Corbyn cos he is "kind" = as bad as each other 
Should the devolved administrafjons/Parliaments have a place at the #brexit negotiation tables? #bbcsp 
Economists, who overwhelmingly said Brexit would be economically bad for all of us, looking much more on target than Brexiteers.  
Brexit one year on: No exit plan in place and racists feel so emboldened that they’re mowing down muslims in the street. Hideous. 
Thread1) #Brexit  may be dead or dying. Hard Brexit is too damaging, soft Brexit makes no sense, so eventually.. 
I think Justin Welby should address the CoE paedopilia covered up by Archbishop Carey instead of meddling in the Brexit process. 
One year on from Brexit, we've learnt a lesson. Don't listen to loud-mouthed Barbour-jacketed men in pubs with pints of beer in their hands. 
This diagram is excellent - demonstrates that the version of Brexit wanted by the Tories and Labour is simply impossible. Dark times ahead.  
#Brexit negotiations must not undercut the UK's commitment to protecting the environment - it's the only one we've got!  
Leave-backing @patel4witham disagrees with the Archbishop of Canterbury Justin Welby's call for all party cooperation on Brexit  
Brexit Big Brother is watching: how media moguls control the news  
There are EU rules to control immigration. The UK government has not implemented them. EU blamed for UK govt failures.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
#Labour campaigned on #socialjustice. Not #Brexit.Only the #Tories did. They lost majority.The #HOL will do its job 
David Davis warns Tory leadership contest would be 'catastrophic' for Brexit negotiations  
Modern business thrives on a free and flexible labour market. EU freedom of movement provides just that.#Brexit #Remain #StopBrexit 
How likely is a no deal with the EU? #brexit #yourvoice #followback @DavidDavisMP 
"The floor is arguments with people about Brexit"Everyone in the uk:  
Brexit one year on proves it has been a diabolical and costly waste of time  via @BIUK_Politics #Breversal 
Britain's Davis 'pretty sure' he'll get good Brexit deal  
This is coming from a Tory: "The unmanageable ENGLISH NATIONALIST right wing of the Conservative party" is what Brexit represents.  
UK to keep duty-free access for developing countries post-#Brexit  
The #Leave vote was strongest in areas with the lowest numbers of migrants. Familiarity breeds content!#Remain #StopBrexit #Brexit  
EEA immigrants contribute more to the government budget than native Britons. #LeaveLies #Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain 
When it comes to Brexit negotiations I can't shake the feeling that the EU is basically Glenn Close in Fatal Attraction. 
David Davis just admitted he's "not 100% sure" the UK will get a #Brexit deal  
On Brexit, sovereignty and regulatory gravity - 
The country remains divided on Brexit The Tories & Labour remain united on BrexitSpeak up or you're going to get Brexit#StopBrexit 
'Make no mistake, on Brexit Corbyn is betraying many who followed him.'  
This is the way #Brexit ends. Not with a bang but a whimper. Please share:  
The depraved & vicious #EU must be dismantled.The only way forward: #brexit , befriended nation states, border control, deportation#Nexit 
Labour have the opportunity to vote against Hard Brexit. They have a chance to put the economy before Corbynism. Will they take it?  
One of Cameron's advisers has said that 16-17 year olds were excluded solely to appease the Tory right.#StopBrexit #Remain #Brexit  
The Furst Haggis is putting separation on the back burner and going to "focus" on "soft Brexit". She's had more "focuses" than a Ford Garage 
Frankfurt is going to be the new financial capital of Europe. And you Brexit voters made it happen. Germany thanks you all, I'd imagine.  
It might have lost some votes, but @vincecable thinks a second referendum on the Brexit deal still makes sense  
As long as people still consider Brexit and Trump as key examples of populist support, we are far away from good understanding of #populism 
Nurses warn Theresa May Brexit is leaving NHS on brink of disaster  
Brexit is the product of some bizarre post-empire superiority complex of the ruling class - who weaved a web of bile to entrap the gullible 
Brexit commission needed to draw poison from debate: Archbishop  
Progress down the wrong path is regress. Every step towards Brexit is a step back. Let's be big enough to u-turn and admit our mistakes. 
Edinburgh firm was behind @ukip's Breaking Point advert in EU referendum - and got £100k for campaign services  
48 developing countries set to enjoy duty-free access to UK markets post-Brexit  
Together, the countries of the #EuropeanUnion have the highest GDP in 2016:  #EU #economy #Brexit  
Priti Patel answers like TM. Question on gay marriage & DUP, answers with blurb on Brexit, getting the job done. Oh deary me.  
Cannot have circumstances where the other side punishes us. If that happens we have to be prepared to walk away, says Brexit Sec. #Marr 
Priti Patel is upbeat about our prosperity post-Brexit because we can now trade more freely with Ethiopia  
Calm down about Brexit everyone Priti Patel has been to Ethiopia and they have agreed to buy all our jam  
Theresa May could waive rights to 95 per cent of British waters after Brexit, fishermen fear  via @telegraphnews 
UK fishermen may not win waters back after Brexit, EU memo reveals  
This sums up David Davies on #Marr this morning #Brexit #ToriesOut #EndAusterity #JC4PM #MayMustGo 
Will   ask Priti Patel why she broke her promises on immigration policy post-Brexit?  
Only that woman from the DUP can save us from Brexit now | Stewart Lee  
 Eagle proving she's in the umunna/Benn plot to undermine corbyn on brexit already. Bring on clp candidate selection asap 
Critical comments about Brexit is not being unpatriotic. Destroying business and jobs is.  
.@DavidDavisMP reassures EU citizens that their rights to stay in UK will be protected after Brexit #marr 
We have some of the best business people in the world in the UK...we should set up a team to negotiate BREXIT... politicians can't do it! 
David Davis on Brexit: "No deal is better than a punishment deal." No deal would be the biggest punishment. 
Leftist-Remainers who cry “But Brexit *may* cost tens of billions!”, while praising Corbyn’s plan to borrow at least £500 billion……  #Marr 
Talk of 'soft Brexit' is pointless. Just stop Brexit outright. - ‘Back soft Brexit,’ trade unions urge Labour  
Corbyn believes #brexit offers the basis for his creation of a socialist utopia. But you can't spread wealth if there's none left to spread. 
So, David Davis advised May to go for a June election.And now, we place Brexit in his hands?You have got to be shitting me...#Marr pic.twitter.com/8piMr8NZl4 
David Davies on #Marr shows why I worry so much about Brexit. Bluster, flippancy, sweeping, self-reverential and lazy. EU must be delighted 
CHRIST ALIVE: Remember, Britain is a Christian nation - unless one of the pointy hatted little fuckers has an opinion on Brexit… pic.twitter.com/kqKTABj7vV 
A German MP the other day: "British politicians who see Brexit as "opportunity" remind me of Putin seeing his foreign policy as "success" 
According to NHS figures, 2k doctors & 5k nurses who arrived last year could be at risk under PM's Brexit plans  
David Davis reveals he wants a Brexit transition of "1 to 2 years". Hammond indicated 4 years or more this week. Big Cabinet divide #Marr 
Listening to David Davis one can only describe Brexit as clueless, delusional, tetchy, making it up as we go along and really scary. #marr 
Davis still rolling out the 'German carmakers and Bavarian farmers will pressure Merkel to give the UK a good Brexit deal' line 
Brexit talks commence...  
David Davis blustering his way through #marr#BrexitHe clearly thinks we're dumb. 
"He's very French" says Davis of Barnier.  Lot of sophisticated Brexit prep going on in Govt. 
.@DavidDavisMP says at the end of Brexit process, EU will gain a "friendly and comfortable ally, not an irritating member of the club" #marr 
On #Marr this morning discussing social security & brexit. We must do all we can to ensure we all thrive. #ForTheMany 
Churchill fought appeasers & isolationists in Conservative Party : Brexit is modern equivalent & must be defeated. It will. @campbellclaret 
David Davis said he was certain of a deal during referendum campaign. Now in charge of getting a deal unsure we'll get one U-turn? @MarrShow 
Asked "are you absolutely sure we'll get a deal?" Brexit Sec David Davis says "I'm pretty sure but I'm not certain" #Marr 
I would prefer that unions demanded 'hard remain' than urge 'soft Brexit'UK should remain at the heart of EU.  
Latest polling for Times shows "wrong to leave" edging it - and clear 58-42 preference for softer Brexit.  
There is no such thing as a so-called 'soft' Brexit. It means no true Brexit. No clean Brexit. Thus no real Brexit. 
Well done, Brexit Britain. Proud now?  NHS doctor moving back to France after 20 years because of Brexit abuse   
Today you'll hear r-wingers say that 85% of voters backed hard Brexit parties at #GE2017. They didn't & here's why they're wrong#marr 
Brexit poll anniversary marked by fragile economy -  by @ChrisGiles_ 
#marr says that David Davis understands the details of Brexit. Well he has read Farage's fag packet & personally I don't think that counts. 
After everything....May's hard BrexitBusiness warningsCorbyn surgePolicy U-turnsSterling downInflation upThe NHS lieA Youthquake  
Loving that "Bollox to Brexit" flag at 0:06 (briefly), then again (better) at 2:16 and 3:43.   
Diminished by Brexit vote -British influenceNHSParliamentEconomyUK Science+educationThe mediaThe £Our tolerant societyAny others? 
EU threaten to fish in UK waters regardless, post-BrexitIs RN sufficiently equipped to police territorial waters? 
NHS doctor moving back to France after 20 years because of Brexit abuse   
Iain Macwhirter documents the inevitable slide of Brexit into chaos, worth a read  
Now the EU are claiming that Britain will still be bound by EU law after brexit. When will this talking through their arses stop ??? 
"...and then a referendum was held that divided the nation, and one could argue those divisions are the reason we find ourselves here today"  
Lord Buckethead on Brexit: 'A mouldy pain au chocolat could negotiate better than Theresa May'  
Archbishop slams MPs as he calls for wartime spirit in Brexit talks  
A soft Brexit is to stay in the SM, ie the EU. Stop trying to defy Brexit   
A clue as to why Brexit is going badly, it was a bad idea driven by zealots  
IDEAL EU/#BREXIT COMPROMISEWe just stay but let #brexit fans pick the fruit & vegAs that's what they really voted for without realising 
‘Back soft Brexit,’ trade unions urge Labour  
UK climbdown on cards? Has a problem in that Brexit Cult will see it as sabbotage -They need to see unpromised land or will happen again  
Nurses say a "perfect storm" of Brexit, dropping applications, stress & low pay cooks up an NHS staffing crisis.  
Nigel Farage & the swivel eyed loons going down a storm on the Brexit stage at Glastonbury yesterday.  
Ministers want ‘Spreadsheet Phil’ as caretaker PMNo Way, would never get Brexit with Hammond! 
We in Ireland should avoid viewing the world through Brexit goggles, writes RTÉ Economics Correspondent Sean Whelan  
I only voted Labour to delay and dilute the policies, inc. Brexit, May was pushing through. It worked. What I'll vote for next, who knows? 
#Brexit negotiations have begun: read our roundup to find out what's at stake    
Great news!! Government pledges improved post-Brexit access to UK markets for world’s poorest. Read our response: 
The Guardian view on Brexit: Wrong then, wrong now, wrong in the future | Editorial  #pac17 
Excellent but sobering stuff on Brexit, EU Nationals & Scotref fm @iainmacwhirter 
Japanese bank moving its EU base from London to Frankfurt after Brexit  
A hard Brexit would be a "disaster" for Ireland, George Mitchell says  
I wonder how Corbyn would have gone down at #Glastonbury if he'd said "and I'll honour my manifesto commitment to deliver Brexit"? 
Oh Jeremy Corbyn when are you gonna fight Brexit? 
No we didn't but a lot of people said they voted #brexit on that basis. That's straight up fraud.   
We asked 13 analysts to explain how they think Brexit will turn out  
Is anyone still pretending Brexit is good? Andrew Marr, once an enthusiast, now concedes it's all about getting the "least bad deal".  
We're tracking four CEOs through Brexit. Here's what they say, a year after the referendum  
UK will maintain tariff free imports from the World's 'poorest countries' post-Brexit  
Someone has to pay for #brexit.  
Brexit one year on proves it has been a diabolical and costly waste of time  via @BIUK_Politics 
The winners and losers among Britain's stocks since the Brexit vote 
It's been one year since the Brexit vote – and the strain on people's mental health is becoming apparent  
The pessimists were wrong about Brexit, it hasn't damaged the economy – yet  
Archbishop tells PM to 'draw the poison from Brexit'  
Brexit's roots go back to the beginning of the European project.  
"Unconvinced by Corbyn on Brexit" does not equal "insta-Tory". Such simplistic binary nonsense is why we can't have nice things.  
Kind of tragi-comic #Britain scrabbling around for some little "Best Deal" from #Europe having discarded Best Deal Ever a year ago? #Brexit 
UK to keep duty-free access for developing countries post-Brexit  
We know this ☞ Sleepless, anxious, depressed: EU citizens in the shadow of Brexit  
But you didn't mention Brexit  
At last !!! ☞ Cross-party alliance of MPs forming to defeat Theresa May's hard Brexit  
Andrea Leadsom said that broadcasters should be "patriotic" when it comes to Brexit. Should Brits be more patriotic? @MatthewStadlen 
Free trade deals for 'poorest countries' to be maintained post-Brexit  
The main architects of the Brexit Leave campaign have seen a collapse in popularity. So sad!  
"Aren't cement barricades just mini border walls in lieu of a big one?" ~@KelemenCari#london #uk #eu #brexit #maga #tcot #auspol #cdnpoli 
WE #BIAFRANS LOVE OUR NATION PASSIONATELY #BIAFRANS R NOT NIGERIANS BY ORIGINALITY GRANT#BIAFRA #REFERENDUM @UN @EU 
Exactly. Imagine Hannity moving to London & becoming an anti-Brexit Labour supporter overnight? That's Louise Mensch, in a nutshell. 
British Law is not good enough?? So German  rule is the answer? No, we didn't ask you for Brexit. We TOLD you we r leaving your project!  
Indyref proposal was always about terms of Brexit being knownSunday Mail deserves to lose readersWhy buy trash that deliberately misleads? 
US is opposed to timing not referendum itself #Kurdistanreferendum 
First she subtweets Brexit with a hat, then this  
I didn't get many takers for my request for more British followers/followees yesterday. I still want to discuss #Brexit with fellow Brits. 
Booker: Brexit ... What a shambles it is all already becoming. ...  #Brexit.  
The abhorrence of Brexit, a very sad situation, the architects don't care, private ambitions abound.  
Masjids are actually having brexit style voting for when Eid will be!  
Labour to do a Eu-turn on hard brexit. Hard brexit died after the election anyway.  
David Davis the Brexit Sectary used EU law to challenge the Snoopers Charter and won. Take back control and #StopBrexit 
UK "subjects" only became "citizens" when common EU citizenship was initiated. Presumably post #Brexit they'll go back to being "subjects" 
FT: 176 of the 317 Tory MPs now want UK to stay in the EU.  Majority of Tory MPs are moderate Brexit can be stopped  
I'm sure he'd love to - but Brexit means neither he nor anyone else can from the UK, you thick balloon. 
It seems to me that there's not enough time to implement any kind of brexit. Ultimately it'll fail.  Can't wait for 'independence day '18  
@Rachael_Swindon @UKDemockery While they gibber about Brexit. Shriek about patriotism. And sneer at the young. WHAT ARE THEY HIDING?  
Labour won over young voters. But it is betraying them on Brexit | Vince Cable  
Tragically Corbyn is perfectly fine w/ Brexit. Has there been even a shred of convincing evidence to the contrary, before or after #EUref? 
Hard Brexit automatically = no safety net, no NHS, no public services, no hope at all. 
Morten Morland on the start of Brexit negotiations, 1 year since the referendum - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
.I WON'T retweet the rag it's in, but I liked the letter! "The Conservatives must split – or else tear themselves apart over Brexit".  
Brexit: Japanese bank Nomura leaves London and chooses Frankfurt for EU headquarters after UK's withdrawal  
Great to see @The_TUC and TU colleagues backing calls for rethink on single market + customs union #Brexit  
I try not to get angry being an open, tolerant @LibDem supporter.But during the EU referendum campaign last year, Corbyn went on holiday... 
The good news is democracy gave the UK an advisory ref, it was won by industrial scale lying, we have every right to oppose Brexit Shambles  
Lord Buckethead on Brexit: 'A mouldy pain au chocolat could negotiate better than Theresa May'   
A Tory leadership challenge right now would be foolish. Get Brexit done, good or bad, and see what happens in 2019. #SkyPapers 
It's right to focus on getting a Brexit deal that MIGHT be acceptable to all sides, but the choice of #Scotref is about just that, a choice. 
Brexit--what happens when, as with the poll tax, it hits the buffers of evidence and electoral endorsement?  via @FT 
Nurses warn Theresa May Brexit is leaving NHS on brink of disaster  
Coming from a Liberal I'm not surprised 
Delighted @NicolaSturgeon @jeremycorbyn and @RuthDavidsonMSP all writing on Brexit for SH. Balance and plurality of views key to journalism  
'the EU is a kind of scapegoat for problems that were already there and Brexit a huge distraction from dealing with the underlying issues'  
'Disqualifying' means - unlike say tax policy, Brexit etc - *outside* the boundaries of reasonable and legitimate political disagreement. 4/ 
Why don't we spend £60b upgrading our buildings, creating jobs, solving the housing crisis and improving our environment? #Brexit 
Unlike Brexit voters Nigel, these people are probably well informed on what they voted for. 
There are 65 million EU citizens in the UK. A minority decided to bugger up the lives of all of them. The reality of #brexit 
MAKE BRITAIN HATE AGAIN #BREXIT 
I agree with @vincecable  'Make no mistake, on Brexit Corbyn is betraying many who followed him'   
Japanese bank moving its EU base from London to Frankfurt after Brexit  
Those who hope #Brexit will pull London down a peg or two, should consider the likely impact on tax revenues#Remain #StopBrexit 
Voters with postgraduate qualifications voted 75 to 25 for #Remain. Those without any qualification voted 73 to 27 for #Leave.#Brexit  
.May & Corbyn's Brexit Plans will GUT the NHSDo you want that?#NoBrexit 
Vince Cable makes his move... and it's a solid one. Does Corbyn keep the pro-EU youth or does he keep hard Brexit? 
Tell you what Nigel, I'd pay a small fortune to watch you walk out on stage at Glastonbury, your reception would be memorable.  
Brexit one year on proves it has been a diabolical and costly waste of time  via @BIUK_Politics 
Brexit ... millions voted to stop Tory Brexit not for Labour Hard Brexit  
I wish I could say we have reached Peak Brexit - but I know things are going to get a whole lot worse 
Is Jeremy Corbyn right to uphold the public vote on Brexit? 
Brexit is not the high point of democracy – it's the greatest fraud ever perpetrated in British politics   
Justin Welby calls for cross-party talks on Brexit  
#Brexit is like Smoking! It's bad for you and not cool! #stopbrexitnow @EUflagmafia @remainstayeu @acgrayling @Scientists4EU @spaceangel1964 
#Brexit will hit foreign investment into the UK costing us vastly more than our contribution to the EU #StopBrexit 
Dear Brexit supporting @TheSunThe law you are praising which provides compensation for cancelled flights is EU regulation 261.Regards,Tom 
#Brexit can be cancelled at any time - it just needs political will and a majority vote from MPs #StopBrexitNow 
So not only don't the NHS get the promised £350m a week post Brexit but they lose vital staff due to EU Nationals not coming here to work...  
"where was corbyn in the referendum?"expressing a nuanced view on the eu drowned out by alan johnson and the chief of marks and spencers 
Lord Buckethead: 'A pain au chocolat could negotiate Brexit better than Theresa May'  
‘Back soft Brexit,’ unions urge Labour  Time to listen to them: Single Market and Customs Union, please 
What is "clearing" and why is $574 billion of trade at risk in London? Here's a quick guide  
I'm a republican. If I campaigned  for a referendum for 20 years, then won, & then establishment said 'we are going again' - I'd be livid.  
This will get a lot of people excited.  Cable in SECRET talks with Tories to water down Brexit  
If Jeremy Corbyn won’t block Brexit, will the Labour Lords step in to provide pro-Remain leadership?   
It's been one year since the Brexit vote – and the strain on people's mental health is becoming apparent   
‘Back soft Brexit,’ unions urge Labour  
Pls consider giving voters a vote on any final Brexit deal.We need the option to Remain if leaving will leave us worse off.#ForTheMany 
The pessimists were wrong about Brexit, it hasn't damaged the economy – yet   
You mean these same EU nationals whose representatives say they don't trust British law & demand ECJ jurisdiction post Brexit? They can go.  
Any Brexit harms UK's international trade and foreign direct investment. There's no jobs first Brexit @UKLabour, only a jobs lost Brexit.  
EU Commission to table new legislation against tax evasion Looks like #Brexit is coming just in time for the rich. 
Funny how Tories claim Scotland is such a burden yet scared shitless of another referendum and doing everything they can to keep it. 
The Mail has form when it comes to choosing the wrong path..... 
It's Brexit Day! Why haven't tabloids been celebrating it? Because they know the public mood is turning.Full video:  
I'd like to quote one of my favourite poets, Percy Bysshe Shelley: "I'm going to let Brexit happen and you'll be the ones to pay". #Glasto 
At the moment those two things are not possible. @UKLabour need to wake up. #brexit. Btw my political allegiance is driven wholly by #brexit  
Lord Buckethead on Brexit: 'A mouldy pain au chocolat could negotiate better than Theresa May'  
Jeremy Corbyn faces a dilemma as Brexit solidifies: which half of his voters should he disappoint? asks @helenlewis  
Enough. Why are we even bothering to negotiate over BREXIT. Repeal the 1972 Act,take our waters back and walk away.   
Nick Clegg predicted this about Brexit one year ago. It is spookily accurate #MysticClegg  
Perhaps an even bigger lie is the bullying arrogance that tries to suggest Brexit can't be reversed.It can be, it will beREVERSE Brexit  
WATCH: Nigel Farage DESTROYS Labour Remoaner on live TV  via @Your Brexit 
Exporters are wise to start preparing for a hard Brexit—the evidence of scrapped investments in the UK are piling up 
Japanese bank moving its EU base from London to Frankfurt after Brexit  
My latest blogpost on Brexit one year on: Lied to, lost, and leaderless. Here:  … … 
... and unfortunately we have made no progress because #Brexit is an unrealistic and idealistic dream in the modern global economy  
We asked 13 analysts to explain how they think Brexit will turn out  
We're tracking four CEOs through Brexit. Here's what they say, a year after the referendum  
Brexit realities.  
If Jeremy Corbyn won’t block Brexit, will the Labour Lords step in to provide pro-Remain leadership?  
This was an honour. #Brexit  makes no coherent sense. I am please to do my bit @No10Vigil @_Britain4Europe 
Matthew Parris compares Britain's Brexit debacle to the Suez crisis of 1956 - a national humiliation  
Can't find the bit in my tweet where I ask for another referendum. Leave won. Get over it. 
Stop telling fucking lies.... 
Concern that new Brexit minister supports removing asbestos laws  
Why don't Leavers agree with Farage that a narrow referendum victory should be followed by a 2nd referendum?#Brexit #Leave #StopBrexit 
Tomorrow from 9am, Andrew will be speaking to the Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP + Shadow Work and Pensions Secretary @Debbie_abrahams #marr 
Andrea Leadsom slammed over ‘stupid’ calls for ‘patriotic’ Brexit broadcasting  
Was a huge pleasure to talk at the Oxford Union - thanks for the Profile: Gina Miller on Brexit and the media -  
Andrea Leadsom demanding that journalists stop asking difficult questions and be "more patriotic" re Brexit. Deeply alarming.  
Just to be clear, there are no benefits of Brexit unless you're a racist who doesn't like people talking foreign on the bus. 
I do like the big yellow flag that says "Boll*cks to Brexit" in front of Jeremy Corbyn. About time he said it too.#Glastonbury #NoBrexit 
Every time I think "he's doing better" or "it's good he's connecting", HE WENT ON HOLIDAY IN THE MIDDLE OF THE BREXIT CAMPAIGN. 
To clarify: Brexit is NOT a 'divorce'. It is a member leaving a club. We don't expect to pay the ground-keepers' pensions after we leave. 
"Conservative MEPs are doing everything in their power to block efforts to protect bees from pesticides."  #Brexit 
>@CarolineLucas calls for cross-party commission on Brexit and a referendum on final deal   
ANDREA LEADSOM WAS RIGHT UK MEDIA CHOKA BLOCK WITH UK TRAITORS ALL PRAYING THAT BREXIT WILL BECOME A DISASTER FOR THE UK 
For the avoidance of doubt, he went on HOLIDAY during the Brexit campaign 
#RapeClauseRuth getting in some early practice for when Brexit and the DUP blows up in her and the Tories faces.  
The architect of Canada's trade deal with the EU offers some advice on negotiating Brexit  
The costs of Brexit look more concrete than the benefits, Morgan Stanley says  
It's been one year since the Brexit vote – and the strain on people's mental health is becoming apparent  
Tomorrow at @FT The case against a further referendum on UK membership of EU.Let's return to being a parliamentary democracy. 
The British Pound is the sick man of Currencyland.Paying the price for petty nationalism.#brexit  
Pity Corbyn's #glastonbury17 speech didn't cover why he was selling out people's futures by supporting #brexit The harm will be to the many. 
'Pay when you leave? That's Crazy' John Redwood rejects EU's 'fanciful' Brexit bill  
Hard Brexit hard liner being cheered by young remainers Strange times...  
The absolute irony. The absolute 100% irony. Corbyn has divided the left like no politician before him. He's backed Tory Brexit.  
Weird to think that we need May to hang on long enough for #Brexit to be killed, as a Corbyn government at this point would keep it alive  
Panelbase/Sunday Times (#EURef 2):REMAIN 48 (=)LEAVE 52 (=)16th-21st JunN=5,481#BrexitAnniversary #Brexit 
The pessimists were wrong about Brexit, it hasn't damaged the economy 
How many times do Leavers have to be told that democracy includes the right to campaign to reverse any policy, however decided!#Brexit 
."Labour needs to STOP being the government’s poodle on Brexit" 
Is the economy taking on a more important role when it comes to Brexit?  
Honestly, they keep it secret, but leading Leavers do that Jeremy Corbyn song quietly whenever they meet. He's a father of Brexit. Respect 
Corbyn never gets enough praise for key role he played in Leave campaign. Brexit wouldn't have happened without his silence. Well done Jez 
Vigil for the EU one year after brexit referendum. #Manchester @Mcr4EU 
The hackers were planning to leak the Brexit negotiation plans, but they couldn’t find any. 
Japanese bank Nomura: 'Sayonara Britain, we're moving to Frankfurt!'  Brexit, the gift that keeps on giving... 
Better book early to hear @JolyonMaugham @IanDunt @anandMenon1 & Monique Hawkins update us on post election #Brexit  
“the UK seen as “xenophobic” and “racist” by overseas workers” Brexit, the gift that keeps on giving... 
#Brexit shade  
The Brexit vote was a fraud. If your new car did 5 mpg not the 50 mpg promised would you meekly accept it?  
Leading Brexit campaigner says 'vacuous' referendum should never been called  
A brexit anniversary story to warm your heart!  
This is my quote of the weekend. Pretty profound abt the state of #Brexit Britain & its four unhappy nations.  
It's like #Brexit isn't happening. The biggest threat young people face.  
Brexit latest - 176 of the 317 Conservative MPs now want the UK to stay in the EU.   
I understand the Leader of a pro Brexit pro nuclear weapons party that opposes PR is getting a rave reception in #Glastonbury 
I voted for Brexit and now know I was wrong. It's not to late to walk away from the brink but we need leadership. #BrexitShambles 
Brexit leadership doesn't care about actual people, their families & individual choices. It's pure ideology: love of "nation", "state"...  
Media coverage of Brexit is Remoaner central, I'm sick of hearing broadcasters & their Remoaner guests talking our country down constantly. 
"Remainers now teetering on the edge of treachery". For wanting the ECJ to oversee the rights of EU migrants post-brexit. The status quo.  
The Lords have already voted to trigger Art 50 & voted against a second referendum. They can't 'block' Brexit.  
My article in the Independent about mental health struggles of #EU citizens in the UK. #Brexit #StopBrexit 
Stephen Collins on David Davis and Brexit – cartoon  
Obligatory selfie w/ @BarryGardiner at @ProgressOnline. Spoke w/ serious consideration on issues & complexity of Brexit. Also, great beard.  
Many now regret their #brexit choice  
It wasn't Brexit that damaged the newspapers. It was the newspapers that created Brexit.  
It's been one year since the Brexit vote – and the strain on people's mental health is becoming apparent  
This German MEP had strong words for the UK on Brexit: "You asked for this, not us."  
Simple-minded Brexiteers like Andrea Leadsom will never grasp that a beneficial Brexit is less likely than unicorns falling from space 
Chant 'No Brexit' when he speaks! It's your future!  
Tory, UKIP & DUP MEPs voted against EU measures against tax dodging. The #Brexit alliance of tax dodgers.#Remain 
APB to anyone at Glastonbury. If you don't want Brexit please be sure to let Jeremy @jeremycorbyn know. #StopBrexit 
Andrea Leadsom fibbed about her work experience and now wants the UK media to lie about the expensive catastrophe of Brexit  
Marine Le Pen.Wishing the British success in their #Brexit negotiations.Hope they pave the way to other Europeans to break free from #EU. 
#Leave supporters should note that fearing a #Remain victory the Tory Right were clamouring for another referendum.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
We the 48% MUST make as much noise as possible in order to STOP BREXIT  
Thanks @DanielZeichner @LNethsingha @JeremyCaddick & Richard Balfe for speaking at our anti-Brexit rally today, great cross party agreement!  
Merkel admits division amongst 27 threaten to undermine hardline position on Brexit, cracks appear in united facade, utter contempt for UK. 
Still defiant in #Leeds City Square today, one year on from the calamitous EU Referendum. Scrap #Brexit now!  
Yes. Let's keep having referenda until we get the result that you want. The people voted. Leave won. Brexit is happening. Get over it. 
Sad times.A Dr who has worked 20 years in the NHS feeling no choice other than to leave as a result of Brexit abuse. 
If Corbyn were to reject Brexit entirely, he'd win another election at a canter. He has a big decision to make here. 
UK food labour market studies suggest Food Brexit = mess: 1)  2)  3) 
The Spectator (generally a pro-Tory publication) explains why immigration hasn't hit jobs or wages #Brexit #Remain 
Heartbreaking. Just one reason why Brexit is driving away vital foreign NHS staff. 
C'on remain. It really is time to get behind Brexit and respect democracy @lucycthomas 
The writers of the Guardian’s ‘Brexit Shorts’ have swallowed Project Fear, says @toadmeister 
Michael Gove sets out how much potential there is for the fishing industry post Brexit. 
@UKLabour need constant reminding of this. The shift represented a vote for change of the political guard. It was not a mandate for Brexit.  
So me opposing Brexit is undemocratic? Let's just bin parliament & make May Supreme Leader of the People's Democratic Republic of England. 
Brexit has damaged so many things in this country I love, not least its newspapers. 
This attitude is bizarre.  Losses from hard Brexit eclipse everything. Cannot "save" NHS or improve services when we're losing £80b p/a 
Most convincing argument missed by Brexit Remain camp - "UK should be governed by EU because UK politicians are so utterly rubbish at it" 
tommy robinson thinks brexit is a cheap version of weetabix. 
Senior City figure upbeat on London role after Brexit.  
Brexit: staying in the EU is a bigger risk than leaving, claims City veteran.  
"The easiest way to get rid of the problems that Brexit presents is Special Status for the North" .@mattcarthy #UnitedIreland 
Brexit: UK negotiators don't know where they're going or how to get there, after frittering away months pic.twitter.com/qwK3IY1LOH 
Japanese bank moving its EU base from London to Frankfurt after Brexit  
Have you noticed how Brexiteers arguments for Brexit have been reduced to "We won the refererendum". They have nothing else. Nothing at all. 
I had a life before Brexit. But for a year now, there's been nothing else. 
Brexit's architects are hated by British public.  
Huge number being too embarrassed* to admit they were duped by Boris' & Gove's Brexit bluster, shows a certain "Britishness"*sooner die 
Brexit Watch. Aly McGovern says that "the best anti-austerity policy" is remaining in single market  & scrapping migration target. #pac17 
Allow exiled Kurdish Jews vote in Kurdistan referendum: Representative  #Kurdistan 
Brexit is increasingly looking like UK gov vs reality. After a year all have is bluster and faux patriotism. Expect flat earth to come  
We voted to go out for dinner. Some think that meant Italian food. Others Chinese. But it meant Greggs. Do we still want to go out? #brexit 
Seems we need a new designation. We have unionist, nationalist, other and now confused. During the election SDLP called for unity referendum  
Clear trends towards soft Brexit, staying in single market, accepting freedom of movement, and favouring Corbyn for PM  
Amazing opinion given Brexit was the ultimate triumph of parochialism and inward-facing, but there we are.  
So it's the one year anniversary of the day after the referendum. You know, the day Corbyn called for the immediate triggering of Article 50 
A year of Brexit in figures, on the anniversary of the EU referendum: Immigration down, growth down, hate crimes up  
Leadsom woefully delusional - the "very strong hand" is a fiction & the most "patriotic" thing would be to reverse course now #Brexit  
Outrageous misrepresentation, but sadly Labour played into Brexiteers' hands with division and deception over #Brexit  
It's time to rethink #Brexit and what it means for Britain. It is time to think of the future. #StopBrexit 
I think it can now be said that Brexit is a discredited political ideology 
About your Labour vote at #GE2017 and your current view on #Brexit#poll please RT. 
Hello Twitter! To patriotically distract you from the dismal economic news around Brexit, here's a thread about manatees!  
Lord Buckethead on Brexit: 'A mouldy pain au chocolat could negotiate better than Theresa May'  
"You may say I’m a dreamer" - Donald Tusk quoted John Lennon as he hoped for Brexit reversal  
TOP POST #3: The 12 cartoons that perfectly sum up the Tory approach to Brexit  
Hard Brexit is finished; soft Brexit may not exist. Where do we go from here? 
How people try and tell me the Tories will get a better Brexit when Boris Johnson, a bumbling fool is at the negotiating table is hilarious 
A year ago today, I gave a Brexit speech: £ would fall, inflation would rise, real wages would be hit. Oh, and negotiations might be tricky. 
Those who campaigned for Brexit have nothing to lose. Those who voted for Brexit have everything to lose, they just don't know it yet. 
Nigel Farage next to everything Britain got out of the Brexit deal.  
People who blamed everything on EU before referendum now angry if anything blamed on Brexit | NewsThump 
'Brexit will go ahead as planned' says former Vote Leave CEO @matthew_elliott  Watch full video here -->  
There is nothing patriotic about supporting #Brexit, Andrea Leadsom. Patriots do not & cannot support the destruction of their country. 
UK candidate Lord Buckethead, who ran against Theresa May in the recent election, now taking her to task over Brexit  
There is no sensible reason to leave the EU. It's not in the national interest. It's time to take back control and stop Brexit. @UKLabour 
Brexit is the problem.Remain is the solution.  
Show some patriotism, UK minister tells broadcasters over Brexit  
Brexit's architects are hated by British public, chart shows  
We've had to put up with this in Scotland ever since the independence referendum. Nationalism addles the mind and poisons the soul.  
Leadsom calls for ‘patriotic’ coverage of Brexit negotiations – video  
Yuck.Andrea Leadsom's call for 'patrotic' Brexit coverage prompts anger 
It's unpatriotic to NOT mock idiot Andrea Leadsom for saying media should do 'patriotic' propaganda for the Tories' stupid hard Brexit 
FT analysis: 176 of the 317 Conservative MPs now want the UK to stay in the EU.  Time now to end Brexit madness.  
True patriotism means opposing hard Brexit  
One year after the #Brexit vote, here are some notable numbers  
SNP criticise Andrea Leadsom's "ominous" demand for media to be more "patriotic" and stop talking Brexit down.  
1) ranty thread to various soft #Brexit/no Brexit groupsThere are a multitude of groups fighting Brexit. This morning I have messages-  
For the many, not the few. @jeremycorbyn is right about one thing. Brexit will devastate the many and only benefit the few. #StopBrexit 
Brexit isn't working for Britain. Its supporters have now switched the emphasis to manipulating news to try anaesthetise public to that fact 
But it's ok for you to tell everyone that voted Leave, that they must have a second referendum! 
The EU says it's dazed and confused by Theresa May's Brexit bumbling  
This is because Brexit was never anything but emotional. Appeal to emotion is the only weapon in the armoury.  
Maybe it would be helpful if certain Tory MPs & donors stood to make a bit less money from Brexit & the wholesale sell-off of the NHS?  
'Brexit expert'. Hm. I'd prefer King's 'dashing cool young professor,' but maybe that ship has sailed. Or never docked in the first place.  
KAL on Theresa May and the beginning of Brexit talks – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Brexit isn't patriotic. It's idiotic. It's a whole different -ic. 
NEWS! People who blamed everything on EU before referendum now angry if anything blamed on Brexit  
Germany is waking up to Brexit & isn't liking it!  pic.twitter.com/wE4EBWsqAK 
Corbyn has to hoodwink a fickle young vote long enough to push through Hard Brexit. That will mean an awful long time sitting on the fence. 
People who incorporate ad slogans into everyday speech, such as 'simples' or 'should have gone to Specsavers' #names #Brexit 
Gove: Brexit could revive sinking fishing industry  
Brexit is textbook Emperor's Clothes Syndrome, pluralistic ignorance; the public were conned, the perpetrators will be exposed eventually.  
Today's Essay topic:"Brexit is like unscrambling an egg."Discuss. 
EU Referendum day - a year on by James Ferguson - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Lord Buckethead on Brexit: 'A mouldy pain au chocolat could negotiate better than Theresa May'   
UK tried for 43yrs to change EU from within.Total failure.Hence #Brexit  
If we're going to vote again on Brexit I want to us to also vote again on the 1997 election that brought Blair to power. 
Young people won't be deceived much longer. When they realise how much Corbyn supports #Brexit their support will melt away #Glastonbury2017  
A year on from the referendum result fear replaced by debate. It's no longer unpatriotic or undemocratic to question hard Brexit 
Ray Wilkins is disappointed Chelsea want Bakayoko saying. 'He's French and doesn't get near the national side' and 'Brexit means brexit' 
although, I should add: I underestimated the degree to which Trump/Brexit would frighten other Europeans into switching course  
@Rachael_Swindon @UKDemockery Just let us spout drivel about how well we're handling Brexit and forget the tragedies our greed has caused  
GOVE: Brexit will be a massive boost for fishing industry. 
Cost to UK, in Brexit bus terms:Snap election: 2.5 daysMay's DUP bribe: 6 weeks#NHS yearly funding gap: 85 weeks#Brexit bill: 5 years  
I'm positive. I'm absolutely certain about Brexit. It's a bad idea. I'm positive. 
Yet Corbyn & Labour Leadership still support hard Brexit & are therefore Brexiteers themselvesWhy?  
Brussels asks how EU rights can be guaranteed if not by the ECJ. But EU laws apply in the EU. Not in the USA, or Japan, or post-Brexit UK. 
But we know they would have done. They'd have started immediately about a new referendum. And everyone would have thought it totally normal.  
Brexit: Andrea Leadsom's calls for broadcasters to be more patriotic branded 'sinister' by @timfarron 
Election confirmed public don't want a hard #Brexit, so "no deal" is not an option. UK negotiating position very weak. EU will play hardball 
Go on Ireland!  Breaking - Ireland will block #Brexit deal if #MayDUP deal goes ahead  via @skwawkbox 
Brexit Watch: "What benefit will Brexit bring that counterweighs the fact we're going to be poorer?" asks Peter Kyle. #pac17 
Hard #Brexit under threat as MPs from all parties plan alliance to defeat Theresa May's plans  
No Brexit is better than a bad Brexit 
When yr weak & wobbly gov is making a shambles of Brexit it's clearly the broadcasters' lack of patriotism at fault   
One year on from the result of the EU referendum a thought for all our politicians, but especially for @andrealeadsom 
The Brexit referendum anniversary is marked by a fragile UK economy & falling living standards, writes @ChrisGiles_.  
Funny how the BBC and others casually overlook this in their quest to subvert Brexit and advance #ProjectFear 
If you can't beat em...#Brexit  
The Reason Brexit is toxic, is the MEDIA have made it TOXIC, people like James O'Brien constantly whipping up hate & anti British, pro EU,BS 
Nick Clegg, to Farrell & Goldsmith: Cameron wd have insisted on referendum in hung parliament but NC won't have it  
not in a good way. Corbyn supports hard Brexit. So when free movement ends, unemployment rockets and economy dives hope you eat your words  
A year after the referendum, we still don't know what Brexit actually means  
Just realised that part of my brain has been furious for an entire year For today only, I'm going to think about kittens instead of Brexit  
Brexit watch. Caroline Flint says single market membership is EU membership by another name, backs Labour's manifesto stance. #pac17 
Any more bidders? The cock-up. Brexit as an epic act of self-harm. All proceeds to the Grenfell Tower victims.   
"Our choice is hard Brexit - or turning back" & we'll turn back.Matthew Parris in @thetimes 
And I am sure you now realise how the same tactics were successfully deployed at the Scottish Independence Referendum in 2014. #ReRunBoth? 
~ The Brexit Dictionary ~Snowflake (n.) - someone openly affected by your insultsSmug (adj.) - someone not openly affected by your insults 
#Brexit: Wrong then, wrong now, wrong in the future | Editorial | @guardian 
'Expats urge Catalan government to guarantee they’ll get to vote in independence referendum', #ARAinEnglish 
Andrea Leadsom's call for 'patrotic' Brexit coverage prompts anger  
More Tory delusion, claiming 85% voted in GE for Brexit. Half of them voted against nasty-Tory, dementia tax & austerity, not pro-Brexit. 
Where do people get the absurd idea that joining EFTA would't mean "real Brexit"? We founded EFTA in 1960. It's a separate organisation.  
This is why I cannot support and forgive Corbyn. He ENABLED Brexit. Don't let his evangelical disciples fool you, he's a disgusting fool.  
The best outcome for Spain would be to permit the referendum, says @nytimes #lovedemocracy #indyref  
Time for a parliamentary revolution sovereignty must be restored. Deal impossible.Brexit is dead & must be buried  
The pendulum swings back ... Too many people now see there's nothing positive about #Brexit. We're poorer for no reason.  
Something to watch for: Tory Remainers pinning effects of austerity on Brexit vote. 
Indeed. Very same mindset as those demanding a speedy "clean" Brexit.  
Brexit going to be a disaster - don't blame the BBC.  Blame these guys  
BRAVO  Andrea Leadsom UR right broadcasters are unpatriotic & IMO traitors & saboteurs with their constant undermining & bias #brexit  
Brexit poll anniversary marked by fragile economy  
Britain is one of the greatest countries on earth. We shouldn't be pushed around by the EU in Brexit talks! Pod 3  
We will not be silenced by remoaners, and it's scare tactics .  A watered down brexit will not be tolerated . Be warned politicians . 
“We must never use citizens as bargaining chips in the #Brexit negotiations" says @CeciliaWikstrom here:   
Todays Express says Corbyn could ditch Hard brexit? How, Parliament voted to leave the EU and single market. So that's it. That or civil war 
Lord Buckethead on Brexit: 'A mouldy pain au chocolat could negotiate better than Theresa May'  
Corbyn BLASTED for ‘Snubbing Armed Forces Day’ in favour of 'Suckling Up To Glastonbury Youth'  via @Your Brexit 
Should broadcasters be more patriotic when reporting on #Brexit? #Conservatives @andrealeadsom @maitlis #Newsnight #yourvoice #followback 
My thread on brexit generated informed debate for around 24 hours. Now degenerating. I will block those who spoil it for sensible majority  
Editorial @nytimes :"Spain should negociate and permit the Referendum in Catalonia"  
Please, for gods sake, stop saying Norway has no say in the rules. You couldn't be more wrong.#Brexit 
Out of interest - is there anyone on my timeline who is still pro Brexit and can convince me that it's going well so far? 
How fitting that, on Brexit-versary, we had encore @ final perf #OHPRondine @operahollandpk re being together 4ever! #family #willmissyou 
From nationwide protests to @theresa_may's election fail: 10 moments Britain would rather forget. #Brexit  
David Davis and Brexit (reads best if you hold phone sideways):  
Cross-party alliance of MPs forming to defeat Theresa May's hard Brexit  
If media had been truly patriotic Brexit would have been exposed LAST year for the stitch-up it is  @helenyg @jcm247 
Hope young people stand up for their rights & their futures by chanting 'No Brexit' when @jeremycorbyn on stage at @GlastoFest #Glastonbury 
Britons look forward to the benefits of a successful #Brexit.  
What fool called it Brexit and not the Great British Break-Off? 
Also a casual reminder that Corbyn and his thousands of mindless fans at Glastonbury are enabling the self destruction of Brexit. Idiots.  
Lord Buckethead on Brexit: 'A mouldy pain au chocolat negotiate better than Theresa May'  
Messy start to Brexit is a sign of things to come, writes @JasonFarrellSky 
This lady is absolutely right. The rude efforts by the BBC to belittle politicians negotiating BREXIT is unpatriotic  
"The best outcome for Spain would be to permit the referendum".@marianorajoy fins i tot NY Times ho veu. 
Theresa May has been bleating about the need for "humility". She could show some by bringing @Nigel_Farage into the #Brexit negotiations? 
Disturbingly on point. A must read. From Brexit to Grenfell  
Brexit negotiations are off to a flying start I see.  
$GS' UK Economist Andrew Benito on how Europe has withstood the initial risks that the #Brexit vote posed  
In Greece for a wedding. Every Greek I've spoken to, every single one, has said how much they envy & admire we Brits for Brexit. 
Broadcasters' job is to be patriotic on  brexit,says Andrea Leadsom. No,their job is to hold lying,manipulative govts like yours to account 
1 year after the #Brexit vote, as #JeremyCorbyn is lauded at #Glastonbury2017, worth recalling his cowardly & reluctant 'remain' campaign. 
What #Brexit offers (& the Spectator says that being concerned about this is 'losing one's marbles'):  
U.K. And EU negotiators ruled out a soft Brexit on day one!  
Time to think the unthinkable! #brexit, unlike death and taxes, is not inevitable #Canbrexit 
Lunacy is exchanging currency at an airport. Based on current FX rates (81GDP:100CHF), @acgrayling's laziness has cost him £24. #Brexit  
I live in safe Tory seat & couldn't condone Labour Brexit but tactical voting was an important part of Corbyn's success - Labour take note!  
Brexit for trade reasons is like leaving your place in one queue to join the back of another 'faster' one... and then the speeds change. 
The Guardian view on Brexit: Wrong then, wrong now, wrong in the future | Editorial  
Those #Brexit talks, as seen by the Express.One country makes unilateral proposal.Others disagree on some points.Bullies, obviously.  
Yes.  All UK citizens are still EU citizens.  If they ask EU citizens to register before Brexit then all UK citizens should do so too.  
Brexit feeling more & more like the fake break-up u did for attention that backfires when u realise your bf was bare tolerating u anyway. 
Can Brexit be stopped? For our children's sake, I hope so. Look at the damage it's caused already.  
Rubbish @billybragg @BBCr4today #Corbyn gave  Remain 7.5/10. Don't con young ppl that #Labour offer a Brexit free future. 
We've had an overwhelming mandate from voters. And 80% of voters are behind Brexit. FFS, has our lying, arrogant government learnt nothing? 
Andrea Leadsom tells broadcasters to be 'more patriotic about Brexit. I suggest she listens to the people in the General Election result.  
Editorial New York Times:Spain should negociate and permit the Referendum 
Lord Buckethead: ‘A mouldy pain au chocolat could negotiate Brexit better than Theresa May’  
I really wish politicians would stop referring to Brexit as "the will of the British people" or "the country's decision". Bollocks. 
Can Brexit be stopped?"There is no point of no return, UNTIL the deal is ratified by parliament"(official source) 
'Our choice is hard Brexit - or turning back', writes @MatthewParris3  
Theresa May 'can't recollect' blocking EU citizens' rights days after Brexit vote  
So sad. 6000 unfilled doctor posts in UK currently & 1 in 10 doctors from EU. Brexit is disastrous for our NHS.  
Was Andrea Leadsom calling broadcasters unpatriotic for asking questions about #Brexit? Welcome to #BrexitBritain 
Belgian MEP mocks UK’s soft Brexit approach. Don't buy their Chocs! Stop buying German , French Cars & Wine!  
How Brexit works: leaked docs show a deregulation task force was looking at cutting EU building safety standards  
"Brexit's architects are hated by British public, chart shows". The Independent.  
Brexit was millionaire's project to persuade ordinary people to vote against their prosperity and welfare. It can and must be reversed. 
'Brexit is not the answer. It’s not too late to realise this' @guardian editorial 
This city is emerging as the biggest winner from the Brexit vote  
Leading Brexit campaigner says EU referendum should never have happened  
Interesting. How someone's mind can change over time about #Brexit  
If this is Brexit Britain, then you can shove it up your arse.  
The revenge of the UK electorate for Brexit will be brutal  
A year of thinking of very little except Brexit -a tiny example, replicated millions of times, of utter waste and destructiveness of it all. 
#AndreaLeadsom I will not be "pulling together" for your stupid #Brexit As a patriot I intend to continue to resist this trashing of the #UK 
"Taking back control" now means daring to take the steps to stop Brexit. Let's keep the conversation going.  
Brexit: Andrea Leadsom says broadcasters need to be patriotic! Dangerous talk  
New York Times editorial calls for independence referendum in Catalonia (but then wants voters to reject secession)  
Lord Buckethead: 'A pain au chocolat could negotiate Brexit better than Theresa May'  
If the Lords try to block Brexit they could be abolished says @eamonnbutler 
So how come we can afford £100 billion for Brexit? Oh, the money tree! Silly me! #BinBrexit #Brexitpoverty 
The EU’s Brexit message: Europe is back  via @FT 
And the compensation that I will get for my flight delay is because I am flying in the EU. We won't get that after #brexit 
The pound has gained against just 6 out of 150 currencies since the Brexit vote  
Basically it'd be UK citizens filling forms requesting to be allowed to live in the UK after Brexit.  It'd be hilarious to swamp the system. 
Only six currencies have weakened against the pound since the Brexit vote  
The only currencies which weakened against the £ since Brexit? Mongolia, Uzbekistan, Turkey, Congo, Egypt & Sierra Leone. #BrexitAnniversary 
A classic example of @BBCNews anti-Brexit spin. Cherry-picked "evidence" about Brexit. Shame on you @BBCChrisMorris  
Britain's Brexit stance 'unclear' after general election   
Brussels gives cold shoulder to May’s proposals for EU citizens  #Brexit 
Leavers' talk is more defensive these days, and their new refrain is often that Brexit is inevitable. It's not.  
RT Today is Independence Day,a day that will live forever in UK history.We should be half way through Brexit by now with just 1 year left!  
BBC News - Brexit: Andrea Leadsom says broadcasters need to be patriotic  Mm.. Goebbels would have agreed with her .. 
A Eurosceptic case for cancelling #Brexit. Difficult to imagine this being written a month ago. #BrexitAnniversary 
I've come to terms with Brexit, but I won't stop fighting for my rights - @RoaringNurse blogs on #BrexitAnniversary  
Farms hit by #brexit labour shortage as migrant workers shun 'racist' UK  
After years of smearing the EU for entertainment purposes your comments on the EU deserve to be ignored. #Brexit is your fault.  
EU actors & courts will continue to use English common law even after Brexit. @odtorson @Chris_Skinner @palleylaw 
In a Brexit divorce deal offering, PM Theresa May said EU citizens will be given the opportunity to stay in the UK  
Foreign banks are jumping ship as London preps for Brexit. This trend could deal serious blow to the U.K.'s economy.  
How is it democratic to "work tirelessly" to try and reverse Brexit when the majority of the UK voted for it?  
I say great.Look what his campaigning did for Hillary. And let's not forget Brexit and Israel election. Everything he touches turns to crap 
My thoughts on #Brexit a year on:  
Time to go, Theresa... Brexit: May 'blocked unilateral offer for EU citizens' rights' last June  
'Be a bit patriotic' @andrealeadsom clashes with BBC Newsnight host @maitlis over the success of Brexit  
'There's no doubt...Britons want Brexit!' Tim Martin's explosive tirade during TV row  
The reason #Tehran is against referendum on #Iraqi #Kurdistan@thekarami 
EU crumbling? Angela Merkel admits Brexit COULD cause division among remaining states Let's hope so! 
Mad as a box of frogs, shamelessly hiding behind "the country took a decision" they never Andrea luv, you conned them into voting Leave. 
Brexit will take our away our children's and grand children's right to study, work and live in other EU Counties. It's time to #StopBrexit 
I accepted it needed to be a Movement. Worst moment was the invidious campaign to blame him for Brexit - made me more determined. 
Great evening with the "Bad Boys of Brexit" @Arron_banks @Nigel_Farage & @andywigmore celebrating the 1st anniversary of the #leaveEU vote. 
The Guardian view on Brexit: Wrong then, wrong now, wrong in the future | Editorial | Opinion | The Guardian  
Brexit: an act of un-thought through lunacy based on lies and unclear aims.   
Hello there Labour leave. I'm a @UKLabour Party member & I'm appalled by Labour #Brexit policy to #Leave the EU. So, I'm leaving Labour. 
We cannot have an open door to #EU #migrants between now and the end of the #Brexit process!  #BBC #SKY #UK #NEWS #RT 
#TiceRichard: The process of #Brexit is taking too long, which is not the way to give certainty to both sides  
I was for Brexit! Now I'm for Nancy Pelosi to Remain even if it's the US not UK. Democrats follow her off a cliff with Obstruction! #maga  
... and told us that if it was close, there'd have to be another referendum, IIRC?  
Brexit: A Tale of Two Cities - 23/06/2017 - @bbcradio4 Great piece by @anandMenon1 
Can Brexit be stopped? The answer is in our hands  
Brits Would Vote Remain If Referendum Was Rerun: Alastair Campbell - LBC @LBC 
Brexit One Year On: Political Chaos, Pounded Currency, & Pressured Consumers  
Theresa May says she is going to let 3m EU citizens stay in the UK after Brexit. Here's what that means:  
Why on earth would anyone take notice of you when your organisation has consistently tried every dirty trick in the book to wreck Brexit? 
"I believe the children are our future.."(May's Intro to Brexit White Paper, sort of) #brexitlyrics #whitneybrexit 
Diana seems to be his go-to analogy: Daily Mail attack on Ralph Miliband, Scottish Referendum, hacking scandal  
From day after Brexit vote on my predictions of key negotiation issues and expectations of what would come next  
I'm completely unpatriotic.  In fact you can shove your #Brexit Britain and minority government into your massive second home's wine cellar.  
I am a migrant. I was born in a fair and even country and now, post referendum, I find I am living in a different and nastier place. 
"The best outcome for Spain would be to permit the referendum, and for Catalan voters to reject independence"  
Hey, @nytimes, it's not just Spain's refusal of the referendum, but its refusal to listen to Catalonia AT ALL.   
Awesome #Radiohead set at Glastonbury: "See you later Theresa, shut the door on the way out."  We're so much better than the Brexit meanness 
One year & one day ago : My plea for people to vote Remain for reasons that were predictable then. #Brexit ? 
UK Will Allow 3 Million EU Migrants To Stay After Brexit  
Can we stop the EU double speak. Brexit is a left wing issue and always has been! #brexitlyrics #Camden #lexit 
The danger is creating the myth of an elite conspiracy. For that reason it is probably best to end #Brexit with the device that launched it 
A year on from the Brexit vote, the EU has become more unified than ever – the loss is ours   
'Be a bit patriotic' Andrea Leadsom clashes with Newsnight host over the success of Brexit  
Defensive BBC, you've done nothing but undermine Brexit and now you are horrified at the unpatriotic accusation. @andrealeadsom is spot on 
Living through Brexit is like circling a supermassive black hole that slows time towards infinity. 
I had no idea Brexit was a duo.Feel a bit silly for stressing out now.  
‘I felt suicidal': EU nationals on how the vote for Brexit a year ago changed their lives   
We need to ditch Brexit completely, move back into a position of strength and security, regain respect.  
Like Radiohead? Remain.Loathe Radiohead? Brexit.This is how the nation is split.#Glastonbury 
POLAND SHUTS BORDER TO ISLAMIC MIGRANTS TO KEEP POTENTIAL TERRORISTS OUT!   
Britain needs to hold a referendum to decide why Johnny Greenwood isn't aging. #glasto17 
Labour won over young voters. But it is betraying them on Brexit | Vince Cable  
The Guardian view on Brexit: Wrong then, wrong now, wrong in the future | Editorial  
.Corbyn's a BrexiterHe'll annihilate the future of: The youngThe not-so-youngThe middle-aged& Older folkOppose His & May's Brexit!.  
Brexit is not the high point of democracy – it's the greatest fraud ever perpetrated in British politics  #News 
Labour & Tories following Brexit as will of the people Even though it's an advisory reforendum Based on lies & anti EU retoric Shambolic  
Daniel Hannan: It's a year since Brexit and the Remoaners have been wrong  
A year on from Brexit, the UK is more divided than ever  
Martin Rowson on the anniversary of the vote for Brexit – The Guardian. With added mad dog Dacre.  
Brexit: May 'blocked unilateral offer for EU citizens' rights' last June  
Well at least @BrexitCentral have admitted that Brexit is about taking away rights of British citizens. 
EU citizens round on May's Brexit plan   
#Brexit dec 'lamentable when taken, remains lamentable now, if ever carried out will still be lamentable in future'  
#OurDateWasPerfectUntil you said you didn't know what Brexit was or that the UK didn't use Euros. 
#Bregret from G Stuart! Way to remedy last yr's 'vacuous qu' is new one: 'do u agree Brexit deal actually reached or prefer to stay in EU?'  
My patriotism, such as it is, is to the UK and the EU, as I'm a citizen of both. It is therefore absolutely incumbent on me to oppose Brexit 
Well said @andrealeadsom anti #Brexit #MSM have stepped up their negative reporting in a bid to scare the electorate  
Scrap Brexit. it's a busted flush. A broken record. A millstone dragging us down. An ill-conceived, mishandled waste of time, energy & money  
The real elite web of press-barons & their pet politicians that has dominated Britain & orchestrated #Brexit#StopBrexit #Remain 
One year after the UK decided to leave the EU, real wages are in decline. Read more about UK's the road to Brexit:  
What do we know of Brexit's likely consequences for the UK?  
Hard Brexit under threat as MPs from all parties plan alliance to defeat Theresa May's plans  
Leading Brexit campaigner says EU referendum should never have happened   
ALL Richard Branson cares about is making money 
Nick Clegg predicted this about Brexit one year ago. It is spookily accurate #MysticClegg  
Patriotic? Patriots are devoted to their country @andrealeadsom - you & your 'swivel eyed loons' are destroying our economy & welfare state. 
They're losing the Brexit arguments so are pushing immigration fears again. Remember that 75m Turks are coming to eat our NHS...  
A year after the referendum, we still don't know what Brexit actually means  
Looks like even the police have had enough of our Theresa's plans #No10Vigil #BrexitAnniversary #Brexit #StopBrexit #FuckBrexit #Remain  pic.twitter.com/j8gSgCqQXY 
The Guardian view on Brexit: Wrong then, wrong now, wrong in the future | Editorial  
Schaeuble says British were "deceived" in Brexit campaign  via @ReutersUK 
#brexitlyrics bob the builder (can we brexit) @TheLastLeg 
.@TheLastLeg Ireland: Trump to the left of me, Brexit to the right, here I am, stuck in the middle of EU. #BrexitLyrics 
Tonight's POLL! What song lyrics apply to Brexit? Tweet us with the hashtag #brexitlyrics 
#Brexit: and so as widely expected Japanese bank Nomura chooses Frankfurt for EU headquarters after UK's withdrawal  
If there was ever a reason to have a 2nd referendum, this is it  
'Be a bit patriotic' Andrea Leadsom clashes with Newsnight host over the success of Brexit  
Do we need a referendum on Muslim immigration in Canada? PETITION Below please sign and RT!  
Brexit and The Economist’s Lack of Intelligence Unit  
Sunderland changes its mind over #Brexit  
UK now the worst-performing advanced economy in the world after post-Brexit vote slump.  
Andrea Leadsom infuriates journalist by suggesting her Brexit questions aren't 'patriotic'  
One year on! #Brexit  
WORST HUMAN - Brexit Da EditionRT for FarageLIKE for Boris  
Martin Rowson on the anniversary of the vote for Brexit – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
The Guardian view on Brexit: Wrong then, wrong now, wrong in the future | Editorial  
"The best outcome for Spain would be to permit the referendum": . Bienvenido, Mister The New York Times. 
OK. I'm going to say this.The fishermen want Brexit, out of pure self interest.Not giving a damn about the 80,000 other folk made jobless! 
Theresa May blocked post-referendum offer on EU nationals rights, George Osborne claims  
Dublin was expected to be the winner from Brexit – now it's not so clear  
The Brexit you voted for vs the Brexit you're getting  
Leading Brexit campaigner says 'vacuous' referendum should never been called     
Best and most relevant question on twitter today.#brexit #ukip #fuckEU #Avgålöfven #SVPOL pic.twitter.com/KKD0WbOUNy 
Andrea Leadsom has urged British broadcasters to be "a bit patriotic" when reporting Brexit negotiations. #Newsnight 
The national suicide of Brexit must be stopped. At the very least we need membership of the single market & freedom of movement. Leadership? 
Celebrating Brexit one year on with revellers and the nose of @Nigel_Farage 
On first anniversary of the #Brexit referendum what has UK achieved? Greater political uncertainty & confusion - not a good outcome so far. 
A Brexit with no benefits, benefits no one.#StopBrexit 
How to keep your EU citizenship after Brexit  
Messy start to Brexit is a sign of things to come  
Andrea Leadsom told Emily Maitlis on Newsnight earlier it was broadcasters' 'patriotic duty' to support Brexit. Govt now officially deranged 
Will it be a hard or soft Brexit? Here are the six scenarios for the UK's exit from the EU. Read more:  
Are we all agreed that rather than "governing" the UK, May and her "brexit" team are now actively and deliberately wrecking our country 
When Iain said a second referendum would still result in Brexit, Alastair Campbell did not agree  
A Father of the House worthy of the name. Confident Ken Clarke will play a pivotal role on BREXIT.  A privilege to work for. #bestMPbyfar 
The case for Brexit is collapsing before our eyes. My column   
#StopBrexit - One year one - Speak it, share it, demand it >> Stop Brexit - PRT  
A ridiculous man in union jack shoes touching a fake lion next to a drainpipe and a rubbish bin. Perfect metaphor for Brexit. 
Brexit: Survey finds 60% of Scots 'want new EU vote'  
One year on from the Brexit vote, the UK economy is not looking so strong. Read more:  
People who voted Brexit in ref then voted Labour in GE have put Brexit in jeopardy with everyone at each other's throats, Gina Miller smug! 
Ousted Brexit Minister David Jones Joins Leave Means Leave  
Yes: #Brexit is wrong. It must & will be stopped.  
If you take parliamentary sovereignty seriously then you are against referendums.The conceptual flaw in the Brexit position.  
Please no more referendums.If Brexit is to be reversed, then do it through parliament.Let's return to being a parliamentary democracy.  
One year ago today, UK voters chose #Brexit; in this photo from that day, @Nigel_Farage holds a newspaper declaring it "Independence Day." 
No challenge of facts, boring insults. Here are facts from unlikely source  
A year on from the Brexit vote, the EU has become more unified than ever – the loss is ours  
This is an economist's radical plan for protecting Wales after Brexit 
Can we all just face if: May is bloody useless, David Davis is a complete fool & Boris is an embarrassment. Brexit Key Stone Cops. #bbcaq 
One year on, we still haven't heard a single credible argument on the benefits of #Brexit. We must #StopBrexit #BrexitAnniversary #No10Vigil 
What do you want to know about the Brexit talks?  
WATCH: Remoaner-In-Chief Gina Miller gets DESTROYED by audience member on Question Time  via @Your Brexit 
If this is true, and politicians are allowing threats of violence to influence their stances then our democracy is in deep trouble#Brexit  
Donald Tusk has said Theresa May's offer on EU citizens' rights post-Brexit is "below expectations"  
If you service primarily white guys that's who is gonna turn up at shows. It's a referendum on your practices not the market. 
Fuck me. Asking serious questions about Brexit negotiations is unpatriotic now. The Tories want to fuck up in peace. pic.twitter.com/kdcblhe64P 
Inequality: at 30yr low. Unemployment: at 40yr low. Crime: lowest since surveys began. Society "crucified" by a Brexit vote? Not so much.  
What on earth does left-right have to do with Brexit? Both parties were split - Conservatives between thinkers & 2nd hand car sales reps. 
#StopBrexitThe Guardian view on Brexit: Wrong then, wrong now, wrong in the future | Editorial  
Brexit 1 year on!  
Martin Rowson on the anniversary of the vote for Brexit – cartoon  
If Theresa May falls under the Brexit bus, never fear Britain - we have the strong and stable Andrea Leadsom.  
The shitshow that is Brexit has reached the 'why can't UK be a totalitarian state where broadcasters would cheer our glorious triumph' stage  
Can Brexit be stopped? The answer is in our hands | Jonathan Freedland  
I kind of admire the tenacity of those people trying to make the "Corbyn is our Trump" thing happen. But it just isn't. Brexit is our Trump. 
What exactly has the prospect of Brexit done to the UK economy? @xtophercook has the details #newsnight 
Madness. If only HM Treasury had been right about the Brexit vote leading to a housing crash. #AssetBubble 
."Popularity of some key Brexit campaigners, including Boris Johnson, Farage & Gove, has fallen to record low" . 
“It would be helpful if broadcasters were willing to be a bit patriotic” - says @andrealeadsom after being questioned on Brexit #newsnight 
Has Corbyn disappeared to his allotment? A real opposition leader would have destroyed May. But he WANTS her to do Brexit. I hate that liar 
I suspect Gove's poll topping isn't just to do with Brexit -  
The “patriotic thing” is wanting the best for your country, not pretending that Brexit is going to be a success or the Gov. is competent.  
Donald Tusk has said Theresa May's offer on EU citizens' rights post-Brexit is "below expectations" #SNT 
EU's fate: 'The faster the whole thing falls apart, the better'  #Brexit  
“Everything that happened since the referendum… has compounded those divides” - @GoodwinMJ on British society since Brexit vote #newsnight 
One year after the #Brexit vote, here are some notable numbers  
Woman on the left now says "vacuous" referendum should never have been called.  
Opinion: How France could win the post-Brexit beauty contest  
We are only into Day 5 of Brexit talks, and now this....  
Oh dear. Andrea Leadsom says broadcasters should be patriotic to make Brexit a success then denies accusing @maitlis of being unpatriotic. 
Leading Brexit campaigner says EU referendum should never have happened  
Sorry @andrealeadsom but that's embarrassing. Fail to plan then plan to fail. Someone in the Government needs explain why Brexit might work. 
UK now the worst-performing advanced economy in the world after post-Brexit vote slump    
This city is emerging as the biggest winner from the Brexit vote  
The crying pity is that there is no good reason why the UK could not provide the same level of info on Brexit.But, of course, it will not. 
House of Lords may now provide the biggest challenge to Theresa May's Brexit plans  
Best source of information on Brexit, by a country mile, is EU.See timeline and key documents: Worth bookmarking. 
“It would be helpful if broadcasters were willing to be a bit patriotic” - @andrealeadsom tells @maitlis after being questioned on Brexit  
Independence Day: Remembering the Brexit Vote One Year on  
Davis: I've successfully negotiated my way out of the basement with the pig. The bad news is the pig now owns Gibraltar#DeadRingers #Brexit 
Today's Friday @RuthDavidsonMSP. What's your position on Brexit on a Friday? It's just so hard to keep up. #Dizzy 
The Guardian view on Brexit: Wrong then, wrong now, wrong in the future | Editorial  
Watch: Farage BLASTS Juncker & EU as Brexit negotiations start  via @Your Brexit 
James O'Brien gives his take on why immigration played such a big part in Brexit  
If an MP get elected on a manifesto pledge to support Brexit then once elected rejects Brexit that is surely election fraud? 
Was Queen Elizabeth taking a silent yet striking stand against Brexit in front of her country’s political leaders?  
"Brexit NOT the solution to this country's problems" one of many messages from @SarahLudford in Whitehall this evening. Join us if you can. 
Schaeuble: "The Britons Were Endlessly Lied To And Deceived" On Brexit  
Architects of Brexit are hated by British public, chart shows  
Dear UKYou do realise May's Brexit economic plan is to sell tea and jam to the rest of the world?No really.RegardsTom#BrexitAnniversary 
A Year On I Have Come To Terms With #Brexit But I'll Never Stop Fighting For My Right To Stay  via @HuffPostUKPol 
In tomorrow's Star: #Corbyn talks to @SweeneySteve about #Labour's Brexit priorities and how #Grenfell is a wake-up call @JeremyCorbyn4PM 
A Brexit Britain will be a powerful force for freedom and prosperity on the world stage—and robust ally for the U.S.  
Brexit blues - © Chappatte dans Le Temps, Suisse  
The co-chair of Vote Leave has criticised David Cameron's decision to call a referendum on the EU  
EU after recent troubles doing better than us, fastest growing trading block worldwide. And stupidly we are jumping into the unknown 
Juncker was asked if he's any clearer on Brexit after talks with Theresa May. His answer said it all  
On the 29th of this month my @UKLabour membership expires. Because Labour supports #Brexit I can no longer support you. #BrexitAnniversary 
Why didn't you do your job properly at the Home Office?  We might not be in this Brexit mess if you had.  
Forget Brexit. The political stars are aligning in the euro area for integration.  @AdamPosen @jfkirkegaard 
'This is NOT a breakthrough' Angela Merkel slams May and demands free movement or NOTHING  THEN WE NEED TO WALK AWAY 
One year ago Britain voted to leave the EU – join us tonight at 19:30 as we take a look at how the country has fared since the Brexit vote  
Brexit is punishment enough (c) 
Shameful game playing by the EU. Chancellor Merkel called it a "good start". @theresa_may did the right thing and offered fair deal. #Brexit  
"Only 6 of about 150 currencies ... have weakened against the pound"@BrexitThe Egyptian is one!#BrexitAnniversary 
EU bad lads flirting with Britain to annoy Brussels is going to be one of the best bits of Brexit  
BREXIT NOTHING TO DO WITH ME says Co-Chair of Vote Leave  
Just tried to watch BBC News for the first time in months. 20 minutes of Corbyn love, Brexit hate and Muslim worship. What a cesspit. 
Great atmosphere at the Vigil. Stop #Brexit @_Britain4Europe Hope Teresa is listening. Whitehall tonight 
EU elitists will come up with endless excuses to cling onto as much power over a Brexit UK as possible. We must not submit to their whining! 
The moment in which @DanielJHannan went from Brexit oddball to full on deluded crazy pantomime comedy villain.  
The UK Brexit team settle in for some tough negotiations  
I will NEVER accept remaining in the European Union. I have spent well over a year blogging about it, and I will carry on until we #Brexit.  
Invoice for attention of Theresa May ref. cost of Brexit #BrexitAnniversary 
Dear @UKLabour moderates - time to put your money where your mouth is on #Brexit  
One year on, still fighting! Joining @No10Vigil for referendum anniversary #Remain 
PUK-Gorran Joint Leadership met today where they made clear that referendum will not be conducted w/o normalization of Parliament. 
Donald Tusk has said Theresa May's offer on EU citizens' post-Brexit is "below expectations"  
Brexit is a revolution that devours its children, the ‘third rail’ of politics—touch it and you are dead pic.twitter.com/qGfMChkzhl 
This latest, pernicious lie must be called out. Neither the ref nor any poll show 80% support for Brexit, still less for hard Brexit.  
#Brexit devaluation, GDP slowdown and higher government borrowing means we've already lost far more than we pay to the EU.#StopBrexit 
No, they voted tactically against the Tories. You're confusing 'referendum' and 'general election'. There's no mandate for Brexit. 
A working day at Paris Air Show. Listening to aeronautical and spatial Europe. High stakes against the backdrop of Brexit. #PAS17 
Draw your own chart to test your knowledge on how the UK economy has changed since the #Brexit vote:  
Foreign banks are jumping ship as London preps for Brexit. This trend could deal serious blow to the U.K.'s economy.  
"Germany and France will present a united front with regards to Brexit negotiations." @EmmanuelMacron 
Shake that Magic Money Tree hard Mrs May :£2Bn for DUP£37Bn-£46Bn a year for Brexit (Treasury)For everything else, there's Master Card.  
10 ways Brexit has proved to be nothing more than a massive kick in the balls  #BrexitAnniversary 
Since the UK's referendum on EU membership, the Pound has fallen 14.9% against the US Dollar.  
And as regards trade in the world after Brexit, it's this tangerine monstrosity who'll be rogering us. Thanks for that.  
EP's Verhofstadt said holding out for a “complex & bespoke” #Brexit deal was risky. UK would do better in EU single market & customs union.  
I voted for Brexit - and now I realise what a terrible mistake I made  
A Bitter-sweet Anniversary: Will Brexit End Access To ERASMUS For British Students?  # via @HPYoungVoices 
Search "ECJ" for some first-rate Brexit moaning.And not from Remainers.I am sure they will get over it. 
At this rate she’ll be saying 800% of people voted for #Brexit by next week. A million %. Everyone on planet Earth. In the Milky Way…  
UK's approach to #Brexit suggests not just political delusion but also antipathy to international rule of law  
Macron and Merkel delivered an unmistakeable message in Brussels: their countries intend to lead the EU post-Brexit  
Everything about Brexit is depressing, negative and divisive - the Britain we loved has been thrown into confusion.  
May's an idiot. Makes an offer worse than that already offered by the EU to UK citizens and claims it's conditional on reciprocity #brexit 
The post-referendum picture is a lot brighter than the one painted by doomsayers, says @CitySamuel 
'It’s clear' Commons ERUPTS as Corbyn DUCKS question on Labour's chaotic plan for Brexit  
Come to downing St now for an anti brexit anti tory rally. Crowds are starting to gather. @No10Vigil 
Vote Leave boss Gisela Stuart criticises Cameron's referendum  
Breaking - Ireland will block #Brexit deal if #May/DUP deal goes ahead.Game, Set & Match via @skwawkbox 
Labour appears set on 'betraying' millions who reject ALL versions of Brexit.  
A growing number of people are becoming pessimistic about Brexit, Alastair Campbell told @IainDale  
On the anniversary of #Brexit, my feelings can be summarised by Miffy's Dream (1979)  
From Brexit to Grenfell: why the left prefers the poor when they're sad and tragic. By Brendan O'Neill  
#Biafrans IPOB led by #Nnamdkanu has bind the charter of Biafrans Liberty in a democratic way not by War with Nigeria but by #Referendum  
Some people still refuse to accept the referendum result. Help us make sure that Brexit is delivered in full  
Irish Indo praises "novel, unique" @sinnfeinireland Brexit EU initiative – but credits it to Fine Gael Foreign Affairs Minister Coveney!  pic.twitter.com/T9M49gJTm9 
Jean-Claude Juncker gives amusingly simple answers when asked about UK and #Brexit.#TheresaMay is a laughing stock. #BrexitAnniversary 
Demand for British manufacturing is at a 30-year high after Brexit led to a weak pound. Is reshoring a good idea?  
Markets since #Brexit  
I animated my twitter avatar Also me while reading Brexit deal articles  
$GS' UK Economist Andrew Benito reflects on what the #Brexit vote has meant for the UK economy so far  
#PollAtFive One year in, how do you rate the Brexit process so far?Please RT for larger sample size.#brexitanniversary 
The Brexit vote, one year laterThe historical roots of the losers of globalization's decision to leave the EU 
Brexit one year later: Markets might get it wrong again, writes Richard Barley  
Dear @sumanthraman-Other than few of you in TN not many in any state interested in" hindi imposition" issue --none demands referendum RT-Bye 
'The British public must be very vigilant and insist that Brexit is not sold out in the negotiations' - @Tom_Slater_ on #SkyNews 
Nnamdi Kanu & supporters should know that even if referendum is called, it's most likely INEC that'll organize it~Ndigbo, collect ya PVCs o 
It’s the magic voter tree! Watch how 52% grows miraculously into 80% (May will be claiming 120% support for #Brexit next)  
Britain's offer to protect EU citizens' rights is "below our expectations," Donald Tusk says  
David Allen Green: Of the poll tax and of Brexit  
Schaeuble says British were 'deceived' in Brexit campaign  
'Remainers are exploiting the General Election results to try to undermine the very clear referendum result' - @Tom_Slater_ on #SkyNews 
My Brexit day thread still holds up I think. Still a long way to go before we have any real clarity on what will happen.  
Loving the uber Remainers airily claiming they would win a referendum were it held again. Altogether now: "You lost. Get over it." 
Happy Birthday, Brexit !  
Allow exiled Kurdish Jews vote in Kurdistan referendum: Representative#TwitterKurds #Israel #Jews 
Theresa May reaffirms migration controls as key aim of Brexit  
I'll be at #politicsfest17 talking to @ianbirrell tomorrow. Brexit, liberalism, hung parliaments and more.  
Alastair Campbell on @lbc argues powerfully why Labour should oppose Brexit. He's so toxic he delivers ever more support 4 Leave 
#Brexit was a crushing rebuke for the #EU andits desire to override the sovereignty of the nations of #Europe 
EU nationals in the UK have been inadvertently caught up in this clueless Brexit. The UK now has to go the extra mile to secure their rights 
Leaked document shows ‘secret’ government studies into impact of ‘hard’ Brexit  via @LondonEconomic 
Brexit purely & simply Tory dispute rest of UK has had to pay for (& 27 other countries) - vain inglorious basterds 
I don't always do RT requests, but agree: neutralising Tory #Brexit mandate was a #GE2017 priority. Neutralising Labour's #Brexit is next   
Of the Poll Tax, and of BrexitBy me, at @FT 
'Duped'?! ...Everyone had the same length of time to carry out their own research into the importance of what they were voting for #Brexit 
Brexit and @TheEconomist's Lack of Intelligence Unit  
we won't stay silent until the issue resolves and we want referendum in Kashmir #KashmirKillings 
Brexit talks latest  
We're tracking four CEOs through Brexit. Here's what they say, a year after the referendum  
*Major* downgrade of Brexit euphoria from the Telegraph in the past few months, no?  
Brexit forever or Brexit never?  
The #Brexit referendum on June 23, 2016 was a great day for British freedom, sovereignty and self-determination. #BrexitAnniversary 
One year ago, Britain voted to leave the European Union. Here's what's next on the road to #Brexit  
They’ve gambled 3 times.  1-  Eu Ref 2 - Pursuit of Hard Brexit 3 - Election after triggering Art50.  They are an extreme incompetent rabble 
'Inequality will increase'How the UK has changed since the Brexit vote  
Vote Leave sold Brexit with an inspiring message of national renewal - a lesson May ignored, says @FraserNelson 
#Brexit was a crushing rebuke for the EU and its desire to override the sovereignty of the nations of Europe  
Three mistakes that Theresa May has made in the Brexit negotiations:  
If you could choose British Prime Minister from last 30 to be leading #Brexit negotiations, who would it be? #followback #yourvoice 
Nothing positive to say about the Brexit decisionThis has been the year when Project Fear became Project Reality. #BrexitAnniversary 
In an alternative reality brexit never happened and this is our PM and home secretary  
Jean-Claude Juncker says he does not know what kind of Brexit Britain wants  
"The Govt can't pretend it won the last General election" @JamesMcGrory on why @Theresa_May's hard #Brexit vision is no longer possible:  
Here's the sequel. Another one word answer from Jean-Claude Juncker. After telling me UK not clear on Brexit, what does he want to know?  
A year has passed since the #Brexit voteIf the #EUref were held today how would you vote?#BrexitDayPlease RETWEET this poll 
#skynews #bbcnews #itvnews  Just a simple reminder to all the British Brexit Obstructionists Team as what the people want ie: get on with it  
Top 10 export destinations for the UK auto industryGuess where it is charged with tariffs, and where it is not—until Brexit is implemented pic.twitter.com/Adg720oajP 
Read FM @nicolasturgeon speech @ScotlandRHShow a year after EU Referendum  
So @ruthdavidsonmspWith your #brexit plansShould you not be out fruit pickingRather than playing at soldiers? 
Brexit will not produce more fish for the UK industry - only better management with more protection will do that:  
Remain would walk an EU referendum now with the young voting and Leave lies exposed. Quitters know it 
Labour won over young voters. But it is betraying them on Brexit | Vince Cable  
The U.K. hasn't even officially left the EU yet and it's showing the consequences of Brexit already. #BrexitAnniversary 
If nations can't change their minds they cease 2B democracies. Reason 4 denying this now...it might 'wreck' #Brexit. 
Trump grabbing power & Brexit made the alt-right (far-right) feel they'd won. Fascists from under rocks are now exposed#BrexitAnniversary 
We must remind #Remain voters who accept #Brexit that passive acceptance is the ally of those who would abuse our democracy.#StopBrexit 
Whenever Brexit gets too much I'm going to open up this pic & imagine these two out on a madcap adventure.  
The British people were "lied to and deceived" during the Brexit referendum, Germany's Finance Minister has said.  
Grotesque ! @GiselaStuart who chaired Leave and did so much harm now says referendum was abuse of democratic process 
That feeling when you are trying to give a serious interview on #Brexit and it begins to rain and battery runs out.  
A year of Brexit in figures, on the anniversary of the EU referendum:Immigration downGrowth downHate crimes up 
British people were "endlessly lied to and deceived" in last year's Brexit referendum German Finance Minister Wolfgang Schaeuble. 
Nigel Farage says he is 'thinking about' returning as Ukip leader 
Theresa May takes aim at UNELECTED Brussels leaders over Brexit dinner leaks  Stay strong @theresa_may @DavidDavisMP 
Time for Scotland's political parties to think big about Brexit, from @KirstyS_Hughes  
Nigel Farage declaring #Freedom over England.The People voted, and they voted for #Brexit. #MEGA 
Erm, Tory Brexit, Tory boy?  
Why didn't anyone tell us that there has already been a referendum and Wales is now independent? #indyWales 
My toon for this weekend edition of SEGA-daily#QueenHat #EU #BREXIT #TheresaMay 
I voted for Brexit. But a year on, it looks less and less appealing  
Forget the referendum result guys, The Guardian's decided Brexit's cancelled. 🖒 
As the Brexit vote turns one, leaving has never been more uncertain | Dan Roberts  
Brexit 1 year on.SNP MEP Alyn Smith "Whats next?".That's easy.The Dole.  
Brexit: #TheresaMay #LiarLiar blocked plan to guarantee rights of EU citizens in the UK immediately after referendum  
Our response to the Prime Minister’s proposals on the rights of EU citizens living in the UK following #Brexit  
EU expats condemn Theresa May's 'pathetic' offer on Brexit rights  
Labour won over young voters. But it is betraying them on Brexit | Vince Cable  
German Finance Minister: British people were endlessly lied to about Brexit  
Forget the doom-mongering, here are twelve reasons to be excited about Brexit  via @telegraphnews 
France takes hold of itself, while Britain stumbles out of the EU in a fog of confusion, delusion, bluster and lies.#StopBrexit #Brexit  
Brexit is a revolution that devours its children, says @Andrew_Adonis  
On this #BrexitAnniversary, we take a look back to Brexit's unusually speedy entry into the @OED in December 2016 
A year after the UK voted for Brexit, it's clear Britain doesn't have the same draw for EU citizens that it once did  
Brexit is like an old person downsizing. Moving from a grand palace with your family. To a grotty flat where you'll die alone. 
One result of Brexit: luminaries like Bonnie Greer, AC Grayling, Henry Porter, Gary Lineker, John Gummer etc have turned into raging bores. 
Labour, your vote & position on SM&CU is being used by Government to prop up hard #Brexit.What say you?  
"Brexit is like Dunkirk all over again, but without the boats" says @fleetstreetfox in full cry 
Brexit: Theresa May blocked plan to guarantee rights of EU citizens in the UK immediately after - The Independent  
 Happy One Year Anniversary to BREXIT!!! Stiff upper lip, UK! Get 'er done! 
It is time for brave politicians of all parties to say the unsayable - that #Brexit will be a disaster and we can turn back from abyss 
“Britons were endlessly lied to and deceived” about #Brexit 
Britons were endlessly lied to during Brexit campaign - Schaeuble  
 #brexit. It was May who SINGLE HANDEDLY blocked plans to give EU and UK citizens certainty after the referendum. 
One Year On from the EU Ref we will be protesting to show that we still reject #Brexit - #Leeds City Square Sat 1pm  
Brexit negotiations going so badly, that they have moved into effectively being the bit where Partridge pitches  show ideas to Tony Hayers. 
yeah with both main parties 100% on the brexit train it's not like anyone had a choice. we voted to tank her majority / garbage manifesto. 
It  is extraordinary how anyone can believe that the leaders of #Brexit care about the British people.#BrexitAnniversary #StopBrexit 
Dear PM, you are delusional. Your pitch was "vote for me to deliver my Hard Brexit". They said "no."  
Here is a reminder of why we voted Brexit 12 months ago. To become a strong, independent nation once again!  
I wish people would stop scapegoating refugees and immigrants for our own self-inflicted problems.#BrexitAnniversary #Brexit #StopBrexit 
After this one-word interview, I've just done another with Jean-Claude Juncker. What would he like to know   about Brexit? 'Everything.'  
#Brexit: 1 year later. @Brian_Whit breaks it down with @ASE. 
Millions who voted Labour didn't back Brexit!  
my vote for Labour was to stop the Tories I was not endorsing Brexit - I am not happy at this misrepresentation of why many turned to Labour 
#BrexitAnniversary: A look back at a busy 12 months since the EU referendum  
Theresa May says Brexit will be good for Britain, tells EU leaders they're dreaming if they think public has changed their mind 
Asked PM what her mandate for leaving single market/customs union was after not winning manifesto majority. replied 80% voters backed Brexit 
You know all those impossible promises I made a year ago about Brexit? I shouldn't have been allowed to do that  
Pretending we can have our cake and eat it, whether applied to Brexit or public spending, will make us all worse off  
How to beat populists - lessons from Brexit, the US, + Macron who does this best. Me for @FT  
PM tells me "not her recollection" Cabinet, blocked by her, backed unilateral guarantee for EU citizens just after referendum under Cameron 
Asked to guarantee that Brexit would be a good deal for Britain, May says "That's what we are working for." Not a guarantee 
Happy Brexit day. To celebrate I will be shooting myself in the foot. 
How have Theresa May's Brexit proposals gone down in Brussels? Leaders are talking now  
Brexit outlook  
Regret, frustration, determination: how voters feel one year on from the Brexit referendum | Guardian readers  
.@JunckerEU "Unimaginable that Court of justice of EU is excluded in any #Brexit citizens' agreement. But #EUCO is not negotiating." 
Merkel: the work of 27 member states should be given priority over Brexit negotiations. 
Britons were endlessly lied to during #Brexit campaign, says German finance minister Wolfgang Schaeuble  
Brexit has left this French doctor feeling so unwelcome in Britain, she's moving home @mrjamesob 
Whatever they do, the elites cannot undo Brexit, writes @Tom_Slater_  
#BREAKING: EU27 want to ensure full rights of #EU, UK citizens following #Brexit, UK's offer on EU citizens below EU's expectations: Tusk  
When you want to engage them intellectually on the Biafra debate, they start insults. How do you intend to get referendum - insults 
Like the way the DUP responded to the GFA referendum?  
EU press conference in Brussels about EU-wide issues and it's given entirely in... English. Still makes me laugh. #softpower #Brexit  
Relax - #Brexit's never going to happen, and here's why:   #BrexitAnniversary 
Brexit: May 'blocked unilateral offer for EU citizens' rights' last June  
CAMERON'S DEAL WITH BIG BUSINESS TO BULLY BRITS TO STAY IN EULeaked Letter Reveals Cameron Hatched Anti Brexit Plot 
Theresa May single-handedly blocked plan to guarantee EU citizens rights after Brexit, George Osborne reveals  
Please RT: Do you have any regrets over how you voted in the EU referendum? Call 020 38 29 1234#IndependenceDay #Brexit 
EU citizen @Alexa_Kantor, an engineer from Oxford spoke to BBC World about concerns about May's plans post Brexit.  
On the anniversary of the #Brexit vote, @davidallengreen reflects on how social media has influenced the past year 
#BrexitAnniversary I will NEVER accept #Brexit. I have spent a year shouting about it, and I will carry on until we #StopBrexit  
Brexit has turned Britain into Poundland.  
Jeremy Corbyn faces a dilemma as Brexit solidifies: which half of his voters should he disappoint?  
Text of @JustinWelby in Lords #QueenSpeech debate yesterday: Brexit, foreign policy & shared values  
Brexit one year on... "It's as if we voted for a black hole."  
2016: no one knows what brexit means2017: we still have no idea what it means but if you say it's bad you're a fucking traitor 
'Entitled to rethink as facts become clear' Diplomat who wrote #Brexit rules says UK can and should remainMore:  
My shortest interview. But one word says a lot. Is Jean-Claude Juncker any clearer on what kind of Brexit the UK wants? Here you go...  
May- can't do a deal with DUP 2 weeks after telling Queen it was done/wastes 2 months of 2yrs of Brexit talks with lost election #notuptoit 
Theresa May's offer on residency rights for EU citizens post-Brexit has been labelled "pathetic" by a campaign group  
We talk to four experts about how the UK has changed since the Brexit vote.  
Brexit Anniversary  
75% of UK landed fish exported to EU. 80% of fish eaten in UK is imported. Utter delusion to think Brexit will benefit fishermen or consumer 
Brexit is (& can only be) a disaster. It's a childish fantasy of AngloBritish nationalism high on its own propaganda  
BREXIT...so far so good? NOT!!!! What a bloody mess...and getting messier by the day!! 
I still bear a grudge about perceived slights that happened in primary school so the idea I'll 'get over' Brexit any time soon is laughable 
What fresh hell is this? The @guardian has commissioned some short films about Brexit from "leading playwrights"  
Yes, but apart from that, what has Brexit ever done for us?  
Theresa May single-handedly blocked plan to guarantee EU citizens rights after Brexit, George Osborne reveals  
Want more detail on UK government's position on Brexit? You're not the only one. Check Jean-Claude Juncker with me today. One word does it.  
A year after a divisive vote, doubts are mounting in a town that went overwhelmingly for Brexit 
The UK after Brexit  
Brexit has turned Britain into Poundland  
2/2 in German (previous in English): "Brexit will cost Britain prosperity...after election the people are becoming painfully aware of this." 
Picture the headline: BREXIT CANCELLED.Now picture what the economy would do.There. You see? 
nicely edited (cut down) version of my anti-Brexit speech last night @IBTimesUK 
Vodafone won't reintroduce roaming fees after Brexit. A big deal for travellers to UK and those in border counties.  
How the EU referendum result upset David Attenborough  
"We won, you lost, get over it" is all I've heard since last June. No positive arguments in favour of #Brexit are ever put forward. 
Brexit: May 'blocked unilateral offer for EU citizens' rights' last June  
Elites face 'double backlash' a year on from #Brexit. @Jacob_Greaves reports for @ReutersTV More on Brexit:  
Young people fought Brexit. But now we’re fighting for a better future | Josh Salisbury  
Will it be a hard or soft Brexit? Here are the six scenarios for the UK's exit from the EU. Read more:  
Jean-Claude Juncker's one-word answer when asked if he's getting a clearer idea of the kind of Brexit the UK wants  
Now the election is over, we're continuing our campaign to take back control and deliver Brexit. Are you with us?  
Population soared by 5million in last 10 years. Previous 5million took 35 years to achieve. Another reason we voted for Brexit 
A year on, the proof that Project Fear's Brexit warnings have yet to come true  @Patrick_E_Scott @telebusiness 
The decline of heavy industry, the collapse of Yorkshire football and the sad logic of Brexit - The Death of Hope  
EU Citizens Living In Britain For 5 Years Allowed Stay In Post-Brexit Apocalyptic Wasteland  
If @Nigel_Farage had really believed that Brexit would work he wouldn't have quit UKIP's leadership on day one. #BrexitAnniversary 
This is @mrjamesob's epic analysis on how Brexit voters formed their opinion on immigration  
British government wanted Brexit talks kept secret but we ensured they can't and will keep you up to date on progress - @M_AndersonSF 
Labour is betraying the entire country on Brexit. And this especially applies to SLab’s ‘Vote Tory to block @theSNP’ campaign in Scotland. 
Junker does not know what type of Brexit the UK wants. There is only one type. The type where we leave and never return. 
There's also a vastly larger and more active #Remain social media network than before the referendum. 
Wales unionists wanting a say in brexit. NI unionists being extremely awkward in negotiations.Does Scotland have the crappest unionists? 
Osborne's Evening Standard saying May was only Cabinet minister post-referendum not to back a unilateral guarantee of EU citizens rights. 
Happy #IndependenceDay. A year on, let's get the best out of #Brexit:  
Theresa May single-handedly blocked plan to guarantee EU citizens rights after Brexit, George Osborne reveals  
A clear majority of the British public are now opposed to Theresa May's extreme form of Brexit.  #BrexitAnniversary 
Theresa May says she is going to let 3m EU citizens stay in the UK after Brexit. Here's what that means:  
NEW: Theresa May blocked post-referendum offer on EU nationals rights, George Osborne claims  
Majority of new Conservative MPs backed UK to remain in #EU  /via @FT #Brexit 
Can you separately table: 'Any agreement to leave the EU must have the support of all four parts of the UK'.  This makes 'no deal' No Brexit 
Norway had an EU referendum. Norway had Project Fear. Norway voted 52/48. Project Fear failed to materialise. Now 70/30. #BrexitAnniversary 
All the ills of this country since 2010 is down to a media that has encouraged Tory victories, their austerity, Brexit & a wrecked economy. 
When it comes to banking, Frankfurt is emerging as the biggest winner from last year’s Brexit vote  
So proud of 17 million Brexit voters who refused to be bullied by the biggest scaremongering campaign in human history. #BrexitAnniversary 
Hannan speaking at Vote Leave HQ moments after the BBC conceded the referendum result  
Now the Tory party that gambled twice so badly is teetering on the brink, Brexit will consume the govt agenda, we will all pay the price. 
The @vote_leave campaign's chief @Matthew_Elliott looks forward…#IndependenceDay #Brexit  
Theresa May has to reach out to all parties to pass a Brexit deal. She'll only get it if she rejects Nigel Farage and puts jobs first.  
I always thought of myself as white but then I was racially abused the day after Brexit  
EU expats condemn Theresa May's 'pathetic' offer on Brexit rights  
I voted for Brexit - and now I realise what a terrible mistake I made  
A year on, we know the politicians who lied about £350m a week to #NHS were obscuring a nastier truth: the cost of #Brexit will destroy it! 
We cannot have an open door to EU migrants between now and the end of the Brexit process. Time to get a grip on the immigration issue.  
An expert's guide to negotiating Brexit  
Celebratory cake? #IndependenceDay #Brexit  
Delighted former Brexit minister David Jones has joined @LeaveMnsLeave board. No deal is better than a bad deal. 
Former Brexit minister David Jones joins board of @LeaveMnsLeave and 13 more MPs register their support. Full list:  
On 23 June a supporter of the EU's got to do what a supporter of the EU's got to do  #BlueForEU #BrexitAnniversary #Brexit #EUcitizens 
If you want to give people back control, give them education & training with the 10s of billions that could be saved by binning #Brexit 
What Theresa May has offered EU citizens after Brexit - and why it's 'pathetic'  
There's no such phenomenon as "after Brexit", like it's a phase. IT'S FOR EVER - like Tories in government and Independence when it comes. 
One year on from the #EU referendum, it's become apparent that the EU will be deciding the #Brexit deal for us  
Labour won over young voters. But it is betraying them on Brexit | Vince Cable  
A year after the Brexit vote it is clearer than ever that what I always thought is absolutely right. 
Before Brexit: we discuss rules with 27 countries, agree, pass laws and follow themAfter Brexit: 27 countries make rules, we follow them 
One year on from 62% referendum result in Scotland to remain in the European Union. Democratic deficit doesn't begin to cover it. #Brexit  
"Britain cannot have the rights of Norway with the obligations of Canada." @AndrewDuffEU v interesting on Labour's Brexit splits.  
A freaking YEAR since Brexit!? Damn. Time flies when you're seething about wilfully ignorant clungetoads voting for the right to blame. 
HAPPY BREXIT ANNIVERSARY!  
I read this re: Brexit. Perfect. "It's like booking a place at Dignitas, finding there's a cure for your illness and then going anyway." 
It's been a year since the Brexit vote. Here's the most obvious immediate impact of the EU referendum. Read more:  
"We feel betrayed" - Anxiety of @BritishInEurope not relieved by Theresa May's offer on #citizensrights post #Brexit 
I am assuming the title of the Global South High Commissioner in the UK, in charge of monitoring the post-Brexit era and expressing concern. 
One year on, Theresa May has lost her mandate and Commons majority for an extreme, job-destroying Brexit. Me on @LBC 
Can't believe that it's 'Brexit day'. One year on from this awful decision we are more diminished, smaller, poorer, alone and adrift. 
We don't know what the Tory strategy is either on Brexit, PM and the Tories are an embarrassment and clueless in the negotiations...  
2 things happening:1. The Leave majority is dying of natural causes2. The legitimacy of the referendum diminishing 
Happy Independence Day. Can we be independent yet?  #Brexit  
Yankee candle have released Brexit anniversary scents  
can't believe it's been a year since brexit. we have so much control now. i walk down the street, a bulldog waves, lady diana is alive again 
EU expats condemn Theresa May's 'pathetic' offer on Brexit rights  
Found the perfect place for a @Bloomberg interview on #Brexit. #Finland #Barösund 
Gentle reminder that only 26% of population voted for #Brexit  
You lost brexit and corbyn lost, go cry in to your coriander soup and healthy vegan shake  
Happy Brexit Anniversary.  
Poll finds that more voters now believe Britain was wrong to vote to leave the EU  #Brexit #trade #economy #business 
One has to ask how politicians and the media would respond if Remainers started making threats of violence. #Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain 
Brexit was won on an unsustainable lie. The Quitterati and Quitterazzi must work ever harder to sustain it. It is only a matter of time. 
Brexit shoved UK GDP growth to the bottom of the table. Greece is growing faster than UK now. #BrexitAnniversary 
One of Leave's most important campaigners says the vote on Brexit should never have happened  
Tomorrow @DanielZeichner & @mikegalsworthy will speak at our #StopBrexit rally in Cambridge! Join us at  #Brexit  
It's genuinely ridiculous, and it's sad that he's doing it on Brexit day, his holiest day of the year. 
"#Brexit is all the government is doing. I made a mistake voting for it." via @washingtonpost#BrexitAnniversary 
When have we seen a Remainer threaten or predict violence from the Remain side? All the threats come from Leavers.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
Theresa May's Brexit strategy is still "not entirely clear," Denmark's finance minister says  
A year ago a referendum was held by Cameron to placate nastiest elements of the back-bench Tory right & the UK wrecked its global reputation  
One year on, and I still haven't heard a single credible argument from a Brexiteer on the benefits of Brexit.#BrexitAnniversary 
Sacked Brexit minister David Jones and 13 other MPs join @LeaveMnsLeave. Enough to vote down a bad deal... 
Ousted Brexit Minister David Jones Joins @LeaveMnsLeave:  
Worth reminding people that this money isn't just still 'waiting' - any peanuts we may get back swallowed already by Brexit damage. Gone.  
Leading Brexit campaigner says 'vacuous' referendum should never been called  
.@sinnfeinireland join Border Communities Against Brexit at Dtormint today marking one year from the European Referendum  
Reckon if there was another Brexit referendum, remain would romp home. Awareness of how we were duped & young would vote in droves. Hey-ho. 
Are we going soft on a hard Brexit? How Leavers are shifting from prioritising immigration to trade  
The Brexit Secretary heads to Brussels for the next round of negotiations with our European partners.  
The true saboteurs of Brexit  via @FT 
Happy Brexit anniversary everyone!  
First meeting of the day with @campaignforleo & Angela Merkel  #Economy #Brexit #FutureOfEU 
Nice to see you're coming to visit Non EU Switzerland.  You'll be able to witness how a Brexit success will work out. 
UK PM May's plans to secure rights of EU nationals after Brexit criticized as "not sufficient" by EU Commission head  
CALLING ALL WRITERS! #political #politics #conservatives #labour #trump #Brexit #theatre #casting #actor #actress #writer #director #london 
PROGRESS. Let's see more of this AND let's hear politicians stating publicly that we should consider stopping Brexit  
#Brexit deal: Three million EU citizens allowed to stay in UK permanently - and will get same rights as Britons  
PM Theresa May's offer on citizens' rights "is a first step, but not sufficient". @JunckerEU at #EUCO - #Brexit  
Says it all.#BrexitAnniversary #StopBrexitLeading Brexit campaigner says EU referendum should never have happened  
Blow for May as EU chief shoots down her offer to let citizens stay after Brexit 
Speech - a year on from the referendum, it's becoming clear Brexit needs to be stopped to prevent damage to Britain  
Looking for a good place to give a #Brexit interview to @Bloomberg at 13.30 CET. Would this work? 
Britain is booming after Brexit, as you can clearly see from these charts. Oh. 
Absent PM's plan detail - most tangible Brexit summit outcome -process for European Medicines Agency & Banking Authority relocated out of UK  
Jeremy Corbyn faces a dilemma as Brexit solidifies: which half of his voters should he disappoint? asks @helenlewis  
A lot of Remoaners are sharing charts from the biased FT that are so negative about Brexit. What about the positives?? #BrexitAnniversary 
Unbelievable. She stood next to a bus with lies on it, won the referendum and now regrets it happening. @StevePeers  
Thanks @WelshLGA #Labour group for a great discussion in Cardiff today about changing the terms of Brexit. Time to re-set the negotiations.  
DCU has launched a #Brexit Research & Policy Institute to explore ongoing impact on business, society & government  
Poll ratings of May & Corbyn have shifted massively over recent months. Might it be possible people have also changed their minds re Brexit? 
The #EU is like a window. Often invisible, but you're gonna miss it if it's broken. #Brexit #brexittalks #UK #theresamay #remain 
To celebrate brexit, I've told my clients to fuck off, set fire to my desk, and asked the boss for a pay rise. 
Oh FFS. Gisela £350m Bus Brexiteer Stuart… now says the referendum shouldn’t have been called. #Brexit  
Brexit vote 1year on - we are now on path to having fewer rights and opportunities in Europe than Norwegians or Turks. So much for "control" 
Since #Brexit vote UK's misery index (inflation + unemployment) has fared far worse than that of peers. Even in #Italy, things have improved 
On @bbcquestiontime last night. I doubt Theresa May could negotiate her way out of a paper bag #Brexit  
Six scenarios for Brexit, outlined - very useful, especially since nobody seems to have a clue:  
Secretary of State David Davis spoke from @ukinpoland about how we've been making last year's EU referendum vote a reality  
Happy Brexit Anniversary! *lies back in bath full of shit, lighting tenners on fire* 
Brexit is a year old and like all 1-year-olds it's keeping us up all night and puking everywhere 
Coincidentally, I will spend the Brexit anniversary by flying to another EU country without a visa or payment or mobile roaming charges D: 
Government trying to hide its studies into cost and impact of ‘hard’ #Brexit #BrexitAnniversary 
This is why Brexit will FAIL. People aren't prepared to be worse off because of Brexit. Keep up the pressure. #StopBrexit 
Happy Brexit day. Here is a statue of a man stepping off the edge.  
TONIGHT: We’re on air at 19:30 on BBC Two with @maitlis looking at how the UK is faring one year after the Brexit vote  
Brexit is one year old today. Happy birthday Brexit, you were an accident and I hate you.  
#Brexit the catastrophic destruction of our country to benefit the few.#BrexitAnniversary #StopBrexit 
Brexit...  
Theresa May offered a plan for EU citizens to stay in the UK after Brexit  
EU citizens: jam will have more rights than us after Brexit  
EU citizens round on May's Brexit plan  
HAPPY BRITISH INDEPENDENCE DAY FOLKS!!! #IndependenceDay #BrexitAnniversary #Brexit #GreatBritain  
Nobody voted to be poorer & #Brexit has already made us so.Speak it - Share it - Demand it #StopBrexit.@vote_leave#BrexitAnniversary 
JUNCKER says he does not know what kind of BREXIT UK wants.  I suggest he listens rather than talk all the time. The answer is JUST BREXIT! 
Soft brexit is pointlessJust #StopBrexit@albawhitewolf @mrjamesob @UKIPNFKN @mikegalsworthy @CornishSkipper @No10Vigil 
A year since the referendum and main development is the £ has dropped, inflation has risen and real wages squeezed. Average Briton is poorer  
Fantastic to visit Peterhead this morning - Brexit provides a sea of opportunity for the fishing industry and coastal communities  
Oh. So it's the anniversary of the referendum is it?*Silence. The wind blows a soiled chip wrapper past a boarded-up high street shop.* 
There are over 60 million EU citizens living in UK already, many of whom would like to retain their rights post-Brexit. #NoBrexit 
In case you were wondering how a "No Deal" Brexit might look:  @FT 
A referendum narrowly won by lies is not democratic and will ruin us.#StopBrexit #BrexitAnniversary 
Brexit is like getting a new phone contract. It costs more, the features are worse and the guy selling it thinks you should be grateful. 
I see how a few wealthy elite can benefit from Brexit, but no benefit for anyone else. Will public wake up to this before or after we leave?  
How the debate over Brexit is changing.  
29% of EU nationals applying currently not meeting criteria to qualify for TM's 'generous' offer on #citizensrights post #Brexit  
UK was the slowest growing EU economy in 2017Q1 with inflation above target. Is STAGFLATION around the corner?#Brexit #QueensSpeech #remain 
Can't find a Brexit Anniversary card. Apparently there is one, but nobody knows what it looks like. 
Forget the doom-mongering, here are twelve reasons to be excited about Brexit  via @telegraphnews 
Can #YPG have an independent state/Fed?The reason Tehran is against referendum on Iraqi Kurdistan   by @thekarami 
Luckily the Scottish Parliament had foresight to democratically vote for a choice of referendum lifeboat after #Brexit.  
In a Brexit divorce deal offering, PM Theresa May said EU citizens will be given the opportunity to stay in the UK  
Morning Glastonbury! Looking forward to speaking at @billybragg Left Field Tent at 12pm; one year on from the Referendum.  
With all the distractions over the past year, I'd almost forgotten how stupid Brexit is and how furious and upset I still am about it. 
If we really WANTED #Brexit there would be a million Brexiteers marching to Downing Street demanding it TODAY. As it is - there is nothing. 
'Fewer rights than a jar of jam': EU leaders and citizens round on May's Brexit plan  
What‘s changed in the UK economy in the year since the #Brexit vote?  
A "soft Brexit" is like being "a little bit pregnant".You are either IN the EU or out of it. 
The BIG Remainer lie is that there is the 'Soft Brexit/Hard Brexit" choice. It doesn't exist. Neither exists. You LEAVE or you don't. 
One year anniversary of voting for Brexit, and this rant is still as brilliant as it was last year  
Theresa May could instantly end uncertainty for EU nationals & British expats by agreeing with the EU's fair & sensible proposals.#Brexit 
Please, even if you support Biafra/Separation of East from Nigeria, still get your PVC so you can vote those who'll make a referendum happen 
EU citizens: jam will have more rights than us after Brexit  
What are you most looking forward to post Brexit, for me it's that union jack tea towels will final be legal 
Oh this is awesome from the ONS.What's changed since the Brexit vote? Draw on charts and see how accurate you are> 
‘I felt suicidal': EU nationals on how the vote for Brexit a year ago changed their lives  
If only they would listen to you and to us!  They have NO mandate for the hard #Brexit. NO consultation. I and millions of others despair  
One year since the Brexit vote and it is already well on its way to be being a colossal political disaster.  
Brexit should reflect the views of all British people,not just one wing of the Conservative Party. @EveningStandard: 
'I'm living in limbo in a situation I didn't have a vote on,' French engineer Alexandrine Kantor on Brexit deal for EU citizens.  
Morning Briefing: Six out of ten Scots back a second EU referendum once the final terms of the Brexit deal are known  
Happy Birthday Brexit?Hands up if you haven't slept right since last year? 
A good reason to buy the physical @FT today: superb spread on the road to Brexit  
Louise White asks EU citz who's lived in Scotland for 20yrs, how she voted on Brexit? THEY DIDNT GET TO VOTE! @LWhiteMedia #CallKaye 
for me, the worst thing about brexit is how obviously pointless it is. we're not gaining a single meaningful thing. #BrexitAnniversary 
(for the Brexiters, obv) - "If" Brexit goes badly, who will you blame? 
Theresa May's Brexit offer for EU residents ‘is not fair and cannot be serious’ says @The3Million founder #VictoriaLIVE 
My brother, @ivorbaddiel, looking a bit like an EU bigwig having been given Britain's Brexit negotiating plans.  
Brexit's impact on markets, one year later, in six charts  
Tories have spent year since EU referendum delivering chaos division uncertainty & instability & still no sign of £350m per week for the NHS 
happy birthday, Brexit. one year old today.   
I seem to have exhausted my reserves of thought-inspiring Brexit related questions. Any thoughts? 
So Brexit is a year old and like most one-year-old's it keeps shitting all over the place #BrexitAnniversary 
Happy Birthday Brexit. Woohoo  
One year since Brexit result and all its achieved is leaving UK divided & has left us an international laughing stock. Well done Brexiteers. 
A year on from the Brexit vote, the EU has become more unified than ever – the loss is ours  
The Brexit you voted for a year ago vs the Brexit you're actually getting.  
Sir, do you have a clear idea of what kind of #Brexit the UK government wants?  
Brexit: EU citizens deal fails to allay fears  
It's one year since the #Brexit vote and the Govt that put us through this has achieved nothing except making the world laugh at us. 
It’s been a grim year – but what if Britain had never voted for Brexit? | Jack Bernhardt  
Pretty sure the Royals didn't support Brexit, Churchill is dead and Nigel Farage is a wanker. What a total shitshow this is! pic.twitter.com/ZjCpmOC7GQ 
I'd like to wish you #HappyIndependenceDay but I fear #Brexit is being sold out by our politicians aided by the BBC. See my Periscope 
Happy Independence Day, United Kingdom.#Brexit = Freedom.  
Britain shouldn’t mistake Brexit talks for poker or war, writes @StephenFidler1 
BOOMING: UK factories just had their best month for orders since 1988. Brexit Britain smashing it!  
Brexit in a nutshell. #IndependenceDay 
An economist at JP Morgan says the UK is not well prepared to get a good #Brexit deal  
This is important. Me: are you getting a better idea of what kind of Brexit the UK government wants? Jean Claude Juncker: no.  
Happy anniversary of the vote for an indeterminate transitional arrangement that will stay in place until natural wastage ends Brexit  
Why Germany is waking up to the impact of a no-deal Brexit (and it involves that BMW in the garage)  @telebusiness 
I'll give you one tangible benefit of Brexit. One year on our people are largely better informed about the EU and our relationship with it 
Juncker on May proposal: "This is the first step, this step is not sufficient"... does he know what type of Brexit UK wants: "No". 
Happy Brexit Day! This year you've got a country with no government 
Celebrate that referendum feeling by shitting yourself with your trousers on fire while throwing yourself under a bus painted with lies. 
Khan: London’s EU migrants must not be bargaining chips over Brexit  
May unveils offer to let EU citizens stay in UK after Brexit | UK manufacturing orders hit highest level since 1988  
Formal meeting with Angela Merkel and @HMcEntee this morning. Good discussion ahead on Brexit and today's #EUCO agenda @irlembberlin 
. @georgesoros says Brexit is "a lose-lose proposition ... people can change their minds"  via @Reuters 
On the #EURef vote anniversary, my thoughts haven't changed. There's no good #Brexit and Scotland deserves better.  
So in other words, up to 52% think there should be a referendum if hard Brexit. The fact this is already far higher than 45% is significant.  
A whole year since I dared to dream we'd never hear of Brexit again.  
The cartoon on the front of this week's @TheNewEuropean sums up where we are, one year after #EUref. #Brexit #BrexitShambles 
How Britain boomed after Brexit!  
#Now, #EUCO: Meeting of President @AnastasiadesCY and PM @theresa_may, #CyprusProblem, #Brexit, #Turkey, @UKinCyprus, @eevriviades 
With all due respects Brexit was about the rest of Britain and the rest of Britain are behind Teresa May #jumpeduplittletwat 
Nomura and Daiwa choose Frankfurt as post-Brexit EU base  
How #brexit has fucked the UK in four graphs. We told you so. #brexshit pic.twitter.com/GiPQjuxUO5 
The UK economy since the Brexit vote — in 4 charts  
BREXIT VOTE ONE YEAR ON: Where were you? @iandunt, @Dorianlynskey & Peter Collins discuss w. @NivenJ1 #owntheremoan 
How to keep your EU citizenship after Brexit  
On the anniversary of the Brexit vote, we ask if an agreement can be made to continue UK-EU research co-operation  
Happy independence day to all my British friends! #brexit #nexit #fvd 
Please finish this sentence as you see fit: "The UK's decision to leave the EU was..." - RT for more representative final result #Brexit #EU 
We were always a proper nation. Brexit just made us poorer, more insignificant & less stable.  
Only a fool wouldn't conclude that #brexit is a complete shambles so far and we're only in the foothills  #brexitanniversary 
I remain so embarrassed by Brexit. 
Everything since Brexit has gone pretty much as remainers feared, although the economic car crash is happening a bit slower. 
#Birmingham's major #FiveWays interchange this morning showing #Brum's desire to #Remain & stop destructive #brexit #EUref #GE2017 #YesEU 
Happy Brexit Anniversary!  
Government and Parliament have their hands full with #brexit. No time for air safety. This will be a repeating pattern now.  
On the anniversary of the referendum, my piece for the @DailyMirror today 
Yes. I think brexit will prolong austerity due to higher inflation / decreased GDP in short term at least. If you've money, you ride it out. 
Nice summary of May's approach to Brexit.  
Worth reading, Brexit analysis by Nick Clegg: says it was a mega-rich elite project, stirring up immigration fears   
One year on from the EU Referendum @SDLPyouth in Derry today, call for special status to protect our interests here #SPECIALSTATUS4NI 
One year ago the people of Britain voted for Brexit. Going well, isn't it. Happy anniversary everybody! 
"We reject a hard-right Brexit and defend the single market" | statement by over 50 @UKLabour MPs, MEPs and peers  
That's 52% in favour of a referendum if a hard Brexit.  
Today in history, the Bruce battled at Bannockburn, Braganza brought Bombay, the Brits bought Bengal and bonkers Boris bros backed Brexit 
A divided, poorer, nastier, weaker Britain. That's all Brexit has achieved so far. It isn't too late to stop it. #BrexitAnniversary 
"You may say I am a dreamer, but I am not the only one." EU Council President Donald Tusk quotes John Lennon on prospect of Brexit reversal  
We've formed a new anti hard-Brexit PLP group to help provide the strongest opposition to the Tories - details here  
A year ago today the UK voted to take our young people's future away. In the year ahead let's take back control and stop the Brexit madness 
Note to BBC: We don't "negotiate our way out of ECJ jurisdiction". We just tell 'em. Brexit must mean independence, not a half-way house. 
Why Germany is waking up to the impact of a hard Brexit (and it involves that BMW in the garage)  
Sadly Brexit was no rational decision, but a vote for an earthquake/bonfire against myriad injustice at every level w/o a democratic outlet. 
Theresa May's plans effectively divide EU citizens into 3 groups. Here's what she proposes  
Should Scotland have the right to veto Brexit?  via @richardjmurphy 
Happy Independence Day all! Thank God for good sense of British people in the Referendum one year ago 
The churlish reaction of many European leaders to Theresa May's very generous offer on EU citizens in the UK underlines the need for Brexit. 
The way things are going, the Brexit lot are only going to end up with Blue Passports and the legal right to measure bananas in shillings. 
MEP @M_AndersonSF welcomes Irish Govt commitment to seek special status for North of Ireland in #Brexit negotiations  
Brexit is a con; sovereignty - we always had it and the costs far outweigh the benefits new trade deals*might* bring 
Businesses are in denial over Brexit, a senior figure at KPMG has warned  
A year ago.Leave promised us bountiful opportunity.Easy.Now talk is of cliff edges,"getting Brexit right",inflation,averting disaster. 
Soros says Britain nearing tipping point, may reverse Brexit | Reuters  
With cost of Brexit to UK unfolding @nick_clegg identifies wealthy elite who've manipulated many for their own ends. 
Anyone else fighting Brexit all the way, if only to stick it to these idiots?  
Brexit is a year old. And like a one year old, it's vomiting all over our shoes and pooing itself incessantly. #BrexitAnniversary 
Somewhat amused by David Davis reference to EU's "ideological obsession".  Anyone else guilty of that, at our (literal) expense? #Brexit 
Problem with Brexit is the kind of politicians who want it haven't,by their very nature,the brains to implement it in a non-disastrous way. 
Funny, I read that as most people (52%) are not opposed to another independence referendum. Depends on where you're coming from I suppose... 
Indyref2: 48% said there should be no second referendum, regardless of the outcome of the Brexit negotiations  
One year on, leave voter tells how she regrets her decision on Brexit:  
1 year ago a coalition of patriotic groups worked together to restore Britains independenceThe Bow Group was proud to play its part#Brexit  
14 of 13,400 workers recruited in Jan-May 2017 were British: NFU finds, as farmers hit by worker shortage #Brexit  
Brexit's about racism, innit? 
Happy #Brexit anniversary. #NoRegrets Let's get on with it now.... 
Brexit turning out well for jobs.  
Until the end of my days, I'll never see #Brexit as anything other than something that takes away my freedom  
Foreign investors could sue UK for billions over #Brexit  
A year ago: The United Kingdom voted in a referendum to withdraw from the European Union, with 51.9% supporting Britain's exit.#Brexit 
A survey has found 61% of Scots back a second EU referendum once the final terms of the Brexit deal are known  
'Better' as in, "Brexit will make Britain better".  
The strange human trait of being unable to admit you're wrong, when you're wrong, in all its glory. 
Six graphs showing the state of the UK economy a year after Brexit referendum  via @ConversationUK 
MARK the one-year anniversary of voting for Brexit by making an absolutely catastrophic decision because a bus told you to. 
Yes, but apart from that..... 
May boasted she would be "bloody difficult" in Brexit talksTruth is she is bloody clueless and it is the UK that will pay the bloody price 
The reason Tehran is against referendum on Iraqi Kurdistan  
British strawberry prices are set to soar 50% thanks to Brexit  
To our friends in Europe. There are so many in UK who still support and love EU! Brexit is not #thewillofthepeople #StopBrexit #EUref 
Furious voter scolds Gina Miller as Remoaner calls on May to reveal her Brexit tactics  
Michael Gove will 'not be dictated to by the EU' as he pledges Brexit deal for fishermen  
Leave voter complains that exit of EU staff will destroy his business. More evidence #brexit was a stupid affair  
Hard or soft Brexit? The six scenarios for Britain  via @FT One of the best summaries I have read 
Brexit has (1) made the UK a worse place to live (2) choked economic growth (3) reduced our incomes (4) made all of us poorer.  
The cost of Brexit just keeps rising and rising. Just as well there's £350m pw for the NHS or it would be an exercise in massive self harm.  
Brexit prompts 264% surge in British people applying for French citizenship  
Today is Brexit-versary! One year on from the EU Referendum - would you change your vote? #BetterCallPaul 0344 499 1000 @paulross @TheSun 
The costs of Brexit look more concrete than the benefits, Morgan Stanley says  
In a Brexit divorce deal offering, PM Theresa May said EU citizens will be given the opportunity to stay in the UK  
A Year Later We Still Have No Clue What #Brexit Means.  
Brexit: Survey finds 60% of Scots 'want new EU vote'  
"You say I a dreamer, but I am not the only one." EU Council President Donald Tusk quotes John Lennon on prospect of Brexit being reversed  
UK PM Theresa May: EU citizens can stay after #Brexit  
Shitheads take a, shitheads take a bow. #Brexit pic.twitter.com/5Bf1iIVOZd 
Breaking – Ireland will block #Brexit deal if #MayDUP deal goes ahead  
Hard or soft Brexit? Here's the essential FT guide to six future options for Britain  via @FT 
I think 'cack-handed' sums up May and her approach to the #Brexit negotiations. From the @guardian 
Hard or soft Brexit? The six scenarios for Britain  
Happy #IndependenceDay A year ago today we voted to get our country back,in the biggest democratic vote in the history of the UK.#Brexit 
My Oil Paintings "The Three Little Butterflies #art #green #red #happy #inspired @Tate @brexit #abstractpainting #art #AuctionInsider #blue 
Brexit's true meaning remains elusive a year on...  
This image says all you need to know about last night's European summit. #Brexit #EUCO 
Brexit: UK offer on EU citizens a good start, says Merkel  
Las 'fronteras invisibles' del brexit  
My father on with THE Larry King? Tonight at 10.30pm on @RT_com ? Really? Well that takes the 99... #Brexit #QueenSpeech #Corbyn #May #Trump 
#BIAFRA: ONLY VIABLE NEGOTIATION WITH IPOB LEADER KANU, SHOULD BE A CALL FOR REFERENDUM & DISINTEGRATION OF NIGERIA  
Always liked him. Nick Clegg says threat of wealthy Brexit elite and populism damages UK | Politics | The Guardian  
After Brexit, the UK's top business schools "find their academics are quitting to work in other European countries."  
Turkey must respect Iraqi Kurds’ referendum move: Barzani adviser @Reuters @heminhawrami 
Brexit: Businesses in denial over stark future of British economy, senior KPMG auditor warns - The Independent  
#ThePutinCartoons | We need investigations by @metpoliceuk and @UKParliament into hacking, #fakenews and criminality during the Referendum  
Brexit: the first year - and they still don't know what they're doing.  They haven't got a plan ...   #Brexit.  
When it comes to banking, Frankfurt is emerging as the biggest winner from last year’s Brexit vote  
Theresa May offers hope for E.U. citizens after Brexit, winning guarded praise  
#Brexit is reduced to political correctness and damage limitation. Next step can only be not leaving.  
In London #Brexit & politics haven't dampened investment. Note cranes! #UKelection #UKElection2017 
No causative link for #repealthe8th & against Brexit?.Irish Twitter correlation, almost 100%. For killing babies & against Freedom? 
Macron's Brexit game plan which leaves Britain far behind  
Happy Brexit Day to everyone of the heroes who voted to leave the EU. #BREXIT 
Breaking - Ireland will block #Brexit deal if #MayDUP deal goes ahead  via @skwawkbox 
The people of the Kurdistan Region intend to express their aspirations through a democratic referendum to the intl community. 
I received on Thurs a high-level EU delegation led by @EUAmbIraq to discuss regional events, anti-ISIL campaign and Kurdistan's referendum.  
"Deloitte report suggests that British car manufacturers would enjoy a boom in sales in the event of a hard Brexit."  
."There is just the possibility that Scotland could make separate arrangements post-Brexit". 
Breaking – Ireland will block #Brexit deal if #MayDUP deal goes ahead | The SKWAWKBOX  
*Brexit Explained*  
this time last year, @ProfBrianCox was telling me the UK hadn't voted for BREXIT, in other universes, he may have been right. 
Happy Independence Day! Britain voted for #Brexit exactly one year ago on 23 June 2016.  
Not, of course that there ever was. That was never on the ballot paper. Only in Mrs May @theresa_may's mind was there ever a hard Brexit.  
@MelanieLatest on #bbctw on assault on West/its values in decline. Imp her challenges & forthright views re self gov/#Brexit taken seriously 
What a lovely and, dare I say it, grown up idea, to spend the money being wasted on Brexit, on rebuilding NHS and on civilised safe housing. 
Happy UK Independence Day! #IndependenceDay #UKIndependenceDay #Brexit  
My son just shouted, twice, from the top of the stairs after having said goodnight, "Happy #Brexit Day, #HappyBrexitDay." 
If Labour said "Sorry, Labour Leavers, but you're wrong. We'll fight Brexit for you & your jobs. Trust us"But they won't. No balls#BBCQT 
G7 meets in Italy, so the borders are shut down bcoz migrants pose security threat!Sack the traitor politicians NOW. All of them#Brexit  
First big part of UK Brexit deal now out in open - big offer to 3 million people, lots of unanswered questions 
It's into that land of xenophobia, hatred, division & a mis-remembered past that #Brexit is taking us. No one intelligent wants to go there. 
Wendy doesn't want to know how she's going to be screwed over she just wants it done #brexit #bbcqt 
Brexit is the lie of all lies.  
Populist nationalists, from Brexit to , are bad at foreign policy—they forget that foreigners have politics too 
Happy Anniversary - 23 June - 1 year since the Brexit referendum. And where are we now? Highly strung and unstable? #BrexitAnniversary 
& that's the kicker. The most qualified/capable of prospering post-Brexit will be Remainers & many will leave 
There was 48% that voted remain now today that's well  over 50% , why on earth can't we have another Referendum. THATS DEMOCRACY 
.@markrutte: 'I am an Anglophile. You are one of our most beloved partners, so I hate Brexit from every angle'.  
1/ the bottom line is that this govt is ideologically committed to Brexit at any cost, and not for the reasons stated. The referendum merely 
Prejudice against immigrants was a 'major' factor in Brexit vote, study finds  
Revealed: Lib Dems' secret talks with Tory Remainers to force soft Brexit #Premium 
MASSIVE CRISIS: Number of EU nurses registering to practice in UK down 96% since Brexit  #BBCQT #Questiontime 
#bbcqt - whilst country focuses squarely on #Brexit - their NHS is being sold off to the highest bidder,backed by Theresa May#naylorreport 
Coming to the conclusion that Brexit is Britain's Saipan moment. Athough it's clearly nowhere on the scale or significance of Saipan... 
#BBCQT So we have yet another anti-Brexit, pro-EU panel and pro-Corbyn/Labour audience in a Brexit area.  
A truth that the Brexit propaganda ignored  
#bbcqt a fair reflection of where Brexit debate now is:at least one person gone mad,Mail gets shouty,no one can remember original question. 
Don't think Iv ever seen such anger as I see now. Far from uniting this Country #Brexit has riven us apart.  
Watching #bbcqt (rare event) people as divided as ever over Brexit. No leadership since Ref about genuine options, trade offs, compromises 
Believe me, brexit will lead to permanent fucking hatred!I'll never forgive turning country into a crap version of1950s, encouraging racism  
The Conservatives can't be trusted to balance the book. Austerity and mixed with Brexit is bad for Britain. #BBCQT #StopBrexit 
Of course the majority don't want brexit. Nothing like the majority voted for it. 
A year after voting for Brexit, Britain’s divided, and in uncharted waters | Timothy Garton Ash  
One year on, the #bbcqt audience are asking what #Brexit means. Finally, we realise that nobody knows what's going on. At all. 
Veering back towards hard Brexit just because of this @bbcquestiontime audience. 
Thicko Remainer in #bbcqt audience cheered for declaring people "didn't know' what they were voting for in #Brexit referendum. #Idiocy 
After yrs of Brexit fanatics saying we can't trust our politicians, they're now saying they should tell us nowt and we shd trust them #bbcqt 
Imagine setting your own arse on fire and then trying to put it out with a bottle of Parrafin. #brexit 
Hats off to Peter Oborne for keeping a straight face as he trots out Daily Mail line on Brexit on #bbcqt. I couldn't do it without laughing. 
How can anyone not know UK govt position on Brexit?! The position is clear, even if you don't agree with it. Pathetic. #bbcqt 
#bbcqtI vote for #GinaMiller to head a cross party alliance for #Brexit 
Extraordinary that Labour and SNP MPs are questioning legitimacy of Brexit. 498 MPs voted for it in the House of Commons! #bbcqt 
SNP "No mandate for hard Brexit ..blah blah blah" Moaning Nats #bbcqt 
So tonight's @bbcquestiontime - Brexit Brexit Brexit. Meanwhile NHS on knees, no social care, school cuts, ppl die in poor housing #bbcqt 
Gina Miller says on #bbcqt people need to know position on Brexit. They do. Leaving SM, leaving CU- detail set out in Lancaster House speech 
The discussion on Brexit on #bbcqt shows what a fruitless divisive mess we have got into. Cameron (and Farage) have a lot to answer for. 
...all about Macron's debut, with confident Merkel, restarting Franco-German engine with decent growth numbers & Brexit as ballast for EU27 
83% of people voting for parties that backed #Brexit, doesn't equate to 83% support for Brexit. People voted on wide range of issues #BBCQT 
Gina Miller says that the plans for Brexit are still a "back of an envelope proposition" #bbcqt 
#bbcqt. Gina Miller nonsense about Brexit fractured GB. No Gina, YOUR undemocratic resistance to the will of the people undermines the UK 
GOODNIGHT FOLKS: Have a happy Brexit Day tomorrow, don’t forget to hang your bunting in the morning.  
Wow. Two things are clear a year on. We have no idea what Brexit actually is and the country is still massively divided. #bbcqt 
This is what Brexit looks like. #bbcqt 
I voted Labour and it had nothing to do with supporting Brexit. Give it a rest with this crap about 83% support in #GE2017 for Brexit#bbcqt 
With the anniversary of the #Brexit vote tomorrow, where are the trade deals Liam and the down payment on the £350 mn for the NHS Boris? 
Lest people think that Brexit & this new citizens offer has been the main event at EU Summit - it really hasn't.... 
Gina Miller accused prominent politicians of acting "despicably" over Brexit #bbcqt  
'Brexit has fractured everything we took for granted in our society.' @thatginamiller the uniquely sensible and realistic one on #bbcqt 
Gina Miller says that the government is obsessing with Brexit, yet is not prepared for the negotiation process ahead #bbcqt 
.@IanBlackfordMP: the government is going to have to listen - building a consensus across the devolved nations on brexit negotiations #bbcqt 
BINGO! SNP lizard pushed the lie 'There is no appetite for a hard Brexit!" #bbcqt There is no such thing, just a Remainer euphemism to stay! 
.@IanBlackfordMP: "I think it's absolutely crystal clear... there's no longer a majority for hard #Brexit." #bbcqt 
The SNP leader Nicola Sturgeon called for openness in Brexit talks to include the devolved administrations #bbcqt  
Ian Blackford said that a compromise on Brexit should be sought to satisfy all parts of the UK #bbcqt  
You can't trust the Government to get a good deal on Brexit. The only good Brexit is a "Dead Brexit".#BBCQT #StopBrexit 
PM: offer made to allow EU citizens remain in Britain after Brexit would depend on the same rights being offered to UK citizens in Europe 
Brexit is a complete shambles, even the Prime Minister and Chancellor doubted its sense originally, what madness to follow this charade!  
'After a vanity referendum and a vanity election we now have a crisis of legitimacy!' Well said that man on #BBCQT - we need a new GE now! 
Germany's Merkel says UK's offer to retain post-Brexit rights of EU citizens in UK at least 5 years is "good start."  
We need to send our expert British linguists to seal the deal on our Brexit negotiations with those EU shitehawks.#StepForwardUncleAlbert pic.twitter.com/itfgirchwD 
I see the Brexit negotiations are going well  
British strawberry prices are set to soar 50% thanks to Brexit  
The principles UK #Brexit offer on citizens rights.  
The top 10 export destinations for the British car industry - the EU comes first by an enormous margin.#Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain 
."We are tethered to the mast of Brexit & WHEN it goes wrong we’re screwed" says Senior Tory 
It's now obvious Brexit will be catastrophic for the UK and it must be stopped.#StopBrexitNow #Brexit1yrOn .@acgrayling .@willblackwriter 
.@theresa_may has outlined her plans on the status of EU nationals living in the UK post-Brexit  
There's only one solution and that's bring down this government and terminate Brexit. There's no mandate anymore. Not for any of this.  
The UK is unprepared and is entering #Brexit talks with "unrealistic" expectations, according to a City economist  
“Name me one lie I told during the referendum, one!”  
Ireland reportedly not impressed with idea of #MayDUP deal, will block #Brexit deal if govt undermines Good Friday agreement. 
BREAKING: German Chancellor Angela Merkel call U.K.'s offer on post-Brexit rights of EU citizens "a good start." 
Alan Johnson ran Labour's Brexit campaign into the ground. Momentum turned marginals into safe seats. Shut up, Alan!  
‘I thought Britain was welcoming. Now the Brexit vote has driven me and my family out’  
#Merkel calls Theresa May's offer on EU citizen status "a good start, but a lot remains to be done until October".  #EUCO #brexit  
Brexit could be terrible news for the car industry – the German car industry   
Most Remainers are young, well-educated and cosmopolitan - just the people Britain needs for its future.#StopBrexit #Remain, #Brexit 
‘Hard Remainers’ need to join Leavers in shaping the post-Brexit landscape  
Brexit prompts 264% surge in British people applying for French citizenship  
.@theresa_may makes offer to let EU citizens stay in the UK after #Brexit  
Brexit: EU citizens offered 'UK settled status'  
@BBCWorld practicing for #Brexit. Broadcaster misspells both Brussels and "Die Zeit". #BBCOS 
.      "Brexit: Article 50 is an 'illusion' and was never actually triggered, argues leading barrister". 
Japanese bank Nomura is moving its EU base from London to Frankfurt after Brexit  
Can someone remind us how Brexit is good?  
EU27 #EUCO on #Brexit finished. The decision on the agencies procedure lasted 4 minutes. 
MAY: 3 million EU nationals in Britain can stay after Brexit. Brits abroad need the same deal. 
I've genuinely forgotten what the point of Brexit was. Was it about 
Agreed. EU27 will decide by vote in November on relocation of EU agencies currently in UK. Confirms EU27 unity. Reduces #Brexit uncertainty.  
#bbcqt bingo Part 1.  "We respect the Brexit vote BUT we must not have a hard Brexit" "Corbyn won the election" "Amnesty for immigrants". 
If enough people get to know this, it should bring down May and her govt#DUP #HungParliament #Brexit 
A message from our Patron #EUflagmafia "Fuck Brexit" #EUhatmafia pic.twitter.com/0C6ljClCbM 
To go through with #Brexit would be to reward threats of violence. For this reason alone Brexit must be stopped.  #StopBrexit #Remain 
The new "UK settled" status would grant EU citizens rights to stay in the UK and allow benefits after Brexit  
A 2nd EU referendum a "particularly foolish proposal" – Ken Clarke in yesterday's debate  
Breaking - Ireland will block #Brexit deal if #MayDUP deal goes ahead  .@itvnews .@skynews .@channel4news 
.@bbcnews Do your job. Report thisBreaking - Ireland will block #Brexit deal if #MayDUP deal goes ahead #DUP 
Ireland will block Brexit deal if Theresa May's deal with the DUP goes ahead #DUPCoalition  
I agree with Pres Obama. Do we as Americans believe #HealthcareIsARight or a privilege? The 2018 election is a referendum on this question.  
"string of leaders suggest Britain can come back to EU if it changes mind on Brexit"48%+ never wanted to leave! 
Enough is enough: let’s stop Brexit before it does irrevocable damage 
Every one of these Great British towns and cities voted to #Remain in the EU.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
The British Brexit chief negotiator arrives ....   
one of the key questions of Brexit negotiations  
Yet another Brexit campaigner fined for breaking the law  
UK protects EU residents rights. EU reciprocates. Quelle surprise. #Brexit scaremongering by MSM fails again 
Christ!!We must stop this madness!No rights!#Conservatives have no mandate. They just want to bulldoze this #Brexit through#StopBrexit 
.Look deeper!May threatens Good Friday Agreement by ousting European Court of Justice (ECJ) after Brexit!. 
Whatever deal Tories do with DUP is not in the name of British people. Whatever deal they do with Brexit is not in name of British people 
Theresa May says she is going to let 3m EU citizens stay in the UK after Brexit. Here's what that means:  
No EU national living lawfully in UK will be made to leave on day of Brexit, Theresa May announces  
May saying some good things here in Brussels. The ECJ must have no post-Brexit oversight. 
Boris Johnson.Ran away after British people voted Brexit. He now wouldn't stand for PM until *after*his Brexit baby is delivered.  #c4news 
This is excellent news. Shame we had to wait so long to hear it. #brexit  
A year after the Brexit referendum, what does it all mean? -  via @JOE_co_uk 
5y EU Citizens to get "settled EU status" - not permanent residence or indefinite leave to remain - unclear on dates & requirements #Brexit 
Latest: The Prime Minister has promised EU citizens living legally in the UK will be allowed to stay after #Brexit  
A yr ago 52% chose:DivisionUncertaintyXenophobia A whopper of a porky on the side of a busSince then the will has changed to no Brexit 
Interesting take on the Kohinoor, colonialism & #Brexit in @TheScotsman by @DalrympleWill  
Theresa May makes offer to let EU citizens stay in the UK after Brexit  
"It's an undemocratic fascist super-state!" Brexiteers cry, forgetting that Britain's empire once spanned a third of the globe. #brexit 
Nonsensical. EU citizens who are not retired and/or permanently resident here yet are not working should exit the UK on Brexit. Unless kids.  
#Breaking No EU national currently living lawfully in the UK will be made to leave on the day of Brexit, PM Theresa May said  
Theresa May has promised that EU citizens living legally in the UK at the time that Britain leaves the EU can stay after Brexit 
Brexit negotiations  
Theresa May promises to let millions of EU citizens stay in Britain after Brexit  
Dear Democrats/media: Georgia special election was referendum on you, not Trump.  
Brexit deal: 3 million EU citizens allowed to stay in UK permanently - and will get same rights as Britons  
My leave voting mate just now: "Brexit might not happen ... it's a clusterf--k. Stay in the single market or better, just call it off" 
#BREAKING Britain rejects EU court oversight of #Brexit citizen rights 
BREAKING - AFP - Britain's May promises EU citizens can stay after Brexit, but rejects all EU court oversight 
#BREAKING British PM promises EU citizens can stay after #Brexit 
BUT May leaves door open to kicking out anyone who arrived after Article 50 triggered in March if Brexit talks turn sour 
UK's expectations of Brexit talks 'unrealistic'  
Benefit cap defeated in the High Court. U-turns on so many things in the last year I can't even keep up. DUP Coalition? Hard Brexit?  
Brexit is a disaster & the EU are openly giving us an out. Take #Brexit off the table & #Scotref is gone, NI problem solved, #StopBrexit 
#QueensSpeech #QueensHat was no accident royals have staff to plan outfits, it was a well thought through gesture. #wewillremain #brexit 
This Remain voter accused @Nigel_Farage of tricking people into Brexit - but then struggled to name one untruth  
Buckingham Palace launches official complaint over Sun front page which states Queen supports brexit  
‘I thought Britain was welcoming. Now the Brexit vote has driven me and my family out’  
Fun Brexit Fact: You're getting poorer!  
Key Brexit changes could be voted down in Lords as Lib Lab pact formed to defeat her in upper house  
'Brexit SABOTAGE' fears as Hammond says Britain could keep ties with EU for FOUR YEARS . No it can't we are leaving.  
The sweet Brexit dream of tax haven UK is still alive.  
Brick by brick #brexit is being dismantled. Every day we make progress. The EU wait with open arms. Let's end this mess. #wewillremain 
June 8th has given us back hope. Let's use it to stop #brexit and #stopracism@hopenothate #hopenothate #progressivealliance #ge2017part2 
I'm still struggling to understand why so many farmers voted for #Brexit.  
And to think that some Brexiters blatantly lied that the Single Market had never been presented as an option #Brexit 
Theresa May has NO MANDATE. She is the last person in the UK to influence Brexit. Your time is OVER @theresa_may. Just resign May! 
Honestly, why on earth are we doing this?What were we thinking of?Who could possibly think this is still a good idea?#IN #Brexit 
Don't worry, hordes of Brexit voters are heading to the fields to take the jobs they were excluded from by migrants!  
Young Britons looking forward to Post-Brexit fruit picking apprenticeships -  via @newsthump 
Brexit must go ahead, but Tory hard Brexiteers must be held to account for broken promises and lies, says Labour  
The Chronicles of Brexit: the Liar, the Witch and the Moron#makeafilmtotallyBritish 
Brits will return to the UK as 2019 approaches. Watch. We'll attract our own people back here to take advantage of booming post-Brexit UK. 
What really bothers me about #Brexit is that there is so much to fix in UK & world at large, but instead all time & resources sucked into it pic.twitter.com/I3pAGoKMLB 
Will the UK ever leave the European Union? #CliveOnLBC #Brexit #Article50 @eucopresident @theresa_may @GuyVerhofstadt 
Essential to get Clegg back in parliament asap>>Nick Clegg says threat of wealthy Brexit elite & populism damages UK  
Prejudice against immigrants was a 'major' factor in Brexit vote, study finds  
The smoking gun. Proof if it were needed that being out of EU jurisdiction will make things less safe - not more so. #brexit #remain 
Think #Brexit negotiations should be done by a multi-party committee? SIGN the petition now:  
Brexit at Tiffany`s #makeafilmtotallyBritish 
.They have EU on THEIR sideIrish "Govt insisting on achieving a “special status” for N Ireland in Brexit talks". 
The idea that the #Brexit promoters care about patriotism or the good of the British people is ludicrous.  
Almost a year on since Britain voted for Brexit @Nigel_Farage says "I have no regrets, no remorse"  #FarageOnLBC 
Can Europe do without Pims? Is it covered by the Brexit negotiations? A neglected issue, I fear.  
On Brexit, we can strike free trade deals w/ rapidly growing economies ALL over the world and harness some of that prosperity for ourselves. 
“The British public want a Brexit deal that doesn’t make us poorer,” says Khan  
Let's ask a straightforward question. What is better value for money? A Brexit divorce settlement or safe housing for all now at risk? 
No cherry-picking? Well in a top bit of EU trolling they're on the menu for May's dessert Brexit briefing  
Japan's biggest brokerage is understood to be moving dozens of jobs from London to Frankfurt  
Around 95 per cent of the 29,000 seasonal fruit pickers in the UK are from the EU Ooops!#Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain 
'Let me ask for a third time' Baroness forced to admit Labour Lords will NOT block Brexit  
Another corker by @toadmeister debunking the literary elites cultural war on Brexit  
Oof. @Andrew_Adonis praises forthcoming book by anon Cato the Younger naming Tony Blair as one of The Guilty Men of Brexit  
#Brexit Explained: Options for the UK's trading relationship with the EU  
The EU says it's dazed and confused by Theresa May's Brexit bumbling  
From Trump to Brexit, populist nationalists share a common flaw:they forget that foreigners have politics too.My Lex  
It's quite obvious that as far as Brexit is concerned, far too many EU politicians are in la-la land. We're leavingOutExitFreeGot it? 
Latest Polls Indicate Majority Support for “Soft” Brexit & referendum to accept or reject a deal. Round up blog by Survation's @tom_bristow 
Clegg says Mail in referendum conflated Mediterranean refugee crisis with terrorism. "It was cynical, untrue and devastatingly effective". 
We now have man who hates Europe leading #Brexit, an NHS enemy in charge of health and a PM who hates human contact  
Hard Brexit is a catastrophic EEA not a good option either, as this blog demonstrates. UK mad not to Remain.   
Brexitears are unhappy that May is ruining brexit. To be fair, brexit was doomed to fail anyway, whoever took it on. It's not too late...... 
Tomorrow's the first anniversary of our Brexit vote & talks began this week, beware of MPs trying to block Brexit while PM has a weak hold. 
Expect Emmanuel Macron to bring the same ice-cold approach to Brexit talks that he brought to domestic politics  
Britain's former spy chief on post-Brexit UK: 'If we can no longer help shape the world, others will do it for us'  
Nick Clegg rounds on the new "Brexit elite" saying their ideas and dizzying money have sent UK to the margins.  
Another reason to keep campaigning. Remainers must speak up more than ever! #StopBrexit #Manchester #Remain #Brexit  
Should be in cabinet and involved in Brexit but somehow his face doesn't fit with his party. He'd do as PM for me. 
"We told Mrs May that a referendum on Irish unity is inevitable and that she and her government had to prepare for it."- Gerry Adams TD  
Spoke to Tory MP who says there's no appetite to replace May till after Brexit, when new leader will take over and hold election April 2021. 
Costs of holidays abroad soaring. Another benefit of Brexit!  
The self-destructive madness of #Brexit:Fruit & veg farmers are facing migrant labour shortages #StopBrexit #Remain 
.@GerryAdamsSF comments on Good Friday Agreement Committee Brexit report  
Please RT! BREXIT IS REVERSIBLE!!!  
The president of the European council believes it possible for the UK to remain in the EU after PM lost her mandate for hard Brexit... 
Brexit was the electoral crime of the century. Those responsible should be prosecuted. 
David Davis begins #brexit negotiations  
Fake Twitter accounts helped the Leave vote win the Brexit referendum  
NO BREGRETS: UK would STILL vote Brexit if vote was today, poll finds NO REGRETS 
.@IainDale has been left riled by Donald Tusk's latest Brexit intervention  
Britain's Treasury chief warns that uncertainty over Brexit is stopping businesses from investing in the country  
I have never protested before in my life, but if UK government backtracks and does not deliver brexit i shall be out. Rt if you agree. 
If you're not worried about the implications Brexit would mean for Northern Ireland, you're not paying attention.  
A change in tone from Dublin. Irish ForMin dismisses 'language coming from London' that technology alone can sort the post-Brexit border. 
Scotland and the House of Lords are about to give Theresa May a Brexit nightmare  
My response to the Queen's speech - including my thoughts on Grenfell, Brexit & immigration  
EU governments say they're confused by Theresa May's Brexit bumbling  
Ha!According to the TIMES - BoJo is not going to contest the leadership until after #Brexit !Dream on Boris ! 
Merkel says EU future more important than Brexit talks.They are already progressing, without Britain!   
Theresa May and Philip Hammond arrive in full regalia for Brexit negotiations. Brussels, 2017.  
Why do we want #Brexit?Because the corrupt, unaccountable, EU has been systematically destroying UK manufacturing for years.  
And those unionist parties lost ... despite their intense fear mongering campaign against a mere referendum :)  
Why do we want #Brexit?Because it's time we stopped raping 3rd World Nations.We are the UK. We're better than that 
A year on from the Brexit vote, the EU has become more unified than ever – the loss is ours  
DUP surprised with poor negotiating experience of Theresa May's team.That's Brexit buggered, then.#DUPCoalition  
First time in the UK after brexit and already the IT systems are crashing, when does the purge begin???  
British PM Theresa May is wounded -- but still walking toward Brexit, writes @carolewalkercw for @CNNopinion  
Indeed and it is probably 15 to 21 months to #indyref2 .... post the summer it will be make argument time esp to rescue from #brexit carnage 
Pres #Barzani received EU member state delegation.Our firm position: No retreat on date 4 referendum,expect EU 2respect our people decision  
UKIP voters turned Labour because Corbyn backed Brexit says Robin Niblett  
The whole idea the EU might "punish" us is a Brexist trope, designed to let them blame the inevitably bad Brexit deal on pure EU malice.  
Brexit sees 254% surge in Britons seeking French citizenship   
Do you think it's this beasts time to take the wheel and become our next PM? A true brexit man... I would vote for him  
how to tell the difference between tory and labour brexit policies 
Japan's biggest brokerage has chosen Frankfurt as its EU base after Brexit, sources say  
News bulletin on @BBCPM includes Donald Tusk stating that UK can change its mind on Brexit. Overton Window is opening ... 
'Imagine there's no Brexit': EU boss channels Lennon  
The Daily Mail spewing nationalism, xenophobia, hate, scapegoating of minorites and anti-intellectualism now as in the 1930s. #Brexit  
Labour want out of Single Market and Customs Union - how does their policy differ from the Tories on #Brexit? #BrexitHandcart 
Taoiseach says ‘door is always open’ to UK reversing Brexit plan via @IrishTimes 
"I can only conclude that the UK government's plan is to walk out of Brexit negotiations"  I hope he's wrong... 
The Daily Mail, spewing fascist hate of Jewish immigration in 1938 and spewing the same hate now:#StopFundingHate #Brexit #StopBrexit 
#Tusk replies:"Im a dreamer but not the only one"when it comes to stopping #Brexit Indeed! 
The writers of the Guardian’s ‘Brexit Shorts’ have swallowed Project Fear  
Tusk: "It must be clear the European Council is not a forum for Brexit negotiations... Leaders will take note of [PM May]" 
May will not get a discussion tonight. "The European Council is not a forum for brexit negotiations," says Tusk. 
First detailed report on potential impact of Brexit on the Good Friday Agreement launched today – @Kathleensf1  
Angela Merkel when she hears a 'no deal' Brexit will cost German car makers £6bn and 18,000 jobs...  
We're prioritising certainty for EU nationals living in the UK & UK nationals living in the EU in our Brexit negotiations. @Conservatives 
At the EU Referendum: REMAINER, REMAINER, REMAINER, REMAINER (probably), LEAVE SUPPORTER. You call that balance?  
Does his best to centralise power in WM,leads on Brexit lies campaign in Wales,now complains Wales being marginalised:couldn't make it up   
European leaders gather in Brussels to discuss #Brexit and the future of the #EU 
As opposed to Brexit as I am, Norman makes some important points for we Liberals to take on board. We need to change our tone and reach out.  
#Brexit: Leave voter realises his fruit farms could collapse without EU migrant workers   
Support from Labour Leadership would be welcome. Absence of support indicates Labour Leadership are still pursuing hard #Brexit#IN 
Of course EU listens. As soon as we have  paper we will study where we differ for next negotiation round #brexit  
Voters rejected May's hard Brexit: Britain should stay in the single market, says @SadiqKhan 
Manufacturers report biggest surge in orders in 30 years because of reduced value of pound. Another benefit of Brexit 
Referendum in Catalonia: sleepwalking into a crisis  via @IrishTimesOpEd 
Catalan government to unveil #referendum details on July 4 #Catalonia #News #SelfDetermination 
Why Theresa May's power-sharing gambit with the DUP imperils Northern Ireland's peace  
Tory accidentally reveals how much of a millionaire he is with unusual Brexit comparison -  
Merkel's nightmare: Hard Brexit will cost German car makers £6 BILLION and 18,000 jobs  
Your fish can rot on the quaysideYou voted ToryYou voted BrexitHell slap it in you muppetsMarket that  
BBC News - Brexit: 'Dreamer' Tusk says UK may yet stay in the EU  
On the eve of the that fateful day, my position on #Brexit has not shifted. Bad idea then, bad idea now Only 1 thing to do #StopBrexitNow  
Lamb has concerns over Lib Dem focus on Remain voters and second referendum 
WATCH | @Nigel_Farage on Brexit negotiations: We cannot sign up to an exit bill before negotiating a trade deal! Talks must be simultaneous!  
#makeafilmtotallyBritishBrexit At Tiffany's 
Tory Grandees prepare for #Brexit negotiations during #SummerSolstice2017. 
Look, we've had our fun for a year now, can we all just agree that Brexit is an awful idea and there's no good reason to go through with it 
Brexit Wounds #makeafilmtotallyBritish 
The rituals are peculiar, but it's the scale of MP denial over Brexit that made y'day's Queen's Speech ridiculous  
Hmmn. If we revert to imperial & make passport covers blue again, could we announce we have "done" Brexit & quietly keep FoM/single market? 
  German Chancellor Angela Merkel slaps down British PM Theresa May on #Brexit talks  
Nice to see you again Theresa, though I was rather looking forward to meeting @LordBuckethead Theresa May meets Jean-Claude Juncker #Brexit  
Nancy they want this to be a referendum on you and it's not there's some dirty dirty stuff going on with our elections@NancyPelosi 
As Brexit negotiations begins, @GuitarMoog explains why "the pre-negotiation phase has been a disaster for the UK" 
The big fact missing in the Brexit debate: free movement can be controlled within the single market.  
"You may say I’m a dreamer" - Donald Tusk quotes John Lennon as he hopes for Brexit reversal  
Brexit: Tusk says UK may yet stay in the EU  
Just renewed my subscription to @TheNewEuropean For the politics, culture, travel, food & more - it's not all about Brexit, you know  
Spanish Parliament rejects again a  Catalan independence referendum  
People should remember the #DUP are pro #UK, pro #Brexit & hate #JeremyCorbyn. They can work with the #Tories  #BBC 
Brexit UK's offer to EU workers:》Wages in a declining currency》No guaranteed rights》Deathtrap acommodation》Scapegoating for UK's ills 
Politicians need to start calling for it to be stopped>>Brexit can still be stopped, European Council leader says  
Stop an extreme no-deal Brexit and stand with us today - sign and share our petition now:  
I'm visiting UK this week & it's striking how many top academics are leaving due to #Brexit  
Pleased to be supporting @SDoughtyMP and others in move to ensure that, at the very least, UK remains part of #CustomsUnion #Brexit  
To protect our city's prosperity, continued Single Market membership must be at the heart of Brexit negotiations.  
.@SadiqKhan: “the Brexit goalposts have been moved" We rejected May's extreme #Brexit & should stay in single market  
Study on the rise of "computational propaganda" as trolls & bots worked together in Brexit & Trump votes.  
"You may say I’m a dreamer" - Donald Tusk quotes John Lennon as he hopes for Brexit reversal  
EU law gave Scotland Holyrood. Without EU protection after Brexit, Tories will attempt to have it abolished. 
.@donaldtusk quotes John Lennon during Brexit discussion #EuropeanUnion 
BREAKING: Spanish parliament votes overwhelmingly against respecting Catalonia's independence referendum. 
The problem with Brexit appears to be that the EU won't give us what the Brexiteers promised. Doh! 
PM Theresa May says she'll set out how UK proposes to protect rights of EU citizens living in Britain after #Brexit  
The Brexit Club #makeafilmtotallyBritish 
SF will oppose any pact that undermines the GFA. We told Mrs May that a referendum on Irish unity is inevitable.  
Dutch PM: ‘I hate Brexit from every angle’  
All white and just one woman. Why is our Brexit team like this? | Tania Branigan  
Dutch PM tells us he 'hates Brexit' and 'I'll hope we''ll come to some form of continued membership or relationship with internal market.' 
The media was right. The special elections were a referendum on Pres. Trump.  
Brexit prompts 264% surge in British people applying for French citizenship  
But John, Labour supports hard Brexit too. Please tell me how that'll help to improve our daily lives?  
"This country is fucked,” one senior Tory said. “We are tethered to the mast of Brexit and when it goes wrong we’re screwed."  
Great to speak with @GuyVerhofstadt at @ALDEParty pre-summit ahead of #EUCO. I emphasised the challenges Ireland faces as a result of Brexit  
Absolutely. With Brexit, the only way to protect our jobs, inward investment and status as Europe's premier city is to stay in single market  
NEWT: The media was right — the special elections were a referendum on Trump. Problem for them is he won all four!  
Dutch PM @markrutte: UK economy to be "hit very hard" by #Brexit and it would be better to stay in the customs union #EUCO 
Hard Brexit to cost German car makers £6 billion & 18,000 jobsBut, but...we need them more than they need us - NOT 
Great to hear London Mayor @SadiqKhan agrees that we should stay in Single Market & shelve all notion of hard Brexit  
Things any remain politician who has then supported Brexit will wish they had paid more attention to #1   
Czech President, a known Kremlin Trojan horse, again called for referendum on Czech Rep. leaving the EU.Yes, we have traitors among us. 
Astute analysis of the government's suspect EU migrants "stocktaking" exercise by the phenomenal Dr Tanja Bueltmann @cliodiaspora #brexit  
A year ago, only 2% more voted for Brexit than against. It is one dumb political party on a suicide course that fails to acknowledge that. 
#BREAKING British PM to unveil plans to 'protect' EU citizens' rights post-Brexit 
#Brexit: ain't no mountain high enough #EUCO 
Great to welcome Ireland's young, energetic Taoiseach Leo Varadkar @campaignforleo. We discussed #Brexit and the June #EUCO agenda. 
'Real misery for no good purpose ' - that's #Brexit in a nutshell  
#Brexit so far has slowed GDP growth, started to cut living standards & has pushed up government debt. #StopBrexit #Remain 
GOP is 5-0 on special elections...Each one a referendum on @realDonaldTrump...The verdict = #MAGA  
The only thing keeping Theresa May in power is #Brexit. It could also be what finishes her off  
£105 to buy 100 Swiss francs at Gatwick. Just another mark of the #Brexit lunacy: paying through the nose for utterly pointless self-harm. 
British strawberry prices are set to soar 50 per cent thanks to Brexit  
How has the Brexit vote affected the UK economy? June verdict  
"Tim Martin of pub chain Wetherspoon & Brexit campaigner said UK can't afford brake on migration & called for special deal for EU workers"  
If Brexit is such a great idea, why are its backers so mediocre, their ideas so vulnerable to scrutiny? Brexiteers make Brexit unthinkable. 
#Government trying to hide its studies into cost and impact of ‘hard’ #Brexit via @LondonEconomic 
brexit for dummies: your local Tesco goes independent, has to arrange new deals with suppliers and own logistics, will it be competitive? 
Don't forget: 70% want the government to get on with Brexit and 80% voted for parties that support ending free movement!  
Early Day Motion tabled by @JohnMannMP "People's Brexit!" This is precisely what Brexit is all about!  
It's time for action and certainty. Not for dreams and uncertainty #Brexit #FutureofEurope #EUCO 
If we had a 2nd referendum and Remain went with "and you'd never have to hear anyone talk about fucking Brexit again" they might win 100%. 
The lords must not "overstep the mark" when it comes to Brexit legislation, warns @UKLabour's @JohnMannMP. #bbcdp 
..revealing CCHQ thought Chorley theirs -driven by financial/ demographics & Brexit too.. employed EU workers to deliver Elex Day leaflets  
The price of the illusion of taking back control.What a pile of steaming turd Brexit is. 
For anyone getting excited about a Scottish veto to Brexit, we had this argument last year and it doesn't exist.  
EU leaders unveil new Brexit negotiating tool  
Almost all of CCHQ's attack on Labour in North West was refocused on Chorley with a strong Brexit message: Hoyle increased majority by 3k 
FM: “We actually see confidence increasing, but with the real risk to confidence being the Brexit being pursued by the Tory govt.” #FMQs 
Best Brussels rumour of week: Brexit 'transitional arrangements' might see continued UK mem'ship of EU beyond March 2019 maybe for yrs 1/2 
The Brexit referendum has made watching Kraftwerk live a melancholy experience, writes sorrowful Brit @LukeTurnerEsq  
UK nationals living in the EU lose all their rights in all 27 EU countries on #brexit day. Who gave the UK govt the right to shaft us all? 
.@IanDunt made good point that Brexit conversation has subtly changed from opportunity to damage limitation - damage predicted by Remainers 
Brexit Means Brexit review – a political farce with terrifying implications  
Even Farage admits there is no chance of #Brexit with no deal. The Government needs to drop its absurd threat  
Tusk on #Brexit being reversed: 'You may say I'm a dreamer, but I'm not the only one.' #JohnLennon #imagine 
All white and just one woman. Why is our Brexit team like this? | Tania Branigan  
Theresa May did not win a majority for her Brexit of deregulation. We can’t allow her to take it forward  
"You may say that I’m a dreamer but I’m not the only one": EU council president @eucopresident on whether UK could reverse #Brexit.  
Brexit Watch:-Real wages falling-Retail sales dropping-Inflation risingYear after referendum this is cost 
Farage replies to Adam on the idea of No Deal Brexit not now an option: "politically now looks v v difficult". Gone away? "Probably has"  
MSM has STOPPED publishing Immigration figures since Brexit becauseMASS MIGRATION POPULATION SURGES OVER 500,000 
Brexit economy: UK faces slowdown amid living standards squeeze  
Our cartoonist @adamstoon1 EveningStandard take a look at the House of Lords and Brexit  
Ruth Davidson doing fake laughing out loud when Brexit mentioned. She can't stand talking about it. #FMQ 
It's funny that @RuthDavidsonMSP is going on CAP, given she now supports #Brexit which will take us OUT of this support #FMQs 
FM: “The big risk to the Common Agricultural Policy is Brexit, which is being presided over by the Tories.” #FMQs 
Election outcome might have called the govt's ability to negotiate into question, but it certainly does not change outcome of referendum 
The North East of England will be particularly hard hit by a hard Brexit.  
EU chief Donald Tusk leaves door for UK to snub #Brexit and stay in #EU    
WATCH our horticulture adviser Hayley tell @BBCBreakfast about the urgent need for a competent, reliable workforce post #Brexit  
Unintended consequences.A metaphor for Brexit and Theresa May's election disaster.#TuesdayThoughts 
‘Yes’ vote ahead in referendum poll with 64% turnout  
#NigelFarage on fantastic form in the #BBC's Brexit Means #Brexit documentary last night. What a year it's been   
Fighting bad brexit. Step 1. Ask your MP to sign this: EDM 2 on staying in the customs union...    
Really worth a watch by @MeeraSyal Brexit Shorts: Just a T-shirt   
CONGRATULATIONS to the 8 male members of the UK's Brexit negotiating team for getting there on merit alone. Very well done mates.  
"Brexit is in trouble, the govt is powerless, Boris Johnson has embarrassed himself. Repeat for the next 2 yrs." @MattChorley, Quote du Jour 
600 buildings may have "similar cladding" to London's Grenfell Tower, Downing Street says  
'Some of my British friends' trying to reverse #Brexit, says @eucopresident 
Time to stop pissing about! Stand up against BREXIT! @campbellclaret @ChukaUmunna @DanJarvisMP @johnmcdonnellMP #BinBrexit #Corbyn pic.twitter.com/f13gdLtmzC 
At workshop with investors. Asked to identify top political risks. Not one chose Brexit. Dominant = Trump, N Korea, Middle East, Italy 
Philip Hammond claims UK will secure 'transitional period' for Brexit, thought to be the time between ‘leaving cliff’ and ‘hitting rocks’. 
More beards than women & no BAME members. The UK team negotiating #Brexit won't reap the benefits diversity brings:  
Companies leaving Britain in droves because of Brexit. Unless we stop it NOW we will be well and truly stuffed...AND THEY WON'T COME BACK! 
Very Hard Brexit needed!  
Outfit bei Queen's Speech: Der "Anti-Brexit-Hut" von Queen Elizabeth  
The only thing keeping Theresa May in power is #Brexit. It could also be what finishes her off  
EU academics are astonished by blinkered self-destructive xenophobia of #Brexit & point to benefits of collaboration on teaching & research. 
Tusk channels Lennon - 'you may say I m a dreamer, but I m not the only one' - Brexit might not happen 
I love the way yoons cackle delightedly: 'Indy Scotland would be Greece!' - the UK's economy almost is mate, & after Brexit who knows?  
Delighted to be in Brussels for first European Council meeting. Just met President Juncker. Good meeting re Brexit & related issues 1/2 
My book of the moment: Douglas Board is truly talented satirist and has our Brexit era nailed  
Could Brexit be reversed? "You may say I'm a dreamer, but I am not the only one" says EU's John Lennon fan.  
This research by @HelenDeCruz shows people voted Labour (&Tory) despite not because of Brexit policy  
The Latest: Tusk holds out hope that Brexit can be reversed.  
To which May will no doubt respond "no door is better than a bad door" You need to understand Donald, we're being led by far right lunatics. 
Macron extends an olive branch block on immigration to angry Leave voters, as dreamer Tusk says stay in. Is this how Brexit ends?  
Who gives a shite if raspberries double in price. We voted Brexit to savd our country not becauad of cheap fruit.  
Brexit can still be stopped, European Council leader says   
I have no sympathy for any businessperson who voted Leave and now complains of the consequences of Brexit. You were repeatedly warned!  
#Italy risk spread over Germany continues to shrink, hits to lowest since Jan as 5-Star Movement relegated Euro referendum pledge to Plan B.  
It’s here! Read our new report with @UKandEU - ft 38 experts on #Brexit1YrOn  #Brexit #Euref 
Have launched a motion this morning with @ChukaUmunna @IanMurrayMP + cross-party colleagues to urge rethink on #CustomsUnion #Brexit  
"The only way to stave off the environmental risks of Brexit is to recognise that change is a chance to do better"  
My blog for The New Statesman and @UKandEU on why the UK Government's 'bloody difficult' approach to Brexit negotiations is flawed.  
As EU gets tough on tax avoidance & evasion in pursuit of a fair taxation system,  wealthy donors 'buy' #Brexit for the UK. Coincidence?  
Whatever form #Brexit ends up taking, one thing is clear, the big, small and mid - sized biz need to fire on all cylinders #MSBSummit2017 
Pretty clear who among British politicians and hacks are on the payroll of the EU. Why don't they reveal their off-shore accounts? #Brexit 
Couldn't @UKLabour say they will do their best to make #Brexit work but if final deal damages us they reserve the right to reassess leaving? 
The Queen’s speech has made Brexit Britain an international laughing stock | Rafael Behr  
More than 700 new EU laws have been introduced in the UK since the referendum  
David Davies MP, inept and unprepared. Trying to sell #Brexit to a public who realise that it will be a disaster #BrexitShambles #ToriesOut 
Summer has done a brexit today in  #comeback 
The #Brexit scaremongering is cranking up.I expect it will be in full flow from all corners of UK media soon.They are an enemy of the UK. 
In life common sense tells you to stop what's causing the damage; in politics you just carry on regardless. 
Remainers warned of this, too, but were dismissed as scaremongers. We need to rethink Brexit for our old age.  
Our paper on the role of #prejudice in #Brexit is out!  And featured in the Independent! 
After 7 years of austerity the govt deficit is set to rise from £47bn to £58bn.  Well done #Brexit.#StopBrexit #Remain 
Make una see oh!This freedom fight is between #FantasticallyCorrupt Nigerian Politicians and the poor masses.We demand #Referendum  
Remember when we warned you that Brexit would lead to watering down of EU environmental protections?  Well, they are already starting  
If any Brexit voters need a job? *APPLY ASAP*  
We now have a man who hates Europe leading Brexit, an NHS enemy in charge of health and a PM who hates human contact  
Japanese were the first Goverment to tell UK of the risks to brexit Nothing in the last year has been done to stop risks so Japan opts out  
SPOILER: don't hold your breath for a Holyrood veto over Brexit.  
Philip Hammond just said what everyone knows to be true: Brexit is hurting the UK economy  
@Albert_Rivera to @MichelBarnier "Brexit negotiations are both a great challenge for #EU and a great opportunity for our future together" 
Down to real Brexit business - how 'generous' is the 'generous offer' ?  
New CITB Research: 2 in 5 recruiters expect construction staff shortages due to Brexit  
The price of strawberries could go up by up to 50% if #Brexit restricts EU fruit pickers  
The Labour Tory & LibDem Pro EU MP's need to get their act together and reject both the Tories & Labours Hard Brexit plans. A new party?  
Japanese bank Nomura is moving its EU base from London to Frankfurt after Brexit  
It's been nearly a year since the EU referendum...give this image a share if you're proud you voted leave!  
We must defend #Europe. Let's criticize, discuss, reform. But let's do it together. #EuropeanUnion #Brexit #brexittalks 
Having to make 'big concessions' for a party like the DUP -- that does not bode well for anything, not UK national politics nor Brexit negs  
Separate deal on #citizensrights is critical to protect 3m EU nationals in UK & 1.2m @BritishInEurope with risk of #Brexit talks collapsing  
Most Leavers think *their* reasons for Brexit have widespread support. ( @CambridgeNewsUK yesterday) 
Daily Briefing- May to clarify EU citizens' rights- Has Scotland got a Brexit veto?- Oil price slide deepens 
"workers' wages may soar if brexit restricts labour" #FTFY 
Next Bond has to be about Brexit. 007 steals publicly-available EU negotiation papers, tries to seduce Merkel and infiltrates Juncker's lair 
Scotland and the House of Lords are about to give Theresa May a Brexit nightmare  
Ahead of the anniversary of the EU referendum tomorrow it's worth remembering just how close it was. This was no mandate.  
'Hard Remainers' need to join Leavers if they want to help forge the post-Brexit landscape, says @AndrewRTDavies 
A tale of two Queen's Speeches: humility domestically, exactly the same on Brexit: is the PM misreading #ge2017? 
New blow for Theresa May over fears Holyrood will block Brexit.  
As Labour politicians, we reject a hard-right Brexit, and defend the single market | Opinion | The Guardian  
Without huge Westminster subsidies (anathema to Tories), Brexit is the end of British farming. But hey, kill some bees to throw them a bone  
Best post Brexit analysis I've read. And you'll never find these views given airtime by the BBC  
Tory Brexit strategy based on experience of people who own more than one house! #WTF 
Yup. I voted Labour to stop tories - am against Brexit. @jeremycorbyn  please note. @Labour4EU 
Clearly true, but sadly @campbellclaret this Tory Brexit lie is another that Corbyn & McDonnell seem content not to correct.  
Agree. I am a children's leukaemia specialist. The NHS is at breaking point and Brexit is a disaster 
Brexit is inherently lose:lose. With the best will in the world, nothing EU can do about that.  
JPMorgan is understood to be seeking extra office space in Dublin for its post-Brexit plans  
I take back everything I've said about #JohnHumphrys.He nailed #PhilipHammond.If you still think #Brexit makes sense- listen.#r4today 
Bloody EU, trying to save bees! We hate bees in the UK! I can't wait for Brexit so we can kill the lot! 
Using the threat of walking away to exert leverage in #Brexit talks is Tory fantasy. As EU27 see it, *we have already walked away* #Today 
Philip Hammond concedes Brexit transition period could be 4 years: "When you buy a house you don't move all your stuff in on the first day." 
PLOT: Lords and SNP look to water down, stifle Brexit.  
Philip Hammond tells @BBCr4today that those who voted to stay in EU now just want to get on with Brexit. Can we have a referendum on that? 
So the courts say Scotland CANT block BrexitThen our PM say's Sturgeon CAN block BrexitNasty corrupt intimidation based governance 
Oh Fuck Off! I did NOT vote Labour for Brexit, but to get rid of YOUR party which is NOT acting in national interest!  #r4today 
This line that all Labour voters voted for Brexit - millions voted to halt May landslide and her Brexit At Any Cost! Another Tory Brexit Lie 
A worrying but well predicted problem for vital soft fruit sector in #Perthshire driven by the Brexit folly.  
We may soon be in constitutional crisis,living standards are falling,businesses are leaving,our reputation collapsing.Brexit isn't worth it. 
There is no appetite in the EU to water down free movement rules (or negotiate a soft EEA brexit) -  @Simon_Nixon  
#Brexit as a spectacular own goal- if it happens. IF it happens.  
Fruit farmer on #r4today votes 4 brexit and then moans that he can't recruit EU staff! Beggars belief, what did he think would happen? Idiot 
It's as if this country never EXISTED before the EU the way some people are going on #Brexit #R4Today 
This isn't surprising. But it's still heartbreaking.  Prejudice against immigrants 'major' factor in Brexit vote  
A brutal, devastating article on the #brexit farce.  
BBC4 intv a major fruit farmer who hires 500 Romanian pickers every summer. He says he could face ruin. And yes, he voted for #Brexit #wtf 
A fruit farmer - who voted Leave - is crying on #r4Today because he won't be able to get cheap EU Labour to work on his farm #Brexit  
Some Leavers employ the idiotic reasoning that if something bad happens in a EU country it must be the fault of the EU.#Brexit #StopBrexit 
We're all, both Leave and Remain, realising that Brexit is crap. It's high time we united behind GB and binned Brexit. #brexit  
Many growers blame the weak pound which has reduced their workers' earning power, as well as uncertainty over Brexit  
The Lords may block Brexit  
Wasn't this supposed to be the upside of Brexit?  
It’s almost as if Brexit is going to be bad for businesses.  
EU countries compete to host London-based agencies after Brexit  
Study proves 'Project Hate' mantra that #brexit was an anti-immigration tantrum. Sorry UK. That's embarassing. 
Another case of illegal spending by the #brexit side in referendum : "respect" the result, anyone?  
Prejudice against immigrants was a 'major' factor in Brexit vote, study finds  
.@Nigel_Farage on fantastic form in the BBC's Brexit Means Brexit documentary last night. What a year it's been   
#Brexit is a cruel way to humiliate our politicians as payback for the expenses scandal, but it's tanking the economy and making us poorer 
Trust in media declining as a result of Brexit lies, says a Reuters report. Not all papers lied. Important to differentiate between them. 
If the head of the UKIP Party Mr Farage who got nearly 4million votes from the people cant be involved in Brexit, then we know its fixed. 
Japan's biggest brokerage has chosen Frankfurt as its EU base after Brexit, sources say  
Retweet if you think @DUPleader would make a better #Brexit negotiator than #TheresaMay!  
President @Masoud_Barzani: 'We can’t wait anymore' for permission on #Kurdish referendum  #KurdistanVotes 
Strawberry costs may 'soar up to 50%' if Brexit restricts labour  
Nomura will pick Frankfurt as its EU base after Brexit, sources say  
108 Wigmore who brought Cambridge Analytics to Brexit & Louise Mensch R lunching.  She orbits the Mercer/Bannon/CA/SCL circle.  
How about we stop? Take stock. Ask is #Brexit really what we want. Does the cost outweigh any benefits. Is there something else we could do. 
It is time we ditched the House of Lords. Their threats to derail #Brexit are infuriating and pathetic.  
Interesting hat, Your Majesty! Was the Queen deliberately making a #Brexit fashion statement with those colour choices? #QueensSpeech 
104 Breitbart London’s shitlord Raheem Kassan ( a Bannon protégé) is Louise’s friend. She worked with him on Brexit. pic.twitter.com/b8efvKcmJn 
103 Mensch was an advocate of Brexit. She is in league with “the Bad Boys of Brexit” who then joined team Cruz and then Team Trump.  
Finally an end to the anxiety for EU citizens living in the UK & Brits living in EU? #brexit  
'She's the least popular person at a party,' @susannareid100 says as we discuss Theresa May's #Brexit and today's #QueensSpeech 
A rallying cry for @UKLabour by @OwenJones84. But no mention of the elephant in the room for the party, Brexit! Ignore it at your peril Owen  
Brexit gives rise to new political identities – new report, one year on from EU referendum, finds  @anandMenon1 
British fruit & salad rotting in the fields because Brexit has alienated the pickers?  
The Brexit vote and UK markets one year on  via @FT 
I agree with @dailytelegraph #Brexit is a constitutional crisis. Like the hat ma'am!  
Brexit is starting to take a toll on the U.K.'s advertising market  
Queen's Speech Brexit laws will END free movement  via @MailOnline 
A year on, which of the following best describes your view of the #brexit referendum: 
We've reached peak #Brexit when the queen is labelled a traitor  
Actual Brexit policy on table tonight, PM putting forward outline of offer on EU citizens + Brits abroad (squeezed in with the after eights) 
What I can't understand is why we are not getting any leadership on opposing Brexit has no one got a backbone? They R forcing Fascism on us.  
OK, I'll be the first to say it: The Chaffetz special election in Utah will be a referendum on Donald Trump!  
Boris Johnson: I won’t contest Tory leadership before Brexit  
some straight people as they organize to pass a referendum on marriage equality. Guess what they did not do: dismiss all people who... 
Value for money over value for people: how material politics can perpetuate inequality  
#QueensSpeach Queen Elizabeth II delivers speech in UK parliament, pledging successful Brexit (via CGTN)  
Did Queen Elizabeth say "Read my hat, no Brexit" today?  
The Brexit vote and UK markets one year on  
Everyone who believes Brexit is the most stupid short sighted decision the UK has made in modern history has a moral duty to try to stop it  
The same night Pres. dodged press pool. Met with WI Gov Scott Walker that day. Dinner with Farage & FL Rick Scott. 2 swing states & a Brexit 
Blog: How'd that referendum on Trump work out?  
You are all so worried abt Brexit nothing else gets accomplished. #FreeNazanin your citizen held captive 445 days @theresa_may @StephenTwigg 
Stay close. Stay roit m8.*side effects may include intense emotions about Brexit and marmite defending *pronunciation of "twat" may vary 
Theresa May facing revolt over Brexit laws  
5 & 0Yes #POTUS take a victory lapThere is NO referendum against you#Wethepeople are proud of your agenda #MAGA#CedarRapids 
This is straight out of the Brexit playbook: promise things that are already true but clash with idiots' Welfare Queen preconceptions.  
Brexit and security loom large at EU summit  
"The significance of the Brexit sequencing U-turn" This is going to be brutal. This piece already is.  via @FT 
.@kimguilfoyle on GA special election: Big mistake @TheDemocrats made...was nationalizing that race, making it a referendum against Trump.  
Amb. Anderson appreciates the serious engagement by the US Friends of Ireland Congressmen on our #Brexit priorities & on the NI negotiations  
Brexit - It's time to refer to it as 'Brexit Shambles' every time.  
Someday I hope to write political intrigue as excruciatingly cutting as the Queen wearing an EU hat & suit on national TV to Brexit Britain 
We need a Brexit in America  
We Only Need Referendum - Ohaneze Petitions UN - Wednesday, June 21, 2017. 23:25GMT We Only Need Referendum - O...  
Remoaners: Sad nasty people, who'd rather see their own country screwed, than accept they lost the EU referendum..  
"I'll get you Brexit, you'll see if I don't!"#brexitmeansbrexit 
#brexitmeansbrexit and the Queen doesn't approve! #QueensSpeech "Fuck Brexit. That is all!" #Remain @CaptainSKA @spaceangel1964 @ChelsClive pic.twitter.com/jAKMXcxXu9 
"I was fortunate to be a diplomat when Britain counted," says the former headof MI6 as he laments Brexit.  
Tories will go for a 'no control' Brexit to avoid an 'economically destructive Brexit'. Both mad, better by far to Remain in control & stay  
artists impression of me from now until the referendum  
Only the old or poorly educated want #Brexit. This country can only thrive with business being able to employ the best educated young.  
Queen's Speech: "FUCK BREXIT! That is all..." #remain #stopbrexit #brexitshambles  @acgrayling @GuyVerhofstadt @ChelsClive @No10Vigil pic.twitter.com/eYdgY9g5Kq 
Scotland and the House of Lords are about to give Theresa May a Brexit nightmare  
If it hadn't been for @LibDems, Labour's support for Tory extreme #Brexit would have seen all hope killed by now. We have kept flame alive. 
."Irish reunification & Scottish independence have become increasingly likely 1 year on from Brexit vote". 
Is it national statement of the bastard obvious day?Anti-immigrant prejudice major factor in Brexit vote  
The Queen had a yellow starry hat..she was a real cool cat...showed May and Co where it's at...she ain't no Brexit rat 
Brexit: One Year On. Our new @UKandEU book - free download here: 
MPs had a responsibility to stand up for what was democratically agreed in terms of an advisory referendum. Many ignored and/or ducked this.  
What happened to the "referendum on the president" narrative around this election we were hearing from the MSM for months?All gone now! 
Yet another Brexit campaigner fined for breaking the law  
@AngieMeader We really should examine this. So much inexplicable behaviour surrounding Brexit makes more sense if tax evasion is a factor.  
OK! This is officially weird. My only explanation is that the whole Brexit "done deal" thing is falling apart?  
Scots! I promise to buy shortbreads every day if you stop Brexit  
Just to be explicit: I think "unilateral free trade" as a reason for Brexit is among the most lazy, boring and stupid takes out there. 
Brexiteers who think #brexit will deliver greater sovereignty should understand that competitive global markets will dictate domestic policy 
So Brexit can be rejected by the Cabinet the Wallyonians, the EU27, the EU Parliament, the HoC or the Lords.  #brexitmeansbrexit 
Scotland and the House of Lords are about to give Theresa May a Brexit headache  
Brexit is economic suicide, it can be defeated. Please work for that. 
Are House of Lords preparing the ground for a cross-party majority to stop Brexit when the Tories split? @bbclaurak 
While you were busy tone policing the shrill brigade led us to the point that a referendum is going to be held. 
The political road map in the U.K. includes a whole lot of Brexit.  
Funny how all the #brexiteers have gone totally silent on the benefits of leaving the EU........#Brexit 
I actually think that the whole of Government is now out of its depth. The Brexit phenomenon is corroding the very fabric of society.  
An agreement on citizens' rights will only apply as part of an overall agreement on Brexit - Portugal's foreign minister tells #newsnight 
If Brexit is such a brilliant idea, why are no other countries doing it?  It's a genuine question. #Brexit  
If it were only possible to define Brexit - to say what it actually is - we could by now have consigned it to the ashcan of history 
Had to mute someone for non-ironically calling anti-Brexit people "Remoaners".Um, dahling, I'm a Saboteur  
THE TIMES: "May facing revolt over Brexit laws" #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Fantastic news for our fishermen as Queen’s Speech says ‘UP YOURS’ to EU fishing quotas  via @Your Brexit 
The main issue confronting Mrs May's cabinet remains the same: not Brexit but what to get her as a leaving present?  
Oh, and this (thanks @RCorbettMEP )  #Brexit 
#Brexit isn't the Will of The People. Anyone who claims otherwise is either lying, deluded or doesn't understand basic primary school maths.  
Just in case anyone is still daft enough to claim the 2016 referendum demonstrated that #Brexit is the "will of the people".  
How'd that referendum on Trump work out? #MAGA #p2 
You can't get an analogue output from a binary referendum pal. The vote was always IN or OUT.  Trying to fudge it won't work for anyone.  
Thank you Frances! This will help us fund two new reporters ahead of #Brexit and a possible #indyref2 - Scotland needs fair journalism  
Theresa May's Brexit negotiations strategy in a nutshell...#brexitmeansbrexit 
Terror attacks accelerated after #Brexit why ?!#brexitmeansbrexit#ISIS = Israeli Secret Intelligence Service.   
Trump's low #s still loom over '18, but D's must counter GOP success in making races a referendum on House control  
#Brexit negotiations. What do we want? A good trade deal with the EU. Answer -  you've got it already. Why are we doing this? 
THE DAILY TELEGRAPH: "May warned of looming Brexit constitutional crisis" #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Nnamdi Kanu says no more elections until they're given referendum for Biafra. WATCH.  
Tomorrow's front page: May set for Brexit Holyrood clash and could be forced to overrule Scottish Parliament if she wants to leave the EU  
Did the Queen of England just weigh in on Brexit?   
Boris Johnson claims everyone is blaming everything on #Brexit. I'm personally blaming #Brexit on him. #brexitmeansbrexit 
Here's my @BorisJohnson interview in full where he rules out standing for leader until after Brexit  via @cathynewman 
Just spent 4 days in Brussels and there is bewilderment here at the incompetence and disarray of the British Government as Brexit begins 
THE I FRONT PAGE: 'May clears decks for Brexit' #skypapers 
Chuka's face as @isaby patiently schools him in the reality of how it's Brexit that will return Parliamentary democracy to UK is priceless.  
Theresa May unveils plans for hard Brexit by Patrick Blower - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Recent cancer conference with 350 delegates. In a vote following a #Brexit debate, not a single cancer specialist would vote #Brexit now 
As a cancer specialist I owe it to patients to oppose #brexit to the bitter end. Detrimental effects on healthcare & NHS are immeasurable 
Jeremy, so many of us listened to you, now you should please listen to us:Brexit is a cynical diversion of priorities, resource and focus.  
Scottish Parliament may need to approve key Brexit legislation, May admits  
How the Brexit negotiations will end... #BrexitMeansBrexit 
Such a pity UK government couldn't pledge pragmatism and cooperation with EU27 and ditch Brexit shambles NOW.  
Did the Queen's hat have a subtle Brexit message today?  
Pres #Barzani met Arab tribes leaders in Nainawa Province.Explained vision &plan on Referendum.They request 2 be w/an independent Kurdistan.  
Fun Brexit Fact: A year ago we were the fastest growing EU country & now we're not.2017 Q1 GDP:Germany   0.6%Eurozone   0.5%UK   0.2% 
We are officially poorer thanks to brexit but the brexiteer logic: look unicorns and our country (which we never lost) is back 
Watching this Brexit doc and it's very revealing how the threat of mob violence was used to bolster Brexit but is delegitimised for Grenfell 
Scotland could block Brexit after Theresa May says Holyrood may get vote on repeal billSharpen yer swords folks....Game on 
I smell the possibility that the Torys are going to try and blame the Scots for blocking #Brexit.  They need a Brexitexit.     Shields up. 
On #podsavetheworld @LSRTweets explains what's going on in Europe after Brexit and the French elections. Subscribe:  
BREXIT BOOST: EU boss admits Liam Fox CAN discuss UK future trade before Brussels divorce   
Why do I get the feeling that Scotland is either being set up as the patsy for cancelling Brexit or dared to block repeal then shut Holyrood 
BREAKING: Preparatory draft doc of Queen's Speech LEAKED. #QueensSpeech #brexitmeansbrexit #Brexit #brexishambles #ToriesOut #MayMustGo 
Brexit is about the rich Rees-Moggs of Britain, not anyone else  
Just tuned into Brexit means Brexit on Beeb 2 and found The Proclaimers and David Tennant. Joy! 
Scottish parliament could block Brexit  
Excruciating. This man is our Foreign Secretary as we negotiate Brexit. @eddiemair in top form. Brilliantly executed interview. 
Her Maj Queen Elizabeth 2,Donned headgear of yellow & blue.A hint to her sinisterMrs Prime MinisterThat her hard Brexit is poo.Better? 
Kraftwerk tonight at the @RoyalAlbertHall a Brexit antidote in sonic form. Imagine Farage getting whipped onstage to this! 
I think about this quote in the context of Brexit and the loss of empire - a grief suppressed, as yet unmourned. @AdamRamsay 
Breaking news! Some Labour bloke on Sky news right now just mentioned a peoples' Brexit! Fuck me but when will it end? 
As far as a referendum on Trumpism,the election yesterday says something for Democrats as they took a 21 point favorite down to 4 in a R Dis  
If GA-06 was a referendum on Pelosi, she did incredible. That well in a Red District? She should think abt running for President  
Scottish Parliament could have the power to block Brexit, Theresa May reveals -  
Honoured to speak in first day of Queens Speech debate. Talking about Brexit & Armed Forces Covenant. Calling for independent commissioner.  
Here's @BorisJohnson refusing to stand for the leadership until after #Brexit in 2019 #C4News 
The Queen for Europe...? If only....   #Brexit #QueensSpeech 
Brexit: Britain leaving the EU is now 'very much open to question', Lord Heseltine says - The Independent  
Friend just pointed out that the Queen's Speech is actually the fullest in ages, due to how massive & complex all the Brexit stuff is 
@WillBlackWriter #CorbynMayCaptionComp TM: The queen favours Brexit, you know...JC: Let's wait and see what kind of hat she's wearing! 
Good question from @StewartMcDonald. If Sewel Convention is the source of 'possibility', surely Wales too must have a veto on Brexit?  
My response to the Queen’s Speech:  We need to get on with Brexit and provide more opportunities for young people.  
'It’s clear' Commons ERUPTS as Corbyn DUCKS question on Labour's chaotic plan for Brexit  
2morrow I've a Seanad Commencement Matter on amending Citizenship Act 2 allow New Irish in North 2 obtain passports post #Brexit @newbelfast 
Brexit can be reversed -- join the call on May to cancel Brexit if she can’t get a deal!  
WATCH: Nigel Farage DESTROYS Shadow Chancellor McDonnell for INCITING Day Of Rage protest  via @Your Brexit 
It turns out the difference between a watershed referendum on Trump and a purely local race with no deeper lessons is 2.9%. 
Let's Exit Brexit with a Brexexit. Scottish parliament, please save us from our own stupidity and end the farce. We've all had enough of it 
."Debate in UK about [Brexit] has been characterised by xenophobia, insularity & a lack of self-confidence”. 
Sooner rather than later Remain MPs have to speak out against #Brexit. The public mood is changing and they must be part of the conversation 
PM is ready to stick to her guns & see Brexit through, even put up with mindless abuse from the opposition, must let her get down to work. 
GA was going to be a referendum on America’s President the first big success for the frenzied anti-Trump Resistance movementThey Lost Again 
Yeah, F you, @michaelgove. We all know that The Queen wouldn't be in favour of Brexit, as you suggested. Her blood is European   
7 years of Tory austerity the country has gone backwards.& with Theresa May a Tory government & Brexit we're not going forward anytime soon  
.If this comes about, Scotland WILL block Brexit!UK is in a safe pair of hands courtesy of @NicolaSturgeon . 
Scottish parliament could block Brexit  
The #QueensSpeech was dominated by Brexit, but there remain plenty of obstacles ahead for the Government  
#Macron's first interview since election - On Syria, Trump, EU, Brexit & "the crisis facing western democracies"  
The breakdown of total research grants and funding for HE institutions shows how they are funded and who by #Brexit  
England, you can't have Brexit. It's bad for you. This is for your own good. You'll thank us later.  
Exclusive: Macron pledges pragmatism and cooperation with post-Brexit Britain  
'Write what you hear, poet, or we will disappear' - @EllyRees storms House of Commons with her Brexit poem, set in St James Cemetery L/pool.  
Gingrich: Democrats said Georgia was a referendum on Trump. They’re right – Trump won   
The Queen's anti-Brexit hat is the most radical thing she's done since that time she dropped from a helicopter into the Olympic Ceremony  
Theresa May signals she may need to seek approval of Scottish Parliament for key plank of Brexit legislation   
There doesn't seem to be much appetite for #Brexit currently. I think it's time for a second referendum, this time, honesty and facts please 
Yesoo we're giving the political jobbers notice to not waste their money campaigning until date #Referendum is given 
CORRECTED Hundreds of top civil servants moved to do Brexit work and won't be replaced in Dept they leave  
All this to make the UK poorer - materially and in influence. So many issues should take priority over the absurdity of Brexit.  
More EU nurses registering in Scotland since Brexit | Because @scotgov is committed to protecting the NHS here 
Sad thing about this Brexit bollocks-as Standard says-is the opportunities we're missing while we obsess about it.  
Scotland could have the power to block Brexit Repeal Bill as Theresa May admits she may need Holyrood consent  
Just 21 percent of Britons are now opposed to Brexit.  
A guide to German residency rules Vastly worse than the rules for EU citizens. #Brexit is theft.#Remain 
.@NigelDoddsDUP: "When people voted in the referendum to leave the EU, they voted to leave the single market and the customs union" 
He may have tipped the balance in Brexit vote - thereby ruining lives of 3.2 m ppl & their families here, 1.2 Brits in EU, & our economy 
On Brexit in 2019, just four of the world's Top 15 countries will be members of the EU:#04 Germany#06 France#08 Italy#14 Spain 
A Brexit Britain will be a powerful force for freedom and prosperity on the world stage—and robust ally for the U.S.  
I was hopin' it would come down to  #SCOTLAND!#Brexit  
Men in charge:Climate change sceptic—environmentEurope-hater—BrexitNHS enemy—healthWhat could go wrong? 
Der "Anti-Brexit-Hut" von Queen Elizabeth  
A Somber Queen's Speech Unveils A Brexit-Centric Agenda In The U.K.  
Rees-Mogg has got this absolutely right. Brexit means leaving the EU Customs Union. Thank heavens.  
To those Brexit idiots who said #Brexit would be the end of the EU. They have become closer and more united than ever. little england alone. 
Brexit is the Hartlepool monkey trial on a national scale. It is a national embarrassment. 
Of course Britain will survive Brexit. We have a woman with a hat on a stick. #StateOpeningofParliament 
What a weird & delirious national convulsion Brexit is. Like the Great Cat Massacre of 1730s France. Looks crazier with every passing day 
Telegraph: Trade talks with the US to kick off next month as UK officials start to make plans for a deal, aiming for a FTA soon after Brexit 
We now have a man who hates Europe leading Brexit, an NHS enemy in charge of health and a PM who hates human contact  
Me when I found out Scotland has power to block Brexit  
.@JamesMcGrory on @BBCWorld earlier is clear: the Govt needs to rethink its rejected hard Brexit vision. RT if you agree:  
If you thought Brexit was all about our relationship with the EU27, it's not. International Trade Sec. Liam Fox has met his US counterpart. 
NEWS! Queen criticised for lack of impartiality by wearing Brexit means Clusterf*ck t-shirt during speech  
So just when some of us were urging SNPGov & indy movement to recover our nerve… We have a veto over Brexit!  
This is not really looking very good. It may just be the heat, but #Brexit itself is appearing more and more difficult.  
Lissie SaxeCoburg vonGothaDrew the world's gasps with her boaterHer choice seemed to sayTo PrimeMinister MayWe are not a Brexit promoter  
So, Scottish parliament 'may' have the power to block Brexit.  
The outcome of Brexit so far has been greater bellicosity and division 
There was no referendum vote to remove the Right to Freedom of Movement. To remove it would be politically illegitimate.#StopBrexit 
#QueensSpeech does zero to address big challenges facing Britain, as May wants to spend next 2 years imposing her extreme damaging #Brexit 
“What Does The Catalan Independence Referendum Mean For Citizens, Activists, Living And Working…” by Erik Sandberg  
No deal #Brexit unacceptable, 30 Tory MPs tell Number 10Sh1t is hitting the fan! #JC4PM Government in waiting! 
I've long wondered, considering all things decided for us without our awareness, let alone consent, why are they letting us decide Brexit? 
NEW Scottish Parliament could have the power to block Brexit, Theresa May reveals -  
Poland!This is the #EUNever, ever, allow them to bully you out of YOUR land.Take back what's yoursFight the EU#Brexit #Nexit #Polexit 
The Queen's speech shows the Tory Right will sacrifice anything & abandon any policy to get their #Brexit tax haven for the rich#Remain 
Democrats said this election was a REFERENDUM on Trump's policies ...Well Then ...Trump WINS by 6 PointsA LANDSLIDE#GA06 
The only thing more entertaining than a long Ken Clarke rant about Brexit is watching John Redwood's agonised face on the bench behind him. 
"Uh oh. No 10 confirm parts of the Brexit legislation may need the consent of the Scottish Parliament" @JasonGroves1 
I fully support Scotland blocking Brexit. If the rest of the UK hasn't made provisions for member nations then it's their own fault. 
Queen says UK Govt priority is to secure best possible deal for Brexit wearing a hat with EU symbols#QueensSpeechpic.twitter.com/2c64tSEZxS 
#Brexit is a criminal abuse of democracy orchestrated by rapacious politicians and press billionaires. #StopBrexit #Remain 
The number of people who will benefit from brexit is so small (in thousands) I just can't see why the rest don't twig? 
Theresa May will not unite the country. #Brexit absolutely divides it. No forgetting, no forgiving. #StopBrexit #Remain 
"Referendum" on Trump ends in humiliating defeat for leftists #WINNING #MAGA 
Triggering Article 50 leads to Brexit as a matterof EU law. If no Repeal Bill EU law still applies as a matter of domestic law.  
#Brexit: What was in the Conservative manifesto and what was in the #QueensSpeech? 
Lots of nancy boys moaning about the heat but don't worry, Hard Brexit weather is back tomorrow. Grey skies just the way we like it.  
Queen Elizabeth expresses her own view on Brexit while reading speech written by Theresa May #QueensSpeech #QueensHat #Brexit #TheresaMay 
If "Scots have power to block Brexit" were true, Brexit would be dead. Brexit is not (sadly) dead. 
I’m also concerned devolved powers may be curtailed post-Brexit. We need agreement through discussion, not diktat 2/2 #QueensSpeech 
GA06 wasn't a referendum on Trump, it was a referendum on endless, relentless, Fatal Attraction-level political campaigning. 
Queen’s Speech: Britain to take back control of fishing quotas from EU post-Brexit  
Dear @MelanieLatest , there's been nothing covert about it. WE ARE TRYING TO STOP BREXIT. BREXIT - WE ARE TRYING TO STOP IT. Get it?  
Tory heavweight says hard Brexit is 'dead'  
"Queen delivers speech outlining #Brexit plans wearing hat that looks suspiciously like a EUROPEAN flag-@DailyMailUk 
You may know 30% of Bills in #QueensSpeech are for Brexit. But did you know 2 in every 3 hospital patients are cared for by an anaesthetist?  
Uh oh. No 10 confirm parts of the Brexit legislation may need the consent of the Scottish Parliament 
Says the bloke who threatened to pick up a rifle if his Brexit dream was denied. Hypocrisy. #dayofrage 
I always think that those who voted #Brexit so they might return to an idyllic UK of the 1950's should see this:  
The Tory mentality - if you sound like you know what you're talking about, you'll go far - fortunately normal people aren't so easily fooled 
Queen of England dressed up with hat resembling to EU flag makes #Brexit speech. God save the Queen! #brexit #euco  
And no answer from PM to my question on why none of the Bills cover impact of #Brexit on environment legislation - huge issue #QueensSpeech 
Dear MPs! Please don't take your beady eyes off the #NHS ball whilst #Brexit negs try distract you  
Trouble for TM in the Lords. Lib Dems say Salisbury Convention won't apply to much of the #QueensSpeech including the 8 Brexit bills 1/2 
The EU is in need of reform,it has many flaws.All of us who voted for "Remain" know this but we know #Brexit was the worst possible response 
Put it out of its misery."Labour and Lib Dems peers vow to water down Brexit as Salisbury Convention doesn't apply" 
Ex-Swedish prime minister Carl Bildt: 'If there is a brutal Brexit, the political scars will last for years'  
Good meeting with German Foreign minister @sigmargabriel on #Brexit and the need for EU reform.  
That awkward moment when you've been a staunch Welsh republican all your life then #TheQueen gives #Brexit people a slamdown with pro EU hat  
Note to armchair pundits everywhere: Every single Democratic loss isn't a referendum on th left. Sometimes you just don't win. 
People are still angry at the EU elite. Brexit is its last chance to show it can change, says @asabenn 
.@newtgingrich: Democrats said Georgia was a referendum on .@realDonaldTrump. They’re right – Trump won   
.@acgrayling makes a potent case for stopping #Brexit in its tracks 
Also* DCLeaks releases hacked "Clinton campaign emails"* Trump fires Lewandowski (June 21)* Britain prepares for Brexit ref (June 23) 
#Brexit must not water down our strong equality and human rights laws says @EHRCChair responding to #QueensSpeech  
The Queen's Speech serves up May's hard Brexit- despite this being exactly what failed to win a majority in election  
The irony today is that a wounded Tory Prime Minister will be able to rely on Labour's support on hard Brexit, low immigration and welfare. 
Referendum Act provided that a referendum had to take place by end of 2017.Imagine: still no referendum, no election, no May as PM. 
 & Breathe  straight from the horses mouth, Barnier confirms Tory's are taking us out of The Single Market & The Customs Union. #Brexit  
Brexit? Remember that Westminster has refused to consider Scotland’s wishes, and ignored every constructive suggestion made by Holyrood.  
May made #GE17 about getting a mandate for Hard Brexit. She didn't get it. Listening to her today, she clearly does not get it in any sense. 
But wait though, has the Queen come as the EU flag because ... Come through with the regal level of shade! #QueenSpeech #brexit   
& did you notice her hesitation as she said 'my government will carry out Brexit'? I want a blue hat with stars! 
Brexit: Britain leaving EU now 'very much open to question', Lord Heseltine says  
#brexit might b in trouble says Heseltine. Fingers crossed  @AngieMeader @BrexitBin @Bregretears @EUflagmafia 
QUICK REPLAY of #Ossoff quarterbacking @TheDemocrats "Trump Referendum" campaign strategy!  
What a hat! What a sign! What a statement! Thank you Queen Elizabeth !!#Queenofeurope #QueensSpeech #QueensHat #QueensEUHat #Brexit  
The LibDems challenging Labour to put their money where their mouth is and block Hard Brexit. Will Labour do the right thing?  
.@newtgingrich: Democrats said Georgia was a referendum on @realDonaldTrump. They’re right – Trump won.  
Now Jezza's on to Brexit. Says new immigration policy must reflect needs of communities, not "the dog whistle cynicism of Lyndon Crosby". 
#QueensSpeech Jeremy Corbyn remembering Jo Cox without a word about how she fought against Brexit, and it is that which motivated her killer 
With Brexit coming, an exodus of London finance jobs is already beginning.  via @bbgvisualdata 
'Do you want these negotiations to fail?' Tory MP @timloughton roasts Labour MP @hilarybennmp in heated Brexit row  
Top trolling from EU parliament's Brexit coordinator  
@GuyVerhofstadt vying with @quatremer for title of biggest EU #Brexit troll (more to come! The negotiations have barely started!)  
Our take on #QueensSpeech - #Brexit must not overshadow fundamental challenges facing UK businesses  - via @CIPD 
You said GA-6 was a referendum on Trump. So he won again, and bigger.  
Has the Queen been making a statement about Brexit - with her hat? #QueensSpeech  
#QueensSpeach Queen Elizabeth II delivers speech in UK parliament, pledging successful Brexit  
Don't be a dick. No coalitions with either of Brexit supporting parties: Labour or Tory!  
After #Brexit there will not be a deep and special relationship with EU. UK will be just another external partner #delusionalism rules 
"Brexiteers call it useless red tape, but without it people die" @pollytoynbee  #regulation #Brexit 
#QueensSpeech outfit sparks rumours she was sending a secret message about Brexit  
#podsavetheworld with the brilliant @LSRTweets. The future of Europe, Brexit, nukes, cybersecurity and more.  
New figures suggest fall in eastern European workers coming to UK since Brexit vote:  
Didn't you say you'd pick up a rifle if brexit didn't happen the way you wanted it? 
How about we give the EU one more go and then referendum in 5 years and if less than 66% of people vote remain we're out? 
#politics #eu #Brexit THIS! is what Leave voters voted for ! They like being confined and restricted !  
People think the Queen is sending the world a message about Brexit with her hat  
Theresa May: "Brexit Brexit Brexit."HM The Queen: "Hold my Dubonnet."[saunters into The Queen's Speech in EU flag-themed hat] 
Asked about threats to the EU, our sample of European elite placed Brexit...12th. Not a priority.Full report:  
Main focus of #QueensSpeech on preparing for Brexit but I welcome a consultation on social care but should include health & be cross-party 
alt-left spin on GA 6. If Dems win it's a referendum on Trump. If Dems lose it's NOT about POTUS. DJT "broke" Kathy Griffin, now Pajama Boy. 
A hard #Brexit it is then  
Vote Leave director admits they won because they lied to the public #remain #DayOfRage #Brexit  via @LondonEconomic 
The #Queen wears a hat that looks like the European flag. I think it wasn't accidental. #QueensSpeech #NoBrexit #Brexit #Europe #TheresaMay 
THE FACT THE QUEEN IS LITERALLY DRESSED AS THE EU FLAG WHEN DISCUSSING BREXIT WILL FOREVER BE MY FAVOURITE MOMENT EVER OF 2017#QueensSpeech 
So why the hell did we vote for Brexit?  
The queen's hat today for the brexit Queens speech. No kidding.  
Finally someone in Labour has the guts to stand up to both Corbyn & May and their plans for a crippling Hard Brexit  
Fake Twitter accounts helped the Leave vote win the Brexit referendum  
The Transformers films are Brexit: panned by experts, hated by the metropolitan elite, powering on regardless.  
An open letter to our MPs: You will not be forgiven if you do not respect the referendum result  
hey @_Britain4Europe This is what we will be up to on the #brexit vote anniversary 
The GOP made every election a referendum on Obama but now the Village insists making elections about Trump is a bad strategy.  
We asked leading #tech experts from across the globe to sum up #Brexit in three words, here's what they said:  
Top trolling today from Queen, who has switched from Brexit-baiting garb in Parliament to something sort-of-yellow to scupper Ascot hat bets 
Pro-EU Labour MP Chuka Umunna berated by @SuellaFernandes and editor @isaby for not accepting the referendum result  
Dear Democrats / Media: ICYMI Last Night Was A Referendum On You, Not Trump  
Dems spent over $25m in GA 6 as a referendum on @realDonaldTrump. It was referendum. And @POTUS won big. 
Referendum on Donald Trump they said! Haha. Just more humiliation for leftists. Congrats #Handel! #GA06 
HANDELED: GA Republican Whips (His) Ossoff; Dems Now 0-4 In Yet Another 'Referendum On Trump' | Daily Wire     
Last night's #GA06 seems to have been more of a referendum on @CNN than on President Trump. I call them as I see them folks. @POTUS 
“Referendum” on Donald Trump Ends in Humiliating Defeat For Leftists  
I vote for @ChukaUmunna and Labour for the first time and he's busy doing exactly what he said he would. Top man. Single market, soft Brexit 
Now 50 Labour MPs refuse to support hard #brexit and 30 Conservative MPs refuse to back 'no deal'. Keep up the #fightforeurope! #UKtoStay 
People think the Queen's hat is a cryptic message about Brexit  
There speaks one of the more “no, never” => “OK, maybe” voices in Round 1 of that referendum  
Time for I House and Sen. bids. $50-$100 donor caps. Give $R and $D a kick in the pants in a national referendum on Citizens United. Fire 45 
Fake Twitter accounts helped the Leave vote win the Brexit referendum  
My thoughts too. When we now know that Brexit was based on lies it is a disgrace that this government is so determined to end citizen rights  
Cruz reax to #GA06: Dems "framed Karen Handel's election ... as a referendum on Trump. Well, that's the second referendum they've lost now." 
Thanks Iain Duncan Smith. We've been explaining for quite some time now that Labour's Brexit plans are like a page from the Tory manifesto.  
The disruption and cost of #brexit continue to mount....  
#UPDATE Prime Minister May unveils a diluted programme of action that includes the mammoth Brexit legislation  
Special elections a REFERENDUM ON DEMOCRATS.AMERICA IS TIRED of costly, meaningless investigations of @POTUS.@washingtonpost, @CNN 
No deal Brexit unacceptable, 30 Tory MPs tell Number 10  
'On and on and on' IDS launches scathing attack on BBC's relentless 'Brexit bias'   
After upstaging May at Grenfell, now the Queen trolls the #brexit brigade by wearing an EU hat. The Queen is WOKE #QueensSpeech 
In @TeenVogue, @JFKirkegaard of @PIIE explains to young Americans why the cool young Brits did not vote for Brexit  
After years of telling SNP to "get on with the day job" Tories launch a Queen's speech admitting they are parking the day job cos #Brexit 
Europe should remember that Brexit was voted for based on lies of right wing media billionaires. 
Brexit bus version 2.0  
I've had my hair blow dried and now I look like @AhirShah 's future self has come back to warn him of the perils of Brexit.  
The Bank of England says Brexit will bring us lower incomes, job losses and higher prises.  
How FAB. Queen wears EU flag as Hat #StateOpeningofParliament #Brexit  
Was Her Majesty trolling Theresa May over Brexit?  
.@neilgraysnp - DUP talks show PM can't even negotiate to keep herself in power nevermind with the EU on a good deal #Brexit #QueensSpeech 
MPs of all parties must now work together to stop Theresa May's extreme disastrous Brexit. My latest column.  
Ummm was there a subliminal message being passed here...?? #EU #Brexit  
Summary of Queens speech - 9 Brexit bills, 5 consumer ones, 7 vanilla ones, & 6 continuity ones -  
Our statement on Brexit and the #QueensSpeech.RT to keep children's right at the forefront of these negotiations. 
With Brexit dominating the #QueensSpeech, check out @anthonyjwells on where the public stand on Brexit post-election  
Britons will lose the Right to live & work in 31 countries. EU nationals will lose it in one country.#Brexit is a self-inflicted defeat. 
Haha. Brilliant!Is Her Majesty sending us all a Brexit-related message, sartorially?#QueensSpeech 
#StateOpening #QueensSpeech #Brexit Sometimes one has to be as subtle as a sledgehammer. People of Britain, take note of the hat.  
Another business leader is saying Brexit might not happen  
If 10 #DUP members are giving Theresa May the run around, what will 27 countries do? #Brexit  via @MidWalesMike 
Many on #Twitter remarking that the hat the Queen wore during her speech today resembles the #EU flag.  #QueensSpeech #Brexit  
Sad to see retro Tories dressed for Ascot while Queen ditches crown for her anti-Brexit hat matching the colours and stars of the Euro flag 
Number of East European migrants registering for work in Britain down by a third. is it Brexit or reduced value of the pound 
europe: "so, what you gonna do about this brexit none of you actually want?"uk: "dress up the queen!""but you could j-""look at her hat!"  
To sum up: Queen puts EU flag on her head, Repeal Bill no longer "Great" and Brexit legislation leaves "all options open". Just tickety-boo. 
That's it brexit talks done now of to do my shopping before I head of to Vienna for European tour it's all go @DanDartsDawson @OfficialPDC 
Was the Queen’s hat a hint on her thoughts on Brexit at the #QueensSpeech?  
We're at Petitions Hearing, European Parliament to press for EU citizenship for Brits post #Brexit All thanks to you 
This was a referendum on Russian conspiracies. There is nothing there, everybody but Dem nutz like Maxine Watters know it. #GA06 
Troll of the week goes to the queen. Delivers #QueensSpeech w 8 of 24 bills related to #Brexit while wearing EU flag  
#QueensSpeech: Brexit Britain will be free to conduct its own trade policy!  
If anyone was wondering where the Queen stood on Brexit, her hat should clear things up.  
I'm sorry but wtf, Brexit came up in the majority of subjects, even maths but only as a short questions in economics????? #Leavingcert 
.@TheDemocrats Are '0-5' In Special House Elections!...So Far, The "Referendum" On @POTUS Is Looking VERY Good!  
#Queen reads speech on #Brexit laws - whilst dressed as the EU flag  #QueensSpeech #StateOpening 
A Queen’s Speech without much style or substance – beyond Brexit bills  
Queen’s Speech talks about “the best possible deal”. This sombre tone is a real change from Brexit as a “great prize for this country.” /2 
The Tories negotiating Brexit? What, with 27 EU governments that currently think we're the laughing stock of Europe? How does that work? 
Ma'am, you couldn't have chosen a more appropriate hat. Yellow stars on blue say it all. Lovely touch. #Brexit?  
No one has high hopes for these Brexit negotiations.  
Queen delivers speech outlining Brexit plans wearing a hat that looks suspiciously like a EUROPEAN flag  
Is the Queen trying to tell us something about Brexit with her hat?  
Some called GA6 a referendum on President Trump. If so, then it was a loss for Democrats  
Queen's Speech over. Unimaginative. Grim. @IanBlackfordMP will outline @theSNP alternative to Tory austerity & a hard Brexit this afternoon.  
A nursery nurse has been forced out of Britain due to the poisonous atmosphere to migrants since Brexit @mrjamesob  
We've got a free-falling minority government with no mandate and no policies bar Brexit. But don't worry. Move along, nothing to see here 
We only said #GA06 was a referendum on Trump cuz we thought we'd win. #SpinHarder 
#queensspeech was 'weak on Brexit and weak on the causes of Brexit' claims @MaryCreaghMP @BBCNews @BBCOne 
'Widest possible consensus' on Brexit can't be delivered unless rights & protections guaranteed for women in every part of UK #QueensSpeech 
Looks like  "Hard #Brexit"  is dead y'all.#QueensSpeech#StateOpening pic-@tara_mulholland 
Old Queenie doesn't want to leave either. #brexit #QueensSpeech2017 
Is the Queen trying to tell us something about #Brexit with her hat? 
And yet, it was @TheDemocrats who framed this election as a referendum on @potus. I agree, it was. 
British government is planning 8 new laws to ease the withdrawal from the EU  #QueensSpeech 
Sgt Brexit's Lonely Hearts Club Band  
None of the non-Brexit bills seem to be politically controversial.This is lightest legislative programme imaginable, other than on Brexit. 
Yes DEMS said it was a referendum! They just didn't realize a referendum against them! #MAGA#TrumpStrong#winning 
So its literally going to be illegal for Brexit not to be a success #QueensSpeech 
Difficult to calculate, but it may be that the Queen's Speech contains proposals for as few as only five new Bills, other than on Brexit. 
Vince Cable announces he's standing to be leader of the Liberal Democrat Party and promises to try to thwart #Brexit  
Queen's speech: 8 out of 27 bills about BrexitMissingGrammar schoolsPension triple lock Fox hunting free voteFree school meals.... 
The Queen is basically wearing the EU flag on her head instead of a crown. Epic trolling. #QueensSpeech #Brexit  
Heretical take: it's not actually a bad idea for governments not to do much. Especially with something like Brexit swamping everything else. 
The Queen appears to be wearing an EU flag as she announces her government will 'make a success of Brexit'.  
Queen says UK Government's priority is to secure "best possible deal" for #brexit  #QueensSpeech 
The Queen says her Gov't's priority is to secure "best possible" Brexit deal, including establishing new national policies #QueensSpeech 
Am I the only one to see a similarity between the Queen's hat and the Flag of Europe?#QueensSpeech #Brexit #brexittalks #justsaying 
Has the #Queen subtly shown how she feels about #Brexit by wearing a hat that looks a bit like the EU flag? #QueensSpeech #conspiracytheory 
Her Maj has come dressed as the European flag for her Brexit Queen's speech. High class as always. #QueensSpeech 
27 bills in total - 8 of them on Brexit 
Can't be unseen. #Brexit #QueensSpeech 
the queen has turned up to do her speech announcing brexit wearing a hat that looks like EU flag #badgirl 
Something else canned from #QueensSpeech: the word 'Great' is missing from 'the Great Repeal Bill' [on Brexit]. 
BOOM! Brexit is on  
HM the Queen says the Government will build "widest possible consensus" on Brexit 
Is this the start of the long awaited Tory rebellion? ☞ No deal Brexit unacceptable, 30 Tory MPs tell Number 10  
Annoyed I can’t make this but glad @mikegalsworthy will be flying the flag for science! Cambridge folks, get out and shout about #Brexit!  
"The election was largely seen as a referendum on the first months of Donald J. Trump’s presidency."   
Ironic that a lot of the momentum behind Brexit was hostility towards minorities and now we have a minority government.#QueensSpeech 
The spin from the Left has already begun.  GA6 was NOT a referendum on Trump.  Sigh, this is why they lose. 
super happy that the folks who can't make a deal with 10 Irish MPs are the same ones who will be negotiating brexit 
Why does anyone care what Lord Heseltine thinks abt Brexit?He hasn't been in Gov since 1997+was sacked as Gov advisor in March #Irrelevant 
SNP Westminster Leader @IanBlackfordMP ahead of the #QueensSpeech on the SNP's priorities of halting a hard Brexit & ending austerity  
It would be more accurate to refer to Brexit without a defining adjective and to accept that "soft Brexit" is actually associate membership. 
Another business leader is saying that Brexit might not happen  
Conservative Party manifesto is in ruins, they have no majority, no DUP deal, no Brexit strategy & no compassion; mandate? #QueensSpeech 
No, it isn't gone. You forget that the Scottish Parliament voted to bring another referendum.We have a mandate, triple-locked. 
This Saturday @mikegalsworthy of @Scientists4EU will be speaking at our anti-#Brexit rally in Cambridge! Join us at  
BREXIT represents an overdue return to self government after decades of corrupt, anachronistic, failed EU policies.Come on Europe, join us.  
How does the Irish border affect the Brexit talks?  
Not a single #Tory MEP is in the room to hear the felt petitions of UK & EU citizens whose rights are put in jeopardy by Brexit #Shameful 
"Referendum on Trump?" 5 point win, more than POTUS! We're going to need a bigger train #MAGA 
Scotland is getting a minister to fight its corner on Brexit. The SNP has welcomed the news. LOL, just kidding.  
Already hitting NHS hard. Staff leaving in droves. Not valued, concerns not listened to, #Brexit &better prospects elsewhere #QueensSpeech 
May boasted she would be "bloody difficult" in Brexit talksTruth is she is bloody clueless and it is the UK that will pay the bloody price 
Referendum in Catalonia: sleepwalking into a crisisvia @IrishTimes 
Gingrich: Democrats said Georgia was a referendum on President Trump. They’re right – Trump won  
.@joannaccherry: Scotland must have a seat at Brexit negotiating table & Tory govt must look again at Scottish Govt proposals #QueensSpeech 
Boyer: "Brexit is about identity, not economics". Punto. 
When comedy is more sensible than reality... Brexit talks as a self-harm intervention.  
when the Queen stops brexit  
Brexit means absolutely nothing else gets done for best part of a decade.  
Just seen first draft of today's #QueensSpeech. Nothing about Brexit, it's mainly her hot takes on Olivia, Chris and Mike on #LoveIsland 
I see the Tories UK strategy on Brexit is being managed by General Meltchett from Blackadder Goes Forth.Jolly good! Carry on chaps...  
*Brexit Shambles*  
What UK science needs from Brexit is for Brexit to be cancelled.  
Britain's former spy chief on post-Brexit UK: 'If we can no longer help shape the world, others will do it for us'  
Hard or soft we don't mind.#Brexit #BritainoutofIreland 
BREXIT UPDATEDay 3: Still trying to find the British government.  
.@EuroLabour MEPs in @EP_Petitions hearing citizens voice their concerns about losing rights as a result of Brexit pic.twitter.com/K3fDMSaEDI 
This from @BenChu_ via @IndyVoices Btw:#Brexit headbangers have been shown the door. They just don't know it yet, 
RT if you think May has lost all authority  on Brexit and must go.  
ICYMI my graphic summary of the Brexit Irish border issue:  
#Brexit is likely to make people poorer, the governor of the Bank of England said. #StopBrexit #Remain 
The @UKLabour manifesto was  a clean Brexit manifesto. This is an attempt to reverse Party policy that won 40% of the vote.  
I promised to fight to protect people's jobs in Bristol. Today marks the start of a two year Brexit Parliament.  
The more I hear of brexit and the more I hear of the EU the more I am convinced that leaving was one of our best decisions ever. 
Brexit threatens jobs of 450 employees in Guildford who are building EU's satellites. Radio interview 42:30  
Vote down #QueensSpeech followed by Vote of No Confidence = new election, loss of Brexit mandate, 2nd EU vote & #REMAIN  
Here's what a £183m cut to your NHS looks like this year. The cost of Brexit this year is 54 times £183m.  
Brexit is already causing a social care crisis with European workers 'not feeling welcome'  
Labour turmoil over Brexit as dozens of MPs defy Corbyn to demand UK stays in single market  
#Britain is now ‘The laughing stock of #Europe’ – read the translation of @derbund’s damning appraisal of #Brexit:  
Interesting piece on how Brexit is draining resources of, and distorting the work of, the domestic civil service:  
Excellent thread explaining why we Remainers are so exasperated that media/public "surprised" Brexit is not going well.  
Last night a visiting friend asked why Brexit was necessarily a bad thing. I laid it out. "Shit," he said quietly, and started drinking. 
Poll finds that a majority of Britons now want a second referendum on the terms of the final #brexit deal  
#Brexit represents the triumph of ignorance over reason. Bigotry over openess. Fear over hope and it will diminish us for generations. 
HESELTINE: Proper Brexit dead, UK may not leave the EU at all.  
By supporting #Brexit Corbyn is protecting the Tory govt. By opposing Freedom of Movement he is betraying the young.#StopBrexit #Remain 
Why we must oppose and #StopBrexit RT Brexit Without Women. Lack of Female Voices as UK Negotiations With EU Begin… 
.@newtgingrich: Democrats said Georgia was a referendum on Trump. They’re right – Trump won  #GA06 
This the best depiction of #brexit negotiations I have seen to date. Unfortunately accurate!  
'On and on and on' IDS launches scathing attack on BBC's relentless 'Brexit bias'   
Now some of the treacherous worms who slid into the tory party are talking about sabotaging Brexit. Name then so we know who the enemy is. 
This is a Queen's Speech without the carriages, a majority, the DUP in tow, a clue about Brexit and a PM with credibility. 
David Davis, either a fool or a liar or both. Utterly unfit to hold political office or negotiate our future. #StopBrexit #Brexit #Remain 
Unlike @theSNP, anti Scottish independence @jeremycorbyn supports Trident & Brexit. He's no socialist.#iwillnevervotelabourever 
My piece on #Hospital. If the NHS is already this good imagine how incredible it'll be with that £350m Brexit money:  
The pound fell below $1.26 for the first time since Theresa May called the snap election  
Donald Trump was right when he called himself 'Mr Brexit' – both have become complete disasters  
'When many people pulled the lever to vote for Brexit they were imagining a return to Shropshire.'  
Political brexit debate on all sides seems to be shifting towards damage limitation. Here's one EEA-type proposal.  
750 civil servants are being moved to Brexit departments; there's no money to replace them. Brilliant.  
Mark Carney says Brexit will be a disaster for Britain  
Britain on its own will count for little on world stage- Former M16 chief on why Brexit hastens declining influence   
UK politics 2017-19 will be dominated by two trends: the chaos of Brexit paralysing government, & the chaos of government paralysing Brexit. 
In short, no money to pay to plan for Brexit. The hidden costs of taking back control.   
Brexit is the government’s biggest challenge. Formal talks begin next week despite post-election chaos  
Over 30 Tory MPs have told Government won't accept "No Deal" Brexit one former minister saying "No Deal is now dead"  
Damian Green effectively says government doesn't have time/resources to do anything except Brexit for next 2 years.. #r4today 
Brexit Without Women  
Good thread here including this graphic that captures much of the Brexit debate  
#Brexit risks huge damage to our economy and our body politic. Remaining doesn't. 
If Theresa May struggles to do a deal with people she agrees with on almost everything, what hope is there for Brexit? #dupdeal 
The UK has by far and away the best universities in Europe. Can it stay that way? #brexit #brexittalks #eurorank  
Effectively we have no government, and no leadership for Brexit either:  
As the effects of Hard Brexit - on jobs, inflation, wages, public finances, interest rates - become clear, the Tory Party will save itself. 
Labour's Manifesto Brexit section contains this coded promise of a Remain vote or a Final Deal Referendum. How will the Tories compete?  
Last Parliament MPs competed for an ever harder Brexit. This Parliament will seem them compete for an ever softer or no Brexit.  
Brexit can be reversed -- join the call on May to cancel Brexit if she can’t get a deal!  
One yr on, I can forgive people who voted for Brexit, but not those who continue to support it. Left or right, they are foolish or malign. 
Good meeting on Tuesday  afternoon with #EPP #Brexit group & then excellent meeting with always informative @GuyVerhofstadt . Dank u wel 
This is aiming way too low for our country. Brexit should be stopped by way of a 2nd referendum.  
Why do the Tories spout they need a strong economy to pay for public services, then continue with Brexit which will ruin our Economy? 
EU citizens in Britain to be asked to register for post-Brexit status  
Billions for #brexit. Peanuts for public services. Where's the campaign bus now? #wewillremain  
#brexit makes us poorer. Resources diverted from other areas sucking the life out of our country. #wewillremain 
52 Lab MPs went against whip on A50, 50 now stand for SM, there must be more, come on Labour MPs, trash brexit, it is for the few not many 
The anti-#brexit voices coming out now are welcome... but where the bloody hell have you been!? You all knew it was a bad idea a year ago. 
The UK and Brexit: The laughing stock of Europe  via @VoxEurop 
UK politics has become a very British farce  The Irish Times is probably the best source of non-UK #Brexit news! 
The deal that was supposedly in the bag two weekends ago.Just wait for May's Brexit deal-making.  
They argue that young people voted Labour to "stop the Tories in their tracks” over Brexit 
Ha. Good luck with that! UK Civil Service trying to shift 750 people to Brexit jobs. But no extra resources overall.  
Its understood there will be 8 Brexit related bills in Queens speech #maastrichtonstilts 
Carney and Hammond join forces on Brexit risk - An unnecessary risk!  
Donald Trump was right when he called himself 'Mr Brexit' – both have become complete disasters  
Whole Brexit thing is so ludicrous, yet no one will admit it + media slant keeps trying to persuade us that public still wants it... 
'On and on and on' IDS launches scathing attack on @BBC 's relentless 'Brexit bias'   
Tectonics: Labour & Tory MP groups on the move against #Brexit. Brexit is dying. 
For the last 2 months, democrats claimed this election was a bellwether & referendum against Trump.Trump's candidate won.#GA06 #Handel 
Government of chaos fails to form a coalition of chaos. A strong & effective opposition could have a field day. But they want Brexit too.  
If #Brexit is such a good idea, why is ALL the noise about damage limitation and nothing else? 
108Andy Wigmore who brought Cambridge Analytics to Brexit to  and Louise Mensch are lunching.  She is in the Mercer/Bannon/CA/SCL circle.  
YES! - @NewtGingrich -> #Democrats said #Georgia was a referendum on Trump. They’re right – #Trump won   
Hey, at least the Dems got one thing right...#GA06 WAS a referendum on @realDonaldTrump! #MAGA #OssoffGotHandeld 
104 Breitbart London’s shitlord Raheem Kassan (who is a Bannon protégé) is Louise’s friend. She worked with him on Brexit. pic.twitter.com/r0suv1M35Z 
Democrats said this election was a REFERENDUM on Trump's policies ...Well Then ...Trump WINS by 6 PointsA LANDSLIDE  
103 Mensch was an advocate of Brexit. She is in league with “the Bad Boys of Brexit” who then joined team Cruz and then Team Trump.  
Brexit Supporter Voted To “Take Back Control” But Can’t Name One EU Law  
What makes it even better is that Democrats wind up each one of these as a "Referendum On Trump!" ... and then they LOSE!  Every time. LOL! 
Liberals said GA special election was a referendum on our @POTUSThe loudest cheers accompanied w Trump chants was when Handel thanked him 
The government lacks a majority, so deciding what Brexit means will fall to Parliament—as it always should have done  
The Democratic Party said this would be a referendum on Trump, but it was a referendum on THEM!#GA06 #Ossoff 
That face u make when reality hits & u realize u wasted 6+ months of your life (& $32M) on a "referendum" that doesn't even exist. #GA06 
There you go Liberals. We had a referendum on Trump.... again. He won... again. Can you guys stop being obstructionists now? #GA06 
Soros "Brexit is a lose-lose proposition, harmful both to Britain and the European Union"  
4 special elections this year. Dems declared each a referendum on Trump. Trump won all 4. Getting tired of winning yet? 
"Referendum" on @POTUS #TrumpHECK YES IT WAS#America WANTS @realDonaldTrump agenda.Take NOTES  Dems & Republicans#MAGA #GA06 
This is a DISASTER for @TheDemocrats!They said this is referendum on Trump!They said they would win!& not only they lost, THEY LOST BIG! 
Let's watch as the #DNC & #CNN try to spin the #Handel win as nothing despite the fact they'd spin a loss as a "referendum" against #Trump 
We will NEVER forget how Labour betrayed us in Better Together and condemned us to this Tory Brexit omnishambles of little England. 
Bret Baier:  "Georgia win was really a referendum on Trump" Trump, Trump 
A week ago The New York Times was calling this a referendum on Trump.Now they say it's a near "humiliating upset"  
.@NYTimes said it themselves: "The race is largely seen as a referendum on the first months of @POTUS @realDonaldTrump's presidency."#GA06 
YESTERDAY on @CNN: Tomorrow's a "referendum on President Trump and his agenda"TONIGHT on @CNN: Dems "need to run better candidates"#GA06 
You people go and say this is a "Referendum on the Trump Presidency" and then @KarenHandel wins and now it wasn't about TRUMP???WHAT?????  
A Queen's Speech from a Government without  a majority, ministers without an electoral mandate & a #Brexit without a plan #ToryBritain 
A referendum on @realDonaldTrump? OK then.And a victory for a Conservative woman. BRAVO ZULU @karenhandel. 
Yeah, I guess the election wasn’t a referendum on Trump after all. LOL. 
So Much #Winning!! Looks like you were right Democrats, #GA06 is a referendum on @realDonaldTrump to keep putting #AmericaFirst! #Ossoff 
Can we build that wall now, Mr. President? #GA06 #mandate #referendum 
Today was a referendum vote on President Trump. The people voted and they chose Trump's candidate!#KarenHandel #GA06 
Still waiting on that "referendum" on Trump!  Democrats keep outspending the GOP AND LOSING!!! 
This is at least the 3rd "major referendum on Trump's presidency" the media has hyped...and lost.  
wait?! I thought this was a "referendum". #spin 
You think a few % points means anything? Handel eeked out a win in an area she should have dominated. Referendum, indeed. 
What referendum? Trump's candidate won. 
#KarenHandel #RalphNorman Wins are a referendum on Support for @POTUS!We will never get tired of winning! Wait for 2018 landslides!  
Dems said was a referendum on @POTUS. So be it. "Congrats to Handel, Projected Winner of GA's 5th House District"  
STOP @realDonaldTrump !!! It's TOO MUCH WINNING!!! I can't take anymore!!!  Referendum on our President?!?  ABSOLUTELY!   #GA06 
Everyone's going to try and turn this into a referendum because this media wants to instantly react and frame. 
So it's not a referendum on Trump anymore?  
Results of the "referendum" on the first 6 months of @realDonaldTrump's presidency are in. Congratulations to @KarenHandel. 
If #Ossoff loses, watch how the media spins the result as no longer a referendum on @realDonaldTrump 
Democrats: let's figure out how NOT to spin this as referendum on @realDonaldTrump. Funny how fast things change. #MAGA 
Dems now 0-4 in all their "referendum" special elections,but hey there's a bright side.. they tell me they're 4-4 in moral victories. #maga 
So, now that Ossoff lost, will Dems and media decide #GA06 was NOT a "HUGELY SIGNIFICANT" referendum on @realDonaldTrump? 
Waiting with bated breath to see how the referendum on @realDonaldTrump comes out in #GeorgiaSixth pic.twitter.com/qCuJgmRBvN 
Bad idea on Democrats’ part to make the Georgia race a referendum on Trump. 
CNN was absolutely right - the GA6 was indeed a referendum on @realDonaldTrump. Congratulations, Mr. President! 
Democrats: how do we now NOT spin this into a referendum on @realDonaldTrump. Funny how things change so quickly. 
Fake News media said this race was a referendum on Trump. What's the new story going to be?#GA06 
Dear @TheDemocrats ,If it's Handel 52 and Ossoff 47. Is this a referendum on the Democratic Party in 2018? Or never mind.  
still laughing.. $23 million spent on #Ossoff. a referendum on @realDonaldTrump #CryMore Congrats @karenhandel @RIRepublicans 
Breaking News:Referendum on Trump blows up in democrats face as Patriots unite... Handel Wins... Trump Wins... America Wins... #GA06 
I have a feeling that the media are suddenly going to pretend the Georgia Special Election was never a referendum on @realDonaldTrump. #GA06 
So...is GA06 still a referendum on the Trump administration or are we not doing that anymore? 
#GA06 was a referendum on @POTUS Trump, and it's looking like America highly approves! #MAGA#LaughingMyOssoff  
On phone w/ @newtgingrich. He says, "This is a referendum on if enough money can invent a person to win a special election." 
UK PM May says will consult widely on Brexit, but Britain will leave EU  
I'm going to be in the UK on the 4th of July. Should I make a t-shirt that says "Original Brexit" and has a picture of the flag on it? 
My guess is MSM will no longer call this a referendum on trump? MAGA all day, everyday 
James O'Brien Has Proof That Politicians Know Brexit Will Be A Disaster - LBC @LBC 
Referenced throughout the general election, Churchill has also been invoked on both sides of the Brexit debate  
Brexit is a lose lose situation says George Soros  
Angela Merkel to Europe on the Brexit talks: 'Let’s stay together, let’s not divide from each other.'  
How is that referendum on Trump going?!?!? #GA6 #MAGA 
Based on how much $$ has been pumped in & how hard the "referendum on Trump" narrative has been pushed, this would be a YUGE Trump win  
Before the hottakes on #GA06 + Trump start rolling, I'd like to note: THIS IS NOT A REFERENDUM ON TRUMP. It's more about health care. 
Brexit negotiations day 1:'Can we have our weather back pls' 
Nun-huh, we're trying to OVERTLY overturn the result of the EU referendum. Am I supposed to be embarrassed about this? Cos, er, I'm not.  
Theresa May: "We will ensure Britain has strong and stable leadership"*Talks failing with DUP, no Brexit plan*Me:  
If #Brexit demonstrates anything it is that Westminster parties place very little value on research and knowing what they're talking about. 
I think she should stay despite being wrongly advised re the recent election and get on with implementing the peoples wishes re Brexit 
By the end of #Brexit negotiations if will be absolutely obvious that staying in EU is only sensible option. What a waste of time & money. 
I remember another election that was supposed to be a referendum on Trump 
Theresa May makes a confident start to Brexit negotiations, European press agree:  
He's surely a remainer at heart and it's difficult actually to identify any genuine benefits of Brexit.  
HEAVER: Brexit is about to make Britain the envy of Europe – Westmonster                  #ma4t 
Europeans have rejected #EU's approach on economy and borders. #Brexit is about to make Britain the envy of Europe.  
Now a faction in both Tory & Labour party against hard BrexitIs this where we see Corbyn's hard left and Tory hard right join forces on EU?  
I'm sorry this is not a referendum it's a house election everyone has turned into a circusall politics is local  
I won't, I've made that clear. And @LibDems are a #Remain party. Voters need space to realise Brexit not the 'break free nirvana' promised  
50+ Labour politicians call for UK to reject extreme Brexit and keep benefits of staying in the Single Market  
The negotiations in Brussels already clearly show that #Brexit has given the EU 27 more power over us, and Britain less influence over them 
I feel as a personal heartbreak. Because my own family, and so many I love, would not be here in #Brexit Britain  
#Brexit is a moronically stupid loss of influence. 
What we are losing. Those fine women, men and families leaving the UK because of the narrow bigotry of #Brexit  
Remember Labour left a note for the Tories? Well, there is no money left for Brexit. We just can't afford it.  
Pleased to be supporting this- Londoners (and many others) have  made clear a hard Brexit is not what they want  
Brexit: The Tories don't seem to have the first clue about their objectives and how to reach them  
No Brexit deal unacceptable, 30 Tory MPs tell Number 10  
Ireland won't sign Brexit deal unless NI peace deal is protected  
Labour politicians join forces to fight against Tories' hard Brexit  
.@Daily_Express is deluded if it thinks that @LibDems will prop up the Tories and UKIP fuelled May. Fight #Brexit  
BBC News Carney and Hammond join forces on Brexit risk - In parallel with Ken Clarke and Lord Heseltine #stopbrexit 
With #brexit looming, British journalist decides not to risk his visa for career change  
How many Irish wish they were still in UK for "influence" in London, so they could be taken out of EU against their will? :)) #Scot #Brexit 
How do you respond with humility to message sent by electorate whilst pursuing the same Brexit which didn't get you a majority govt? #May 
Low productivity, low skills, poor infrastructure; #Brexit will worsen Britain's home-grown problems #StopBrexit 
If Cameron hoped that referendum would end fighting in the Tory party, he was wrong. Again. And again. And again. 
Tomorrow's column: Tory leadership crisis as tension between Brexit and need to appeal to generation Remain.  
The message it sent is: we do not give you a mandate for your Brexit. Please: respond with humility to that.  
BREAKING News:Theresa May LiedTories LiedElection Manifesto ShreddedVoters DupedBut Brexit is still on???!. 
Voice of the Mirror: May day over Brexit as PM proves politically bankrupt  
This is the @spectator: a magazine that backed Brexit; now says we need EFTA to avoid "disaster". Idiocy.  
.30 Tory MPs?That'd sink the Tory's hard Brexit then . 
Is Brexit dead? Lord Heseltine says leaving the EU “is very much open to question now” #newsnight 
It is time the @Conservatives started listening. #Brexit is bad for the economy and bad for Britain and it's people. #StopBrexit 
“The idea of a hard Brexit is not credible” - Lord Heseltine tells @maitlis #newsnight 
Hard to imagine a more ideologically corrupt Govt. No mandate, majority or morality. Bent on forcing a Brexit wanted and needed by so few. 
Vince Cable "It is essential to remain in the single market & customs union”or Ed Davey "I will work tirelessly to stop or reverse Brexit" 
In the hard sense, Brexit is dead...very much open to question [whether we'll leave the EU]: Heseltine on @BBCNewsnight 
No Brexit deal unacceptable, 30 Tory MPs tell Number 10  
"Idea of hard Brexit not credible, no majority for it in Parliament, we have a split cabinet, a split country." Heseltine on @BBCNewsnight 
Brexit Negotiators Assemble.....#Cornish #Brexit  
Polls tighten, rain pours in Georgia's 'Trump referendum'  pic.twitter.com/6zruoWm8Di 
Great that we are hearing support for Soft Brexit. However, that's still Brexit. So join me in calling for #NoBrexit  
Theresa May says "over 80 per cent of the electorate" backed Brexit. Yes, but not the Tories' Brexit.  
The DUP tail wagging the Tory dog is barking. If May can't collar 10 Unionist MPs, how will she bring to heel 27 EU leaders for Brexit? 
Proud to have my name on this statement from @UKLabour MPs supporting Single Market membership & against Tories' extreme disastrous #Brexit  
Hard Brexit is dead, says Hezza. Will we even leave the EU? "I'm not sure- that is very much open to question."  
Good! >50 Labour politicians say voters backed Labour in election in order to stop May's hard Brexit in its tracks.  
Wednesday's DAILY TELEGRAPH: May clings on to Brexit lifeline #tomorrowspaperstoday #bbcpapers 
Top Row: Labour's well qualified & experienced TeamBottom Row: Tories. I know who I'd rather in charge of #Brexit!#European #Football 
Conservatives are planning a defenestration of worker's rights post Brexit. This is the 'red tape' that they despise along with fire safety!  
'You haven't left EU if you don't leave Single Market' IDS shuts down soft Brexit dream  
.Seeing into the heart of Brexit darkness from @fotoole "If government is NOT here to help, why not destroy it?" 
A second referendum would almost certainly have a Remain result. What a total distraction and waste of energy David Cameron set in motion. 
OF COURSE Scotland will be represented in brexit by an unlected Lord. 
Brexit is a mistake. At last an MP says plainly that he will work to stop or reverse it. @EdwardJDavey will get my vote for @LibDems leader. 
Brexit won't happen once people realise the damage, says Lord Bilimoria. How would you feel if we cancelled Brexit? #IanOnLBC 
How others see us (2) : More ridicule heaped on #Brexit #Britain 
Brexit benefits, in reverse order.10. None 9. Zilch8. Nada7. Bugger all6. Not a fucking thing 5. Sod bloody all4. Fuck all....... 
Hmm, worrying. Maybe he's been distracted by pondering reality & data rather than joining BoJo on the fantasy Brexit marketing roadshow.  
It seems to me that we all know brexit is a colossal mistake but the government is forging ahead to not lose face, they can't admit failure. 
This may seem odd with the Tories seemingly getting their way on Brexit but I think Brexit is the beginning of the end of the Tories. 
Feb 21: Lord Kerr, author of Article 50, ridicules the Government’s claim that it is irrevocable #Brexit #StopBrexit 
GA-6 referendum not just on Trump but also on voting rights  
Mass "enthusiasm among Latinos, who see the election as a referendum on Pres Trump & his anti-immigrant policies"  
Leaked document shows ‘secret’ government studies into impact of ‘hard’ Brexit  via @LondonEconomic 
V interesting new Labour group set up calling to remain in Single Market with 50+ MPs, Peers, MEPs #Brexit  
As Labour politicians, we reject a hard-right Brexit, and defend the single market  
."Brexit, we continue to be told by its champions, is a golden opportunity to make a 'bonfire of red tape'". 
TONIGHT: Is Brexit dead? Lord Heseltine says leaving the EU “is very much open to question now” -  22:30 on BBC Two  
.Brinkwomanship as we stand on the Brexit cliff edge. 
This is what Brexit feels like:  
Can anyone lend me a copy of Paul Mason's Daily Brexit Bulletin just so I can get up to speed on how things are going? 
Tomorrow: Brexit is already causing social care crisis, as EU nationals tell recruiters they 'won't work somewhere they don't feel welcome'  
Dear Brexit,I'm fed up with you. Fed up with your name,what you represent,the lies upon which you were born & you haven't even happened yet 
My big concern is while everyone is distracted by Brexit and the DUP, the sweeping NHS cuts are not hitting the headlines. #NHSbreakingpoint 
Isn't this how have Brexit negotiations started? UK weakened without a government & plan...Stopping  #Brexit seems the only plausible move!  
Billionaire investor George Soros says Britain may reverse Brexit  
Why are we borrowing £13 BILLION A Year to then give it away in Foreign Aid Whilst public Debt is growing at it fastest rate £1.680 Trillion 
What UK science needs from #Brexit: @JeremyFarrar in @thetimes today  
UK car industry risks ‘permanent’ damage from Brexit ‘cliff edge’, trade body warns  
why GA-6 is really a referendum on im-peach-ment  
Cut Foreign Aid To Keep Bobbies On Beat, Head Of Met Police Federation Suggests - LBC @LBC 
Universities are the antidote to UK’s Brexit challenges – UUK sets out 5 priorities ahead of exit negotiations  
Brexit Won’t Happen Once People Realise The Damage: Lord Bilimoria - LBC  @campbellclaret @trevdick @smburningham1 
Brexit is feeling like we know we made a bad decision but we're going to power through anyway. Brexit is like when I bought khaki shorts. 
How others see us (1) : #Brexit #Britain the laughing stock of Europe: via @VoxEurop 
Angela Merkel wants the EU's priority in Brexit talks to be on keeping the bloc unified  
Brexit voters are realising what they voted for everyday...2017 Q1 GDP:Germany   0.6%Eurozone   0.5%UK   0.2%  
You know I am bored senseless with the #Brexit negotiations and all the shadow boxing. Just tell them we're off and we're keeping our cash. 
People who think Only Fools & Horses is the greatest sitcom ever made #Brexit 
Fine. The UK will not sign off on a soft border unless commit to signing off on Brexit.  
READ | Our CEO @LizBilney on why panic over a 'no deal' Brexit scenario is not only overblown but plain wrong.  
EU nationals are already legally in UK and came here in good faith; Brexit mess not our fault, so shouldn't apply same principles. 5/ 
I stressed that the referendum is peaceful, democratic means to allow the people of Kurdistan to determine their future on their own terms. 
"The fact is that Brexit is a lose-lose proposition, harmful both to UK & EU"Wrong! We're getting unicorns! Fact! 
The @bankofengland has started surveying key British business decision makers. Here's what they reckon about Brexit  
James O'Brien Has Proof That Politicians Know Brexit Will Be A Disaster - LBC @LBC 
What should the United Kingdom do next? #Brexit  
Quarter of £1m-plus homes being sold in secret, fearing that Brexit London's house prices are falling 
So, a British PM who can't negotiate to form a government with a 10-seat regional party wants to negotiate Brexit. Hmmm.  
Billionaire George Soros says Britain will be forced to reverse Brexit decision  
Carney, Hammond and the BBC seem to be relaunching Project Fear today. In reality only 'Hard Brexit' can rid the UK of costly EU red tape. 
Mark Carney just confirmed Brexit will be a disaster for Britain  
My cartoon - #Brexit in a nutshell #DavidDavis 
Queens Speech draft:Greetings to everyone in the CommonwealthExcept you ScotlandYou can get back in your box & eat up your Brexit Cereal  
Can somebody please save this country from the Tory Clowns ? #brexit 
*Brexit Explained*  
What's your Euref #brexit status? RT please 
Now is surely the time to bring the Brexit falsehoods to justice  
He's not Nigel Pearson but he's Hard Brexit nonetheless. #WelcomeAppleton 
Chairman & CEO of @Total @PPouyanne: "Brexit is absolutely not a good thing for anyone." #globalconversation  
Indeed. The squeeze is on. #brexit makes you poorer. #wewillremain 
People are still angry at the EU elite. Brexit is its last chance to show it can change, writes @asabenn #Premium 
Let's say it again, postpone the Queen's speech, but cancel Brexit.  
Brexit has pushed UK GDP growth to the bottom of the table in 2017. Uk now below Greece!  
Theresa May just walked into Brexit talks with the confidence of a kid tiptoeing in school after his dad was exposed for bumming a horse  
Georgia's special election is a referendum on Trump  pic.twitter.com/jVwiMSmQfw 
'You DON'T accept the result!' Remainer Umunna berated during FURIOUS Brexit clash  
Government finally developing policy on EU citizens post-Brexit, but the key question is what post-Brexit status they'll be registering for.  
Expecting a vote for #Brexit not to make you poorer, is like chewing on a Scotch Bonnet chilli in the hope it won't make your eyes water! 
"To win, Labour must..... stand up for the values of our voters"Overwhelmingly, Remainers. Time to fight Brexit. 
“Soft” and “Hard” Brexit Terms Obsolete  
#Labour MPs & MEPs reject a hard-right #Brexit, call to stay in #SingleMarket@SDoughtyMP @ChukaUmunna @RCorbettMEP 
Any broadcaster using the words soft and hard Brexit is misleading its viewers and revealing its anti-Brexit agenda 
The UK and Brexit: The laughing stock of Europe | VoxEurop.eu: European news, cartoons and press reviews  
Country is in chaos as the govt fumbles Brexit, but my God the standards have fallen at Ascot and that is front page news for BBC!  
#Iran opposes holding talks of a referendum to partition #Iraq and considers those who fuel the idea as opponents of Iraq's independence. 
NBC, ABC Adopt Dem Talking Points, Hype Georgia Special Election as ‘Referendum’ on Trump (VIDEO)  
I see the £ has dropped again since Davis started the #brexit negotiations. Wonder how many billions UK pensionrs in EU have lost in last yr 
Northern Ireland emerges as the thorniest issue in Brexit talks  
The Chancellor has provoked a rift with the Prime Minister after distancing himself from Theresa May over Brexit #SNT 
'On and on and on' Iain Duncan Smith launches scathing attack on BBC over Brexit coverage  
Chancellor Philip Hammond warns: We must avoid Brexit 'cliff edge'  
Havard Nordtveit played 15 games, was lazy, slow & mediocre yet he got a move to a Champions League club. His agent should negotiate Brexit 
Turning up the anti-Brexit noise  
EU citizens in Britain to be asked to register for post-Brexit status  
Politics and monetary policy come together as Philip Hammond and Mark Carney join forces  
What type of Brexit is the UK government team heading for? 
Because of this principled group of Labour politicians, it is nonsense to claim the Labour vote as a vote for Brexit  
That's encouraging. But why not just say #Brexit is a mistake? That's what Hammond is implying. 
Is Labour fudging its position on Brexit and the customs union? @EvanHD puts it to @Keir_Starmer 
#Brexit will make Britain worse offTHIS IS NOT NEWS I hate Brexit and want it stopped. Today.  
Tide is turning vs. #Brexit post #GE2017. The level of despair amongst #Remainers is being replaced with intelligent, incisive sarcasm! 
General Election result changed everything. There is no mandate for a Tory hard Brexit  
Britain loses its first battle with the European Union over the timetable for Brexit talks  
 DUP point to a lack of negotiating skills on the Tory side. Doesn't bode well for #brexit 
Soros says Britain nearing tipping point, may reverse Brexit  
Great, but it needs Corbyn to stand up and fight with them. Except he won't, because he wants Brexit. Sorry, kids.  
Labour politicians join forces to fight against Tories' hard Brexit  
If doing a deal with the DUP is hard, how are Brexit negotiations going to be? I despair at this sorry crowd.  
I want @NicolaSturgeon to say that given the state of UK government's Brexit negotiations she is more determined than ever #Scotref is right 
At the election I promised Walthamstow that I would fight against hard brexit and for membership of the single...  
Proud to have signed this by Labour MPs, MEPs & Peers: we reject a hard-right Brexit and the poverty it would create  
And this is a mere bagatelle compared to Brexit negotiations.  
Chaos. And they say they can negotiate Brexit? 
Call me old fashioned, but I'm guessing he'd like to cancel it. I wouldn't blame him. #brexit  via @telegraphnews 
Stages of Brexit1) sunlit uplands of freedom2) German car makers3) no one said it would be easy4) poverty, pah! Taste the sovereignty 
Labour voted through hard brexit. 62% of Scotland voted to remain. Corbyn does not speak for us. End of. 
#Ossoff is a referendum on your illegitimate & failing presidency.#SendAMessage#FlipThe6th#VoteYourOssoff#GA06#TrumpRussiaLies..   
This is welcome news. @jeremycorbyn needs to back this now too. Jobs are at risk from this divisive Tory Brexit.  
This may now be the only way out that doesn't lead to disaster: #CancelArticle50, then hold a 2nd referendum.  
No majority, no Brexit strategy, no policies, no DUP deal - Tories' #QueensSpeech 
50 Labour politicians form new parliamentary group to oppose hard Brexit  
The only conceivable reason why the Tory right are so desperate to get #Brexit is to create a low-tax, low-regulation, low-welfare Britain. 
Mark Carney says Brexit will be a disaster for Britain  
16-17 year olds were excluded from the #Brexit referendum vote, not for constitutional reasons, but to appease the Tory right!.#StopBrexit 
The British people voted for Brexit in a democratic referendum, Gov should honour this in order to take back full control & trade globally. 
Hunting, really? No re-run of #Brexit vote or #IndyRef,but #FoxHunting. Yes, Tories want to take us backwards. Say NO! #ToriesOut #MayMustGo 
The Queen's Speech marks a shift in favour of a softer Brexit  
The DUP, the bottom of the political barrel, are saying May's government are shit negotiators just as they start negotiating Brexit? pic.twitter.com/KUrS5kEsca 
He's so right, when will Brexit government recognise the blindingly obvious?Brexit is madness.  
I am one of 50+ Labour politicians rejecting Tory hard Brexit & defending the importance of Single Market membership  
Very positive meeting with @MichelBarnier today - he has real knowledge of complexity of Irish vulnerability on Brexit + will work with us.  
In which @Tony_Robinson RTs a FT piece on Brexit with a Blackadder reference, and my year is made.  
Who knew that committing to an outcome before entering into negotiations was so fraught with peril? #DUP #Brexit 
"We reject a hard-right Brexit and defend the single market" | statement by over 50 @UKLabour parliamentarians  
 SNP Westminster Leader, Ian Blackford, on tomorrow's Queen's Speech, which must bring an end to austerity & a change of course on #Brexit.  
IDS: “Well Cathy, I just wish you or somebody else would define for me what a hard Brexit is, or a soft Brexit. They are ridiculous terms.”  
On further delays: DUP-Tory deal is confidence and supply arrangement. Brexit is most complex demerger in post-war history... 
It says something that the DUP can mock May's negotiating capability the day after Brexit talks opened and she has no choice but to take it.  
#Brexit was a badass lie. A con trick. A madness of xenophobia and prejudice that induced a form of mass delusion. Such is the power of hate 
Opinion: Here's a path that would avoid a Brexit calamity  
I've got an idea for how DExUK can achieve their very desirable goal, perfectly easily: ditch #Brexit.  
Still so apt... #FirstGifComesUpForYourName - Brexit  
The real Tory #Brexit:Leading Tory Brexiter Daniel Hannan rubbishing the #NHS on Fox News in 2009 #StopBrexit 
A very useful list of #LeaveLies by @RCorbettMEP #Brexit #StopBrexit #Remain 
The Tory party is riddled by incompetence, muddle, fanaticism & greed. It needs at least a decade out of power to sort itself out.#Brexit 
35% of Brits think other parties should be included in Brexit negotiations on an equal basis as the Conservatives  
Even forming a #CoalitionOfChaos seems to be beyond this government. And we rely on it to negotiate a #Brexit deal! 
DUP say 'don't take us for granted'.Chancellor's Brexit not on message.Poor Theresa, it's all going pear-shaped! 
Just satire? #Brexit #GE2017 #WeakAndWobbly #ResignTheresaMay #ToriesOut #BrexitShambles 
I'm gonna have to rethink this, perhaps Brexit isn't as bad as I thought it was. #Joke 
Defeated by the heat, Michel Barnier resorts to interpretive dancing to explain what the EU wants as a Brexit deal.  
In Luxemburg today at the Gen. Aff. Council #GAC for an exchange on Brexit negotiations. Happy to meet w Irish foreign min. @simoncoveney 
Yes! You can want a Clean #Brexit AND be a social liberal on #gay + #women's issues.My article beyond the £-wall. 
So sounds like DUP deal may well fall over ... Meanwhile government with no majority is conducting Brexit negotiations ... #BananaRepublic 
May's talks with DUP not going well #bbcnewsAccording to DUP spokesperson."If she can't negotiate a C &S - how can she negotiate #Brexit" 
"Here's some stuff I wanna do. If I don't get knifed by my colleagues. And I do a deal with the DUP. With capacity left over after Brexit."  
It’s not just the UK that will benefit from Brexit. The EU will too:  
Independence is the best antidote to Brexit, but I'm going to a Franco Scottish wedding soon and may demand political asylum till Indyref2  
Britain’s tax avoiding media tycoons want #Brexit to protect their wealth from tax authorities #StopBrexit #Remain 
Such a suspicious attitude to being bilingual in Britain when it's the norm in most of the world. Probably explains Brexit. 
May developed our Brexit negotiation strategy. Remember, that's why she couldn't do any pre-election debates? She was too busy with that.  
Now that we've started #Brexit negotiations, can we start a campaign to suspend, without pay, our MEPs? 
Our vice-chair @RCorbettMEP argues that we're still no wiser as to what the government hopes to achieve from #Brexit  
#Brexit is a policy deliberately designed to make Britain poorer and weaker than it would have been.#StopBrexit #Remain 
@Feorlean meets European Parliament's Brexit lead @GuyVerhofstadt in Brussels . 
 was right calling himself 'Mr Brexit'—both have become complete disasters by a similar arrogance and incompetence 
DUP v experienced negotiators w/May over a barrel. 10 days after #10 said deal, still no deal. Lucky EU #brexit team can't read English...  
If the Government can't negotiate effectively with the DUP it doesn't give you much hope for Brexit deal does it?  
she is trying her very best to pass Brexit to Labour 
HA!Phillip Hammond's *Mansion House* speech.A straight *lift* out of the Labour Party playbook !Jobs and the Economy#Brexit 
Astonishing? We're still waiting to hear a single tangible benefit from Brexit, that isn't the racist fantasies of stopping immigration....  
Corbyn chaos! McDonnell demands Tories STAND DOWN let Labour negotiate Brexit . McDonnell is off his bloody headhttp://shr.gs/AEKPubf 
You Tory supporters do know that the Tories are going to completely screw-up Brexit? I mean, you do realize this? 
#PakCricketAnotherWani The win of Pakistan Cricket Team has proven that if a referendum is held in Kashmir. Pakistan will win.  
HEAVER: Brexit is about to make Britain the envy of Europe – Pew Research | Westmonster        #ma4t 
The party that can't even negotiate a successful deal with the DUP wants to negotiate a Brexit deal with the EU.  
I wondered who'd be the first columnist mad enough to link the #Grenfell tragedy to Brexit. I should have guessed.  
This was the deal that May said was in the bag nearly some two weeks ago.Imagine what Brexit will be llke.  
Donald Trump was right when he called himself 'Mr Brexit' – both have become complete disasters  
Corbyn must manage expectations of young who voted for him hoping for a softer line on Brexit or no Brexit. Better still, engage with them. 
Labour & Philip Hammond both want "a Brexit that puts jobs (& prosperity) first". That's also known as an 'anti-matter Brexit' 
@MartinSchulz: Brexit is “the result of a shameful campaign by unscrupulous populists relying on fake news”  
CNN reporting an OSSOFF win in Georgia will be a referendum on Trump. Get out and show them they are WRONG Georgia. We are counting on you 
Bank of England chief expertly trolls Boris Johnson in a dire warning on Brexit  
'If you think experts are expensive you should try employing amateurs'. (Red Adair's prescient comment on Brexit negotiations)  
At last. A stage 3 debate in the Scottish Parliament. Your actual legislation.  And no mention of Westminster or Brexit yet! #thedayjob 
Brexit will make UK poorer.  
Over half of Britons don't think Theresa May can handle Brexit  
The boss of Rolls-Royce has called for "as little change as possible" after Brexit to minimise impact on business  
You are a year too late!!  "#Brexit will make Britain worse off, Bank of England Governor Mark Carney says"  
Remainers will keep trying to reverse Brexit,keep talking the UK down. Brexiteers know different.The UK can suceed & flourish after Brexit  
The boss of one of Britain's biggest manufacturing employers warns against a hard #Brexit  
For the benefit of all #Brexit negotiators I've been putting together a list of diplomatic excuses from the sixteenth century. 
IT'S HAPPENING NOW #NNAMDIKANU HOUSE IN UMUAHIA THE LEADER OF BIAFRANS IPOB,NO REFERENDUM NO ELECTION ALL OVER BIAFRA LAND #FREEBIAFRA 
"Instead of re-fighting the Referendum, wouldn't it best if Plaid Cymru MPs fought to get the best deal possible for Wales". @UKIP #UKIP 
.@willie_rennie responds to reports that Nicola Sturgeon will deliver a referendum statement. 
EU's Barnier explains how Brexit divorce and trade talks will not be parallel but also kind of parallel  
“Soft” and “Hard” Brexit Terms Obsolete  
In a year's time it'll be worse. Easy to imagine the demands for a referendum on the final deal being unstoppable. 
Brexit story so far: We've come to negotiate Here's the deal What?  Red line! RED LINE! Shut up! Just kidding. We'll take it 
The debate changes slowly, so you don't notice it, but Brexit is now almost exclusively about damage limitation rather than opportunity. 
Imagine if you saw a video from last year of Johnson or Gove doing their 'Brexit will fix everything' speech today. They'd look deranged. 
Good spot by @MichaelPDeacon - Britain's 2 top policymakers spoke today and neither cited a single benefit of Brexit  
What Brexit, Trump, and the tide of nationalism really mean for business.  @PankajGhemawat 
My Brexit predictions. 1) Skilled EU citizens will leave. I understand this already happening In universities & hospitals across the UK. 
2017: "Our Brexit deal will mean more jobs + fewer immigrants"2019: "We've agreed that Britain is now a semi-autonomous German dependency" 
"If The Zoo Refuses To Give Us Date For Referendum, There’ll Be No Election In Biafraland" – Kanu Replies Osinbajo  
If the Government believes that Brexit will make British people "poorer or less secure" then failure 2stop Brexit would surely be negligent 
Brexit talks begin pic.twitter.com/D7qV3ejoqY 
Thank you to ex Sabbatical Officer @SebDance for talking to us about the crushing realisation of #Brexit and 'that' sign! #MCRtoEUParliment 
"We'll soon know whether #GA06 was a referendum on the Trump administration or a meaningless sideshow where the Democrats got lucky" 
Brexit Day 2. Top negotiator David Davis has got the EU exactly where they want him. 
1/4 Great honour to have been Min of State for European Affairs for last 3 yrs, representing Ireland in Brussels & EU capitals & on #Brexit 
I've a funny feeling it will be "a vote on independence once the terms of Brexit are known". 
#UKAutomotive has made its position on #Brexit clear today:  
Wheels starting to come off Tory Brexit agenda - @M_AndersonSF 
EU already said (April) it wants a reciprocal guarantee for EU & UK citizens' rights. Its "first priority"  #Brexit 
Brexit fears see 254 per cent rise in number of British applications for French nationality  
#Brexit talks launched: Would UK election shock and terrorism impact negotiations? #hungparliament 
#EU Parliament hears from expert opinion that #ECJ jurisdiction in UK cannot occur post #Brexit 
#Brexit Secretary David Davis said on Monday that Brexit negotiations were “off to a promising start”:  
Soros is an economic terrorist and is now threatening to overturn Brexit. We should take his threats seriously.  
A government in disarray frozen in the headlights of the oncoming Brexit disaster  
We laughed, but Trump was right when he called himself 'Mr Brexit'. Both are complete messes  
#Brexit will make Britain worse off, Bank of England Governor Mark Carney confirms | The Independent  
Procurement + finance already have long-term effects.EU Comm charm offensive since Jan will place firms in policy landscape post-Brexit 4/4 
Most investors see a torturous road ahead to Brexit, according to a Barclays poll  
What does #Brexit mean for the the UK's seas? Come to UCL in London on 28 June 1830 for a debate I'm chairing 
Soros says Britain nearing tipping point, may reverse Brexit  
Brexit options:  
Brexit In Reverse? by George Soros via @ProSyn 
“If The Zoo Refuses To Give Us Date For Referendum, There’ll Be No Election In Biafraland” – Kanu Replies Osinbajo  
By our seat-by-seat analysis, Brexit was responsible for about half of the national swing from the Tories to Labour  
All eyes are on Georgia during the first major referendum on Trump's presidency  pic.twitter.com/1SSSJpJvGt 
.@M_AndersonSF @LNBDublin attending the AFCO meeting on "Brexit:Constitutional challenges and implications"at the European Parliament today  
There was no talk of 'hard' or 'soft' Brexit before the Ref vote. It was made clear that leaving the EU meant leaving the single market. 
Excellent piece by @IanDunt trying to dig under Labour's deliberately nebulous Brexit policy to help them find a way 
Labour Plotting to Frustrate Brexit Legislation  
The Brexit Sec headed to BrusselsTo show the EU how he hustles,But promptly gave wayThe very first dayWhen Barnier flexed a few muscles. 
As the negotiations go on & absurdity of what we are doing becomes clearer the pressure to stop Brexit will become overwhelming.  
BREXIT: Daily Mail readers are sticking their fingers in their ears and yelling “lalalala.”  
More than that ... serious people are now openly mocking #Brexit 
Mark Carney says Brexit will be a disaster for Britain    
A huge change in the landscape - as yet largely unremarked upon - that no-one serious today is still arguing that Brexit is better.  
Mrs Cobbit was negotiating with Mr Mayor to leave the Market Sq.#brexit  
Now you can weep. Those who voted to remain were right.Mark Carney says Brexit will be a disaster for Britain  
And to think it hasn't even happened yet. I sense after Brexit, the UK is going to make Greece look affluent.  
‘Cocky’ Britain caves to EU's #Brexit demands on day 1, gets trolled on social media.  
In the U.S., the Georgia vote is a referendum on President Trump and more:  via @ReutersTV pic.twitter.com/FnhlZL4Zjg 
Editorial in major Swiss paper slams Brexit. Says UK has fallen from grace and Govt now a bad joke. 
The best critique of Hard Brexit was written in 1979...  
It's clear there is a huge divide between the elites and the people across the EU. The UK and Brexit lead the way 
Unless the Tories change tack & ditch brexit  they are soon going to be nothing more than a footnote to history  
Britain's former spy chief on post-Brexit UK: 'If we can no longer help shape the world, others will do it for us'  
Most are weary of austerity & Brexit discussion.Unfortunately, Brexit is just starting.Fortunately, it can be jettisoned at any time.  
#starmer @labour are you listening? 2/3rds of your party voted #Remain #The only good brexit is NO brexit #StopBrexitNow 
When @mrjamesob asked this Brexit voter to name one EU law he didn't like, well, he simply couldn't  
Brexit negotiations  
I wonder how long before significant numbers of ppl start realising it would be better if we just cancelled Brexit. 
Hammond is saying very different things about what Brexit should be compared to Brexit minister, Davis - what a bloody shambolic mess 
While govt is in chaos and Brexit talks are headline news, the DoH are still carrying out plans to close local A&Es and create US-style ACOs 
Georgia race could be a referendum on the GOP’s massively unpopular health care bill  pic.twitter.com/nSEYfTReUr 
Soros says Britain nearing tipping point, may reverse Brexit  
This week's moan is about the lack of positive press around the fact that the Brexit negotiations have started and on time   
Politicians have a duty to try to improve the life chances of the people. Mrs May must pluck up the courage to say Brexit will worsen them. 
'You don't accept the referendum result!' - @isaby tells @ChukaUmunna 
#Tories  Steamrollering ahead on Barmy Brexit while #Labour mouths platitudes about a "Jobs Brexit".No Mandate, No Opposition from Corbyn. 
#Brexit: UK caves in to EU’s demand to settle divorce before future trade on first day of talks  
When your parents' generation voted for Thatcher, Blair and Brexit, you know you can't put your future in their hands.   
"Brexit Dads". You know the type: Balding, lonsdale/tapout sleeveless. Drinks carling. Perpetually dressed for a BBQ that never comes. 
Germany’s Schulz Says No Brexit Would Be Best Outcome of Talks 
Dear @theresa_may Genuine questionCan you please tell me why we are doing #BrexitSincerelySarahPs Please read the Emperor's New Clothes  
How you could keep your rights as an EU citizen after Brexit - @JillEvansMEP @Plaid_Cymru 
"The easy option of playing to the domestic media will not work" @davidallengreen sharp on the foolishness of Brexit by headline...  
Angela Merkel tells German industry to hold firm as Brexit talks begin  
To be honest, the Monty Python team could probably do a better job negotiating Brexit 
Davis and team seem to have had trouble understanding the word 'No'.#Brexit #Remain 
Brextremists sabotaged Britain's influence in the EU by driving it into self-defeating confrontational stances. #Brexit #Remain 
David Davis and the EU's Barnier slammed the door on any prospect of a “soft” Brexit  
#Brexit is like the Suez fiasco in 1956 when a Britain with an inflated sense of its power was brought crashing to earth#Remain 
"Like jumping out of a plane with no parachute..." #ToriesOut #GE2017 #JC4PM #ForTheMany #ResignTheresaMay #Brexit  
When I was young the debate was whether Britain should withdraw from East of Suez. Now it's withdrawing from east of Dover. #Brexit #Remain 
Mark Carney just confirmed Brexit will be a disaster for Britain  
Polls are now open in Georgia for the U.S. House special election. The runoff race is widely seen as a referendum on Pres. Trump: pic.twitter.com/cQGsBGApk8 
Merkel urges EU to stick together after Brexit talks launched  
Swedes' love for EU grows stronger after Brexit vote  
Oops ...The Governor of the Bank of England just told the world that Brexit will make Britain poorer, and cost jobs.  
HEAVER: Brexit will make Britain the envy of Europe.  
Quite the opposite.  EU wants to clamp down on international tax avoidance which is why many billionaires & the super rich back Brexit!  
What is the Brexit timetable and how might it change?  
"People around the world are asking: 'Who's in charge of #Brexit- in charge of the UK?'-@BloombergTV pic-@mac123_m 
Not even the best Brexit deal that the most deluded Brexiteer might imagine can ever assuage my thirst for Scotland's independence. #ScotRef 
Excellent letter from new colleague @darrenpjones on threat to Airbus from the Tories' extreme damaging #Brexit. Only silence from Tory MPs.  
Govt’s U-Turn on Day One of Brexit talks is fundamental. By the ever excellent @davidallengreen  
This by @IanDunt is worth reading. Labour - and Jeremy Corbyn - need to be bolder & more principled  on Brexit.  
I think the best thing to happen now is for @theresa_may to resign and as she does give an anti brexit speech. go down in glory 
The EU has consistently shown it is better, faster and stronger with Britain out of the equation. Maybe they should have held the referendum 
Things we've learnt so far this week:-Banks are full of criminals.Brexit will make us poorerIt's hot 
Confirmed: The British side had indeed demanded the EU explain its legal rationale for the so-called 'Brexit bill'  
We go live now to the Brexit negotiations...  
Sinn Fein will block Brexit and Mrs May's coalition of chaos. Good on them. 
Brexit negotiations will prove the Leave camp lied. They lied repeatedly. They lied about the benefits of Brexit. (1) 
Mark Carney mocks Boris Johnson as he warns Brexit is unlikely to be a "land of cake"  
Tell Melanie Phillips that we are not covertly trying to overturn #Brexit, we are OVERTLY trying to do so. And for very good reason.  
This settles it. There will be no Brexit deal. So it's either accept Freedom of Movement, Remain, or leave and trade through the WTO .  
Spread the word & sign. Brexit can be reversed -- join the call on May to cancel Brexit if she can’t get a deal!  
David Allen Green: The great significance of the government's U-turn on Brexit negotiation sequencing  
Launched leadership bid on .@libdemvoice . Very positive about party's future. Aim to lead through uncertain period: early election? #Brexit 
The significance of the UK's U-turn on day one of the Brexit negotiations, by me at @FT 
Here is the HM warning before the referendum  which was largely ignored by the Brexit propaganda  
a soft brexit. a plushie brexit. a 600 thread count hypoallergenic brexit that sings you to sleep when you squeeze its paw 
@cathynewman here's a little animation I made on soft vs. hard Brexit -hope you like it!  
Quite right - I believe in the EU project & want to see EU negotiators stand by the values of the EU. Even if I am trapped on Brexit island. 
The press predicted May would "crush" the EU in Brexit talks. One day in and the reality is the complete opposite.  
Blackadder reference in FT piece on Brexit and trade policy?*achievement unlocked*cc @Tony_Robinson 
HowLongAreWeGoingToWasteMillionsOnBrexitNegotiationsWhenWe Could JustCancelBrexit? 
#Chancellor emphasises need for "mutually beneficial transitional arrangements" in #Brexit negotiations. He's right.  
#Brexit Fact: IMMIGRANTS are key to make UK ECONOMY GROW! A somehow missing truth from the populist #GE2017 campaigns of the Tories & Labour 
Conservative ministers know Brexit will be a disaster, says @mrjamesob. Here’s the proof  
What a clear-sighted  article! From a Swiss newspaper on #Brexit & the #UK #BrexitShambles#bankofengland 
.@JonSnowC4 You, Peston & a few honourable others will report this but most Brexit fan broadcasters (not least at BBC) will keep it quiet.  
Brexit talks finally opened in Brussels on Monday, with much to do and the British government hanging by a thread  
UK Govt say Brexit talks got off to a "promising start," which is how they work. They start by making promises then move on to breaking them 
WATCH | "Brexit process is now tied in with May's credibility of which there is very little. The solution is @DavidDavisMP." @Michael_Heaver 
Come on! We became poorer the moment sterling collapsed after Brexit vote. The problem is that the media lets politics trump economic facts.  
When Handel wins we will be told it had nothing to do with Trump, if Ossoff won we would be told it was a referendum on Trump.  
Brexit: Butlins owner Peter Harris gets EU referendum fine  
Anyone else feeling a tad bothered by a) the adversarial set up and b) lack of diversity in the room? #brexit  
Bank of England governor mocks Boris Johnson as he warns Brexit threatens economy - live updates  
Carney barely concealing his contempt by asking if #Brexit will be "a gentle stroll along a smooth path to a land of cake and consumption.” 
Front of the Queue? British Trade Minister Flies to U.S. to Sketch Out Post-Brexit Trade Deal  
This year of utter mess could have been avoided if MPs had rejected, as they knew they should, the advice of the 'advisory' EU referendum. 
Mark Carney just confirmed Brexit will be a disaster for Britain  
Brexit CAN be reversed! Join the massive call on May to cancel #Brexit if she can’t get a deal!  
Vince Cable: May must listen to Hammond's Brexit warnings instead of locking him in a cupboard again  @vincecable 
Every indicator, every piece of evidence, every person of competence, is telling us loud & clear: #Brexit must be stopped. And it will be. 
The #Brexit vote was based on lies, we already had control but chose not to use it. A result based on lies cannot be valid.#StopBrexit 
George Soros says the economic reality of Brexit is catching up to Britain  pic.twitter.com/GGkwPzLHA3 
The only Brexit deal that's going to happen is one that benefits the European Union and its member states.  
David Davis says Brexit talks will be most transparent ever. Yet he has a Press Secretary who won't meet press, and a secret working group. 
Philip Hammond is basically saying: as the only Cabinet minister who can do arithmetic, I'm trying to smuggle out a message: STOP BREXIT!  
We will know how well each stage of the Brexit negotiations has gone by the state of David Davis's hair at the susbequent press conference. 
Broadcasters using 'soft Brexit' and 'hard Brexit' are misleading viewers and revealing an anti-Brexit agenda.  
Memo to David Davis. what Churchill would actually think of Brexit talks - Never was so much chaos created by so few for so little ... 
What Mark Carney's speech attacking Brexit has done to the pound  
David Davis leaves his hotel for Day 2 of Brexit negotiations.  
BREAKING: ‘Knifeman drives at children’ at Kent military barracks – armed police on scene  via @Your Brexit 
In a no-deal situation the EU would lose the most in post-Brexit tariff costs according to research by Civitas:  
Brexit is kind of like watching a car crash falling off a cliff onto a train crash.  
And again we have seen the Chancellor distance himself from the position of the PM on Brexit. Further disarray at the top of government. 
Over 60% of Europeans say EU should not make concessions to the UK in #Brexit talks  
"And the pound comes tumblin' down." #MarkCarney takes a swipe at #BorisJohnson and #BrexitLalaLand#Brexit 
The pound dives. Again. 1 hour ago chart @Brexit#MarkCarney#MansionHouse 
Brexit contagion: 55% of Europeans believe more countries will leave the EU, according to a Chatham House survey.  
Carney sees the Brexit delusion for what it is, but chooses his words very carefully. See the whole thread.  
“Soft” and “Hard” Brexit Terms Obsolete: think @WikiGuido is right about this  
Three months before the federal elections Merkel's campaign is barely on a low simmer. Brexit and Trump doing all the campaigning for her 
#Brexit is not independence, it is a stumbling and confused retreat from Europe #Remain 
The Westminster culture of brazenly spinning guff to credulous/complicit parts of the media is going to be painfully exposed by Brexit.  
Any broadcaster using the terms “soft Brexit” and “hard Brexit” is misleading its viewers and revealing its anti-Brexit agenda.  
"Soft" and "Hard" Brexit Terms Obsolete:  
Everybody’s worst nightmare? As Brexit talks heat up, we unveil a 110 foot Theresa May statue to mark the occasion.  
The government thinks it is negotiating. In reality it is making harrumphing noises, while the EU presses home its demands. #Brexit  
Labour pretending they would negotiate a better Brexit deal is almost as delusional as pretending Brexit is a positive thing. 
..Chancellor's speech also open invitation to car industry, pharma, manufacturing, fin serv to say what actually think about Brexit impact 
The Bank of England chief Mark Carney just expertly teased Boris in a dire warning on Brexit  
Governor Carney refers to Brexit as a "land of cake" - who could he possibly be referring to?  
Ireland won't sign Brexit deal unless NI peace deal is protected  
Carney: "Before long, we will..find out the extent to which Brexit is a gentle stroll along a smooth path to a land of cake and consumption" 
A majority of Britons now think Theresa May can't handle Brexit negotiations  
My pledges: Housing, Schools, Brexit, Step-free Access. And a huge thank you to everyone who voted for me!  
Theresa May has lost her mandate and Commons majority for an extreme, job-destroying Brexit. Me on @LBC 
Governor Mark Carney: "Since the prospect of Brexit emerged, financial markets, notably sterling, have marked down UK’s economic prospects" 
This is the key passage from Mark Carney. He says Brexit means lower incomes, job losses, higher prices incomes. (Quotes via @AndrewSparrow) 
I see the value of the £ isn't very strong or stable after just Day 1 of the Brexit talks.   
At this point it does very much feel like the UK's strategy on Brexit is being managed by General Meltchett from Blackadder Goes Forth.  
Carney: "Before long we will all find out the extent to which Brexit is a gentle stroll along a smooth path to cake and consumption"  
After #Brexit it’ll be Christmas every day, there’ll be unlimited free ice cream & we’ll all get an adorable puppy to stroke. Er, no, Boris. 
#StopBrexitNow "There is a serious chance there will be no Brexit at all"  
Pound falls after Bank of England Governor Mark Carney says he's still worried about Brexit  
Tories under May simply didn't give under 45s a reason to vote for them beyond Brexit. Staggering complacency  
#TellJeremy #StopBrexitNow Brexit is reversible, says author of Brexit treaty  
Brexit has made us poorer, says bank of England. Exactly excuse Tories need to savage our public services yet more. People voted for this. 
Leave voters, 24/6/16: "The EU will be begging to trade with us. This is a great day."Brexit negotiations Day 1: "PLEASE, NOT THE FACE." 
I'm confident the Brexit that Quitlings want will not now happen. More confident by the day. 
First image of Brexit negotiations not great advert for U.K. gender equality - EU team has 5 women, UK just one  
Gradually a post-Brexit EU is starting to emerge. My take in @FT 
Mark Carney:-Brexit may not be gentle stroll-UK economy not ready for rate rise Pound falls#brexit 
Day two of #Brexit negotiations...  
Main Brexit thing is I am going to persevere with "Laboratoires Barnier". It"s been in my head for months, don't think you won't escape now. 
Sitting in agric cttee listening to UKIP member say 'Value CO2: it is an essential plant food'. Even more destructive on climate than Brexit 
I don't remember the #brexit referendum offering me the option to 'lower real income growth' was this a bus I missed? 
We voted this election to defeat hard brexit! Democracy! Get on with it!!!  
Brussels buzz- if @IanDuncanMEP joins Scotland Office in Lords dealing with #Brexit  PM will claim Scotland now represented at EU talks. 
**Chancellor also says that "businesses up and down the country" have put investment decisions "on hold since the Referendum" - 
Theresa May's drastic "hard Brexit" has been rejected by voters. The question of what replaces it is back in play  
So why are we doing #brexit?  
Spreadsheet Phil Hammond has gone as close as he possibly could within the confines of the Conservative Party to calling Hard Brexit bonkers 
Mark Carney just told you all the Brexit vote made you poorer.  
Let's put it clearly then. Carney has said that the prospect of #Brexit has already made us poorer.  Happy now? 
Bank of England Governor comments gets BBC to say what they should have said simply on basis of official figures: Brexit has made us poorer. 
The pound falls after Mark Carney says it's not yet time to raise interest rates in Britain  
Extraordinary speech from Hammond. given up pretending he thinks there are benefits to Brexit. Confirmation that May's authority has gone. 
Its Official: Bank of England Governor tells the City: Brexit has made us poorer. 
3 days shy of the EU Referendum anniversary, still can't believe we are now negotiating to walk away from our natural friends & allies. 
Phillip Hammond and Mark Carney have just said Brexit has made us poorer, and will make us poorer. Pound on the slide. War coming in Govt. 
astonishing: Hammond barely mentioned any benefits to Brexit at all. Spoke about it as if he were mitigating a natural disaster. 
It's too late to change 'hard/soft Brexit' to 'bad/less bad Brexit', isn't it?  
.@Plaid_Cymru warned that #Wales would be neglected in #Brexit negotiations - we're being airbrushed out of the reporting on them now too.  
Hammond has gone full soft Brexit. Wants transitional arrangements. Sticking w/ current customs arrangements. Saying deal must protect jobs. 
#Brexit: EU 'open' to change of heart, say France and Germany  
Chancellor Philip Hammond explains how the U.K. hopes to achieve a "Brexit for Britain"  
For lunch, I'm going to fill two slices of bread with jellied eels and lemon curd. It will be a 'sandwich like no other in history'. #Brexit 
Pleased to chair the European Research Group. Huge thanks @SteveBakerHW for his tireless work. Looking forward to a prosperity-led Brexit. 
Why on earth would the UK Govt include the untrustworthy SNP (led by a clype) in any high level Brexit discussions? 
Embarrassing start to #Brexit talks for David Davies & Tories.Wrong order. Only 100 pages of prep in 1 year,Total #BrexitShambles #ToriesOut 
I've often wondered if there were two Brexit ballot papers, one giving the option "Fuck the world and everyone in it" 
1 year on & I'm still not seeing any evidence #Brexit will produce one real benefit to the UK...Seeing plenty showing it's a 'clusterf*ck'! 
As far as I can discern this morning, Brexit simply means wonderful sarcasm in the face of certain doom. 
Chris Grayling congratulates uk Brexit negotiators getting status of eu nationals to top of agenda. But was top of eu agenda too!So not hard 
Gonna have a Brexit themed Sunday lunch this weekend - No Brussels 
Brexit Extremists. @pollytoynbee hits the drum we've been banging since day 1. Deregulation: The far right Tory coup 
STOP CALLING ME A REMOANER. Goodness me, this isn't moaning. Moaning is when e.g. my coffee is cold. On #Brexit I'm CATACLYSMICALLY FURIOUS 
The only kind of Brexit that is good for Britain is a "DEAD BREXIT". Make your voice heard and #StopBrexit 
You & many of your fellow defeated Remainders would rather see Britain fail than Brexit succeed.  
Women at Brexit table: 1 of 10 for UK vs 5 of 11 for EU. The lone female is Davis' secretary, whereas EU women are team leaders @thetimes 
#Brexit is a colossal waste of time and money. The energy sapping negotiations are all about preserving the benefits we already have. Crazy! 
Brexit: UK caves in to EU demand to agree divorce bill before trade talks  
To Chris Grayling: will you & Tory mates stop saying all votes for Labour were votes for Brexit? Mine was a vote to get a Tory out. #r4today 
One thing I have noticed about unionists in Scotland, they've gone strangely quiet about Brexit & how it's going to decimate the economy. 
Brexit Secretary David Davis predicted “the row of the summer” would be over the timetable for talks,Day 1. He rolls over & Summer is over. 
14 meetings in 4 cities over 3 days on managing brexit and protecting the Good Friday Agreement - supported by @dfatirl #working4IRL 
Still amazed by people proclaiming support of Brexit standing up for the rights of Russian oligarchs owning U.K. Buildings as investment. 
Fintan O'Toole: Trump and Brexit are result when government stops helping people  via @IrishTimesOpEd 
Remind me: on whose behalf is all this happening? #Brexit 
Bold piece by @pollytoynbee linking #Grenfell and #Brexit - let's end this deregulation mania...  
Queen's speech tomorrow, but still no news on the #MayDUP coalition. How can they negotiate Brexit if they can't even form a government? 
David Davis and EU rule out soft Brexit on day one of negotiations  #Premium 
3hrs it took her to decide Brexit justified tearing up a 400yr old Union.2 weeks on from GE2017 and what? she's still "contemplating"? 
Huge volume of Brexit laws threatens to overwhelm UK government  via @FT 
The glorious sight of pundits who say that government's Brexit uturn was inevitable who on Friday accepted government's denial at face value 
Hey! Tories! Corbyn has always thought Brexit was a really good idea. Corbyn still does. Maybe you should consider that it isn’t. 
Starmer clarifies Labour Brexit position: still punching ourselves in the face, but with gloves on.  
Prepare for weeks, months & years of the @BBC reporting #Brexit negotiations with pro-EU, anti-UK bias.Yes, the BRITISH state broadcaster.  
This shouldn't come as a surprise, but there's a huge volume of Brexit laws threatening to overwhelm UK government  
Worst moment in UK political history. Tories, without mandate or working government, are negotiating Brexit which half country don't want... 
John Crace perfectly sums up the first day of the #Brexit negotiations @guardian 
And my personal favorite piece ever, by Kieran Corcoran: "Explainer: Can Brexit Really Be Overturned by Petition?" 
No news comes out of day 1 of Brexit talks so National makes up a story...'twas ever thus  
This is exactly the challenge for the next @LibDems leader - expose Labour's support of Brexit and speak to mobilised young voters  
SMR: Brexit Negotiations Are Off! And he's away with the fairies already, bless him! Why are we still doing this? Why? Anybody? #nomandate 
Post-Brexit, Europeans More Favorable Toward EU  
That moment when Daisley inadvertently conceded the SNP was the best option on Brexit.  
Happy launch day to POEM, ed. Fiona Sampson, @arshi_mona & @DrAishaKGill!! Here's what @SeemaMalhotra1 says of this 'WOMEN ON BREXIT' issue:  
We shouldn't change course we should stop. Time to acknowledge that Brexit is a self inflicted disaster.   
Northern groups insist on referendum for Biafra@Gidi_Traffic @BiafraRetweet @HQNigerianArmy @NGRPresident 
Brexit can be reversed -- join the call on May to cancel Brexit if she can’t get a deal!  
Peak FT - 'Has Brexit affected the dating scene?' 
There will be no Hard Brexit only a weak capitulation to a much worse deal than we have now, leaving the EU is crazy 
Brexit forces some US banks to consider shifting funds out of UK  
Post-#Brexit, Europeans More Favorable Toward EU  
The U.K.'s finance minster and top banker are to announce Brexit safeguards  
The irony. Minimum 70% agreement is required among EU27 for Brexit deal to carry. In UK, Brexit Referendum result carried w mere 50%+  
The vast quantity of Brexit legislation, described as a "tsunami", will be harder to process in a hung parliament  
Stop frigging about. No brexit is the only good option, you know this.  Have the guts to say so! 
Blindly optimistic - UK economy will slow amid Brexit talks and pay squeeze, warns CBI  
Fintan O'Toole: Trump and Brexit are result when government stops helping people  
Brexit is just beginning and it’s already breaking  
Meet the DUP and the secret donations funneled into Brexit campaigns #DUPCoalition 
Brexit: British people have changed their minds on leaving the EU, poll finds  
Georgia race could be a referendum on the GOP’s massively unpopular health care bill  pic.twitter.com/ZWkvF3YgVX 
"Brexit threatens to become a fiasco — and investors are in denial," writes @BrettArends 
Err ... Isn't "enhancement" a code word for gene manipulation? ☞ Brexit 'will enhance' UK wildlife laws - Gove  
There is no dealNo deal is the dealEvery voter in the referendum (IN or OUT) is being betrayed  
Brexit negotiations are finally underway. How did we get to this point?  
#Brexit thoughts.  
If Corbyn is insisting on Brexit then he's saying that none of his social policies are of any importance and were only written to get votes. 
UK growth will be 'subdued' as Brexit unfolds, says CBI  
I wish @theresa_may  would put Jacob Rees-Mogg onto the #Brexit negotiations team.  
Ireland won’t sign any Brexit deal unless Good Friday Agreement is protected 
Day One BrexitLikeyou've told everybody you've been studying hard for your examsYou sit down to do the first paperQ1 Why didn't I study? 
brexit deal spoilers: theyll let us keep trading with them so long as we keep following all the EU rules & regs, only now we don't get a say 
BBC REPORTER COVERING DAY I OF BREXIT is already pulling  the UK down big time.This woman should be removed from reporting OUR progress  
Brexit, they have to find a solution to the NI border issue and then negotiate a trade deal. But the border issue requires an FTA to solve? 
The bill is virtually 100% public school funding. It will be an issue in 2018. A referendum on who cares more about low income education!  
And our Brexit negotiating team arrive in Monte Carlo by mistake. We're so screwed. Enjoy!  
Jaguar Land Rover to hire 5,000, easing Brexit jitters    
As predicted by many Brexit evolved into a something best to be described as an episode of the Muppet Show. 
Is the special election in Georgia (#GA06) a referendum on President Trump? Here's what we may learn, according to @amyewalter. #PBSNews pic.twitter.com/PNRx4JnJus 
Her desk has her ideas for Brexit on it. 
How much business will Macron's France take away from Brexit Britain? ... I'm guessing a lot.  
I'd like a three-way Referendum1) Hard Brexit2) Norway model3) Stay in EUAnyone arguing Norway is taking back control would look absurd 
Where, pray tell, British Brexit Negotiating Team, are the women?  
Absolutely agree, the license fee need to end post Brexit. The past year has shown the BBC as a true propaganda machine & an EU puppet. 
Sooner the better........ 
‘Celebrations over Pakistan’s victory a referendum against India’  
 Today A New Beginning For Britain As Brexit Negotiations Commence!   #BREXIT #UK #EU #TheresaMay #DavidDavis #ConservativeParty 
#Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP has had to back down in talks. Share our editorial: ‘Brexit Baloney in Brussels’:  
My PA just sent me this. Brexit talks begin. #dear 
The Government wants Brexit to usher in a new era of freedom of movement - as long as you strap into a space rocket  
NI's greatest asset amid all this Brexit mess is its messiness. My plea to big-up the GFA at this critical juncture:  
EU Brexit Talks Round Up Day 1"All sides have agreed that tomorrow will be called Day 2." 
Karel De Gucht, Former EU Trade Commissioner, says that "There is a serious chance there will be no Brexit at all"  
David Davis and EU rule out soft Brexit on day one of negotiations #Premium 
Does Labour have a clear position on Brexit? @EvanHD asks Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer #newsnight 
Precisely. UK is acting as if Brexit is something being done to them by the EU.  
So if it's the opening morning of the Brexit Test, what's the score? The EU 110/0 at lunch, after winning the toss? 
Watching @Keir_Starmer on #Newsnight, still trying to fudge his approach to #Brexit. Only clear policy is 100% support for leaving. Tragic. 
“We got off to the worst possible start” – Shadow Brexit Secretary @Keir_Starmer on #Brexit negotiations #newsnight 
"No deal means chaos" – says @SophieintVeld, deputy to @GuyVerhofstadt, the European Parliament's lead negotiator on #Brexit #newsnight 
Brexit Shorts: Permanent Sunshine by AL Kennedy and starring Scott Reid  And this..genius.Brilliant work @ScottReid93 
Absolute transparency in the Brexit negotiations is assured, Barnier can already see straight through David Davis. 
The people changed their minds on #TheresaMay so why not #Brexit too?asks @davidmartinmep : 
Now that the Brexit stupidity has started, is it not time for a really big protest featuring young people to show the EU we do not agree. 
Bit rich for a man who spent his adult life trying to overturn the views of the British people as expressed in the referendum of 1975.  
So I'm off to Brussels folks! Wish me luck!Just so you know I'm going for a hard one...#Brexit  
He has a cunning plan....so cunning he doesn't even know it himself. Let's be honest, this is just embarrassing. 
What a waste of time and money. @conservatives have no backbone. Bin #Brexit, its madness.  
Remainers have the chemistry even if Leavers have the physics - @JananGanesh on winning the unthinkable. #Brexit  
Seriously, can we all be clear that the UK rolled over to *everything*. Didn't win *or try to win* a single point. Brexit is a total lie. 
Missed the press conference by @MichelBarnier  & @DavidDavisMP  following #BrexitNegotiations? Watch>  #Brexit  
Morten Morland on David Davis and the beginning of Brexit talks – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Why is the parliament allowing David Davis to negotiate Brexit. What about the other parties? What about the people. We are not all Tories. 
The physics and chemistry of Brexit. My column in tomorrow's FT  
Davis is saying these things to fend off the vampires of the Tory far right. But they, like #Brexit, are history. - & btw Jeremy: take note.  
Brexit returns to front pages @SkyNews after talks finally begin. Remoaner @Kevin_Maguire will huff and puff and I'll cheer the news 
Former EU Trade Commissioner thinks "there is a serious chance Brexit may never happen at all."  
Brexit, Day 1. After several hours of tough negotiations there are already encouraging signs that nothing whatsoever is happening. 
If May believes in national unity, she should try representing us all. Starting by dropping plans for a DUP deal and a hard-as-nails Brexit. 
'@Michael_Heaver: European citizens are growing tired of the EU's huge failings. Brexit will make UK envy of Europe.  
.Brexit is thuggery, pure & simple thuggeryWorse, it's Govt-supported thuggery. 
With so much else going on.. we must remember that Tory Brexit rhetoric collided with reality within minutes today  
Brexit Secretary David Davis appears to have conceded to EU demands during the first day of historic talks  
Brexit negotiations: Barnier rules out 'concessions'  
DUP Set to Spurn Tory Remainers and Back Full Brexit  
Can't wait for @toryboypierce on tonight's @SkyNews papers trying to pretend EU talks started well. Always look on the bright side of Brexit 
Vote for Johnny and Camilla WE CANNOT HAVE ANOTHER BREXIT. #LoveIsland 
I give in: utterly depressed at what a prison island of morons I'm living on. If you voted Leave, please be offended. I mean you. #Brexit 
If I visited Downing Street as Taoiseach I would've referenced the opening scenes of 28 Days Later as a likely post-Brexit scenario. 
I did a survey with hard Remainers: over 50% voted Labour to tactically stop a hard brexit.  
My 2 sons early 30s also both voted Labour and passionately want to remain in EU. They saw it as the only hope. No mandate for Brexit #EU 
Cancelling Brexit - what would happen if we changed our mind about leaving the EU?  
May should put Brexit talks on hold and bring Labour on board for advice, writes @thom_brooks 
The opening shots of the Battle of Brexit, as told by our man in the firing line.  
'Staying under EU law ISN'T Brexit' Pub boss roasts Remainers for single market dream  
You already have that. The best one. To throw that all away on the back of a consultative referendum with a narrow result is madness.  
.Worrying sounds coming out of N Ireland & Brexit will only make it worseTHIS opinion from MODERATE nationalist . 
Exclusive footage shows the UK's #Brexit team arriving in Brussels #brexittalks #BrexitNegotiations  
Ireland won't sign Brexit deal unless NI peace deal is protected  
#Brexit -ers saying "we can mek our own trade deals after we leave EU" might as well be saying "we want to pay more for the stuff we import" 
'Dear David, I trust I find you well, and that the Brexit negotiations are going as planned'  
Tomorrow @ScotNational Europe 1, UK 0 - Day one of the Brexit negotiations shambles: Davis capitulates on the divorce bill and timetable  
'We need to get out'Fuming radio caller berates 'hard and soft Brexit' in passionate rant  @DavidDavisMP @theresa_may 
Support holding national referendum on EU membership: 65% 61% 57% 57% 53% 51% 50% 44% 42% 
Frightening that UK Team supposedly negotiating Brexit have so little understanding of how important EU27 is to France & Germany #Brexit  
TONIGHT: The deputy to the European Parliament's lead negotiator on Brexit tells #newsnight that "no deal means chaos" - 22:30 on BBC Two 
In a tweet, the deluded bubble at Number Ten over Brexit.  
Remainers: EU sequencing is clearBrexit headbangers: WE WILL CONQUER[Govt caves]Brexit headbangers: STUPID REMAINERS!  
Jan:"May's ultimatum to Brussels"April: "May will deliver EU exit"June (Brexit negotiations day 1): "UK caves in to EU demands"  
A frazzled David Davis takes England to a 3-0 defeat in the first round | John Crace 
The fallacious notion of #brexit coming down to a Merkel/May agreement is persistently peddled by the BBC. 
I'm quite certain both Tories and then Labour will fail in all EU Brexit negotiations and we'll end up more or less staying in. #Remain 
Tnight shadow #Brexit secretary Keir Starmer tells us he favours deal in which EU citizens with jobs in UK can still come freely post Brexit 
Our Brexit Minister did not know that the EU is a collective bargaining organisation. We know more than him. FFS.  
FFS!!!! Theresa May's Tories couldn't negotiate "breakfast" never mind Brexit  
If they want a deal that *works* - we already have one - so they may as well just cancel Brexit.Stop this train before it crashes. 
Brexit negotiations are not war. EU are not enemies. The EU has been one of the pillars of peace in Europe. Quit the jingoistic bullshit. 
Looks like those of us who voted for an independent Scotland in EU are going to enjoy our schaden crispy & deep freude by the end of Brexit. 
One year on, Brexit still just means pointless economic suicide, isolationism & regression - propped up by xenophobes & liars. #Brexit1yrOn 
It's time we stopped Brexit before it too late. Don't believe the lies of the Brexit extremists.#StopBrexit 
Goldman Sachs will double its Frankfurt staff on Brexit, says its Europe head  
Brexit negotiations started today. The EU is controlling the conversation.  
Catch the latest episode of Remainiacs, the no-bullshit Brexit podcast  pic.twitter.com/E8RESD2A0r 
If David Davis looks this tired and dehydrated on first day of Brexit negotiations, just imagine what he'll be like on day two! #StopBrexit 
Whatever happened to Davis's and May's Brexit 'row of the summer'? - ITV News  
Tories are a complete shambles, laughing stock of the EU #brexit at least we have got our country back innit  
The most significant statement on Day 1 of Brexit talks  
Theresa May is living the Brexit nightmare that she warned of  
How about those Brexit negotiations? I don't know about you, but I can barely move for all the sovereignty we've regained. 
During Brexit negotiations, you will notice some Remainers undermine UK position at every turn and take the side of the EU. 
how many retweets for a seat at the brexit negotiations@DavidDavisMP 
How do you feel about the prospect of a successful Brexit negotiation? #CliveOnLBC #Brexit @DavidDavisMP @MichelBarnier 
#Brexit humiliation begins. This isn't us taking back control. It's us wilfully throwing away the control and influence we already have!  
Jacob Rees Mogg perfectly exposes the real agenda of the Lib Dems/EU. No Brexit at all, remain a full member.  
UK caves in on first day of Brexit talks  via @HuffPostUKPol 
Hammond's Brexit language isn't acceptable for a Cabinet member of his seniority says @FraserNelson  
Brexit of any kind is not a done deal. Let's keep talking about why it's a calamitous mistake. Our EU friends are watching. #NoMandateMay 
Universities UK has published five priorities as Brexit negotiations get underway  
Possible contender for @LibDems leadership  @EdwardJDavey reveals he's clearly opposed to Brexit & seeks to stop itA very welcome statement  
Fantastic, Jacob Rees-Mogg just put down 'sir' vince cable over #Brexit, no soft brexit or retreat from it you #libdem remoaners #skynews 
Britain, EU reassure citizens they won't be forced to move or change jobs after Brexit  
Estragon: Shall we go then?Vladimir: Yes let's go-They do not move-#Brexit  
David Davis during #GE2017 campaign "We will deliver parallel #Brexit talks"TODAYEU: You will exit first Davis: OKStrong and stable 
Skrr skrr in the white bentleyDem man dere tryna sen fa mehMay try tell man bout 'brexit'Dm'd dat bih tell her you best resign, EXIT.  
Gen. Joseph Dunfor , US military: the issue of Kurdish referendum is one left out to be worked out between P. Barzani and PM Abadi  
Brexit negotiations started with an early concession from the UK to the EU. Here's what you need to know:  
#Brexit is SOCIAL DUMPING sold under the name of "SOVEREIGNTY"! #remain #StopBrexit #hungparliament @UKIPNFKN @nickreeves9876 @EUflagmafia 
.@theresa_may hi Hun. Well- give us the gossip! How did the Brexit negotiating go today? Any news on the £350million a week for the NHS?xoxo 
Before Brexit happened and I dedicated my life to howling in despair, I used to write books. Thanks @RSLiterature  for having me as fellow 
Britain just caved into a major EU demand on the very first day of Brexit talks  
Exactly, no deal = no Brexit = no need for a 2nd referendum, just a progressive government to get back to work solving our real problems.  
Brexit negotiations: David Davis says 'promising start' made - Delusional   
We Survived for Centuries before we joined the EU And will Survive Centuries after we leave the EU 
Day One of the Brexit negotiations  
.@Nigel_Farage: Soft Brexit is code for staying in the European Union apart from name  #FarageOnLBC 
UK government has a new Brexit mantra - in place of 'Brexit means Brexit' it will now be 'nothing is agreed until everything's been agreed' 
The significance of the UK's climb-down today on Brexit sequencingNew by me, at @JackofKent:(no paywall) 
"No deal means chaos" - @SophieintVeld, deputy to lead Brexit negotiator @GuyVerhofstadt tells #newsnight 
On al-Jazeera in a sec talking about what a great idea Brexit is and how well prepared the British team are. 
#Brexit As nothing is agreed till all is agreed, sequencing doesn't really matter. We can do without silly hacks' hyperbole of "caving in." 
Our crack Brexit negotiating team managed to misunderstand both France & Germany's negotiating position.  
German news just reported that there are 96,000 Brits in Germany. That number could rise sharply if #Brexit is not stopped. 
Article 50 negotiations-Terms of Reference agreed by EU & UK published.Our aim:maximum level of transparency  #Brexit  
This is a huge deal. It means the PM has to agree a Brexit bill before showing Britain what we are getting in return. A first-rate stitch-up  
David Davis: Deciding timetable for Brexit talks will be "row of the summer"Day one of talks: Ok we give in.  
Annapurna is a cracking read. I'm sure Barnier will love it. But as a gift to mark the start of Brexit negotiations? Odd choice.12/12 
David Davis needs that walking stick from Michel Barnier. Brexit Secretary's stumbling already with EU setting the pace. Leaving's crazy 
#Brexit Must we suffer daily bulletins from the commentariat? Like an iceberg two-thirds of this negotiation is hidden below the surface. 
Breaking news: UK and EU agree to meet every four weeks so that the UK can pretend to have a say on Brexit terms. 
On Govt's u-turn on sequencing...one person in the know tells me: "the govt said lots of stupid things that it'll have to shift on..#Brexit 
What should David Davis’ priorities be in the Brexit negotiations? @Nigel_Farage takes your calls from 7pm  
FFS!! Theresa May's Tories couldn't negotiate "breakfast" never mind Brexit  
The UK Has Agreed To Organise Brexit Talks In Exactly The Way The EU Has Been Proposing For Months  
UK Gov is abt to face a huge psychological challenge - do they dare to be honest with British people abt Brexit negotations? >> 
Looks like Brexit negotiations will be a testosterone fuelled affair. One woman & 8 men on uk team; two women on eu side. 
Wanting Mandelslime to "help" UK Govt with Brexit negotiations is like wanting stomach cancer to "help" cure gallstones.Keep. Him. Away.  
Mind that influence some elements of the media told you Ruth Davidson had over UK Govt...aye, it was a load of codswallop. No 'open brexit'  
Poor media - hopelessly picking at things to try & make it seem like a negative first day of Brexit negotiations. They need to lighten up. 
Thanks to election, Davis is eating humble pie & getting on with EU schedule. Otherwise he would have been in hard Brexit & high drama mode.  
Article 50 negotiations: who, when, what & how -Find here the terms of reference document agreed by @MichelBarnier and @DavidDavisMP #Brexit  
Well, Germans & French may just help us out with a 'soft' Brexit. They're still offering we can stay (ahem, better).  
Positive, constructive first day of Brexit negotiations. You'd not know that if you relied on mainstream broadcasters for info though 
David Davis has ALREADY caved in to EU demands in the Brexit negotiations  
For both, EU & UK, a fair deal is possible & far better than no deal."I'll work for that. I'll work with the UK, never against it." #Brexit  
Very upset at seeing Scotland, my other country, being pulled out of the European Project. President Macron called Brexit a crime. It is.  
Ex-Swedish prime minister Carl Bildt: 'If there is a brutal Brexit, the political scars will last for years'  
David Davis forecast row of the summer would be over sequencing of Brexit talks. Davis wrong. UK gave in. UK 0 EU 1 (Davis og) 5 mins. 
"The country looks ridiculous," the Financial Times -- not exactly a leftist mouthpiece -- wrote recently #Brexit 
SENIOR EU OFFICIAL SAYS AFTER 1ST DAY OF BREXIT TALKS LONDON STILL QUESTIONS WHETHER THERE IS LEGAL BASIS FOR EXIT PAYMENT TO THE EU 
I'm not sure why there is so much surprise to this.  The UK has no bargaining power.  This is just the harbinger for Brexit in general. 
Michael Russell: Until now Scotland has found itself sidelined in the Brexit discussions. That has to change  
Wait, why is Britain leaving the EU in the first place? Here's the backstory on Brexit  
Barnier is clearly in charge and will set the terms of the #Brexit negotiation. Davis looked flustered and out of his depth. 
David DavisWhat he wanted: 'the fight of the summer' over sequencing of #Brexit talks.What he got: nothing 
Here's the video of the Benn/Davis exchange on No Deal Brexit - tariffs, health cards etc, that I was tweeting about  
Small but significant: Davis sed "fight of the summer" would be over Brexit timetable. Wasn't even fight of 19 June.  
.@MichelBarnier & @DavidDavisMP agreed on dates, organisation & priorities.1st orderly withdrawal of the UK. 2nd future partnership #Brexit  
A sad day for those who feel part of the great tradition of Scots in Europe. Brexit is anathema to us all @joao_kay @EuanKay18 @CatrionaKay 
Govt's negotiating position unravelling faster than you can say 'Brexit means Brexit'.Those who voted Tory must feel they been sold a pup.  
"The Prime Minister will publish a detailed paper, outlining our offer on Monday," @DavidDavisMP says after Brexit talks with Michel Barnier  
Pundits reporting Brexit process really ought to try explaining what's happening. Not telling us what they think ought to happen. 
EU extends sanctions over Russia's Crimea annexation following a bogus referendum—investment and imports forbidden 
Anyone still barking ‘Brexit means Brexit’ should be ashamed of themselves  
4. Do not trust anything from the @DExEUgov press office on Brexit.Sad but true.  Misdirections all the way./ends 
.@MichelBarnier @DavidDavisMP #Brexit "A fair deal is possible and better than no deal. I will work for that."  
This press conference presents a significant problem for much of the #Brexit camp. It refuses to play into their chosen narrative. 
What if Spain prohibits Catalan Referendum on Independence? 53.3% say DO IT ANYWAY. #WeWantToVote#WeWillVote 
Seeing as the UK currently doesn't have a government, exactly who or what is David Davis representing to the EU? #brexit 
Theresa May launches the Brexit negotiations, but forgets her most important negotiating asset  via @thecanarysays 
Macron plans to reform the EU, Britain storms out in an infantile strop. #Brexit #Remain #StopBrexit 
Sorry Michael still have £350m ringing in my ears, nobody in their right mind believes a single word a Tory says. 
Learn from your mistakes, Theresa May. Drop the belligerence over Brexit | Keir Starmer  
Agreed terms of reference for Brexit talks. No reference to transitional/future trade relations so UK has accepted EU position on sequencing  
Why do we need to pay to leave the EU When we were NEVER Asked if we wanted to be part of the European Union 
Imagine. If Brexit wasn't taking all this energy, we could address things that really matter – housing, health, education, the good society 
UK doesn't even have positions on Brexit areas.Let alone position papers.Let alone confidence to publish them.That is the difference. 
Michel Barnier says there will be one week of #Brexit negotiations every month. So like a period. Only more painful. 
I KNOW this is petty & mean spirited but watching TV news clips of David Davis parading himself on EU stage is DEEPLY irritating !#Brexit 
LIVE now- Article 50 negotiations press conference with @MichelBarnier & @DavidDavisMP  #Brexit  
Did your da say'If X jumped in the Clyde does that mean you have to?'Mine didSo Scotland:If rUK jumps off the Brexit cliffwill you too? 
BREAKING: Britain and EU agree to terms of reference for Brexit talks - statement  
Cancelling Brexit - what would happen if we changed our mind about leaving the EU?  
'Public opinion hasn’t moved a jot on Brexit' says @Nigel_Farage 
#Brexit is the stupidest thing ever.We don't have to do it.We have not legally decided to do it.And the fools are still trying to do it.  
#DavidDavis plan for #Brexit. I could live with that.  
Oh dearTheresa May launches the Brexit negotiations, but forgets her most important negotiating asset 
62% of Brits don't think the government is well prepared for Brexit negotiations  
border in Ireland because no-one wants one, the British people are united behind Brexit, there's no such thing as soft Brexit. 
2-In Britain, she supported Farage's hardly-veiled racism and on Brexit. In US, she hung out, and still does, with Alt-Right propagandists. 
We made the biggest ever mistake with the EU referendum. We need to admit it first though. Only then we can go fwd  
Almost 25,000 people from the EU teach & research in the UK's top universities. We must protect them. #brexittalks #brexit  
"There is a serious chance there will be no Brexit at all"  
Drunk sailor who sank his own yacht promises to lend some arm-bands to passing cruise-liner in return for his rescue #Brexit #DavidDavis 
Good to hear chief EU negotiator specifically reference Ireland in his media statement on the opening day of the EU-UK #Brexit talks.  
In 1990 the Great #MargaretThatcher warned that the #Euro would end #European #democracy!  #Brexit #BBC #SKY #UK #EU 
Brexit negotiations come to a humiliating end as David Davis loses everything in a game of rock, paper, scissors  
PM: change course. Make simple but vital changes now to the Brexit strategy. My @guardian article. 
#PollAtFiveHow confident are you of a good Brexit deal being negotiated for the UK?Please RT for larger sample. 
Yes. We must be constructive during negotiations to minimise damage but I will work tirelessly to stop or reverse Brexit by democratic means 
Taoiseach Leo Varadkar says any border between the Republic and NI after Brexit must be "invisible".  
This remains the definitive #Brexit negotiations tweet.  
Received a delegation from Turkish consulate in Erbil.Reiterated our firm position to hold referendum for independence on 25/9/2017.  
Brexit in short: UK can get reasonable deal if it pays up and accepts freeish movement. 
Good piece by @IanDunt on Labour's strategic ambiguity on Brexit. This little paragraph is crucial. #nationalisation 
First formal meeting between @EU_Commission and @DExEUgov. #Brexit #hiking 
Germany proposes soft Brexit deal including continued free movement and 'joint' European/British court  
FDP leader @c_lindner pulls a crowd. Tells full hall at Frankfurt uni that 2017 can be liberalism's comeback year after Trump & Brexit.  
#NigelFarage: "If #DavidDavis becomes #PrimeMinister I believe  that the #British Government will be genuinely committed to #Brexit." #TORY 
You Voted For It. Your Government Must Now Deliver.It's called 'democracy'Hard Brexit. The one true BrexitThe rest.is High Treason.  
#BrexitNegotiations #brexittalksTriggering #Article50 process in 2017 does NOT mean #brexit date must be 2019: 
The UK Brexit negotiation team is entirely made up of white men. We're coming across as an out of touch embarrassment, again. 
You can get all that by staying in the EU and much cheaper than cost of #brexit #nobrexit 
QUISLING SCUM @nick_clegg Calls for Britain to accept 'PAINFUL CONCESSIONS' from Brussels over Brexit  
MARCH 4, 2019: Markets react positively as David Davis announces an unexpectedly early Brexit deal. Tory-DUP talks continue.  
PM @theresa_may has been CLEAR!' There's NO possibility of soft Brexit, JPMorgan chief says   
#SikhsRejectNarendraModi Time for freedom is near. If world can see Brexit. We are waiting to see Khalexit from India.  
Brexit is breaking  
What a disturbing world where start of momentous #Brexit talks are half way down bulletin cos of ghastly #MosqueAttack #GrenfellTower 
Privacy International Sends #Brexit Teams Anti-Surveillance Package  More here:  
#SikhsRejectNarendraModi Khalistan Referendum 2020 is the voice of every Sikh. We Pakistanis support it  
I have no hope of UK becoming a fairer/more equal societyin my lifetime [I'm 68]No hope whatsoever#Brexit only increases the desperation 
May asks UK for mandate for hard Brexit. Voters reject it. May, Davis open talks pretending nothing's changed. Insane: Commons won't back HB 
The Tasoich has just said he regrets the UK leaving the EU. What he meant to say:"are you completely insane or ridiculously drunk?" #Brexit 
Germany is in the EU. So are we. We already have a trade deal. Go home, have a lie down, & stop sniffin the #Brexit glue. 
As #Brexit negotiations begin, here's @CarolineLucas on why we'll fight Theresa May's extreme Brexit  
Cancelling Brexit - what would happen if we changed our mind about leaving the EU?  
@WingsScotland  ...and with everything going on in the world BBC readers top read story is........  and they let these people choose Brexit.  
I wonder how long before our govt accepts that Brexit is dead and unachievable & what a waste of millions  £££'s it all was? 
The people have spoken, but what did they say? We make the case for the formation of a Brexit Citizens’ Assembly  #EU 
.@M_AndersonSF to attend Brexit hearings in Brussels  
Varadkar says Brexit a decision for the UK people, but Ireland "remains saddened"... will negotiate as part of the 27 
Good speech. Now please focus in the Hard Brexit: no single market and no customs. 
No, 85% of voters didn't back "hard Brexit" - it wasn't even a majority.  
Thought provoking piece from @andrew_lilico. Here's an important bit. EU27 will not accept a 'soft' Brexit deal.  
I'm sweating like the Catholic Church when the marriage equality referendum was announced 
Dear David, What's the line with UK sov'n territory inside the EU, that uses the €, give it back or abide by EU courts if we Brexit?  
Labour don't have a clue how to do Brexit but don't worry Corbs is doing Glastonbury. 
Why the Conservatives have no mandate for "hard Brexit". By @georgeeaton  
A friend admits he voted Labour "to avoid a hard Brexit". I asked if he was familiar with Labour's position on Brexit. He wasn't. I sighed. 
That is something that concerns me now, too. Brexit is not worth this. 
The most complicated negotiation of all time has begun. Your guide to the EU-UK #Brexit negotiations.  
British people have changed their minds on Brexit an Independent poll finds just as the UKs Brexit economy turns bad  
This is just delightful! #Brexit #CarryOnAbroad 
Even Scottish Nationalists don't want another referendum.  
I may have this completely wrong - and may be desperately out of touch - but my sense is the British public are now sick to death of Brexit. 
Soft Brexit in the streets, hard Brexit in the sheets.  
BREXIT: Negotiations come to unexpectedly early end with David Davis securing a packet of Wotsits and half a Curly-Wurly for every Brit. 
All those who voted for the @Conservatives to "strengthen" @theresa_may's hand, YOU WERE LIED TO. AGAIN.#Brexit negotiations have started. 
Are the brexit negotiations finished yet 
This in The New European shows the extent to which Corbyn is about to disappoint young voters on Brexit  
Swiss media, in contrast, thinks the UK gov't is nailing Brexit. Jk, their headline is "Laughing Stock of Europe". (Transl'n by pal's pal.)  
Neither May nor Corbyn has prepared the Brits for the painful choices posed by Brexit, write @JohnSpringford and I:  
Tell Theresa May: No Deal means No Brexit 
Catalonia's 129th #presidentMas "The @catalangov will not go back in the defense of democracy, the referendum will take place"  
EU has been clear that UK can't have its cake and eat it. EU members and EU parliament would not vote through a 'soft' Brexit deal. 
The UK being represented in #Brexit negotiations by David Davis is like England entering the World Cup and fielding Accrington Stanley. 
Worth remembering as #Brexit talks start Tories still not reached agreement w/DUP. DUP v strong negotiators w/strong hand. A lot like EU...  
David Davies arrives in Brussels to begin #Brexit negotations. (Photo c/o @MonkeyPicks.) 
I concur absolutely. The tactical vote worked... it broke the grip of May's hard Brexit political ideology & put all options back on table.  
“For there is more that unites us than divides us,” says @DavidDavisMP as he kicks off formal Brexit negotiations in Brussels #EuropeYesEUNo 
UK should fund the Brexit bill by issuing an Freedom from the EU Bond, marketable to hardline Eurosceptics, paying 0% interest 
"David Davis arrives in Brussels to begin Brexit negotiations" by Barbarossa - just FP'd:  
.@ChukaUmunna on @BBCRadio2 calls for Britain to be ambitious in #Brexit talks, aiming to keep the economic benefits of the EU. Pls RT:  
As Brexit talks begin, @pewresearch's newest #migration interactive:  
It's Brexit Day! David Davis begins negotiating UK's EU exit - your 10 tweet guide   
Is it realistic to think that the British public will start to see Brexit for the mess that it is- and so pull the plug on it?... Yes.  
Brexit critic Silvana Tenreyro joins UK Monetary Policy Committee  via @FT 
Here's the first of our #KeyIssues2017 posts, Brexit and the economy:  
David #Davis and his team arrive in Brussels this morning for #Brexit talks.  
#presidentMas already speaking at the @cambridgeunion about the self-determination of Catalonia on the O1st referendum @Cambridge_Uni 
EU:Brexit?UK:No. Cancellation of Article50EU:what?UK:Decided it's a daft idea cancel itEU:Oh good!UK:Only pulling your leg.Hard Brexit.  
Today at my wonderful German dentist who said she didn't wish to stay in post-Brexit Britain.Tragic that so many Europeans have left or will 
#Brexit negotiations are said to be proceeding 'amicably'  
RT - #TellJeremyNow !! My vote for Labour is NOT a vote for Brexit  
It’s time to prepare voters for some tough Brexit compromises, says @JamesKirkup 
She may as well stay and take the Brexit hit for her party in reparation. With new leader stepping in after the blood letting  
David Davis arrives in Brussels to begin Brexit negotiations.  
They're down. Keep kicking them. We mustn't make the same mistake as after the independence referendum.  
The Tories have a problem with professionals. Brexit is probably only part of the story. Wider values-based rejection of the party an issue  
A topical anecdote from Chris Patten's memoir, First Confession, on the day Brexit negotiations begin.  
Michael Gove changes tune on cheaper food #brexit  
Owen Jones watch the march from 17 million who voted leave EU if we don't get a hard Brexit, there's thousands of us from berks ready march. 
The buccaneering Brexit adventure begins...  
Sign the petition: Theresa May has no mandate for hard Brexit  
Brexit talks are officially underway - but Britain's hardline strategy is increasingly being called into question  
Lord Mandelson offers this advice to the Labour party and the government for Brexit   
Brexit isn't going to win any diversity awards ...  
Something genuinely surreal about Brexit talks opening at a time when relations with the EU are literally the least of Britain's worries. 
#Indyref2 post #Brexit certainly is on table, especially while possibility of failed Tory election candidates going to Lords is on table!! 
Brexit can be reversed -- join the call on May to cancel Brexit if she can’t get a deal!  
#Brexit tastes awful. We still have to make the best of it. Go Europe! #BrexitNegotiations @GuyVerhofstadt @EurLiberalForum @ALDEParty 
The UK’s #Brexit Options in the Eurozone complex - visualized!  (based on  by @BBGVisualData) 
Remainers are trying to use the election result to block Brexit. Our vote to Leave must be delivered. Join us →  
Cretinous myth that 80% of voters were voting for #Brexit in this #GE2017 well and truly put to bed by @TheEconomist#BrexitShambles #wato 
So it begins, this is where the Brexit fantasy meets reality.  
Boris Johnson and Michael Gove have suggested that Theresa May should stay on as prime minister and deliver Brexit  
Okay, in simple terms, how can a minority govt which has not passed a Queen's Speech, possibly be allowed to negotiate Brexit? 
If any journalist doesn't know Nicola's position on iindyref & Brexit by now, then they're in the wrong job. 
David Davis sent Theresa May a message from the Brexit negotiations:"These foreigners seem to have formed some kind of union..."#kitileaks 
OpenDemocracy doing amazing work on the DUP and the secret donations funneled into Brexit campaigns  
Brexit update:Both sides have agreed to wear pants during negotiations. Next up socks. In other news the £ is now worth two feathers. 
PM @theresa_may fights for survival as #Brexit talks start  
The racial and gender imbalance at the Brexit talks is striking- and unacceptable @lynnenright  
13. The EU should reform this law NOW. That can solve the issues and allow a revisiting of the Brexit decision, as well as reducing future 
Queen gets everywhere, even the Brexit negotiations! @QueenieOfNorway @AnnaR966 
"Everyone has a plan till they get punched in the mouth": Jonathan Powell channels Mike Tyson in @CSWnews #Brexit  
Only reason Brexit didn't stop months ago is fear of conflict. A far right war on liberal democracy we let happen & win. Head in sand denial 
Quick reminder to our brave boys and girl currently negotiating Brexit: it is a terrible idea and it is your duty to stop it at all costs 
#Brexit should make the UK economy more attractive. Fin. services will want to be there" - @NileGardiner @MorningsMaria @FoxBusiness 
Just remember, MEPs can veto any Brexit deal that is not up to scratch. That includes environmental standards and honouring Paris Agreement  
The only person fit to represent Scotland is Nicola Sturgeon. #brexit  
"There is far more which unites those parties [Labour and Conservatives] on their position on Brexit," says @BrexitCentral's Editor @isaby 
SCENE ONE: BRUSSELS David Davis enters the Brexit negotiations looking confident.CUT TOSCENE 2: A DYSTOPIAN LANDSCAPE, POST BREXIT  
EU bringing in law to clamp down on tax avoiders. It should be enacted in 2019, but not if there's a hard Brexit. 
This could prove an unintentionally prophetic line from Davis... #brexit  
UK Brexit team arrive in Brussels to commence negotiations #BrexitNegotiations 
We should have an entirely alliterative Brexit Negotiation Team.David DaviesManfred MannDanny DyerKris Kristofferson 
Brexit drove a wedge between @AndyWestTV and his mum. They wrote letters to each other to try to resolve their differences #r2vine 
Britain and the EU embark on their first day of formal Brexit negotiations  
Sexist Brexit. It's bollocks & beards only on U.K. Brexit team. Not even a menopausal elder stateswoman with her very own beard 2 b included  
Germany drops a big hint about a 'soft Brexit'  
this may be a stupid question, but has Theresa May formally made a DUP deal? or is she starting Brexit negotiations without... a government. 
I agree. Cheapening food has deskilled and devalued work and concentrated wealth and power.There is a line from it to Trump and Brexit.  
Oh good #Brexit negotiations are underway  
Children’s Rights must be a priority in Brexit negotiations – @Donnchadhol  
The #Brexit negotiating team arrives in Brussels.  
David Davis: "These negotiations will be tough, which is why I brought my specialist Brexit negotiator"  
Why children's rights must be protected and championed through Brexit process - read our news story:  #BrexitChildren 
Here we go 
Finally! The beginning of the end to our membership of this ghastly FAILED political union!  #BREXIT #BBC #SKY #ITV #RT #NEWS #UK #EU 
Lame PM, weakened and divided Tory Party and Brexit negotiations begin today. What could go wrong? 
David Davies is starting brexit negotiations today. I am so embarrassed for us. 
More than 50% of people believe we should vote on the final deal. Poll for Mail on Sunday shows mood on key #Brexit issues changing...  
Brexit can be reversed with just one click -- join the call on May to cancel Brexit if she can’t get a deal!  
Mark: Theresa May's Tories start Brexit negotiations today and the country is in an absolute mess!!!!! 
Nigel Farage tells me: "If David Davis becomes Prime Minister I believe that the British Government will be genuinely committed to Brexit." 
There are as many chickens as there are women in our negotiating team #Brexit  
Does Theresa May enter today's Brexit talks in a lose-lose situation?  
Theresa May heading into Brexit talks like…  
Brexit Talks Underway: First Photo   
EFTA, EEA, Customs union … acquis communautaire: what the key terms of the Brexit talks mean  
I wish Brexit was an Xbox One exclusive, then it would've been canceled already 
Brexit team photo before talks commence  
Why don't you journalists let her get on with it then? Away and bother Davidson about Scottish economic disaster from Brexit. 
Are there any women in the UK's Brexit negotiating team?  
Brexit negotiations today...Davis: "Can I have a unicorn?"Barnier: "We already said no."Davis: "... ... Shit." 
A good day to RT again the best ever Brexit tweet.  
There are plenty of signs of a possible Brexit compromise, says @jameskirkup But who can sell it to voters? 
Together we can secure the best Brexit deal & build a stronger Britain.(pic via pinterest)  
Yes, let Pakistan withdraw troops & settlements from POK & let us have a referendum in Jammu & Kashmir. Choices are only two. Take your pick 
More beards than women on UK Brexit negotiating team.  
Anyway, happy Brexit Day.  
I fear we are about to discover the dangers of putting all our arse in one Brexit. #brexittalks 
Don't worry, women. Us men have got this Brexit thing covered.  
Another #Brexit embarrassment: we've sent an #AllMalePanel to the most important negotiations over our future since WWII 
Brexit negotiations begin today. Do you trust Theresa May & Boris Johnson to get the right deal for Britain ? 
Big day today as Brexit negotiations begin. There's only one man for the job   
On BBC Radio 5 in a sec talking about Brexit and how smoothly and impressively I expect negotiations to go. 
#Brexit negotiations start today. 14,000 refugees and migrants could die by the time they end. We must #StandAsOne 
Our editorial @EveningStandard on how the Mosque attack unites us & why David should bust 3 Brexit talk myths  
Brexit negotiations now finally starting, having wasted > 10% of the Article-50 countdown clock so far.  
By starting I mean David Davis will be sat in the Berlaymont twiddling his thumbs as UK has no official position on Brexit still.  
The 10 Brexit compromises Theresa May won't talk about | Charles Grant and John Springford  
This is our Brexit team arriving  
8. UK markedly less confrontational and more sensible re Brexit negotiations since two months ago.Something must have happened./ends 
"You are advised not to drink alcohol," Eurocrats told as #Brexit talks commence in heatwave  
"Thanks Brits!... watching Brexit unfold is such a pleasure". (sigh)  
Flags at half mast outside the EU commission, where DD has begun Brexit negotiations. pic.twitter.com/iRvWLuNWOs 
Times Now goes into PR mode. Their daft and rhetorical questions are straight out of a dictator's referendum.  
1. Close reading of various statements suggests fundamental shift in Brexit "sequencing". 
UK offers *potential* basic decency to Europeans & expects fawning praise & if that's not Brexit in a nutshell  
Still co certainty on the government it be formed on Weds, meanwhile Brexit negotiations commence today  
No joke. Sit in the dark, then go home early, Eurocrats advised as #Brexit talks kick-off amid high temperatures. 
*BREXIT UPDATE*Plucky David Davis takes the Krauts out of the game.France sneak in to hoover up UK opt outs.More later.  
Con & Lab treating #Brexit like an all you can eat buffet when in reality it's an à la carte menu 
The polls are clear - the British people want a #Brexit that keeps our economy safe by staying in the Single Market #LeaveWatch 
ICYMI - Barnier prepared for Brexit talks by walking in Savoy Alps at weekend "to draw the strength and energy long hikes demand".  
Helpful thread.  The folks at @instituteforgov playing a blinder on Brexit information.  
May starts Brexit talks, after holding a GE on grounds of not having  mandate; not outlining Brexit policy; then losing majority altogether. 
Corbyn's hush-hush Brexit policy becomes clearer  
UK #Brexit Negotiation Team Arrives in Brussels.  
The considerable powers promised to Holyrood have vanished, those we have now, under threat of being removed by Brexit. #UnionLies #ScotRef 
We sent a warning briefing and anti-surveillance phone pouch to #Brexit negotiators to help them stay secure  
#UPDATE Britain, EU start formal Brexit negotiations at European Commission in Brussels - @bmmafp reports  #Brexit  
If it takes the government this long to reach an agreement with 10 like-minded DUP MPs, I am not holding out much hope on Brexit in 2 years 
48% & rising :   more and more of us have doubts about Brexit.  Single market should be on today's agenda.  We didn't vote to become poor. 
Agenda for today.#Brexit #BrexitNegotiations 
Oh dear Theresa! Labour takes three point lead over the Conservatives, says new poll  #mondaymotivation #Brexit  
Parliament underlines the importance of fair and equal treatment of EU and UK citizens as Brexit talks start  
LISTEN: @nick_clegg on #R4Today on why Govt needs to come clean with the British people & start putting the economy first in #Brexit talks  
WATCH | "We're starting negotiations in a positive & constructive tone determined to build a strong and special partnership". Brexit begins!  
The “most complicated negotiation of all time” is under way in Brussels. Can Britain and the EU make Brexit work?  
Malta, with smaller population than Edinburgh & about same size as Isle of Arran, has more influence over Brexit than Scotland does.  
Editor-at-Large @matthew_elliott says apart from rhetoric, both parties agree on Brexit  
Opinion: Here's a path that would avoid a Brexit calamity  
The Chancellor does support the PM's Brexit Speech & White Paper, approved by Parliament, which he helped write. Sorry to disappoint the BBC 
Delusion and dishonesty have triumphed. We need to get real on #Brexit. My letter in today's @guardian#brexittalks 
.@DavidDavisMP on opening of #brexit negotiations: "There is more that unites us than divides us" ...seems an odd thing to say at a divorce 
This is so vexing & pointless. Just remain in the EU, stop twisting, finagling, writhing & wriggling to protect us from #Brexit in a Brexit.  
First day of Brexit talks dismissed as 'window dressing'  
Britain, EU begin Brexit negotiations in Brussels #Brexit  
#Brexit won't cure UK's problems. It's like having 1/2 your teeth removed to treat an ingrown toe-nail. Don't put faith in charlatan Tories.  
Brexit negotiation team assemble for tomorrows opening talks. What could possibly go wrong?RT/RP @JinksGhost 
I see appeal of Corbyn, but he’s not answer for Scotland. Supports Trident, supports Brexit, & opposes, and is ignorant about, Scottish Indy 
42 questions about Brexit that need answering  
That's a handy gif, not just for Robinson, but also to illustrate how Britain is heading into the Brexit negotiations.Top work! 
The emphasis here on transparency is key - up to now No10 has been able to control the Brexit message to a large degree. No longer.  
This Brexit stuff seems utterly trivial today. But if you can be arsed to look, here are my latest thoughts  
Article 50 negotiations just started. #Brexit  
#SpotOn ... today's #Brexit meeting between @DavidDavisMP and @MichelBarnier in a nutshell... 
In which Germany fails to understand what created Brexit in the first place  
Brexit talks start today. We have no Government.Wheeeeeeeeeee. 
.@JamesMcGrory: the British people turned around to Theresa May's hard Brexit and said "no thanks" #AllOutPolitics 
#Brexit priorities: clarification of the costs, legal certainty for EU citizens in the UK & no hard border between IE and Northern Ireland.  
Michael Russell: Until now Scotland has found itself sidelined in Brexit . That has to change (From The National)  
Europeans appreciate the EU more than they did before #Brexit!  
Don’t bother with @BBC propaganda Tune in  news 1pm for assessment Grenfell Tower Syria Brexit Finsbury Park & more 
The simple truth is Brexit will damage the lives of normal working people. And it shames what Labour stands for that you pretend otherwise.  
"Spain is open to business & open to foreigners in a way the UK no longer is," @lugaricano tells @ft:  #brexit #spain 
Brexit Secretary arrives in Brussels for first formal talks saying UK and EU are "determined to build a strong and special partnership" 
"We're starting this negotiation in a positive and constructive tone" - @DavidDavisMP and @MichelBarnier speak as #Brexit negotiations begin  
As #Brexit negotiations start today, read @NicolaSturgeon on why there should be a genuine four-nation approach.  
FM @NicolaSturgeon getting on with the day job, at least until journalists ask about Brexit and IndyRef  
The Brexit negotiating team arrive in Brussels  
David Davis on the phone. Says he's confident in "making Brexit a Titanic success". Could someone please lend him the DVD? 
Revealed- the UK's  #Brexit negotiating strategy. "Dear EU.We are about to saw off our left leg. Will you give us a bandage and an aspirin?" 
#Breaking: Arriving in Brussels, Brexit Secretary David Davis says: "We are starting this negotiation in a positive and constructive tone"  
BREAKING: Brexit negotiations have begun 
Sorry @jeremycorbyn  but this is bollocks, the Tory reason for brexit is to avoid the 2019 EU anti tax evasion laws, what is your reason?  
The Brexit negotiations are beginning. Here's what you need to know:  
The horizon is the perfect metaphor for Boris Johnson's Brexit  
#BREAKING Britain, EU begin Brexit negotiations 
Quite reassured to hear that the Brexit talks begin at 11 and break for lunch at 12.30. I assume there is also a tea interval mid-afternoon 
Mr #Brexit enters with Monsieur #Brexit  
And so it begins ... #Brexit  
I will get back to doing some jokes when the world relents a bit and stops being so horrific. Who thought Brexit would be light relief? 
Since March PM has dealt with 4 terrorist attacks, election, minority govt, Grenfell tragedy, now Brexit negs. A PM under pressure? You bet. 
Today is the day #Brexit negotiations start. So where is the £350 million a week for the NHS that Vote Leave promised? #LeaveWatch 
Waiting for Brexit talks to begin at European commission HQ  
SOFT BREXIT:  The appearance of freedom, but with all the benefits of prison.  
I'm currently doing German lessons via Skype. All classes now begin "Can you explain this latest stupid Brexit thing your country has done?" 
A year since the referendum & less than two years before Britain is due to leave the EU, Brexit talks begin.   
I rushed downstairs excitedly this morning to see what #FatherBrexit had left me. He’s stolen EVERYTHING, and my chimney is RUINED! #Brexit 
Yes, it is called the @LibDems Pro EU, Pro SM, FOM and in most cases Anti Brexit #Remain 
Breaking news:U.K Brexit team arrive in Belgium to begin negotiations  
Brexit: Obstacles facing UK and EU negotiators  
Brexit negotiations start today. I will work with @GuyVerhofstadt and @ALDEgroup to protect citizens' rights, environment, businesses. 
Europe may offer 'soft Brexit' and let UK stay in Single Market, hints German Foreign Minister w joint ECJ oversight  
Brexit negotiations start today with a severely weakened government with a severely weakened mandate. Outlook looks severely weak. 
It's a perfect storm of both circumstance and foolishness, and it's now not easy to see how the UK will come out on the other side. #Brexit 
We don't want brexit, we don't want any kind of brexit, we want what is best for our children's future and that is to remain in the EU.  
Germany signals Britain may be able to secure 'soft' Brexit  
A useful analogy for how the UK's Brexit negotiators will feel today:  
Brexit split the Tory party and will go on doing so for many years  
Theresa May's Tories.. Austerity Crisis Brexit Crisis Election Crisis Grenfell Fire Crisis Terrorist Attacks Crisis  
Michael Gove says Theresa May will be in power at the end of the Brexit negotiations  #r4today 
With Brexit talks starting, would it be too much to ask the BBC to desist from talking down Brexit Britain's prospects & bigging up the EU? 
Brexit team en route to Brussels. What could possibly go wrong?  
Brexit talks to begin. Hoping David Davis delivers the Brexit we voted for. 
Boris Johnson on Brexit this morning. So much vaguer than one yr ago when he said UK was going to have all EU benefits w/o constraints.  
'@georgegalloway: 'Soft Brexit' is no Brexit at all.  
Britain clearly contains just enough idiots to be following the path of instability that IS wants ffs#FinsburyPark #Brexit #Manchester 
Brexit should be seen as what it is: an internal Tory squabble pushed through on a referendum result built on lies. It should be cancelled. 
Leavers seem to live in a fantasy world in which the economic superpower next-door ceases to have a powerful impact on us. #Brexit #Remain 
Meet David. David thinks UK can negotiate its own post Brexit deal with Germany. David is our chief negotiator. We're doomed #brexittalks 
The folly of soft #Brexit is that the EU is the economic superpower next-door, and we should have a say in what it does.#Remain 
May starts Brexit talks with no mandate, no set plan and two Tory plots to challenge her leadership already underway  
Daily Briefing- Brexit kick-off in Brussels- Parliament majority for Macron- Markets push on after tech wobble 
We go into Brexit negotiations with no definitions  - of success, failure, Brexit itself. Inexpert people facing experts never ends well. 
Absolutely. If Brexit was about jumping ship before the EU collapses... the storm's passed. We're in the lifeboat alongside, looking silly.  
#Brexit negotations formally start today. For the @Europarl_EN, safeguarding citizens' rights is the absolute priority. 
#Brexit will damage Scotland more than England. We need immigration, Erasmus, EU funding. Who now is standing up for us ? Ruth or Nicola ? 
#r4today Brexit interviews:Tim Martin. Talks BS. Gets away with itBoris. Talks BS. Gets away with itClegg. Talks sense. Gets hammered  
Brexit day is here. The Tories have no mandate in Britain and no authority abroad. What could possibly go wrong? 
Nick Clegg (they're all on air today) backs John Major (so does Mandelson) to chair a cross party commission to advise on Brexit talks 
I am sick of this hatred which has been created by people like Farage, RW organisations, Brexit IMHO was a breeding ground and made it legal 
Brexit talks begin today  
Today an unformed govt in total disarray, facing chaos and massive events on all fronts, commences talks on Brexit. Sitting comfortably? 
The UK sends it's top envoy to initiate brexit talks.   
Brexit splits the Tory party, and provokes almost primitive passions in some Europhiles and Europhobes  
Michael Gove says no change in UK's approach to Brexit from that set out by Theresa May before elex @bbcr4today 
Theresa May's Brexit negotiating team arrive in Brussels....#brexittalks 
Thread on sources of reliable information on Brexit as negotiations start (rather than mere commentary).  
Michael Gove says he is sure Theresa May will remain in power and deliver Brexit #r4today 
The @GMB/@Survation poll today says voters want soft Brexit (staying in single market) by 55 to 35.Leaders - Tory and Labour - should listen  
My lovely Brexit friends. Hands up if in favour of  Hammond's Brexit? Pay some money, accept some immigration, access to single mkt Yes/no ? 
Going to negotiate Brexit...what an utter FARCE! Today I almost feel ashamed to be British. The world is laughing at us! #BinBrexit 
Long table for those Brexit talks. (via @GroomB) 
The Conservative and Unionist Negotiating Team head off for Brexit talks. If only there were a handy acronym to refer to them by. 
With #Brexit talks finally starting I still hear uk politicians saying you can't be a member of single market and not be in EU. Incorrect. 
A deal like no other in history#Brexit  
Brexit negotiations begin today with no approved plan, no mandate, a government without even a majority. What a mess. 
Honestly, we need a grand coalition. Terror, Brexit, Grenfell: this cannot be handled by a gang of Tories without a majority or a leader. 
Bonjour M. DavisEh?Welcome to BrusselsThank youHave you a Government yet?Working on itOr a mandateBrexit means BrexitZut alors! 
EU fear that fragile state of Tories will lead to brutal Brexit.We'd be better served by a Corbyn-led coalition.  
Brexit negotiations start today. Noel Edmonds and a phone are on its way to No.10  
The country needs their expertise and connections in this huge task - if they are willing to be team players, accepting Brexit is real 2/2 
It's also a shame we're not honest enough that the Brexit you're pushing for make it *far* harder to increase funding for anything.  
Today the future of our country is in the hands of this man.....we're fucked. pic.twitter.com/uCvqhcCGax 
Brexit negotiations begin today. Decades of right wing bull**** about to hit reality. What a shame Labour are also in on the racket 
How can we have any faith in a strong & stable #Brexit negotiation when the Tories cancel Queens speech & haven't formed a Govt? 
Survation: Second EU Referendum: Support: 38%Oppose: 57%Don't know: 4% 
Survation: Leader trusted to negotiate best Brexit deal: Theresa May: 52%Jeremy Corbyn: 39%Don't know: 9% 
Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP leads a British team to Brussels later this morning to begin #Brexit negotiations  
So now we get Tim Martin saying "90% voted for Brexit parties" on #r4today.This is getting silly now. 
TODAY:UK team flies to Brussels to start Brexit talks, and International Trade Secretary Dr Liam Fox is in America to discuss a UK–US FTA. 
17. And fifth and last, comes the UK government, which is woeful on providing reliable Brexit information.  But for completeness, @DExEUgov. 
Govt can only sit in parliament 2 days after Queens speech. Because of referendum no govt to discuss Grenfell or Finsbury park. Thx leavers  
British people have changed their minds on Brexit, poll finds | The Independent  
#Brexit -Art.50 negotiations begin today. We want maximum level of transparency. Rights of citizens, first priority.  
Severe national nursing shortage. And #Brexit has already caused 96% reduction in nurses coming from EU. ARE WE MAD?  
Half of skilled EU workers that Britain will need after Brexit now plan to leave   
.@BBCr4today - This keeps happening: You interview Wetherspoon's Tim Martin, he spouts utter BS about Brexit, you don't grill him!#r4today 
12.  The third best source for information on Brexit is, oddly, the UK parliament (not the government). 
BBC now provide Remain leader Lord Rose a platform to further undermine #Brexit talks. Peter Mandelson to follow. Sheer undiluted bias. 
It's astonishing Brexit talks have gone ahead today, when the Queen's speech isn't even passed. No mandate for May's Brexit at all yet. 
No Prime Minister, No Government yet, and Brexit has started and is being negotiated by the Tory Party. That should worry everyone. 
British ministers preparing to begin Brexit talks this morning with no plan and no agreed destination. #fetchezlavache 
Difficult to understand the imputus behind the Tories desire to breakaway from EU at any cost........ 
As the BREXIT negotiations start in Brussels LAB take 3% lead in new Survation poll  
Brexit begins. I am guessing as news comes out from Brussels, sterling will indicate which direction the UK falls.  
We have to revoke article 50 & hold a new referendum now! We need a Remain leader now @timfarron @LibDems @KenClarkeMP @CarolineLucas 
Brexit talks are finally set to begin - with Theresa May under pressure for a soft breakup  
A democratic Brexit needs cross-party consensus: letters including one from me debate what we face in negotiations 
The Tory #Brexit team arrives in Brussels this morning....#Remain #CoalitionOfChaos #WeakAndWobbly #bbcnews #Theresa_May #ToriesOut 
Brexit negotiations begin: A 'historic' case of national self harm. Unite to prevent this folly!  
NEW: Shopping Cask-itTODAY'S BRITISH #BREXIT NEGOTIATION STRATEGY IN FULL  
#TheresaMay spent entire election telling everyone #Brexit needed her 'strong hand'.....Day one - #DavidDavis goes in her place! 
As Brexit talks start, Britain’s back is hard against a wall. And nobody, not even in Brussels, wanted it that way  
Blog: The Brexit guide to madness - Today the government commences Brexit negotiations. There are four possible...  
It's the Illuminati's Fault We Didn't Learn From Brexit 
Praying for all tweeps, esp those killed/injured outside #FinsburyParkMosque last night, and those involved in #Brexit negotiations. #prayer 
Today the Tories begin the process of stripping your human, employment and consumer rights that were guaranteed by EU citizenship. #brexit 
Barnier opens with question to Davis, "do you know what problem Brexit solves yet? , If so we can start from there" 
FFS!!! Theresa May's Tories start Brexit negotiations today and the country is in an absolute mess!!!!!  
Leading playwrights create Brexit dramas for the Guardian  
UK’s Davis going to BXL today to start #Brexit negs not knowing if May’s govt has a majority or if UK wants to leave Customs Union. #fail 
Why batteries are more important than Brexit  
The UK has feasted at the table for 40 years. Brexit will remove us from the table & feed us the scraps instead.  
Yes, difficult to argue with. They're living through history; the greatest avoidable self-inflicted disaster this country has ever seen. 
Brexit negs begin today. Worst outcome: no result.  Possible outcome: soft Brexit. Likely outcome: hard #Brexit. Best outcome: cancellation. 
Brexit talks: what to expect on day one  
Status of the four Budapest Memorandum signers:Russia - MordorUK - Brexit suicideUSA - Trump dumpster fireUkraine - vanguard of the West 
The People Voted for Brexit !And the Gov said ok in 3 yrs! It's never going to happen! The U k is gone & Britt's have no identity,no Country 
Brits voted for Brexit to escape EU laws & courts. UK courts should be supreme, we won’t accept EU courts ruling over us after Brexit  
The EU will try to bribe,bully & threaten the UK during Brexit talks. Their greatest fear is we leave & succeed.Get ready to walk away  
What is true referendum - Pic 1 or Pic 2 ?#JustWondering 
At last! Brexit talks start almost a year after UK referendum  
The vast quantity of Brexit legislation, described as a "tsunami", will be harder to process in a hung parliament  
High-Stakes Referendum on Trump Takes Shape in a Georgia Special Election  
There's a Norway option in the Brexit talks. So what does that mean? Here's a simple guide  
Markets:-Asia stocks -Euro gives up early gains-Oil -Pound  ahead of Brexit talks  
Welcome to Theresa May's #StrongAndStable Britain: Islamophobia attacks rise 326% in 2015 Homophobic attacks rise 147% since #Brexit 
Hi-Stakes Referendum on Trump Takes Shape in a Georgia Special Election-remember this is a +double digit R district  
A significant result for the strengthening of EU; for the weakening of U.K's position on #Brexit; and for rejecting far-right policies.  
Brexit started a boom in hate crimes: 34% increase in religious attacks, 15% in race attacks  
Asia stocks inch higher, sterling and euro steady ahead of Brexit talks  
Georgia's special House election on Tuesday has become "a referendum on the Trump presidency."  pic.twitter.com/rHYj5MGdIk 
Did you vote for Brexit because you believed the NHS was going to get an extra £350 million per week?Please RETWEET after voting 
-Brexit talks to start-Chinese housing data on deck-Le Pen keeps her career aliveWhat's moving markets in Asia  
Brexit talks to get under way in Brussels  
So @BBCNews decides to show Brexit and BBC sport rather then showing Muslims being hit by a van at #FinsburyPark 
They're not alone. How the #GA06 race could be a referendum on the GOP's unpopular health care plan:  
Davis goes to Brussels full of bluster & posturing & nothing else: empty hands, empty head, no mandate or authority. There'll be no #Brexit. 
And this is why we need to get our media & politicians to reel in the nationalistic anti-immigrant brexit talk fucking asap 
EU warning as Brexit talks FINALLY begin in Brussels  
The Lib Dems were right about the Iraq war, and now they are right about Brexit. Like stroppy teenagers, the electorate do not thank them. 
Brilliant! @MiniEurope (model EU cities) in Brussels trolling UK Govt by including a mini anti-Brexit protest in its London display.  
The UK is about to begin negotiating #brexit when it doesn't have a mandate or even a government...  You couldn't write it! What a joke! 
Brexit could be a matter of life or death for Northern Ireland  
the one positive thing that has come out of Brexit for me is much increased use of the word 'folly', which i have always loved 
Right Davis. Bring it on. Let's see what you've got. My guess is absolutely fuck all. #brexit #brexitshambles #BrexitNegotiations pic.twitter.com/j2QZ2IY6x2 
Good luck tomorrow to our Brexit negotiators for a Hard Brexit (ie, Brexit).  
Britain and EU launch Brexit talks in Brussels  
Happy #Brexit Day! Our Prime Minister - @theresa_may - is a total fucking laughing stock in Europe. RULE BRITANNIA! So strong! Much stable! 
It took nearly a year but the British people are beginning to see what Brexit really is. And they don't want it.  
Brexit must & will be stopped. We're in early days yet. 
Good @thetimes recognized UK neither a credible govt nor a credible PM time to put aside hard Brexit look for compromise across all parties  
Doesn't Hammond's 'slope not a cliff edge' Brexit still slide us downwards to the same point, just slightly more slowly?#AllRoadsLead 
So here we are: 19 June 2017, it's the day #Brexit negotiations start. And here's the UK on its way, strong and stable as always, of course.  
Beebe-be-be-beep. 00:00It's Brexit negotiations day!!Are we ready? Are we fuck. 
It's 11:55pm.Brexit negotiations tomorrow.At No# 10 May is panicking, but David Davis is saying "relax, tell them the dog ate your plans." 
Guardian front page, Monday 19 June 2017: Fragile Tories warned over ‘brutal Brexit’  
Oi #starter .... There is no consensus on brexit #StopBrexit 
My 5 years' experience negotiating on single market & climate change at EU showed me a) how UK can lead in EU b) what a disaster Brexit is 
The Tories were supposed to be going into these Brexit negotiations emboldened and uncompromising. They instead go humbled and diminished. 
Opening minutes of the Brexit negotiations tomorrow  
Brexit is going to be so tedious, and yet so devastating. This is how crises unfold now. No wars or revolutions, just stifling bureaucracy 
Brexit negotiations due to start[BL, Stowe 17]  
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
So on the eve of the #Brexit negotiations there is speculation that the Prime Minister is about to be overthrown. Strong & stable, eh? 
Suggest everyone interested in Brexit #follow @WeyandSabine, the EU's deputy chief negotiator.  Interesting tweets and RTs. 
On Brexit negotiation eve, the UK's crack diplomatic team have been spotted on their way to Brussels.  
UK's cheif Brexit negotiater David Davis recently admitted he had never read a Brexit Impact Assessment...   
David Davis - This idiot is leading the UK's Brexit negotiating team... #BrexitShambles 
Brexit Day!  
Ever have that awful dream where your Brexit negotiations are starting and you haven’t studied? 
#Brexit is a kind of political rabies which turns otherwise reasonable & intelligent people into driveling idiots.#Remain 
If Brexit wasn't top issue in #GE17 it was because May & Corbyn conspired to a) keep voters ignorant of the calamity &b) pretend done deal 
UK #Brexit negotiation team heads to Brussels.  
Democracy thriving in France today. EU is not on verge of collapse. We are. #Brexit 
#Brexit will make a bad economic situation a lot worse #Remain #StopBrexit 
Fellow traitors. What's your plans to sabotage the Brexit negotiations starting tomorrow? 
There's good discussion now on different versions of Brexit @bbcr4. But this is discussion we should have had years ago. Democratic deficit 
Brexit is dead, just need to let @MichelBarnier know the good news. Monday might be a good time to tell him. 
How can David Davies have a mandate to negotiate brexit? Tories haven't even formed a functioning government. 
On this account, Davis is being offered up as a human sacrifice so he can deliver Brexit and be deposed as voters realise how bad it is.  
Voice on phone: "Hi. Have you been involved in an accident that wasn't your fault?""Yes. Brexit. Can you help?" 
In other news, Brexit negotiations begin tomorrow, so I thought I'd dig this out again...  
Looking forward to Brexit Day tomorrow when Father Brexit gets jammed in my chimney like some kind of obvious metaphor or something. 
We may defeat Brexit yet. Public opinion finally changing. Small majority want second referendum once we know the deal.  
What's the diff between soft & hard Brexit?It's a sliding scale:'soft' keeps close to what we have now'hard' moves away & jettisons more  
Brendan O'Neill's @australian column on the great betrayal of Brexit: 
The UK government could save the economy with one very simple step. Rerun the referendum because it would be a landslide to Remain. 
The chancellor is now openly contradicting the PM's position on Brexit. This government really is not sustainable.  
People saying #ScotRef should wait util we know the facts about #Brexit. When did the British state ever give us the facts about anything? 
Theresa May is due to start Brexit negotiations with the EU on Monday in an embarrassingly weak position      
Almost a year since the referendum neither major UK party has a coherent & consistent Brexit position. Negotiations start in 13 hours. Cool. 
Am not even sure what I did before despairing about Brexit. It's like a job now. Night. 
53% of Brits now want a second referendum on the terms of the Brexit deal, according to Survation polling.  
Brexit could be significantly watered down following 'disastrous general election': @Nigel_Farage  
Brexit gets real:EU leaders believe May too weak to do a deal.Tomorrow's Guardian  
Armed with his new mandate, David Davis makes a strong start to the Brexit negotiations:  
BS. Brexit will hurt the most vulnerable more than anyone else.  
Take your pick as to the exact sequence of errors that has led us to the brink of Brexit without a stable government  
Brexit is really harking back to an Empire that went many decades ago. Stupidity writ large. 
The UK government team arriving for Brexit talks tomorrow.  
In Brexit boost, Jaguar Land Rover to hire 5,000 UK staff...But I thought Brexit was the apocalypse!? Lol   
Brexit talks open tomorrow. Here's my forecast on David Davies' first day.  
Brexit is like Prohibition - the only way to force its supporters to accept that it can't work, is to try and implement it 
When are the millions who voted Tory going to see that the whole EU vote and  Brexit chaos was caused only by the Tory Party #TheresaVsBoris 
BollocksReferendumExacerbatingXenophobiaInitiatesTomorrow 
This is what brexit is all about. The rest is a con.European commission to crack down on offshore tax avoidance  
Look at what's happened to the number of British citizens seeking German passports  
Isn't it clearer by the day that Brexit is 1 giant opportunity of a few tax-evading plutocrats to gut the UK state? This the power behind it 
Without deal with DUP, Brexit talks are meaningless since Theresa May could never guarantee Parliamentary approval of anything agreed. 
Cameron treated the uk like we were in a Truman show experiment, when Brexit ref.  all went wrong he moved on. Not a care #TheresaVsBoris 
I see Phil Hammond has come out and contradicted #May by confirming no deal from the EU would be a bad deal. Her days are numbered. #brexit 
Which is why there's no #QueensSpeech...except one involving #Brexit. So no domestic agenda as such.  It's a #landgrab. For now. 
Imagine if we announced this was our Brexit Negotation Team. #TheresStillTime 
The EU will try to bribe,bully & threaten the UK during Brexit talks. Their greatest fear is we leave & succeed.Get ready to walk away  
Which is being made much WORSE by Brexit. Only 46 EU nurses registered with UK @nmcnews in April 17 = 95% drop from last spring! 
Let's remember Friday is brexit days first anniversary Share the news & ruin a leftist pricks day#Brexit 
Jeremy Corbyn starting to sound like he's being programmed with the same drivel generating software as the Maybot. #Brexit #Remain 
If food won't get cheaper after #Brexit, would I be wrong to conclude that it'll be more expensive?#MichaelGovePorkies 
Theresa May cancels sovereignty. Enjoy your Christmas dinner you Brexit turkeys.  
'Democracy' gave us an advisory ref narrowly won by industrial scale lying. We have every right to oppose Brexit & ask for an informed ref  
This is a long game. We want to defeat  #Brexit AND the #Tories. Forever.  Patience.#Remain 
A shiny penny to the first person who can tell me what the Tories *actually* promised on Brexit.  
Gotta say - this is much better tone from Corbyn on Brexit.He acknowledges his remain voters & says no intention to walk away from Europe.  
In Brexit boost, Jaguar Land Rover to hire 5,000 staff  
Lemme guess it was Brexit's fault?  
#British people have changed their minds on #Brexit, poll finds:   
Theresa May told she has 10 days to save her leadership as hard Brexit supporters warn of challenge      
A must-read view from Ireland. "Just wait until austerity-fatigued voters have to live through a Brexit-driven economic slowdown."  
*Brexit Shambles*  
The Conservatives are trying to get everything ready to start the Brexit talks. This pretty much sums up how organised they are...  
BREXIT: Theresa May’s team “making last minute preparations to start strong and stable negotiations in the morning” confirms No.10.  
11 years ago today new Statute of Autonomy was approved in a referendum in #Catalonia. Ruling against it in 2010 triggered the indy process. 
Martin Rowson: the Brexit negotiations begin – cartoon  
Seriously, how is Theresa May going to get "the best Brexit deal" for Britain when she can't sort out shelter for families two miles away?  
The majority of people would back a referendum on the terms of the the UK's departure from the EU #Brexit #Remain 
For decades gov's have forced immigration onto us until the referendum : when we stood up & said NO MORE ! listen to the people for once  
Interesting. Now majority of voters would like a second referendum after Brexit deal is negotiated.  
Country doesn't think 'no deal is better than a bad deal'. Also strong support for soft Brexit.Basically, Corbyn played Europe perfectly.  
Only the collective force of groupings like the EU can stop the super-rich & giant corporations dodging taxes.#Remain #Brexit 
RT: The British people will not allow Brexit to be watered down,reversed or betrayed in anyway.We must be tough & uncompromising in talks  
David Davis, tomorrow. #Brexit #Tories 
In the film "Speed" a bomb on a bus will explode if it slows down. That's the UK re Brexit & Independence is the hero cop who saves the day. 
British people have changed their minds on Brexit, poll finds   
Cancelling Brexit would be ‘great’ – German minister  
There is no excuse for @jeremycorbyn to be swimming in the stinking #Brexit pool made by Murdoch, Dacre, Farage & the Tory right. #Remain 
11. SNP will not see better conditions for winning a referendum as they saw in 2014. The future has become much more difficult for the Nats 
8. It is rather difficult to win a secessionist referendum if it depends on demonising one third of the population as sub-human deplorables 
Hammond is right. If, say, the EU demanded a deal including an annual tribute of 10 young men and 10 young women, we should refuse. #Brexit 
Scotland has lost industry after industry under the Tories. Brexit will see them finish the job. SNP fighting back.  
"The Mail on Sunday 18/06/17 Brexit survey results in full" by HappyToast - just FP'd:  
Big shout out to Hannah, who texted my LBC show to say "you need to beware, you cunt" for suggesting the possibility of a second referendum. 
People in Britain would "clearly" now prefer a soft Brexit, Ryanair's Kenny Jacobs says   
#IN Thread - why Tories & Labour are deluded over the boutique #Brexit deal they're both offering1) picture an alternate reality for a sec 
Schrödinger's Labour Party - They are both in favour of and against Brexit 
#Brexit negotiations begin tomorrow. Sign up for email alerts to get the latest information on EU #citizensrights:  
Theresa May cancels Queen's Speech 2018 over Brexit  
Conservatives: Brexit means Brexit, no deal better than a bad dealLabour: Brexit for the many not the fewLib Dems: vote againThe EU:  
What so-called 'Brexit Bill'? I don't want to hear Brussels utter one more word about it. We can counter-claim €1trn  
I don't want a VW Beetle convertible, I want something exactly the same in every way as a VW Beetle convertible, only cheaper#IN #Brexit  
Theresa May told she has 10 days to save her leadership as hard Brexit supporters warn of challenge   
Brexit cannot be undone, but people can change their minds. There are signs this is happening.  
Labour's for hard Brexit my arse.Corbyn's backers want soft Brexit (at least) over hard Brexit in a 64% to 19% ratio. That's thumping.  
Theresa May starts Brexit talks with the EU on Monday in an embarrassing position    
Let's go! @DavidDavisMP  heads to first round of talks with a vow Brexit is DEFINITELY on  via @MailOnline 
Corbyn is massively out of touch with his party on Brexit  
Referendum on the streets of Kashmir tonight#PAKvIND 
The "Brexit at any cost" argument only makes sense in the context of hating the EU more than you like your own country  
May on Brexit: "who is going to be there...for the UK? It's either going to be me or Jeremy Corbyn." But on Monday it will be David Davis. 
British people have changed their minds on Brexit, poll finds  
A ‘no deal’ Brexit is the perfect cover for the Tories to bring about their small state agenda  
I voted labour but did NOT vote for Brexit 
A year on from #brexit, just hours before negotiations start, Gov peddling empty tautologies. This is a country on verge of profound crisis  
Support for Brexit is fading away. It time to stop the Brexit madness before it is too late.#StopBrexit 
Get in, idiot, we're going Brexit negotiating  
What Brexit was to the UK election, Trump will be to the US election. Democrats could run a socialist hamster & it would get a ton of votes.  
#Brexit talks start tomorrow, if all goes to plan...  
#brexit would leave a massive hole in public finance  
This is what having a press dominated by #Murdoch and right-wing tabloid does to a country The real cause of #Brexit  
If May did a U-turn on Brexit, I don't think many would care, except Boris, because his career depends on no one ever challenging his lies 
Gosh, this is a long, drawn-out process (Brexit)! Who got us into this mess?Heath 1972Thatcher 1986Major 1992Blair 1997/2001Brown 2007 
British government plans two-year Parliament session to deal with expected onslaught of Brexit-related legislation  
David Davis begins Brexit negotiations tomorrow.  
Shadow chancellor accuses the Government of being in "disarray" over Brexit on the eve of talks in Brussels  
It is #Eid a week earlier in downtown Srinagar. Kashmir is out on the streets. Another Referendum.  
This is no longer simply about a 2nd referendum. It's about Westminster ignoring the democratic will of Scotland's people.  
I always get excited on Brexit Eve, wondering what the morning will bring. I'm guessing bluff, bluster and rank incompetence #brexitshambles 
Where next for #Brexit? There's only one plausible model - and it is clearly less good than staying in the EU:  
David Cameron tells Theresa May her Brexit is doomed  
Georgia race could be a referendum on the GOP’s massively unpopular health care bill  
Why is Philip Hammond trying to destabilise his government’s Brexit talks? My blog:  
'Happy Birthday Mr President': This from Farage is groveling & pathetic. It also shows where his loyalties lie. No patriot!#Brexit #Remain 
SDLP leader @columeastwood has voiced concerns about "mixed signals" coming from the #DUP over #Brexit  
Do I have this right?#Brexit negotiations start Monday and we have no #dupdeal still, a non-majority Government and no negotiating position 
It's not about whether people voted for hard Brexit or soft Brexit, so much as they voted for a blind Brexit. But now eyes are opening. 
'Big business leaders press Theresa May to rethink hard #brexit' RT if you believe we must put a stop to ANY #brexit 
Jones's logic... Let's take the public's rejection of May's Brexit as a clear endorsement of May's Brexit... otherwise we betray voters.   
German foreign minister says there may be chance of "soft" Brexit that keeps UK in EU's single market  
Bloody EU, cutting down on off-shore tax avoidance. Sick of them stopping rich people from ripping us off! Brexit! 
The strange tale of the DUP, Brexit, a mysterious £425,000 donation and a Saudi prince #DUPCoalition 
She inspired Hitchcock classics, dabbled in sci-fi and even predicted Brexit... pic.twitter.com/lvS662Pokx 
Germans offer a soft #brexit option to save UK economy from meltdown. UK shd snatch the chance, but I bet it won't 
Brits say no to leaving EU customs union, no to no deal, and yes to 2nd referendum  
Baking hot in North Yorkshire today. Sweating like David Davis at tomorrow's Brexit talks. 
Poll suggests that most Europeans want to take back control from Brussels  #Brexit 
#Brexit is a cesspit created by press-barons and a transatlantic clique of rich business men and their political lackeys. #Remain 
Firecrackers are deafening! This is a referendum damn it! #Kashmir #IndvPak 
UK public: Brexit is settledCorbyn: Brexit is settledLabour manifesto: Brexit is settledAlastair Campbell: That's not what we voted for!  
There is scant chance Theresa May will go soft on Brexit - Me for @FT  
Here are the GE2017 voter mandates: "Accepting the referendum result" - Con (42%) + Lab (40%) + Ukip (1.8%) + DUP (0.9%) = 85% 
I don't want a hard Brexit in fact I want to stay in the EU but I am also one of the 85%.  It's a bonkers statistic 
Treasury once again big problem over Brexit. We need to leave Customs Union as well as Single Market & ECJ - not sellout with half-baked EEA 
Georgia race could be a referendum on the GOP’s massively unpopular health care bill  
My letter to David Davis. Govt should reset Brexit approach: less rhetoric more progressive values for shared future  
As talks open this week, Theresa May's team must accept that a hard Brexit is now impossible  
1/ Keir Starmer makes two factual errors on Andrew Marr: "second referendum impossible until after we've left EU" Not true, 
Seems the public trust themselves to make the final decision on Brexit.  Something we in the @LibDems have supported all along 
Hammond:Is not the PMIs not in charge of Brexit negotiationsIs not in charge of International TradeIs only responsible for the Treasury 
Timely reminder that #ScotGov paper in December 2016 on #Brexit options called for all of UK to stay in Single Market. Still on the table.  
Brexit is dead. Der Spiegel "The promise of Brexit was steeped in ideology from the very beginning, a fairy tale based on dark chauvinism." 
Listen to @OwenPaterson discussing why no deal must be an option in the Brexit negotiations on @BBCRadio4 
A remarkable comparison with the lack of UK government Brexit transparency to parliament here  
Austerity is being replaced by Brexit poverty. WAKE UP ENGLAND! #BinBrexit #Brexitpoverty 
Boris: We can reflect the mandate of the more than 80% of MPs whose manifestos pledged them to support Brexit  
The model anti-#Brexit protest at Mini-Europe in Brussels. Made my day!   
Check out the Parliament's red lines ahead of the expected start of #Brexit negotiations tomorrow   
Who's behind Brexit and why? Who paid for the Brexit social media war and why?This is not grass roots.This is not patriotism.  
#Breaking: #PUK will also select a representative to sit on referendum committee after it voted to support it  
High-Stakes Referendum on Trump Takes Shape in Georgia Special Election...  
Brexit is anything but patriotic!  A true patriot would never want to do deliberate harm to their country & compatriots. #stopbrexit #YesEU 
If we want to weaken support for #Brexit we must relentlessly attack the lie that Brexit is patriotic.#Remain 
If Scotland wants any chance of staying in the Single Market it'll have to be able to threaten a Yes vote. A referendum's our only leverage. 
Govt Brexit negotiating team: 7 men 1 woman 0 BAME!  Why couldn't they choose on merit?  
This is exactly why Scotland needs a choice of a lifeboat of an independence referendum... Hammond is aiming for the iceberg!!  
Majority back holding a referendum on terms of Brexit deal  
Serious q: how can #Brexit negotiations start when we do not currently have a government? 
I'm not going to do any "on the eve of Brexit negotiations..." but this from the excellent @AlbertoNardelli is a good thread for context. 
#Brexit negotiations start tomorrow, so been reading up about the UK representatives. Not filling me with confidence, I'll say that much  
....and sadly rather too many happily wear their ignorance with mind-numbing nationalistic pride. 
Dark Tower:  on Theresa May's crisis as a crisis of citizenship #GrenfellTower #Brexit 
#Brexit - the chosen policy of rich tax-dodgers seeking to rip-off ordinary Britons #StopBrexit #Remain 
Most leavers think of themselves & #Brexit as patriotic. We must seek to show them that it is a betrayal serving foreign interests.#Remain 
If you're not FOR Brexit, then you must be against it? So please sign up to get a mass Tweet trending on anniversary of Referendum #Marr 
Me on @LBC at 4pm: 53% of people support a second referendum on the detail of the Brexit deal.  It's the will of the people, isn't it? 
In the UK, support for Brexit is collapsing. And in the US, support for Trump is collapsing. Experiencing right wing nationalism is the pits  
Don't cancel the 2018 Queen's Speech, cancel Brexit.  
A major question mark still hangs over Brexit — what kind of society will the UK be afterward?  
Brexit boost: Jaguar Land Rover is set to hire an extra 5,000 engineers and technical staff in the next 12 months  
Britain can stay in customs union after Brexit, Labour's Keir Starmer insists  
Doesn't matter how I voted in Brexit or GE I respect the nations decision BUT 'scapegoating' is a cancer! It's JC's fault it's TM's fault  
How can @jeremycorbyn keep saying #Brexit is settled when a clear message from #GE2017 was rejection of @theresa_may's hard Brexit strategy? 
David Jones argues anything other than the UK leaving the Single Market and Customs Union would not be a Brexit. 
"Mr Mundell said it would be "unfair on the people of Scotland" to have another vote before a Brexit deal was done." Exactly what FM asked. 
#Brexit is a policy led by traitors - Putin helpers, and those wanting to hand Britain over to transatlantic plutocrats. #Remain 
Liam Fox says he will take a big bag of Caramel Freddos to sweet talk EU into a good Brexit deal.  
May will be "too busy with Brexit" for a #QueensSpeech next year, but called a vanity general election just days before negotiations begin 
Becoming clear Remainers who voted for Labour to rethink Brexit, will be disappointed.  
Goldman Sachs will double its Frankfurt staff on Brexit, says its Europe head  
Excellent thread. Sums up why I'm petrified of how #Brexit will end. Toxic combo of fantasy politics, self-delusion and Pollyannaism  
I stopped believing in Brexit when I was seven.. 
Public perception of the alternative Brexit strategies of the two main parties.  
This Father's Day I'm getting my dad the only thing he really wants: a smooth, orderly Brexit in the national interest. 
UK government lacks a majority, so deciding what Brexit means will fall to Parliament—as it always should have done 
Hard Brexit (as supported by Labour) will ensure you won't be offered an 'alternative' though. Just more austerity.  
Brexit of ANY kind will be bad for Britain. We are ALL going to pay the price of the #Brexit madness.#StopBrexit 
Daily Mail seem to be trying to bury that new Brexit opinion poll, so I saved a copy  
ICYMI: I spoke to @jillwrenn about the roles of Brexit, liberalism and age in Britain's modern political landscape  
So glad the Tories have their line agreed & their team looking assured, organised & united before Brexit talks start, er, tomorrow.   
Brexit will be fine, says another rich old man.  
Conservatives Prepare “Secret Plot” To Oust UK’s May If She Backs Off “Hard Brexit”  
I'd feel a lot better about Brexit negotiations if this was the team in charge.  
This on Grenfell Tower: Fire regulations review was abandoned, civil servants were redirected to working on Brexit  
This is a great primer on Single Market, customs union & #Brexit issues @uk_tpo - recommended  
The dire state of #Brexit Britain - as seen from SwitzerlandRead:  
Actually it focused first of all on U.K. staying  in the single market as best compromise . That is still true - how about it ? #Brexit  
#INPut simply, if the public were given an independently audited #Brexit cost & were asked "In or Out"They'd vote inAnd all MPs know that  
As far as I can see there are 4 options No Brexit, Soft Brexit, Hard Brexit, No deal. Order of preference -only first two acceptable. 
Theresa May has no mandate and cannot be allowed to make any Brexit deals. #NoMandateMay really should be trending 
Theresa May is due to start Brexit negotiations with the EU on Monday in an embarrassingly weak position   
Brexit negotiations start tomorrow. From now on we will provide a weekly update. This is what we know so far:  
Youse all do know that the FM has been saying for about a year that Scotland needs to know the terms of Brexit before being given a choice.. 
Can we maybe just tell everyone "Brexit" has already happened and just change the passport colour or something, then carry on? 
How fox hunting was shared more online during the election than Brexit stories - and how 30% of 18-24 read about the Tory ivory ban policy.  
All known before the vote, even stated by Brexit’s own economists  Fannies still voted for it.  
"Europe's Laughing Stock" - no, not a German paper, a Swiss paper. Switzerland's outside the EU, remember? #Brexit  
Philip Hammond undermines PM on eve of #Brexit talks as he says 'no deal would be a very bad outcome' 
#Brexit is a mistake. #HardBrexit is a disaster.   
The @LibDems are vilified for our stance on Brexit and the second referendum. Time will tell and we will be on the right side of history. 
Not hard, not soft - Boris Johnson demands an Al Dente Brexit  
Question. Why do hard pressed people in this country have to be taxed heavily so people from outside this country can live here for free? 
Labour Brexit Chaos: Starmer Backs Staying in Customs Union  
What's the fucking indyref2 mystery here?We look at the end brexit deal....if it's as shite as we expect....goodbye UKIt's an escape route 
Leadsom repeating the "over 80% voted for Brexit" canard.This is a lie. 
Theresa May has NO working majority and NO MANDATE. Her team therefore has no legitimacy to negotiate Brexit.#Marr  #bbcsp 
I see @DavidMundellDCT is on TV discussing Brexit.  Time to recirculate the link to ‘Scotland’s Place in Europe’  
"Brexit for the many, not the few?" Does stupidity know no bounds? What's happening in the U.K.? 
Let's examine Lord Digby's (and general #Brexit) mantra "there are other trading blocs out there, with which we can do business": 
Brexit and UK universities: our Brexit FAQs are regularly updated. For more information visit the UUK website  
Tory excuse for delaying Queen's speech for 2 yrs is for "more time to deal with #Brexit laws". Why call election in the first place, then? 
Did Lily Allen stop Brexit? No. Did Katy Perry stop Trump? No.Will Pamela Anderson stop May? No. Celebrity opinions are unwanted. 
No they have not. In Lords Labour said it could back a referendum on deal if public opinion backed it - which it now does.  
Business finally plucks up the courage to tell May they don't think Brexit is such a great idea  
#INThread 1) 2 years into this #brexit process.Labour & Tories still talking about boutique special EU deal that limits free movement 
Worried for a second that I haven't yet read the papers for a meeting tomorrow morning and then remembered I could be negotiating Brexit. 
I really don't *get* WHY the *commentariat* are UNCLEAR about Labour's position  #Brexit#marrI'm ONLY a twitter hack - but I *get* it 
I'm pleased govt is looking to adopt @LibDems economic plan & public support referendum on final EU deal. So WHY DIDN'T YOU VOTE FOR US FFS? 
John Redwood said people should stop moaning and get behind government's Brexit strategy.WHAT STRATEGY?  
BBC is still reliving the EU referendum. It still wants us to Remain. The narrative is clear, dreary and relentless #bbcsp 
. @third_lucky Rubbish. TMay had a majority, wanted a bigger one and ended without one at all. I call that losing her mandate on BREXIT 
On @Peston I explained Labour's priorities for Brexit and how our investment-led economy will deliver social justice in Britain.  
German Minister: UK reversing Brexit and staying in EU "would be great". Nah we're alright thanks  
.@DavidLammy says "the mood music" on Brexit has changed after the election and he maintains we should remain in the single market  
There is no Brexit for the many, scrap it as a deluded idea and fix the real problems of this country .@BrexitBin .@jeremycorbyn 
RT if you think the only Brexit poll we need is 'One whole year on, with all we know now, do we still really want to do this?' 
Chancellor @PhilipHammondUK explains why the focus when Brexit negotiations start on Monday must be the economy above immigration  
So Mr #Corbyn, the only difference between you & the #Tories on #Brexit is that you'll give the #EU the upper hand. 
Brexit negotiations start tomorrow lads  
UK to double length of next Parliament to deal with Brexit  
Both Labour and the Tories are promising the same impossible dream of Brexit. They are both promising the unachievable. They are both lying. 
How to spot a Brexit lie Q. Did someone from the Leave Campaign say it? A. It was a lie. 
Daily "Crush the saboteurs!" Mail poll finds MAJORITY want 2nd referendum on Brexit deal & 2/3 want Soft Brexit  
This is why you should ignore people who tell you to: "Shut up. Move on. You lost." And carry on fighting.#survation #Brexit 
British people have changed their minds on Brexit, poll finds - Brian Adcock - political cartoon gallery in Putney pic.twitter.com/qUfqbeQgLn 
I'm not overly keen on her, but she was democratically voted in, has started #Brexit & now needs to complete it.#TheresaMayShouldStay  
Talk of "generous UK offer" on EU-UK citizens' rights post Brexit. EU already made fully comprehensive proposal !  
#Brexit negotiations with the UK to begin tomorrow focussing on citizens' rights + financial settlement + new border  
IDS on clear Brexit agenda: "86% of the public voted for manifestos that contained leaving the single market and leaving the customs union."  
The Brexit Gov can't even negotiate a deal with DUP. Do they honestly expect us to trust them to do the best for us with the EU? 
Staying in the Customs Union and the Single Market is NOT Brexit. Better staying in than that. Literally. #Brexit  
BREXIT BOOST: Jaguar Land Rover to hire 5,000 new staff. 
On @LBC 1) What would PM need to do to regain your confidence? 2) What's an 'open' Brexit? 3) Why will terrorist flags fly in London today?  
The tide has turned. People are better informed about the implications of #Brexit than they were a year ago and they've changed their minds  
Remember TMay called the election solely to get bigger majority to get through  her Brexit plan. She failed & now has no mandate 
With a weakened leader and reeling from crisis, Britain hurtles into the Brexit unknown  
"I voted Labour to get rid of Tories and stop Brexit. Is 0 out of 2 still a win?"  
'The issue of Brexit is settled' says @jeremycorbyn . Yet many voted Labour precisely to unsettle it 
The Quantum Brexit.  
David Davis tells not to worry about #citizensrights after #Brexit despite having consistently voted against them  
Political parties will “reap the whirlwind of public anger” if the Government backslides on key elements of Brexit  
Forget #Grenfell.The press and pundits will.It'll be about NOTHING but #Brexit for next two years.#QueensSpeech#abuseofpower 
Powerful attack in Mail on TMay’s Brexit position by ex-minister & Goldman Sachs boss  
There is no good reason for this, unless you're trying to attempt to stitch up Brexit process and want to avoid scrutiny. Anti-democratic  
Is there a Panini album of the Brexit negotiating teams?  
British people have changed their minds on Brexit, poll finds  
As a Remainer I never imagined free-market Tories would shack up with a bunch of hard right creationist homophobes to push their Brexit  
So Mr Corbyn, the only difference between you and the Tories on Brexit is that you'll give the EU the upper hand. No Thanks!  
Sarah Wollaston hints she could frustrate Theresa May's Brexit plans: "There is not the parliamentary arithmetic for a hard Brexit"  
There's no such thing as:A red, white and blue Brexit.A Brexit for the many.A pragmatic Brexit.There is only one: a catastrophic #Brexit 
Are people that voted to stop the SNP happy? Is this what you wanted? Scotland neutered in Brexit talks all power to WM& DUP? 
 Corbyn & McDonnell said they want out of the SM & CUThat's hard BrexitTalk of a "special deal" makes Labour sound like Vote Leave 
10) Asymmetry between resources will shape talks: for UK there will be little else, & Brexit is an obsession. For EU27 it's mostly a process 
On the eve of the Brexit negotiations’ commencement – on BBC Radio 4’s BH program  
Absolutely brutal from @DerSPIEGEL on #Brexit and Britain. Worth a read.  
While the ashes of Grenfell Tower are still warm. Brexit must be stopped for all our sakes. That will work for everyone, not just the many.  
The "No Queen's Speech next year so to make time for Brexit" excuse up there with the goatskin excuse this year. Constitutional flapdoodle 
I'm sorry but this is utter rubbish. #Brexit will hurt the many and will kill off all of your spending plans. Get real!  
WATCH: Hammond Backs Brexit  
Brexit negotiations begin tomorrow. The UK has:-no Govt-no negotiating positions-a PM noone thinks will survive the negotiationsFiasco 
8) Meanwhile, Labour's Brexit position remains confused and full of contradictions 
7) Whatever form Brexit takes, whoever governs will have little time or resource to do anything else for the next few years 
6) Brexit is tremendously complicated. It is about details. But in many ways what is a technical process has been driven mostly by ideology 
Hammond accuses Brussels of "most egregious pre-negotiation posturing" he has ever seen on the Brexit bill 
Phillip Hammond saying he wants a Brexit that avoids a cliff edge shows he obviously doesn't understand that Brexit is a cliff edge  #Marr 
Some Tory MPs feared Hammond would use #Marr interview to torpedo #Brexit strategy but he was v clear - we must leave single market and CU 
Growing inequality and Brexit. Both bad for Britain? Delighted to be presenting a show on @LBC 10-12 today. Do listen or better still call 
Sturgeon:2016: Scotland vote on Brexit once details known2017: Scotland vote on Brexit once details knownMedia: Sturgeon inconsistent! 
Economy crumbling as Britain prepares for #Brexit negotiations, with Jaguar Land Rover... hiring 5,000 new staff?   
Keir Starmer not fully defining Labour's #Brexit position, leaves it sounding almost indistinguishable from the Tory position. Which it is.  
Do Labour want Britain to stay in the single market after Brexit? #marr 
Andrew Marr points out that @Keir_Starmer's description of Labour's position on #Brexit is EXACTLY the same as the Conservative one. #Marr 
We are on a slippery road to dictatorship in the UKIs there not supposed to be a team for Brexit?We need another #GeneralElection now 
'Soft Brexit is non-Brexit'. RT if you agree!  
It does not take a whole Government to negotiate BREXIT: why abandon 2018 Queen's Speech amid worst social housing crisis since1945? 
Ahead of my interview on ITV's @Peston Show at 10am, I have written in The Mirror about #GrenfellTower and Brexit.  
Brexit is a disaster, it’s going to wreck our UK businesses reliant on EU, it’s going to diminish our global standing. All sense is gone. 
#Tories have reduced #Parliament to a #Brexit committee for  2 years.Nothing else. #abuseofpower#QueensSpeech 
Britain would be welcomed back if Brexit were reversed, Germany's Wolfgang Schaeuble says  
Suspect someone at No 10 has even considered no more Queen's Speeches for whole 5 year parliament "because of Brexit" so to avoid key votes 
The two years for Brexit laws excuse for no Queen's Speech next year doesn't add up. Bills could continue.Just about avoiding n-c vote. 
Brexit negotiations begin this week. He said this in 2012  
This man called Brexit .  
I voted Labour and brexit. I would now vote lab and remain 
May would be mad to press the Brexit kamikaze button - strong piece by former trade minister Jim O'Neill  
We've already lost face, comprehensively. Nothing left to lose. Let's abandon Brexit.  
But for May,Johnson,Gove,Davis etc is there anyone in this country - after what's been happening - who has any real enthusiasm for Brexit? 
Tfw Brexit negotiations start tomorrow, & the dog ate my homework. 
Can't believe Brexit negotiations start tomorrow. It's like when you have an epic family argument and then have to host people for dinner. 
WARNING: 'Overnight coup' planned against weak May if she backslides on Brexit.  
The voice of universities must be heard during #Brexit negotiations - call from university leaders 
The government lacks a majority, so deciding what Brexit means will fall to Parliament—as it always should have done  
Queen's speech will be last until 2019 as Parliament doubles how long it will sit for to handle Brexit   
I voted Labour but not for Brexit @jeremycorbyn 
Brexit is so complicated, Parliament has decided to sit for twice as long as normal  
Will Brexit now be hard, soft or scrambled? Here's everything we know so far  
"The promise of Brexit was steeped in ideology from the very beginning, a fairy tale based on dark chauvinism."  
Majority back holding a referendum on terms of Brexit deal  
The Tories want hard Brexit; the vast majority of the country wants soft Brexit or no Brexit. How exactly will the PM square that circle? 
Brexit: 2018 Queen's Speech cancelled by government  
The future may or may not be bright. But either way, the future’s Brexit.  
Labour & Tories have called this wrong, the public mood is shifting rapidly on Brexit.Can either show leadership and respond to this?  
Corbyn: Change is coming. Tories are in no position to negotiate a good Brexit deal.  
The dark mystery of who funded the DUP's six figure Brexit campaign  
Need to mend 'broken' Britain, to heal inner hurt, to rebuild bridges with our EU family. Brexit can't do this strongly led realignment can.  
Brexit negotiations start tomorrow. UK side seems to have neither a clear mandate nor public support for its positions.  
Public support the first time, I think, for a 2nd referendum on Brexit terms. Stay-or-Go then a real choice after last year's lies  
Will of the people: seems to be turning against the reality of Brexit now (from MoS).  
Would be fascinating to see how a question like "Do you just want Brexit to go away?" would poll in the UK 
Farage:Do not listen to those who tell you this election meant a rejection of a so-called “hard #Brexit”.YOU KNOW WHAT YOU VOTED FOR !  
British public opinion on Brexit right now. By @Survation who got the Election right. In MoS 
Brexiteers will topple May if she deviates from 'hard' Brexit. This pressure why she called election, but she's ended in a worse place.  
Majority of UK now wants to stay in EU customs union, single market, favours second referendum. Public support for Brexit collapsing?  
Secret plot to oust Theresa May as ministers threaten ‘stalking horse’ if PM fails to deliver ‘hard’ Brexit  
Forget calls for soft Brexit, I’ll deliver on the will of the people, vows @DavidDavisMP 
Charts from Mail on Sunday Survation poll on latest views on BREXIT 
David Davis rebuts Emmanuel Macron over Brexit 'open door' on eve of talks  
#Labour voters oppose hard #Brexit with overwhelming preference for unrestricted EU trade over immigration controls  
EU may force London's "clearing" business to relocate after Brexit  
On a referendum to accept or reject the final Brexit deal when negotiated:Support: 48%Oppose: 43%(via @Survation, 16-17 Jun) 
The U.K. is welcome to return to the EU, Brexit negotiator Guy Verhofstadt tells a German newspaper  
Majority will increase as the consequences of Brexit become clear. Time to call a halt to this nonsense and remain.  
Brexit talks must involve all parties, says SNP's new Westminster leader - Evening Express  
New Survation / MoS poll finds the British public now rejects a hard Brexit, and wants a second referendum.  
There is no Brexit for the many. Or Brexit for the few. Stop taking utter bollocks. These is just Brexit, a reckless folly built on lies.  
As much a vapid and meaningless slogan as Brexit means Brexit and No deal is Better than a Bad Deal.  
 In an admission that #brexit will be a disaster #May announces no 2018 Queens speech for fear of a backlash. #coward 
And the downsides of #Brexit are only just beginning to be realised by many. Another vote on any #Brexit deal vital  
Brexit talks to start on Monday  
Should the Tories do something that wasn't on the Referendum ballot paper and the voting public voted against in the general election?  
Tories are discovering their strident Brexit position is not just on wrong side of history but now also on wrong side of public opinion.  
Let's hope more parties get behind the @LibDems then as they have been caĺling for a second referendum all along. It's the right choice.  
Norway's relationship with the EU is back in the spotlight as a possible model for Brexit  
Survation MoS poll finds for first time more people, 53%, backing new referendum to approve Brexit deal than opposing. 
Britain to hold special two-year parliament session to tackle Brexit  
We have a totalitarian government working for the super rich pushing through a hard #Brexit by any means necessary- 
Brexit: 89% of Britons want dual citizenship after leaving EU, finds survey  
millennials are good until you realise that if we had a republic referendum a young monarchist page would make a "yaass queen" meme 
Brexit will hit the poorest the hardest. It should be taken very, very seriously. 
Pls, let's stop sounding ignorant. A Referendum is NOT war! Canada has had peaceful referenda. Quebec got 'Nays' so they're still part of us 
Nigel Farage: They Are Going To Reverse Brexit  via @yournewswire 
UK PM May will face leadership challenge if she softens Brexit:  Telegraph  
A smooth "Brexit" has long looked difficult. Now it might be becoming impossible for Prime Minister Threresa May.  
Good Man! #DavidDavis likes it hard....#Brexit   
Forget calls for soft Brexit, I’ll deliver on the will of the people, vows David Davis  talk is cheap action needed 
#Brexit-Chapter Umpteenth in #ToryProxyWar over Europe.Date of beginning of current cycle-Major Premiership: early '90s 
.@Survation-which called #GE2017 right asks: "Would you like a referendum to approve #Brexit deal?" 53%-#Yes 
Dear Jeremy,There is no such thing as a Brexit #ForTheMany 1/ 
Theresa May get ready for#Brexit and forming new government  
Trump's rise, the Brexit vote & alt-right makeover of far-right brought fascist scum from under rocks. The alt-right's over but scum exposed 
Can't work out Corbyn, but certainly McDonnell seems hell bent on hard Brexit. Labour's EU policy is just as mysterious as Tories'. 
Brexit Secretary David Davis warns Europe: Don't try to stop us leaving the EU  
@IanDunt - This is a picture my daughter drew. It's of David Davis starting Brexit negotiations in Brussels on Monday. Very proud dad.  
Britain to hold special two-year parliament session to tackle Brexit  
UK Conservatives Prepare "Secret Plot" To Oust May If She Backs Off "Hard Brexit"  
Labour must commit to anti-#Brexit. 
Brexit:56% of skilled EU workers in UK say they are going to leave70% feeling discriminated38% feeling vulnerable 
When all is said and done on Brexit it will be the poor who pay for it, not the billionaires who wrote the cheques for it. 
Forget about hard or soft. Let's just not Brexit at all#StopBrexit 
Brexit secretary David Davis warns Europe: Don't try to stop us leaving the EU  
#Europe on the rise as #UK flounders ahead of #brexit talks  
What really pisses me off about Brexit is that it is really stupid. Are we as a country that dumb? 
Don't forget that on Monday May is going to start brexit negotiations and just HAHHAHAAHHAHAHAHAHA HOLY FUCK IT'S GOING TO BE SO BAD 
I'm an Englishman and cannot comprehend why you would not wish to chose your own destiny in an indepenedent country. Brexit is a disaster. 
Research on thousands of hard Remainer shows they voted for Labour predominantly as tactical against May hard Brexit  
A #Brexit Britain would bully poor countries into doing deals that suit it, and be bullied by powerful countries into deals that suit them. 
Queen's speech scrapped next year to allow more time to tackle Brexit laws  
RT Can't wait to see this uk #Brexit negotiator get torn apart by EU Negotiators as #c4news did #Skypapers #Marr 
The same internal splits that led the Tory party to holding #EUref will continue during #Brexit.  
The people changed their minds on Theresa May so why not Brexit too?  
Secret plot to oust Theresa May as ministers threaten ‘stalking horse’ if PM fails to deliver ‘hard’ Brexit  
The Brexit vote devalued the pound. Why that has led to inflation, but no export boom. Good @WSJ piece  
"#ScotRef will take place at the end of Brexit negotiations" ... Hasn't Nicola Sturgeon repeated this several times?  
Pressures on, keep pushing. Brexit is a house built on sand.   
Be in no doubt the Tories will use their Brexit 'Great' Reform Bill as the main plank in May's Queens Speech to drive further deregulation  
Brexit is so complicated, Parliament has decided to sit for twice as long as normal  
New Mail on Sunday poll shows majority want to be in SM & CU & want a referendum on deal. Are you listening @labour? #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Political crisis, dozens dead in horrific fire, Brexit negotiations just days away and this is the SoS front page?! #everydaysexism 
Join the #StopBrexit rally in Whitehall on  Friday 23 June! #Remain #Brexit #BrexitShambles 
An interesting piece of polling research on why committed Remainers voted Labour #Brexit #Remain 
So Jeremy, is it #Brexit or the #NHS ? You know you can't have both.Spell it out. Make it clear. 
Queen's speech to MPs dropped next year to allow for Brexit laws  
Big business leaders press Theresa May to rethink hard Brexit  
So-called 'secret plot to oust May if no hard Brexit' @Telegraph shows that #Brexit is a right-wing ToryUKIP coup. Resist. Time to resist. 
You’ll be all in favour of a second referendum to rub my stupid face in it then, won’t you, “Linda.” 
Next year's Queen's Speech cancelled to devote more time to Brexit  
NEW: Govt announces rare 2-year parliamentary session to give MPs the time to consider Brexit legislation. Just 1 Queen's Speech for 2 yrs. 
David Davis rebuts Emmanuel Macron over Brexit 'open door' on eve of talks  
Next year's Queen's Speech is being ditched by the Government to ease the way in Parliament for new Brexit laws. 
The anger we feel about the state of the country shouldn't be directed at May,but the billionaires behind 'her' vile antisocial hard Brexit. 
#Brexit Myths Busted:#MarchforRemain on Saturday #stopbrexit #UniteForEurope 
The dark mystery of who funded the DUP's six figure Brexit campaign  
He's going in the wrong direction on this one. Can't we have a Brexit for the none?  
cant help wondering if we shouldnt prioritise getting our country together first... not now spend billions on brexit. 
Half of skilled EU workers that Britain will need after Brexit now plan to leave  
The people who voted for you don't want Brexit. And if you "deliver" it you are delivering the agenda of the most hated PM in a generation  
With PM May on the rocks and the Brexit negotiations starting Monday, a once in a lifetime headline opportunity for "May the Farce v EU". 
National press tries to bait Jon @Ossoff into saying his race is a referendum on Trump or Pelosi but he stays on message: it's about Georgia 
BREAKING: First poll since the announcement of Catalan independence referendum shows a majority of Catalans will vote Yes. 
First polls:52% Yes48% NoTurnout: 64% Catalan Independence Referendum #gameon 
News from #DavidDavis! #BREXIT negotiations start on Monday 19th be ready and show your support! WE CAN DO THIS! #BBC #SKY #UK #TORY #UKIP 
Jeremy Corbyn: Weakened and divided, Tory government is in no position to negotiate a good Brexit deal for Britain  
Jeremy Corbyn article on Brexit and single market tomorrow. It's not wholly clear what the policy he seeks is.  
Join the Stop Brexit rally in Whitehall on  Friday 23 June!  @nickreeves9876 @Scientists4EU @IanDunt Pls RT #Brexit  
Today's Times editorial really is extraordinary, & seems clear to me we're already very close to RW press calling for Brexit to be stopped  
Important thing now is to stay calm and give authorities time to investigate the cause of the fire & establish link to Brexit & Islamophobia 
The many don't want brexit. 
British man STRIPPED OF CITIZENSHIP after fleeing UK to join jihad-linked group. Trudeau please note!- Your Brexit  
And there is no BREXIT for the many only for the few. 
Do you accept the result of the EU referendum ? #brexit More retweets the better and if people decide to follow us , that's great too  
For over 40 years the UK has subsidised EU farming whilst neglecting our own. We must Brexit,stop paying the EU & invest in UK agriculture  
Getting May to resign could effectively be all it takes to kill Brexit. Too discredited, too toxic for any other PM to take over, Con or Lab 
Jobs and wages were hit, not by EU migrants, but by Chinese imports #Brexit will make that worse.#Remain 
EU's house of cards will COLLAPSE if Brussels punishes UK for Brexit, Swedish MEP blasts  
The only good Brexit deal is #NoBrexit. Please wake up and seize the initiative! 
'For the many' entails 'no Brexit'  - please listen to this 
Change is coming. Labour will deliver a Brexit for the many not the few, and bring our country together. #ForTheMany 
Tories are in no position to negotiate a good Brexit deal, says @jeremycorbyn  
A superb piece of writing on #Brexit from @MarinaHyde 
Tory, UKIP & DUP MEPs united to vote against EU tax avoidance measures.   #Remain Tax haven #Brexit 
Considering the majority in NI voted for no Brexit Ian Paisley certainly has no regard for the wishes of the electorate. 
Forget the Single Market myth – the UK has little to lose from being outside it   #Brexit 
"We believe in properly and fully leaving the Custom Union" @ianpaisleymp tells me. V clear on #DUP desire for hard #Brexit. 
Hi @theresa_may you don't have a working majority so how do you have legitimacy to negotiate Brexit?#MayMustGo 
Breaking: DUP want out of customs union @ianpaisleymp tells me 'A soft.. Brexit we read as no Brexit and that we will not countenance' 
Another ten years and I shall be 10 years older and still certain that Brexit is a crime against the people of the UK perpetrated by the 1%. 
UK Government and other Brexit parties have destroyed our reputation, lost us friends and isolated us. But not in the name of the 48%.  
U.K.'s EU deal was grossly preferential for the U.K.  Brexit collapse will return U.K. to the more comfortable role of 'sick man of Europe'. 
It’s not exactly nuanced, but here’s Spiegel in English blasting the UK Tory Party. UK now a laughing stock. #brexit  
Ken Clarke urges change of course on Brexit amid 'hopeless splits' - The Irish News  
Let the games begin#Brexit  
By our seat-by-seat analysis, Brexit was responsible for about half of the national swing from the Tories to Labour  
Brexit woman on #LBC describing Grenfell Tower protestors as Marxists and demanding to know why the EU didn't do anything about the cladding 
What Nietzsche's Philosophy Can Tell Us About Why Brexit And Trump Won  
#recap The German view of the recent General Election and Brexit is pretty damning 
Please read this.This exciting Brexit future feels like all the rubbish bits from the past | Marina Hyde  
.@CarolineLucas proposed to include PR as an option in the 2011 referendum - #AVisnotPR. Sadly, this was voted down   
Reversal of Brexit decision would be great: German minister.   
Naïvely, initially, I kept asking how my life would improve with Brexit.  Never got a positive answer; only insults for questioning. #Remain 
 No backing for May's Brexit Economy tanking No stability No Brexit plan UK reputation shredded  Stop Brexit before it gets worse pic.twitter.com/HjJP9Tt5bK 
"No one would be calling for a do-over if Brexit had lost"Are you kidding me they pre-emptively said they would  
#Brexit-the single greatest act of idiocy in UK history. 
Very important that everyone understands that Brexit is an element in Hard Right political agenda which includes deregulation as cornerstone  
How can #TheresaMay negotiate #Brexit on Monday when she hasn't yet formed a government? 
Just been to Estonia. They shake their heads in bewilderment at #brexit #NotMyPM 
Thanks for your honesty. Get out there and convince others that they were sold a pack of lies. We can stop #Brexit. Best of luck. 
If #brexit is so magnificent, why aren't any other EU countries doing it? Honestly it's a genuine question??  
Is the new chat that we should stop talking about Independence cause it's getting boring and throw in with Theresa May's Brexit? Fuck that. 
If the €100 Billion Brexit bill is what we would have paid had we remained it's more proof we were right to leave  
Press lies undermine democratic debate by destroying the foundations of agreed facts upon which debate and argument rely. #Grenfell #Brexit 
Yes. THIS. No one in any of  Leave campaigns, nor in May's gov, incl via any select committee, has yet shown how/why #Brexit in UKs interest  
It takes Russian journalist Alexander Nekrassov to talk sense on biased BBC News. #Brexit   
#maymustgo b/c if she negotiates #brexit it will be to Britain's detriment. 
David Davis will freak Michel Barnier by entering #brexit negotiations without any discernible negotiating structure.  
Me neither. Fuck Brexit and the clowns it rode in on  
I am really enjoying watching Brexit as it slowly, slowly, slowly and painfully dies. 
The Lie, sorry, Leave campaign did a great job convincing gullible people to vote for Brexit. You are allowed to admit it & change your mind 
Setting out key political realities #Bodenstown tomorrow & the necessary reality checks!#DUP #Tories#Brexit #Unity 
If (now, when?) a 2nd referendum is held, it must be done properly: a full franchise & a majority bar. As should have happened first time. 
Either scrap #Brexit altogether or hold a 2nd referendum. There are no other legitimate alternatives. 
You've had a year to sell me Brexit, I'm still not buying it. No Brexit. 
Brexit means brexit  
Labour's #Brexit position​"I want a VW Beetle convertibleOr something exactly the same as a VW Beetle Convertible only cheaper"#IN 
Poll shows slight increase in support for a United Ireland since Brexit result  
.Yes - WHY aren't they?"Why aren’t Scotland’s politicians calling to reverse Brexit?". 
Brexit negotiations. The EU: "So could you tell us your plan?"Britain:  
(Sunday evening) Oh god, Brexit negotiations tomorrow. I'll definitely do some preparation right after Bullseye's finished.  
Let's not pretend they won't make it the narrowest & conservative referendum they can get away with @eilistweets #rally2repeal #repealthe8th 
These idiots think that we will get better deals when we are desperate and vulnerable outside the EU, than the EU has already got.#Brexit  
The vandals and hooligans are the Tories and their billionaire press baron friends who are wrecking this country with #Brexit.#Remain 
to clarify GBP  Jun 23, 2016 $1.4699 by 1 July was $1.3243 so Brexit vote caused gbp collapse rise in import prices & now falling real wages 
"Brexit did indeed unleash hate - not that of the British for foreigners - but rather of the liberals for the masses." 
For all the ruthless neoliberal ambitions of Brexit, it's just gone and face-planted before the first hurdle... as it always deserved.  
EU may force London's "clearing" business to relocate after Brexit  
collapse of GBP came directly after Brexit vote as did collapse in firm's investment & hiring intentions as EU27 started growing strongly 
Brexit negotiating team prepares to leave for Brussels  
#WION Reformers & Rebels, #Lord Karan #Bilimoria. He thinks #Brexit is dangerous & Narendra #Modi is inspiring. Saturday 9PM Sunday 8PM IST 
Those Brexit negotiations on Monday.  
What do we want?BREXIT BRITAIN!When do we want it?NINETEEN FIFTY EIGHT! 
Interesting that so many are signing this petition: "My vote for Labour was NOT a vote for Brexit" !  via @UKChange 
My bit on the eve of Brexit negotiations  
This is truly disgusting. This awful pro Brexit propaganda newspaper blames Europe for London skyscraper tragedy.Shameful shameful pic.twitter.com/flqjIpp267 
Britain would be welcomed back if Brexit were reversed, Germany's Wolfgang Schaeuble says  
why do british ppl pretend they arent european like i know brexit is a thing but ur still part of the continent pal 
In which imminent Brexit disasters are somehow blamed on people who warned that they would happen. Expect a lot of this.  
Brexit talks begin on Monday and nobody's quite sure what will happen. Here's a guide  
Another Brexit lie falls. I think the only thing left is Blue Passports  
How Ireland's border became a bigger Brexit issue  
DUP called for a sensible #Brexit that works for all? Yet support leaving Customs Union and Single Market. How will that work. #saturdayrte 
Vote for and against Brexit, and vote for Tories and Labour, by age. pic.twitter.com/8wRYcaqwMx 
We don't want any #Brexit.  
Breaking down the British music industry and Brexit (from the archives)   
I have a hunch Brexit will end up being like Communism; a disappointment only because it was never fully implemented in its pure form 
the old voted for Brexit having benefited hugely from the triple lock I always thought eventually the young would fight back & refuse to pay 
The DUP wants to abolish the Goebbels-esque @BBC licence fee. Please let that, & hard, real Brexit, be the price of supporting @theresa_may. 
Interesting. #Brexit #EU 
What I've never understood is how a Labour leader could ever have embraceda policy quite as obviously hard right and neocon as Brexit. 
Seen elsewhere: Scottish Greens reassert independence referendum support in wake of General Election  |…  #ScotRef 
The answer to this letter is that Parliament is much too busy with referendums, elections and Brexit stuff to do anything else:  
Brexit is barmy, we all know it so... Corbyn continues to pursue it. May and Corbyn together. 
Anyone still barking ‘Brexit means Brexit’ should be ashamed of themselves, says @zoesqwilliams 
I've just been asked if the Brexit negotiations should be televised live, and now it's all I want in the world. 
The Guardian view on Brexit Britain: a clown not a lion | Editorial  
Government start Brexit negotiations on Monday.Its like sitting a nuclear physics exam but all you've done is watch episodes of Spongebob 
BREXIT: Top trade negotiator appointed - Britain doesn't need EU anymore. 
Yet despite this millions of us are very clear: Brexit is an error, it should never happen and it probably never will.  
'Twas Brexit and the slimy Gove did tire and fumble under May. All flimsy were the Cabinet. And the DUP held sway'. 
Should be, but isn't. Brexit has never been more than an incoherent jingoistic spasm against modernity dressed up in lies (Also: what plan?)  
This exciting Brexit future feels like all the rubbish bits from the past | Marina Hyde  
At least it's not just infosec - this on how the UK denied itself access to trade negotiator top talent in run-up to Brexit negotiations.  
Instead of paying £60-100bn on Brexit, we cld refurbish all high-rise w state of art sprinklers, alarms, stairs, replace flammable cladding 
'No deadline' for DUP-Tory deal - May's inability to negotiate a deal makes #Brexit even more unlikely   
Britain can't get a decent Brexit negotiator because the government refuses to pay the asking price. You couldn't make this stuff up  
I do feel sorry for the scapegoat . BUT the arrogance of “Brexit means Brexit”, the hubris of the election call! 
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT NEGOTIATIONS  
Sad& true but too late. To my eternal shame UK media unprepared & unwilling to give airtime to Remain MEPs like me to rebut Brexit arguments  
50% of @LeaveEUOfficial voters not willing to lose a penny for Brexit. They will be £2000+ pa worse off if Brexit Elite get their way.  
This needs repeating, absorbing, repeating again and continuing with the work needed to halt Brexit.  
Your polite reminder that Brexit negotiations start Monday - because our government was too [ insert] to ask for a pause.  
#Brexit is dead A Wave of Anger Crashes over Britain Death of Brexit at the Hands of Theresa May - SPIEGEL ONLINE  
Theresa May has lost her mandate for Brexit - MPs should make that clear, writes @stephen_dorrell  
Great line in another great @MarinaHyde piece: "For the most part, Brexit was yesterday-disguised-as-tomorrow."  
This from the @thetimes   How Britain shot itself in foot before EU negotiations begin. All going well #Brexit  
Let's not forget the torrent of hate and lies poured out with impunity by the #Brexit billionaire press before the referendum.#Remain 
Theresa May's drastic "hard Brexit" has been rejected by voters. The question of what replaces it is back in play  
'Have you been involved in an accident that wasn't your fault?' a twerp just called to ask.'Yes,'I said.'It was called Brexit.Can you help?' 
Norway's relationship with the EU is back in the spotlight as a possible model for Brexit  
One yr ago tiny majority of electorate won Brexit ref. The hard truth is the crash of UK's fortunes and politics is entirely due to Leavers 
Right wing press: 'How Could It Happen?' May and #Tory ministers in denial. Meanwhile, on the Cabinet Office website  
Second referendum. 
Brexit talks start on Monday. We, literally, have no strategy and are being led by people who routinely promised a 'bonfire of regulations'. 
Yet another reason to scrap Brexit.  
What's the latest #Brexit news? Catch up on the latest updates with our weekly briefing   
Most EU countries would like to leave Customs Union and set their own trade policy; only UK can do so. The least contentious part of Brexit.  
Brexit has made other Europeans more favourable towards the EU, research finds  
That is correct. It is the UK's choice to continue with #Brexit and disengage with EU, the most disastrous decision in decades  
Bloody EU! Trying to stop cancer, miscarriages & birth defects! Who do they think they are? #Brexit now! 
Reversal of Brexit decision would be great: German minister - Reuters  
The recent long, rambling thread on the UK Government's approach to Brexit negotiations is in blog form here:  
It is up to ministers to prove why Brexit is in the national interest  
They want Brexit derailed. They prioritise cheap foreign labour over border control. They grovel to radical Islam. They r the Establishment 
"Cup of tea, Theresa?""Tea is important to this government & we need to ensure we deal with this important tea & brexit issue""Oh, ffs" 
True but also time for @UKLabour to abandon plans to leave the Single Market and end Freedom of Movement. In fact time to abandon #Brexit!  
This exciting Brexit future feels like all the rubbish bits from the past | Marina Hyde  
European support for EU surges in wake of Brexit vote  
Pros and cons of five post-Brexit scenarios ahead of the start of formal negotiations on June 19  
@Kier_Starmer Please can we stop Brexit before it does any more damage.  
John Major: "...if they decide to leave on the basis of inaccurate information... then I regard that to be deceitful"#Brexit #Remain 
On reading this a lot of things became clearer, like disastrous Brexit decisions and Rogers leaving. Terrifying frankly.  
"Time-out in Brexit talks"UK political uncertainty and leadership vacuum surely mean that Brexit must be halted. 
Mrs May sends her best, the UK's negotiating team arrives for initial Brexit talks in Brussels  
This goes to why Brexit preparation and policy has been so bad.  The resignation of Rogers in January was significant.  
They're practising for #Brexit by exiting. I'm sure it will make us better prepared when the time comes.  
Michael Gove admits that food will not get cheaper after Brexit, contradicting his claims during the referendum (£) 
The British public were grossly misinformed about important issues relating to the referendum.#LeaveLies #Brexit #Remain 
The Tory Right weren't going to 'get over it' if they lost to #Remain, they were clamouring for 2nd referendum.#LeaveLies #Brexit  
Every week that passes more and more people talk about backing out of #brexit. #wewillremain 
Another great week. Even @theJeremyVine had a debate on just backing out of #brexit. Keep up the pressure. The tide is turning #wewillremain 
What lies behind the euro crisis, Brexit & Trump: Keynote at FundForum International, Berlin & discussion M. Greene  
This reads like Tories own Dead Parrot Sketch. But little recognition of the anvil tied around their neck: Brexit  
The people changed their minds on Theresa May so why not Brexit too? . My article in today's Daily Record 
How Ireland's border became a bigger Brexit issue  
Labour will work cross-party to stop "extreme Brexit". Good that Labour working with others finally. Baby steps.  
Brexit: 89% of Britons want dual citizenship after leaving EU, finds survey | The Independent  
#Brexit negotiations begin on Monday. Sign up for email alerts to get latest information on #EU citizens' rights.  
It is up to ministers to prove why #Brexit is in the national interest  
There is more opposition to #Brexit among younger and more educated Brits  
Billions for #brexit. Cuts to firefighters. We're a country with warped priorities. Stop Brexit now.  
The dark mystery of who funded the DUP's six figure Brexit campaign  
In the meantime we risk losing thousands of hardworking, well-educated, English speaking, loyal, friends of the UK."The Madness of Brexit"  
Absolutely brilliant news! UK hires top New Zealand trade negotiator Crawford Falconer to head post-Brexit deals.  
By contrast this is how David Davis' dept announced start of Brexit talks:short press releaseMonday's timetablephoto of Westminster  
"If they offer us coffee, hold out for biscuits as well."Biscuits would be a success, given this government's suicidal Brexit stance.  
UK can stay in the Single Market after Brexit if it adapts the "Norway model". My latest in @telebusiness 
Chancellor Philip Hammond calls for a "pragmatic" Brexit to safeguard Britain's economy  
If we want India on our side after Brexit, we must face up to the mixed history of our Empire  via @telegraphnews 
To continue with #Brexit is just not acceptable. It has no benefit and May has no mandate #BinBrexit 
Was there ever a government worse equipped to strike a Brexit deal? Britons should demand we step back now from social and economic suicide 
Reverse Brexit: Scots should unite, expert says  
There's a Norway option in the Brexit talks. So what does that mean? Here's a simple guide  
If you read the responses to Boris's tweet you'll see many of us are absolutely furious about Brexit.  
We don't need a pragmatic, hard, soft, open or any other kind of #Brexit. We just need to come to our senses and forget this damaging folly.  
Theresa May warned Britain might have a "weak and unstable" PM. It's happening. It's her  
David Davis arriving in EU for #brexit talks  
Have you noticed it's the Brexit politicians who want to remove regulations and to leave everthing to the free market? #GrenfellTower 
A great thread (from one who knows) on how the Government's approach to Brexit is infantile, self-serving, and a betrayal of our country.  
It is up to ministers to prove why Brexit is in the national interest  
Brexit uncertainty is causing concern and having an impact on prices, Mark Mobius says  
'A spoiler on how Brexit negotiations might go' @MarinaHyde @guardian 
Told @Nigel_Farage about the great work we're doing at @YALiberty... he told me he's thrilled with our success! #Brexit  
By hacking Facebook data and voter rolls. Cambridge Analytica also was used which Nigel Farage used as well in Brexit fight 
#NnamdiKanu is another saviour to Biafrans after Dim #Odumegwu #Ojukwu #BiafraExit #referendum #SouthKorea 
So: governor's race becomes, in large part, referendum on this. Dem nominee must run on/pledge to sign it, no? 
Could it be that they recognise failure ahead when they see it? Brexit is so wrong and potentially undeliverable.  
All we need is one courageous, principled, strong & stable leader to call Brexit for what it really is:a destructive, divisive, delusion.  
Upbeat EU calls Britain to order in Brexit talks  
Both #Tories & #Labour just don't get it...the EU isn't to blame...the problems that face the UK are self-inflicted. #Brexit must be stopped 
The UK already does trade outside the EU. Thanks to 50+ trade agreements the EU has with the rest of the world. All lost after brexit. 
."May put HERSELF & HER Brexit plan at heart of campaign"Voters rejected itShe lost majority & lost her mandate 
This exciting Brexit future feels like all the rubbish bits from the past | Marina Hyde  
Brexit means Brexit. No deal is better than a bad deal.  Almost a year on from the vote and still an utter shambles. 
Prince andrew is a twat, I've met him, I know. I will never accept Brexit and neither will half the country. What a diabolical mess. 
UK hires top NZ trade negotiator to head post-Brexit deals  
Brexit will end in tears. For everyone. 
Thank you, Britain – #Brexit has vaccinated Europe against populism  
#WriteMaysResignationSpeechSorry is the hardest... strong and stable, Brexit means Brexit, no magic money tree...word 
EU Brexit Negotiations by Matt – political cartoon gallery in Putney  
"Reverse the burden of proof - it is up to ministers to prove why Brexit is in the national interest"  
I am as embarrassed about Brexit today as a year ago. As an ex Tory voter, I hate what they have done to our society. Shame David Cameron. 
"Philip Hammond says 'majority of people' want a soft Brexit 72 hours before talks begin" #premium 
Imagine how many more regulations they will cut post-Brexit? Rees-Mogg went public with the wish to roll back to India level 
How dare they start Brexit negotiations without a cross party representation. This affects the whole country, not just Tories. 
One thing ducking questions over Brexit and manifestos. You can't duck questions over citizens dying en masse on your watch. May's finished 
just a cheerful reminder that Brexit negotiations begin on Monday and no-one has a fucking clue. 
The country is in a negative mood. We need to be positive. Brexit negotiations start on Monday. I'm drinking to that - an independent UK!   
G.K. Chesterton: The poor object to being governed badly, while the rich object to being governed at all. #Brexit #ECHR #ECJ #Remain 
Germany are saying Brexit is deadAn Orange Fisherman in Peterhead just went pop  
Brexit negotiations start...  
No Brexit plan or government. There are calls for the PM to resign and mass protests in the streets.Michael Gove:  
Shame that @bakermckenzie research shows that  #brexit uncertainty causes 56% of them wanting to leave the UK 
Wouldn't it simply make sense to ditch this abhorrent Brexit charade and keep our EU citizenship?  
People have to stop pretending #brexit is obligatory. It's not. We can keep our membership of the EU. We can stop brexiting. 
#Brexit legitimised this. Normalised it.  
I will continue to deliver Brexit with a strong and stable government despite my resignation as prime minister #WriteMaysResignationSpeech 
Labour's new Kensington MP was on housing scrutiny committee  
Matt clearly has had a leak of the UK Brexit team's approach  
"Time to reverse the burden of truth"It is up to ministers to prove why Brexit is in the national interest  
NEWS: Demonstrators are rallying against the destruction of Banksy's iconic #Brexit mural   
The #GrenfellTower tragedy vividly exposes May’s lack of leadership skills & empathy. She’s out of her depth & not ready for Brexit.Resign.  
#WriteMaysResignationSpeechI was meant to get away with incompetence until we got a hard Brexit but the election went wrong as plebs voted 
UK hires top New Zealand trade negotiator to head post-Brexit deals   
'You don't know!' Emily Thornberry slammed on Question Time for Labour's Brexit plans  
Do please help this brexit supporter with his poll.  
Foreign press, e.g. Bloomberg, Der Spiegel already saying "brexit is dead"  
Should #Brexit withdrawal & future relations be agreed at the same time or no negotiation? @CommonsEUexit @DavidDavisMP @MichelBarnier  
Good to see Dover Tory MP @CharlieElphicke supporting the EU. No to Brexit!  @EUflagmafia 
Let @foreignoffice do more.Let them recommend #Referendum for Biafra's independence.#BiafraExit#FreeBiafra from Nigeria @BorisJohnson 
#EUflagmafia @EUflagmafia somewhere near Chester #Brexit #brexitshambles 
Tories, UKIP, DUP - the Tax Avoiders Alliance #Remain #Brexit 
Nobility:1-KDP support Turkish Pres against Kurds in referendum2-PYD support S.Kurdistan independence ref. 3-PKK support S.Kurdistan' ref  
Negotiations start on Monday 4 Brexit with Europe & they can't even agree a deal with DUP in 5 days it would B hilarious if it wasn't scary 
For those asking if we want a hard Brexit or if we want a soft Brexit. The answer is clear.The answer is Yes. 
Absolutely. Just been saying the same. Mob rule spurred on by #Corbyns brown shirt thugs 
After 15 months of telling us #Brexit talks must be parallel with Trade talks, #Davis capitulates ' withdrawal first 
Kurds should not have to wait any longer for referendum, says KRG rep to US @BayanRahman 
Do you favour brexit - YesDo you favour hard brexit - NoHere is the problem, soft brexit means stay in the EU. 
EU to open Brexit talks with divorce bill and citizens' rights  
exclusive preview of monday's brexit negotiations  
Hammond on Brexit entirely incompatible with May red lines (FoM, ECJ, no to Single Market/Customs Union).   
This exciting #Brexit future feels like all the rubbish bits from the past  
Back in Dec 2016, #Brexiteers said UK could slash environmental & safety standards 'a very long way' after #Brexit  
Jamie Vardy and Harry Maguire will get on very well. Both Sheffield boys. Both Hard Brexit players. Good. 
This is a tragic, unforgivable wake up call on deregulation before we allow Brexit to enable it on a mass scale.  
Lucky Brexit negotiations aren't beginning any time soon, so we've plenty of time to work out what we want. Oh, wait..  
This tweet is now over a year old. And the situation is significantly worse than I could ever have imagined. #Brexit #EUref 
David Davis starts #brexit talks on Monday, God help us 
.@theresa_may .@DExEUgov you can't start #Brexit negotiations , you have a national crisis here. Deal with it first #GrenfellTower 
Brexit talks begin on Monday and nobody's quite sure what will happen. Here's a guide  
Forget the UK government Guy, it isn't great at multi-tasking and in fact it's pushing a Brexit agenda not owned by nearly half 'the people'  
The EU starting Brexit negotiations with May on Monday is a. something I hoped would never happen and b. a waste of time. She won't last. 
Lib Dems getting a deal with Tories for 2nd Brexit ref, post negotiations, may be the face saver the UK and Lib Dems and Tories all need :) 
Brexit negotiations start Monday with no plan or government. There are calls for the PM to resign and mass protests in the streets.Ruth:  
.Bodes well for Brexit deal?"May has now spent MORE than a week FAILING to get a deal for 10 Westminster votes". 
Can’t believe @Theresa_May and the Tories still intend to start #Brexit negotiations as if nothing has happened. #obsessed. 
Will Brexit now be hard, soft or scrambled? Here's everything we know so far  
Jacob Rees-Mogg advocating LESS health & safety for UK people.#Brexit will be the death of us! 
We can either spend our energies fixing broken Britain, fixing social housing, fixing the NHS or we can waste our time on Brexit. Which? 
I've never known a more turbulent time than this (and I lived through the Thatcher years). And it all began with Cameron's referendum. 
Brexit EU-UK negotiations begin1st phase:-Citizens' rights-UK financial obligations-Northern Irish borderpic.twitter.com/VdKeCrHrSP 
So, new Taoiseach refuses questions on domestic issues, but does interview on North and Brexit with national broadcaster. Interesting.  
C4 News discussion appears to blame Brexit vote for the Grenfell Tower disaster. No explanation of alleged causal link. 
Peterhead Harbour benefited from #EU funding. Your #Brexit will put an end to such infrastructure spending.  
#Tories know the price of everything and the value of nothing. @DavidLammy speaks for all with a social conscience: 
Reassure them by ditching Brexit - because that's what you really believe in Philip.  via @AOLdotUK 
Once ignored by Theresa May, Britons who want a "soft" Brexit now have a weapon: leverage  
This exciting Brexit future feels like all the rubbish bits from the past | Marina Hyde  
For heaven's sake bin Brexit NOW! Billions on a project that has no purpose. STOP IT! #BinBrexit 
Dunno what's going on with Brexit. Dunno what's going on with IndyRef 2. But here's Nic and Ruth in a lift.  
Government: it takes 4+ years to update fire regs as it’s all very complicatedAlso government: We can do Brexit in 2 years#c4news 
Govt Min on @Channel4News says housing review delayed 4 yrs as 'it is a complicated area'. And they expect to do Brexit in 18 months. 
A hard Brexit is unlikely and more jobs may now stay in London, HSBC executive says  
If Jose Manuel Barroso had not tried to stymie Scottish independence & Scotland won the #indyref, Brexit wouldn't have happened & all in EU 
Anyone still barking ‘Brexit means Brexit’ should be ashamed of themselves, says @zoesqwilliams  
Brexit: More than half of skilled EU workers in UK say they are going to leave | The Independent  
It's all wrong.DUP running our country. essential workers & families driven from their communities, nurses using food banks & #brexit 
You can't even speak with residents who have lost EVERYTHING you don't need to be negotiating Brexit or a coalition with DUP. 
The breakdown of total research grants and funding for HE institutions shows how they are funded and who by #Brexit  
8 charts that show how Brexit has boosted the EU's popularity among Europeans - Business Insider UK  
On what authority can the Tories proceed with Brexit negotiations before the Queen's Speech has taken place? #askphilip  
Boris Johnson HITS BACK at Labour for playing a ‘political game’ with Grenfell Tower fire  via @Your Brexit 
.@ukhomeoffice so what exactly is the point of this email? What nonsense to send. We need our rights guaranteed. Now.  #Brexit #EUcitizens 
In full: Tommie Gorman talks to Taoiseach Leo Varadkar about Brexit, Stormont and United Ireland  
Still no plan: UK Gov email tonight on eve of talks on rights of EU citizens in UK and British citizens in EU - #Brexit @The3Million 
Britain agrees to an EU demand for early Brexit talks to focus on divorce and not trade  
Chancellor Philip Hammond calls for a "pragmatic" Brexit to safeguard Britain's economy  
UK to agree #Brexit divorce bill before trade talks - So much for May's strong negotiating position!  
Millions of us are very clear: Brexit is an error, it should never happen and it probably never will.  
It is up to ministers to prove why Brexit is in the national interest  
My solution if I were PM. Stop #brexit,invest in social housing, education & health. Increase top level of tax. Create a minister for unity 
The man most likely to save Theresa May is John McDonnell.By supporting Tory hard Brexit and street protest he's her last card. 
Entirely possible that #GrenfellTower will bring #TheresaMay down, not her poor election performance or even Brexit. #JusticeForGrenfell 
AIMSI's thoughts on "abortion" referendum. Are you listening Leo? @campaignforleo #Repealthe8th #maternity #everypregnancy 
Desperately unprepared Theresa May is keen to get on with Brexit negotiations to shift attention away from the humiliating election result. 
I would say we're in perfect shape for Brexit talks on Monday 
YES to an independent #Kurdistan: I declare my support for the referendum on September 25th on independence of Kurdistan region#DrWidad 
Wise words from Helmut Kohl who died today. Brexit does not represent many of us. UK is divided, misled, & in crisis  
Brexit negotiations still due to start Monday, apparently.  
Labour is clear: Brexit would be better with single market membership | Chuka Umunna  
No comment is better than a bad comment. Strong and stable. Brexit means Brexit. All Work and No Play Makes Theresa A Dull Boy.  
I am ex Tory too. Moved to Lib Dems after Brexit and May's hardline cabal. I fear for our country, a tragedy driven by Tory power lust!  
New Taoiseach must bring fresh approach to North and Brexit – @GerryAdamsSF  
#Brexit is ECONOMIC SUICIDE and starting the negotiations WITHOUT A PLAN & GVT is self humiliation! #remain #hungparliament #GE2017 #GE17 
This government is failing to manage the #GrenfellTower tragedy. How will they manage their own Frankenstein monster - #Brexit#ukpolitics 
Turns out posing the question "should we cancel Brexit?" makes a lot of listeners rather annoyed  (@theJeremyVine) 
.@ChukaUmunna: Labour is clear: #Brexit would be better with single market membership #LeaveWatch  
#Brexit is based on 37% of a rigged electorate - not enough for a public sector strike according to the Tories. #Remain 
At this rate Theresa May will go into Brexit negotiations on Monday and come out with us joining the Euro. 
Prince Andrew's thoughts on Brexit are the musings of a tired, middle-aged man  
I didn't hear SNP turning a General Election into a referendum and telling people to vote for the 'opposition' #CoalitionOfScum 
1. So, here we go.Has the UK U-turned on Brexit sequencing?  Significant if true. 
Brexit is dying a slow horrible death. RIP. Probably the saddest thing ever seen. Will celebrate it's demise though  
Stumbling to the Starting Line: Brexit Talks Set to Begin amid Chaos in London  
Did you have an option of a watered-down Brexit on your ballot paper? I voted to Leave, not for Remain in disguise  
Given the state the UK will begin Brexit negotiations in on Monday, you wouldn't blame the EU for sending it home. 
I have very bad news for you. Despite your continued propaganda tweets no one has yet to explain what Brexit is , let alone agree with it. 
The overwhelming priority of govt is to force Brexit on us whatever cost. The urgency is to protect its supporters' offshore funds from tax 
#ukip #farage admitting #EU referendum not legally binding in clash with @thatginamiller @Bregretears @BrexitBin @UFE_Bresistance @UKIPNFKN 
The Musicians Union (@WeAreTheMU) rightly alarmed about #brexit 's negative effects on #musicians & other artists: 
As Brexit talks loom, UK PM May scrambles for deal to stay in power  
An utter failure of basic political responsibility, cloaked beneath cynical attempts to pretend 'tariff free access' entailed soft Brexit. 
obscene spectacle of him doing nothing on hard Brexit while Tories spent year formulating most right-wing national project in living memory. 
Having said that, it seems that people under 50 are largely immune to #Brexit press lies, so maybe just let demographics do its work. 
+9 flats added in Tory Council *refurb* meant 700 residents: too many for single staircase + Academy built on Estate land compromised access pic.twitter.com/TnHbdCZElm 
They are taking their time about it but the media is waking up to the fact we were right all along. #Brexit 
@BorisJohnson JUST RESIGN AND TAKE THERESA WITH YOU 
This is where Britain and the EU stand on big Brexit issues before negotiations begin  
The most important #brexit question is so seldom asked: all time and effort is being invested in something that has no discernible upsides  
It is time to introduce criminal penalties for editors and owners so blatantly attacking our democracy with their lies.#Brexit #Remain. 
Kohl's last political intervention was to warn against “unnecessary severity & haste” after Britain's Brexit vote  
Our Chancellor thinks Brexit will cause economic damage to Britain, but won't publicly say so  
The #Grenfell cladding is banned in Germany, but that hasn't stopped the Daily Express dishonestly trying to blame the EU#Brexit #Remain 
Press release: Cautious welcome for new Taoiseach’s 2018 Repeal referendum 
Remember that snide remark by May about 'citizens of nowhere'? Well, if she ploughs on with her mad #Brexit, Brits will be just that. 
Do not allow yourself to be conned into thinking Brexit has to be done. It doesn't. It & all the shit arising from it are voluntary.  
With no deal #brexit still on the cards @EU_Commission & @DExEUgov should seriously consider separating negotiation on #citizensrights 
Minister @simoncoveney welcomes the announcement on start of Brexit negotiations:  
Britain's pro-Europeans have long wanted to soften Theresa May's "Brexit." Now they have the leverage to do it.  
Been saying for a while #Brexit will be a shambles & will lead to the UK imploding:  but didn't think this soon! 
Good blog making a strong moral and legal argument for a separate Brexit deal on the rights of EU/UK citizens  
Yep. The democratically elected leaders of EU states have to vote on laws. That's why the EU27 have to agree Brexit negotiation position. 
Opinion: 'The choice is not one between a “good” and “bad” Brexit, but one between less and more damaging'  
Has UK made a U-Turn over the Brexit timetable?Looking at @DExEUgov's apparent denial.By me, at @JackofKent:  
And who stands to make hundreds of millions out of Brexit Boris? That's right, hedge fund managers. You should give up public life. 
EU says Brexit talks to assume U.K. still wants complete break, but softer options can be discussed  
I'm against #brexit but if it must be negotiated last person I'd want at the table is #TheresaMay b/c she doesn't care about ordianary lives 
Can't fuck up the plan if you haven't got a plan. #Brexit @Conservatives pic.twitter.com/qRzfJY1ptc 
On Monday when #TheresaMay begins negotiating #brexit her EU counterparts will look like the Red Arrows b/c they'll fly circles around her. 
89% of Britons want dual citizenship after Brexit How many Brexiteers in this lot? Bloody hypocrites. 
Labour is clear: Brexit would be better with single market membership | Chuka Umunna  
1/2 Notice how the Remainstream media are trying to exploit Grenfell inferno to try & undermine Theresa May before the Brexit negotiations. 
Brexit was always far more likely to put the 'little' in Little Englander than the 'great' in Great Britain.  
. @theresa_may's unwanted egotistical election was an abject failure. Brexit begins Monday and we don't even have a government. RESIGN NOW. 
Apparently, when it comes to Brexit, no plan is better than a bad plan. 
#Spanish prosecutor general Maza warns #Catalan indy referendum volunteers with the full weight of the law!  
Most people don't want Brexit & they are not being represented properly in Parliament in our decaying unrepresentative FPTP democracy 
The new Taoiseach must bring a new approach to North and Brexit. Sinn Féin leadership meets with Leo Varadkar  
#Brexit is not some abstract concept for farmers straddling the border between N. Ireland and the Rep of Ireland.  
May has no mandate to start negotiating #Brexit on Monday. She is playing a high risk game with our futures  
Davis in tears as he informs the Nation !"The dog ate my Brexit strategy "  
UK to agree #Brexit divorce bill before trade talks, EU sources tell the BBC 
How Brexit, terror attacks and a horrific fire have all impacted London Mayor Sadiq Khan's leadership  
Support for the EU among its citizens has jumped sharply since the Brexit vote  
Cross-border cooperation to protect environment across Ireland must not be “diluted” by Brexit warn MEPs  #BrexitEnvi 
Philip Hammond to prioritise economic prosperity in Brexit talks  
Gerry Adams says SF met with Theresa May yesterday and discussed the Good Friday Agreement and Brexit  
David Davis and Michel Barnier are to hold a joint press conference on Monday at the end of the first round of formal Brexit talks  
Most of #Brexit's benefits come from shredding regulations - regulations that protect YOU but reduce profits. Be careful what you vote for.  
The Queen Is Heckled While Visiting Victims Of The Grenfell Tower Fire - LBC @LBC  VERY DISRESPECTFUL 
#InCaseYouMissedIt Nigel Farage Forced To Admit EU Referendum Not Legally Binding Under Current Law  
89% of Britons want dual citizenship after Brexit  
However this #Brexit farce ends, we have made absolute fools of ourselves. It will take years to rebuild respect. Thanks, #Brexitfolk 
Martina Anderson: Brexit, peace, and the future of the Good Friday Agreement  via New Europe  
Thank you, Britain – Brexit has vaccinated Europe against populism | Jean Quatremer  
Keir Starmer: Labour can change course of Brexit after May's election rejection  
A path that would avoid Brexit calamity  via @FT 
Labour urges UK government to drop ‘reckless’ Brexit plan  via @FT 
Hammond on Brexit: we should prioritise protecting jobs, protecting economic grow and protecting prosperity as we enter those negotiations. 
The Brexit strategy reminds me of how I thought I could write my dissertation overnight because I'd been talking about it for 6 months. 
It is up to ministers to prove why #Brexit is in the national interest, says @stephen_dorrell 
It is a sign of the extent of ideological Brexit mania that the Chancellor saying the economy matters is a shift!   
.@stephen_dorrell MPs must “maintain an open mind" & "question negotiating mandate developed by ministers” #brexit  
Europeans like the E.U. more since Brexit. Even the British  
“…and that concludes our 12-month Brexit planning process.”  
Thank you @EU_Commission for transparency. You are showing UK citizens how to empower them in the discussions on #Brexit that lie ahead. 
Possibly because states can exceed EU standards, eg on fire safety, but not go below them.Of course UK can go below after #Brexit 
In Britain, 48% of those polled thought Brexit would be a 'bad thing', while 44% said it would be 'good thing'  
In which Labour opposes the wrong kind of Brexit while still unable to identify a right kind.  
HSBC sees the chances of a hard #Brexit receding after Britain's shock election result  
Again May saying "I know I'm utterly useless around people in tense situations BUT TRUST ME, I'LL STILL GET THE BEST BREXIT DEAL." Fuck off.  
Brexit is gonna look really, really, really silly when Boris & Davis start negotiating... 
The Parliament has to approve any #Brexit agreement, so its concerns must be taken into account. Find out what they are    
Government has caved in to the EU on Brexit talks timetable. Citizens' rights & UK financial liabilities first. 
If EU members 'can't make their own laws' how the flibbertigibbet did Germany manage to outlaw the cladding used at Grenfell Tower? #Brexit 
In two-horse race If Tories were to U-turn & become pro-Remain & Labour retain its Corbyn Hard Brexit position, how would you vote?Pls RT. 
AS EU says it is shocked that UK has not yet submitted Brexit negotiation papers, Govt says there is a perfectly simple explanation.  
#Brexit negotiations will begin on 19.6. Here you can find EU's position papers transmitted to the UK.  
Only one mobile UK Network That Will Commit To Not Reinstating Roaming Charges After Brexit  
Exclusive: Starmer writes to Davis setting out new Labour demands over Brexit  
Britain bows to EU demands to start Brexit with divorce talks  
If we were really being sensible, we wouldn't be doing Brexit at all  
Prove to me that the UK will be a more progressive, fairer, democratic, advanced, educated place as a result of Brexit, and I'll back it 
Thread  I couldn't agree more with every tweet--my view/questions exactly. If hard Brexit now still comes it will be thanks to @UKLabour 
Theresa May's response to #GrenfellTower has weakened her position further; strengthened the DUP's; & weakened U.K on Brexit negotiations.  
UK attracts record overseas tourists after pound's Brexit slide  
Four ways to help low-earners:1. Cut food tariffs after Brexit2. Allow housebuilding3. Scrap alternative energy rackets4. Reduce taxes 
This This is the cause of Brexit, not the EU. This is the cause of #GrenfellTower . Nowhere to hide after Brexit.  
Catalonia: Could an independence referendum actually happen?             Yes, of course! @greenleftweekly 
DUP leader Arlene Foster says she wants to see a "sensible Brexit" that works for Northern Ireland and the Republic 
Repeat until it sinks in:EVERY aspect of Conservative Brexit policy sits on a spectrum between absolute incompetence & total dishonesty.  
"Jeremy Corbyn didn't win!" Oh really? • Opening for Run The Jewels• Doesn't have to negotiate brexit• Got to touch a boob 
It is time to build a Coalition of Common Sense -my @TheNewEuropean piece abt Brexit & stepping-stone EEA transition  
So, "British" exports food & drink increased since Brexit announced. Top 2? Whisky & Salmon. No wonder so much work against SNP 
Emily Thornberry confirmed that Labour backed leaving the single market after confusion about Labour's Brexit plans  
Briefing Paper - Brexit and Northern Ireland: A Reading List - has just been updated 
Get used to this.  EU will be main source of information on Brexit.  
I know it is now.. not allowed.. to criticise St Jeremy of Islington but wake up folks he is still supporting May on hard brexit!! 
Coming soon: Kristin Scott Thomas, Penelope Wilton, Meera Syal and Joanna Scanlan star in Brexit Shorts  
"Prince Andrew interviewed about Brexit" - if we're talking about relevance, let's have a chat with Salvador Dali about rugby league. 
The EU can only spare us one day for Brexit talks next week.This is all such a shambles.  
Brexit talks start on Monday. Never seen such unpreparedness before, and I once put a chicken in the oven after guests had already arrived 
14 May: David Davis warns Brexit timetable will be "row of the summer"16 June: UK capitulates on Brexit timetableWell. 
Our position papers citizens' rights+financial settlement. Our aim: to ensure maximum level of transparency  #Brexit  
Only 26% support leaving SM & more think #Brexit wrong than right, there's no support for any kind of #brexit  
Theresa May receives Brexit boost as DUP reveal they will back her plans ahead of Queen's speech on Wednesday  
The UK has capitulated already, #brexit talks will be run the way the EU said. Openly and transparently. I'll share all relevant info here.  
It is time for Labour party members to influence Brexit, so UK stays as *member* of Single Market (not just 'access to'). Draft motion:  
The DUP back May's Brexit vision of leaving the customs union and single market, not Hammond's watered down version  
Agenda for the 1st formal negotiating round. Negotiations in Brussels ending with press conference @MichelBarnier & @DavidDavisMP #Brexit  
Brexit: 89% of Britons want dual citizenship after leaving EU, finds survey  
Choose your future, choose Europe not the decaying, pustulant ToriesStop Brexit now  
54% of Brits have favourable view of EU (up 10 points in a year) & only 44% think Brexit will be good - Pew research  
Since #Brexit, Europeans now have a more favourable view of the EU  
Politics is the art of the possible.I'm not interested in vague aspirations like Brexit.I want the country run in our best interests again. 
Keir Starmer: Labour can change course of Brexit after May's election rejection  
Smart EU video on Brexit talks - very interesting PR move from commission, which shied away from getting involved in EUref debate.  
Brexit insurance  
Britain should stress jobs, prosperity in #Brexit talks: finance minister Hammond  
Unless something unexpected happens, remainder of the Brexit talks will also be on the EU's terms.Because EU has prepared, and UK has not. 
I'm an ex-Tory, and I believe in strong national defence. Now the main threat is from Putin and via #Brexit the Tories are helping him. 
UK U-turn on Brexit.UK caves on insisting on parallel talks for trade deal.  
The EU sequence now suits the UK, as Theresa May doesn't have a mandate for hard Brexit and the gov can't agree what it wants.  
#Brexit negotiations to continue every month through the summer, EU aim is to see if is 'sufficient progress' by Oct to move to next phase 
Britain must not be taken in by the “soft Brexit” snake oil peddlers  
#Brexit expect 4 week pattern for talks. Weeks 1&2 preparations, 3 a week of negotiations in Brussels, week 4 reporting back to governments 
#DUP No turning back on #Brexit  
#Brexit negotiatons to begin at 11.00am Monday. #EU source says will only be 1 day of talks next week but expect press conference Monday pm 
#EUROPE: Majority of citizens right across continent want a referendum on EU membership! #Brexit leading the way...  
Watch: @AamerAnwar calls for a full criminal investigation - a damning assessment of a negligent Tory Government. #Grenfell 
Wise words from #NigelFarage. Politicians may be divided on #Brexit but the people are united! Let's get on with it   
Only good thing to come out of Brexit result. @Nigel_Farage deeply frustrated after promise to destroy EU no one else wants to follow suit! 
Queen does what May feels was beneath her. Maybe it’s time to go back to monarchy. Prince Andrew can do Brexit. 
"The world is your oyster." Prince Andrew says there may be 'fresh grass' for British business after #Brexit  
No, sorry, you've misunderstood the electorate and result. Most people voted Lab/Con inspite of the #Brexit idiocy, not because of it. 
If you don't think Brexit is a cult, try naming one practical, tangible advantage it will bring to our daily life.  
Theresa May is due to start Brexit negotiations with the EU on Monday in an embarrassingly weak position  
These charts explain why the DUP needs a soft Brexit  
As qualifications to negotiate Brexit go, "crippling insecurity minimally camoflaged by brittle belligerence" is not up there.  
Sandeels and #seabirds: Protecting our seas in post-Brexit waters  #ornithology @RSPBScience @RareBirdAlertUK 
A business friendly Brexit 
I have good news for you all. Despite all the noise and disagreement, most people and political parties want the same things from Brexit. 
It's worth noting that proponents for 'Soft Brexit' do NOT want Brexit at all. They want to stay in the EU and ignore referendum result. 
SURGE IN DEMAND ACROSS EUROPE FOR REFERENDUM ON EU MEMBERSHIPMore Europeans want a referendum and want out. 
Poland!This is the #EUNever, ever, allow them to bully you out of YOUR land.Take back what's yoursFight the EU#Brexit #Nexit #Polexit 
3 If your first thought hearing of a major tragedy is "how can I use this to justify Brexit?" you need to take a long look at yourself /ends 
This pointExactly this pointThere is no money for anything in Labour manifesto if we hard Brexit. Simply put it trumps everything  
This is beyond words.  Express tries to use #GrenfallTower  as argument for Brexit.  
Labour's position on Brexit here re-explained. The position is to continue not to have a position.  
This letter writer says that FM @NicolaSturgeon needs to concentrate on domestic policies, and not another divisive referendum.  
Welsh Labour: Scottish Government should be at the top table in #Brexit negotiations.Scottish Labour: "I'm not sure about that".Right.  
*UK's Brexit Negotiating Team*   
In this week's edition of The New European: Will @jeremycorbyn stop Brexit? 48 pages for the 48%. In all good newsagents today!  
UK university rankings are slipping. Years of under-investment appear to be driving this. Brexit will not help. 
A softer Brexit will protect jobs, says HSBC chief  
First wave of Brexit anger is breaking over the country. The worse things get, the more powerful it will become.  
It's very easy to be relaxed about a "glass half empty brexit" when one has a footman who can refill it. Not the smartest royal intervention 
We've got to show the link between Brexit & austerity! The irony is Corbyn via tacitly supporting Brexit is voting to force austerity on us!  
you have my attention.#brexit  
Speaking at @EPinIreland on #Brexit impact on the #environment for the island of Ireland #Dundalk @FineGael @EPPGroup @Env_Pillar 
3 is only network committing to not reinstating roaming charges post-Brexit  
"Ministers will quit if #Brexit is watered down" indeed? Is that a threat or a promise...?#EveryCloudHasASilverLining 
Prince Andrew on Brexit: The world is your oyster, fresh grass for business in big external market.  
UK housing crisis demands massive instant action on vast scale, thousands at risk: Can a Government manage this AND start Brexit on Monday?  
Common sense from the Duke of York: UK firms should make best of #Brexit. (Yes, we have to leave #CustomsUnion.) 
Europeans, including the British, view E.U. more favorably after Brexit vote poll finds  
We have to start saying it, don't we? #brexit isn't really about immigration (that was just to get the votes of bigots) but deregulation. 
NEW Remainiacs podcast in which we figure out soft Brexit, geek out over EU regs and I get quite cross about things 
Referenced throughout the general election, Churchill has also been invoked on both sides of the Brexit debate  
Unless @labour begins to oppose @Conservatives Brexit mania the UK is doomed to a miserable future (yup I know the present isn't great). 
.@IanDunt's bleak analysis of the upcoming Brexit talks somehow ignores Prince Andrew's trade negotiation skills.  
President Masoud Barzani: The referendum is for independence and its result must be implemented  
Our country is in a total mess. And absolutely none of it has anything to do with the EU. Why weaken ourselves further with #Brexit? 
The election changes nothing - we need to get on with Brexit, says @AVMitchell2010 
Starmer said election result strips May of her mandate to continue with Brexit talks on basis of her white paper/Lancaster House speech. 
Formal Brexit negotiations to start on Monday as planned as new poll shows 70% of voters want Brexit to be delivered  
Exclusive: EU still hasn't received 'positioning papers' from UK Government over Brexit  
As @rafaelbehr spotted, unclear govt entitled to start Brexit talks until it can demonstrate confidence of Commons  
Interviewed Keir Starmer with @GuardianAnushka: he said will work with MPs from any party to block "extreme Brexit".  
"The world is your oyster!" Prince Andrew urges UK businesses to view #Brexit as a "glass half-full" opportunity.   
15. The test for Brexit will be when people pay real costs for the policy.The Community Charge failed that test.  Will Brexit?/ends 
Man born into enormous wealth and with unearned job for life tells people to make best of Brexit.  
14.  Similarly, the test for Brexit will not be whether mandate or timetable has been kept, or "Eurocrats" defeated, or it is a good idea. 
Thread by @davidallengreen comparing "mandate for #brexit" with "mandate for poll tax" very good. Manifestos & mandates never the last word.  
As Britain softens its Brexit aims, E.U. leaders say their doors are still open  
Housing construction the initial focus of Letwin's 'Red Tape Initiative' to drop EU regs as part of Brexit 
If you stare at this tweet for 40 seconds, then stare at a wall for another 40, you'll still be far more productive than the UK Brexit dept. 
They told us we'd gain from #brexit, but reality shows further #brexit losses on their way:  
If they have to bring him out to defend their position, you know they've lost all credibility.Corrupt Brexit 
EUROPE: Majority of citizens right across continent want a referendum on EU membership! Brexit leading the way...  
Humphreys: 'Romans didnt have to worry about Brexit.' There speaks a man without a history degree.Britanniaxit was traumatic 
1. A short thread about the Poll Tax and about Brexit. 
The EU have not received positioning papers from the govt on brexit with 'talks' days away.  Brexit will fail.  
Today, Prince Andrew on Brexit. Tomorrow, Timmy Mallet on the Schleswig-Holstein Question:  
BREXIT BOOST: Britain would be '£156 billion a year better off WITHOUT a deal with EU'  
Govt has no mandate for extreme Brexit: Time to change course, abandon the rhetoric & publish progressive objectives  
Answer: i. No ii. It's banned in Germany & the USiii. Jacob Rees-Mogg wants to further reduce UK safety standards post-Brexit#Grenfell 
There is no “extreme Brexit”, “hard Brexit” or “version of Brexit”. There is either Brexit or no Brexit. He wants no Brexit.  
Theresa May & David Davis have no mandate to negotiate for whole UK on #Brexit. "Will of people" is now for cross party / 4 nation approach. 
FARAGE: Public united behind Brexit but the politicians are wobbling. Will of the people must not be overturned!  
Keir Starmer: Labour can change course of Brexit after May's election rejection  
BBC promotes Prince Andrew's comments on trade after Brexit. Note to both: UK always could trade outside EU. China=Germany's biggest market 
"Lots of people voted for free stuff" says @DanielJHannan, who claimed Brexit = £350m/week, staying in Single Market & "immigration control"  
Prince Andrew thinks Brexit will be fine. I feel completely reassured now. #r4today 
There it is then. No money for Brexit.   
Britain could slash environmental and safety standards 'a very long way' after Brexit, Tory MP Jacob Rees-Mogg says   
How serious Germans see UK. (Tho he mixes up UUP/DUP)  Brexit Dead: Anger Crashes over Britain  via @SPIEGELONLINE 
Almost feel sorry for David Davis. I was better prepared for my Latin O Level than he is for the Brexit talks. #r4today 
Those 'difficult' #Brexit talks:UK "We're leaving the EU!"EU "OK"UK "We want to keep all the good things"EU "No"UK "OK" 
You realize brexit is going to fail don't you?  
V important to mention that the 'plan' May enters #Brexit talks w/Monday is of less regulation, less health and safety, less accountability 
Retweet if you're a Eurocrat who plans to use cheap roaming to sabotage Brexit when on hols this summer 
If anyone believes these Tory's will negotiate Brexit with the 'peoples' best interests at heart they need sectioning, all about the elite 
Will Brexit now be hard, soft or scrambled? Here's everything we know so far  
Wise words from @Nigel_Farage. Politicians may be divided on Brexit but the people are united! Let's get on with it 
I wonder how many real problems our political class could have solved instead of the self-inflicted, invented problem of Brexit? 
Nearly 12 months of chaos and subterfuge from government, we need to keep applying all our efforts in exposing their flawed #Brexit plans.  
BBC: "We now go live to hell where Prince Andrew is explaining why #Brexit is a good thing"  
Just trying to work out why  Prince Andrew's views on #Brexit are newsworthy - didn't he step down from business role?  #R4Today 
People of Britain. Sorry to bring this up, but at this time does ANYONE really give a stuff about what Prince Andrew thinks about Brexit? 
For the next five years the government could concentrate on making the country safe after the ravages of austerity. Or Brexit.  Your choice? 
Worried about the Brexit negotiations starting? @IanDunt explains why there's cause to be.  
Theresa May is under more pressure than ever to deliver Brexit  
Brexit Is Dead: A Wave of Anger Crashes over Britain  
Remainers' tactical votes for Labour mean that we are not discussing Tory landslide and endless austerity now. Brexit back as main problem. 
Quieten down everyone, Prince Andrew has an opinion on Brexit! 
"I doffs me cap to your fine Sir, Gods speed delivering us 'umble peasants a bountiful Brexit for all. Us simple folks, we knows our place"  
Brexiteers must be very happy that a DUP/Tory alliance #Brexit will mean more jobs for white British terrorists in Northern Ireland 
People living in the UK must improve their language skills to prepare for life after Brexit 
Keir Starmer: Labour can change course of Brexit after May's election rejection  
MT @pewresearch Post-#Brexit, Europeans More Favorable Toward #EU  Thank you Britain. 
Chuka please describe what a 'good' Brexit looks like and how it would be better than staying in the EU?  
People have to grasp that arguing amongst ourselves can only help the Brexit Elite who wish to harm the UK.  
IPOB: Any dialogue with Nigerian Government without documented date for referendum is an exercise in futility -IPOB   
New Irish PM: Referendum Will be Held in 2018 to Repeal 8th Amendment Protecting Unborn Babies  
#Brexit is just going swimmingly!  
#WION Reformers & Rebels, #Lord Karan #Bilimoria. He thinks #Brexit is dangerous & Narendra #Modi is inspiring. Saturday 9PM Sunday 8PM IST 
Duke of York: "as much in the dark as anyone else" about Brexit. Which makes his facile comments irrelevant.  
DUP backs Theresa May's vision of Brexit, not Philip Hammond's  
'We are the best in the world!’ Tory MP @Tobias_Ellwood hails Britain's Brexit prospects  
Congratulations on the announcement, @Tim_Canova! Let's make 2018 a referendum on corporate Democrats.  
Back it Bangalore!With all your might, hold a referendum on cow slaughter!#Abhayakshara#ProtectWithPen 
Known professionally as @TheFinanser, we'd probably dub @Chris_Skinner the #Fintech Godfather.  #Article50 #Brexit  
Following the results and ratification of the referendum, NicholasCerrito has been approved by the National Assembly to be Prime Minister.  
"A year after Brexit vote, more people view EU favorably" – @AP on our new global survey  
Talks on Britain's exit from the European Union will start next Monday. #Brexit #EU 
NO BREXIT. I SHALL KEEP ON SAYING THIS 'LIKE A FART IN A THUNDERSTORM' TOO #Brexshit 
For British youth, the recent election was a referendum not on Brexit but on the welfare state.  
Poll: 70 Per Cent of Brits Still Back Brexit  
.@wischoolboards Wisconsin Public School Referendum Restriction Bill Is Worse Than You Thought #WIbudget #WIedu 
These industries and companies need to be kept on side during the Brexit talks  
Perhaps Theresa May will become a Remain hero, her incompetance in losing a 25% poll lead has stopped Brexit Shambles in its tracks... 
FM: Davidson is a one-trick pony with nothing to say on Brexit  
.@joswinson Inspire. Go for leadership of @LibDemsFight #BrexitMount a #LibDemFightback Be inspired by @EmmanuelMacron 
True but I don't believe we'll just give up voting rights. Brexit needs to be cancelled.The Brexit caused faultering economy will allow this  
EU citizens want a Brexit-style vote... to say 'yes' to staying  
Now is the time to turn the tide against the nationalist myth that Britain does better alone. We can do that by being honest about Brexit.  
World class news providers more willing to report Brexit Shambles accurately than British ones...  
Dear @theresa_may you said during the election you were working on #brexit so where the hell are the opening papers.  
When I think about Tories going off to negotiate #Brexit on Monday, I'm reminded of Lord Melchett from Blackadder 4 
New vid on Qatar, UK trade & Brexit out soon.  #100OUR 
I'm 55yrs old, & I've never felt so motivated to riot#GrenfellTower#Brexit#DisabledDeaths#DUPalliance 
It was an advisory ref narrowly won by industrial scale lying.We have every right to oppose Brexit Shambles & ask for an informed ref #BBCTW 
Michael Portillo says hard Brexit is dead & Theresa May won't make it to the Tory conference #bbctw 
Absolutely correct Andrew. May is putting our health and our very lives way below her utterly mad "brexit" priorities. This MUST be stopped 
May is building a policy - "brexit" - she knows to be wrong on the basis of a subverted Referendum process.The British people must stop her 
Revealed! Britain's #brexit negotiating stance. Lemmings to ask for cushions to be placed at the bottom of cliff. 
Many congratulations to Fintan on winning this year's Orwell Prize for journalism, unbeatable on Brexit & the peace process #OrwellPrize 
Larry David was fired from Saturday Night Live & turned up for work the next day pretending nothing happened. Britain's best Brexit option. 
Labour are committing themselves to year after year of austerity, if they'd go through with Brexit. #bbcqt 
Brexit talks start on Monday and we have no idea what we're doing. #bbcqt  
The British Conservatives used to be feared in the EU... now they have utterly blown our reputation & clout. #Brexit 
Brexit: an endless supply of trapdoors and shit. Hardly the outcome you voted for is it Brexshiters? 
MUST read: how May (and Hammond) can choose a path that would avoid Brexit calamity  via @FT 
Tory Tobias: "We should be very proud of our country. 5th largest economy in the world"Yes, by being IN the EU!#BBCQT #Brexit #FFS 
Audience reactions - calling for Hard Brexit - show majority are completely ignorant of dire consequences. Disinformation abounds #BBCQT 
That is precisely what a country does before it becomes an offshore money laundering sweatshop devoid of principles. Brexit breaks us all.  
Notion that the "nation has called for Brexit" and the nation cannot change its mind is stupid. We change our minds every election #bbcqt 
Hard Brexit would be 'utterly mad' and Trump is 'dangerous,' Richard Branson says  
Let’s just pretend Brexit never happened, put it down as drunken mistake and never speak of it again. A political one-nighter. #BBCQT 
Manufacturers have called for the government to rethink its Brexit strategy following the election result #bbcqt  
Brexit is catastrophic. An obvious disaster being smacked down on a progressive and successful UK & driving us to destruction. Resist #bbcqt 
Let's not forget we are in this Brexit shambles because of Cameron trying to appease his rebellious backbenchers #bbcqt 
Nicola Sturgeon said that a hard Brexit is 'dead in the water' following the general election #bbcqt  
Cameron couldn't negotiate his way out of a paper bag. He and Major are irrelevant to Brexit.  #bbcqt 
Politicians clueless & terrified of speaking out against obvious idiocy of Brexit. It's beyond embarrassing. Worldwide laughing stock #bbcqt 
David Cameron has said that Theresa May 'must listen' to other parties on Brexit #bbcqt 
When a politician says 'I don't know what you mean by Hard Brexit' it usually means 'I want a Hard Brexit' #bbcquestiontime 
The Labour manifesto was fairly clear.No Single Market.No commitment to the Customs UnionA hard brexit in other words. 
#EU majorities in France Italy Spain Greece want own "brexit" type referendum  
Roar of applause from #bbcqt audience when Dimbers interrupts Thornberry argument that Tory Brexit stance unclear to say Labour's is too 
Emily Thornbury - getting stick on bbcqt for Labour position on Brexit. Good. Labour have been as bad as Tories on this. #bbcqt 
.@EmilyThornberry says that Theresa May does not appear to be prepared ahead of the start of the Brexit negotiations #bbcqt 
After all the talk of a "hard Brexit", the Conservatives are now failing to achieve a semi. #bbcqt 
The next question tonight asks if we could expect a u-turn from Theresa May over 'hard Brexit' #bbcqt 
Duke of York: UK firms should make best of Brexit  
Brexit talks start on Monday and we have no idea what we're doing.......................................    
The trouble is if the Government don't start #brexit negotiations soon there won't be enough time to blame the EU when it all goes wrong  
The overwhelming priority of this govt is to force Brexit on us. The urgency is protecting its friends' vast offshore savings. It's a con. 
Irish Times journalist’s analysis of Brexit added ‘highly important perspective’ to debate  
We need Joe Hart. A quality young Hard Brexit keeper. 
Next time someone tells you the people voted for hard Brexit, remember the MPs that voted against triggering art. 50 #NoMandate #Remain 
I wonder if Gove & other Tories will regret calling for a 'bonfire of regulations' post Brexit? #GrenfellTower 
Europeans, including British, view E.U. more favorably after Brexit vote, poll finds  
#Brexit is the English nationalism that dare not speak its name." @fotoole #OrwellPrize for Journalism winner: 
you're bang on. I think in 20 years Grenfell will be the most significant event of 2017 - far more so than election, the attacks, brexit. 
Thanks, Brits – Brexit has vaccinated Europe against populism. Often disagree with @quatremer but he's spot on here. 
Clip from a fascinating conversation between @akalamusic & @AdamRamsay on Brexit & "convenient forgetting" of empire  
Hey @ALDEgroup, MEP @beatrizbecerrab is using your logo and institutional image to call a referendum a coup d'etat. Anything to say to that?  
Britain has three days to figure out its Brexit plan. Divorce talks start June 19  
wow that would give TM a massive boost. Rees-Mogg has proved he is 100% behind Brexit  
A Danish MEP sees through the #eu Perhaps others will too....#brexit  
There is little support for leaving the EU in EU nations surveyed, but many want a referendum on membership  
Most Europeans judge #Brexit as bad for EU and UK  
The Brexit disaster is totally attributable to the fact that real truth is ignored for ill informed personal opinion. Social media aids this 
New cabinet, new approach to our #Atlantic resources? Watch on @RTEOne now #brexit #fishing @simoncoveney @DenisNaughten @FineGaelMayo 
Whether they like it or not, those who voted for Brexit emboldened the likes of these mentalists.  
All the fuss about a second referendum is a smoke screen to stop questions about Tory policies and about Brexit and its dire consequences.  
This kind of bizarre reasoning is the intellectual force behind Brexit. Will not end well  
Brexit or funding for the NHS, Police, Fire, Education, Social Care, Welfare, Defence etc?I know, tough call right?My choice is no Brexit 
No preparationNo planNo teamNo mandateNo leverageNo timeNo authorityNo clueBlame the remainers for complaining#Brexit  
Exclusive: EU still hasn't received 'positioning papers' from UK Government over Brexit  
DUP backs Theresa May on Brexit, says @peston  
"Unbelievable" UK Gov still hasn't submitted Brexit papers for talks starting Monday, EXCLUSIVE by @JoeWatts_  
Friday's New EUROPEAN: "Will Superjez Stop Brexit?" #bbcpapers #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Far worse than Suez. That just exposed the UK's already existing weakness. Brexit will do the weakening. 
#wifeswap it just goes to show how ignorant some of these brexit voters are. So shocked that Polish people actually work and pay taxes! 
Brexit, #ge2017, hung parliament-All pales into insignificance when you consider what #GrenfellFire actually means about this country. 
Brexit Is Dead: A Wave of Anger Crashes over Britain  via @SPIEGELONLINE 
Monday's Brexit talks to be held from 11 a.m. — "Brussels time, of course."  
Getting really angry watching #wifeswap Brexit special... People just don't understand what they voted for. It's sad. 
The negotiating table @TheEconomist #Brexit #UKElection2017 #TheresaMay 
Glad the Guardian leader spots "the plans that have emerged to opt out of EU building standards as a Brexit bonus"  
This shows the core stupidity of Brexit. Instead of parntering with allies against real threats, UK cowers in fear.  
All set for Monday then? We know Brexit is Brexit and it’s red, white and blue. Can’t imagine there’s anything else on the test. 
Productive meet with Comptroller @tomdinapoli sole trustee of New York State $192bn pension fund. Exploring #Brexit threat 2 North's economy  
69% voted #GE2017 42% voted Cons32% of Cons voted Remain20% of people voted Cons & LeaveNo mandate for Con Brexit, EU talks must stop. 
If this Brexit election was actually an austerity election, perhaps the Brexit referendum was actually the austerity referendum? 
First question #EU team are going to ask is "Are you the legitimate UK government, as per #GE2017, with a mandate to negotiate #Brexit?" 
Surely they should have picked families with similar backgrounds if it was going to be a fair Brexit argument! #wifeswap 
Swapping a Remain voting family for a Brexit voting family. What could possibly go wrong?  #wifeswap 
Brexit talks start in Brussels on Monday, which should be interesting given that our PM hasn't yet formed a government. 
It would've made more sense to swap people from the same bg but with opposing views on #Brexit rather than making it about class? #wifeswap 
Thank you, Britain – Brexit has vaccinated Europe against populism | Jean Quatremer    
With talks due to start Monday we are utterly fucked. If you want to know how fucked read this by @IanDunt #Brexit pic.twitter.com/4wLfIkGn5j 
There are words that forever haunt the British mind:Gallipoli...Dunkirk...Suez...This generation adds a new one:Brexit... pic.twitter.com/FK121gI0Ll 
The British public are united on Brexit, but Parliament is starting to look wobbly, says @Nigel_Farage  
.Well deserved!@fotoole has won Orwell Prize for Journalism for commentary on UK Brexit ref. 
Freeing business from any constraints so it could maximise profit was what #Brexit was about for the billionaires.  
It really is very simple. If you're not willing to accept FOM then it's hard Brexit. End of story. All we've had for a year is unicorn dung.  
Can any @Labour MP or supporter please tell me the one thing that makes you support #Brexit apart from electoral advantage? 
Now this how you do a good Brexit thread.  
People who support #Brexit just talk about retaining the benefits of EU membership not the benefits of leaving. Strange that... 
When Brexit appears in the sky  
I give Brexit another 6 weeks, the anger as to the cost of what's on offer, the dingbats will wake up. You've been conned. 
I will NOT accept anything but a complete separation!Davis has confirmed Brexit talks are set to start on Monday 
#Brexit will cause crash in direct foreign investment*cough*Aren't facts awkward things?  
#Brexit negotiations to go ahead on Monday, Government confirms  
Has May said anything of substance about Brexit since the election? Have I missed it? Does she really think nothing changed? 
Remainers want to use the election result to block our vote to Leave the EU. Brexit must be delivered. Join us →  
Indeed, BBC wrong to say abolition of roaming charges after Brexit just up to UK. UK law can't determine what EU decides if no deal on this.  
The madness of Brexit.  
Ken Clarke: Cross-party agreement on Brexit is in national interest  
One of the many little benefits from the EU that are at risk from #Brexit (& that govt doesn't want to keep):  
The UK is a disaster and still she ploughs on with her Brexit Shambles for which she had no mandate... #Shexit 
"Millions of EU citizens did not get to vote last week - that’s why I’ll be their voice in Parliament on Brexit"  
Ever since the referendum the pro-Brussels establishment has plotted to reverse it says Leo McKinstry  
Wow damning..worth looking at what those in the EU think of us. "Brexit is dead" from someone inside the cabinet?!"Hope so" from me outside  
On why young people in the UK - sensibly - opposed #Brexit 
Britain’s aerospace industry - the world’s second largest - will be hurt by failure to secure a good Brexit deal.  
Carry on being optimistic sunshine. This can of  Brexit worms has already turned on you and your dodgy mates. Enjoying watching you fail. 
A fascinating detail picked up by @faisalislam - mixed DUP thinking on a hard or soft Brexit  
.@Nigel_Farage: Most of the British public are united on Brexit, but I fear the UK Parliament is not  #FarageOnLBC 
56% of EU nationals at FTSE 250 companies said they were likely to leave UK even before conclusion of Brexit talks.  
In four days time, UK, with no government and no #Brexit plan, will start negotiations. The scale of this duplicity really is incredible  
It's inexcusable; at a time when the world around us is becoming more & more unstable to promulgate this Brexit crusade to self-destruction.  
No Brexit is better than a bad Brexit. 
On the referendum, peoples of the region must accept one another to resolve differences via dialogue and achieve their rights & aspirations. 
Cross-party consultations on Brexit out of the window then  
“The shit has hit the fan.” Irish farmers straddling the border are fretting about Brexit. @NicRobertsonCNN reports.  
Pro tip for Theresa May: Finish one negotiation before you start the next#sequencing #Brexit #DUP 
On Belfast Radio regretted the loss of 3 SDLP MPs silencing the voice of one tradition while DUP voice is magnified at Brexit vital time. 
No. You must understand. Brexit means freedom from Europe... not freedom for you. Your freedoms will be more limited. All hail Brexit.  
Confirmed: The Opposition have not been consulted on the Government's starting Brexit negotiations before Commons returns/ DUP deal done 
.@PeterHain: Theresa May “is no longer in charge of the Brexit negotiations. That, uncomfortably, is the truth.”  
While the Country goes from bad to Worse And Brexit Becomes a Tory Nightmare, They Focus on Scottish independence, In an effor to cover up. 
Brexit support remains high  
Superb article. Any Brexit will harm Scotland. Any Brexit will harm rUK. Scottish parties should oppose, not enable, any Brexit.  
#Brexit minister Mike @feorlean Russell seeking cross-party talks in Scotland - extracts from Glasgow Uni speech tonight 
The Tory war on the poor and vulnerable continues. While we suffer and die, all Ruth can talk about is "No 2nd referendum!" 
Name anything positive or beneficial that #TheresaMay has achieved since becoming #PM...anything..?No?Me either#MayMustGo #GE2017 #Brexit 
DUP says that they back David Davis' vision of Brexit, and not Phillip Hammond's Soft Brexit. They will back May for that reasonGET IN  
Corbyn could form a Govt if he changed his position on Brexit and reached out to Tory Remainers to form a coalition of sanity. #justsaying 
Brexit has “vaccinated Europe against populism” Brace yourself before you read this.  
No-one has a mandate for #Brexit. Another referendum is urgent: & everyone aged 16 & over affected by the outcome should have a vote. 
What's a soft Brexit then? I'll tell you, soft Brexit is a media buzz phrase for remaining in EU.  I'm with Ian and the DUP all the way. 
At FMQ tRuthLess Davidson went on and on about #indyrefBut had nothing to say about #Brexit her Party Turned their back on Scotlands Vote  
For all those Remainers who said that we wouldn't be able to do #ERASMUS if we left the EU... utter rubbish! #Brexit #EURef  
This is hardly an original thing for me or anyone to ask but, at what point does the Brexit damage become too much & we just back out??  
Scenario for you: Jo Swinson becomes Lib Dem leader, takes party into coalition with Tories again with the cost of another Brexit vote. 
It is total baffling and incomprehensible that Labour leadership would wish to promulgate and promote this abhorrent Brexit 'schism'.  
I think the right phrase for people to get their heads round right now should be "No Brexit is better than a bad Brexit". 
BREXIT BEGINS: David Davis confirms talks will start on Monday  
Rupert Murdoch is the Prime Minister. The shambles of a yes woman who has died on stage multiple times is a stooge.Hard #Brexit continues.. 
.@RuthDavidsonMSP challenged @NicolaSturgeon that she was losing support for an independence referendum.  
Roaming charges are gone! But after Brexit the UK will get them back, right?  
.    "What Happens When ALL Those New Young Labour Voters Realise They’ve Voted FOR A Brexit-Backing Party?" 
I have written exactly 999 words on Monday's Brexit talks but the executive summary is: We're fucking fucked, lads  
UK Govt. could get on & solve problems like affordable housing, instead of wasting citizens' time & money with #Brexit:  
Forget DUP. Forget Brexit. Biggest political risk facing PM now is the fire - if cuts/deregulation blamed. (Reminds me of Bush & Katrina) 
Thank you, Britain – Brexit has vaccinated Europe against populism | Jean Quatremer  
"Thanks, Brits – Brexit has vaccinated Europe against populism"  
Brexit Briefing: Have EU stopped laughing yet?  
How can they start Brexit talks on Monday??? We don't even have a proper govt yet!! A total shambles thanks to Cameron, Johnson, Gove & May 
One thing no-one has explained to me is why Corbyn-McDonnell Hard Brexit would be any better than a May-Davis one? Stop Hard Brexit instead!  
A rhapsodic French view on Brexit.  
Sticking to your delusion can end badly. #Brexit  
Brexit negotiations begin Monday.  This was my pre-election piece on May's lack of any plan.Post-election, she lacks a plan & credibility.  
Lost investment, confidence through the floor, inflation, lower growth. Time to call the whole thing off. #brexit  
We,the passengers,have told her we'd rather not crash,but Capt May is heading straight into a hard Brexit.She needs to get out of autopilot. 
From Guy Verhofstadt's ALDE party asking UK govt to reconsider Brexit. Please sign and RT.  
We are dragged into Groundhog Day.Govt asked, but got no mandate for May's Brexit.May said she'd listen. But not to us.What election?  
Thank you, Britain – Brexit has vaccinated Europe against populism | Jean Quatremer  
Linking Grenfell to Brexit. Guardian plummets new depths.  
Brexit negotiations will not be delayed, says David Davis  
Formal negotiations on Brexit will begin on Monday, the UK and EU say. UK is due to leave by the end of March 2019.pic.twitter.com/jReTOnWRhE 
Brexit negotiations start on Monday. Just a reminder that we still don't have a government.  
SHAMBOLIC TORY BREXIT SHAMBLESWe're all going to be POORER-FACT!Former Foreign Office head: There’s no good Brexit  
Yes, Brexit has unleashed mass hatred – of liberals for the masses, says Julie Burchill  
Our Brexit Barometer falls again after another drop in Britain's retail sales  
Voters gave a mandate for Brexit. May promises to deliver. Voters gave a mandate for a second referendum. Sturgeon threatens to deliver. 
Theresa May has lost her mandate and Commons majority for an extreme, job-destroying Brexit. Me on @LBC 
Am i missing something? Minority Government starting Brexit negotiations Monday and Queens Speech Wednesday yet doesn't have a deal with DUP 
What's shocking is @DavidDavisMP & his crew have spent decades calling for #Brexit; & a year after #EURef, they're still totally unready. 
Varadkar announces abortion referendum for next year  
When it comes to #Brexit, Northern Ireland’s complexity is its strength says @hayward_katy @QUBMitchell -  #LoveQUB 
A very real coup. @Conservatives pushing #Brexit negotiations though but no Queen's speech. @theresa_may - the thief doing a smash and grab. 
Brexit Is Dead: A Wave of Anger Crashes over Britain  
Britain has three days to figure out its Brexit plan. 
#Brexiteers across Govt:Whips' OfficeBrexit DeptForeign OfficeDept. for Intl. TradeTreasuryDefraDept. of TransportDfIDHoC Leader 
It's a year to the day since the #Brexit #BattleoftheThames! We must ensure our #fishermen aren't shafted BY THE EU! 
Maybe now would be a good time for Labour to tell us what their Brexit plan would be. Once & for all. What kind of Brexit do Labour want? 
. Its poetic and on the eve of the Brexit talks too. Its a sign that Britain will dominate once again  
The British government has just confirmed Brexit negotiations will begin this Monday, despite agreement with DUP still not being formalised 
Surely the EU has an obligation to only negotiate with a Sovereign State government, not just a political party posturing as one? 
Brexit negotiations to start on Monday  
..Govt asked for stronger mandate, failed to get it, lost majority, but believes manifesto approach to Brexit supported.. before MPs return 
#Brexit is the greatest cockup since Suez & possible because of similar fantasies. At heart it's the final dissolve of Tory spinelessness. 
BREAKING: #Brexit negotiations will start on Monday - UK govt confirms.  
First round of #Brexit talks will start on Monday June 19, EU and UK officials confirm  
the Government is going to start Brexit negotiations before its confidence & supply negotiations with DUP have finished & signed off 
Brexit negotiations will begin on Monday 19 June as planned, the Government has confirmed  
Officials from the UK and the EU have confirmed Brexit negotiations between David Davis and Michel Barnier will begin on Monday 
... so Brexit negotiations will begin on Monday - with the same approach from the Government as outlined before the election 
Brexit will go down with Suez as one of those words which sends shivers up the spine of future British government ministers. 
'hard brexit defender' da fuq you on about mate 
Quality young Hard Brexit defender. An English lad for once! Well done city. Welcome in the Nags Head for a pint young man #WelcomeMaguire 
Government has agreed with European Commission to start Brexit negotiations on Monday in Brussels:  
Brexit dept confirms talks will start in Brussels on Monday, even though there's no government, no plan, no aims and no capacity to deliver. 
#BREAKING Britain, EU to begin Brexit negotiations on Monday: official 
Funny, I can't imagine everyone who voted tactically for Labour being particularly happy about Labour demanding hard Brexit. 
Can't negotiate a confidence and supply deal, so we're gonna have a go at negotiating Brexit instead  
Now official. Brexit talks begin Monday.  
Lord Adonis suggests Sir John Major as chair of cross-party talks on Brexit. Could this take off?  
Hate sells. That's the lesson of #Trump-#Brexit. 
To be fair, I'm not entirely sure why the Tories haven't approached @labour, they share so much policy and Brexit. 
A ‘no deal’ Brexit is the perfect cover for the Tories to bring about their small state agenda | @mattzarb 
Pay up, make nice if you want 'soft Brexit', EU to tell May  
So much for all that "DUP will force soft Brexit" stuff.  
BREXIT LATEST: Tories and DUP AGREE on EU exit as new Government talks 'progress'  
If rumours on DUP backing May's Brexit are correct, effectively means one devolved administration codetermines policy while two get shut out 
Transpires that #GE2017 meaning an end to Clean Brexit was complete fake news.  
Funny how the Great British Public is wiser than the elites when they agree with you on Brexit, but thick & deluded when they don't, Daniel.  
Despite the speculation, spin and hopes of Irish Gov. DUP source firmly on the side of hard #Brexit in support of May and Tories.  
Survation poll reinforces the need for the SNP to strongly speak up for their mandate to hold a referendum:  #ScotRef 
Raised with PM the huge impact of Brexit on NI and risk to shared society, and resultant necessity for a special arrangements for the region 
We need to implement the real economic benefits of Brexit as soon after Brexit day as possible @JLongworthLML 
Prime Minister Theresa May is under pressure to agree to DUP demands on Brexit and domestic policy  
Blimey...where on earth would THAT leave the Brexit vision set out by @theresa_may ? 
DUP backs Theresa May's vision of Brexit, not Philip Hammond's - ITV News  
From club closures to the looming threats of gentrification and Brexit, dance music in London has often felt under siege #RealScenesLDN 
Looking increasingly likely that #Brexit negotiations will start this Monday as had been planned pre #GE2017 
Lib Dem role now crucial. Stand up to populism on Left and Right. Work with others to solve big issues like Brexit, NHS funding, inequality 
Enough is enough. Set a date for a referendum. Join #Rally2Repeal this Saturday in Dublin, Cork, Galway & Kerry#repealthe8th 
How about Sir John Major as chair of inter-party talks on the UK's Brexit strategy? #SaneBrexit 
Lord Buckethead has agreed to lead Brexit negotiations  
Britons want Theresa May to change direction on Brexit, poll shows  
Today, 60% of people in Scotland say they do not want a second referendum on independence – more than double the number who back it #FMQs 
Labour's Brexit policy looks pretty much the same as May's 'Hard Brexit'  
FlashBackWOWSchool Time@Nigel_Farage Schools #GinaMiller over #Brexit "What part of word #Leave don't you understand?"#LeaveMeansLeave 
To be clear: Govt proceeding on Monday with a Brexit plan that's just been rejected by electorate. Not just an outrage, unsustainable too 
Apparently, soft brexit means access to the single market at only twice what it used to cost. Still, Elitists keep their bungs and fiddles. 
Brexit talks to start Monday: EU sources  
EXCLUSIVE: The top EU and UK Brexit negotiators have agreed to start talks on Monday, as scheduled  
We voted for you @jeremycorbyn . Two thirds of your support, it's been said, is anti-Brexit. We need you to speak for us.  
Farcical cancellation of .@PhilipHammondUK Lancaster House speech advocating soft #Brexit. #brexitshambles continues. @duponline use veto. 
60% of Scots in new poll want Nicola Sturgeon to abandon independence referendum. But is she listening? Course not 
If that's true why doesn't he do something about it? It's been nearly a year since #Brexit & the longer it goes on the worse it will be!!  
Reverse Brexit: Time for Scotland's pro-EU parties to show leadership & call for an end to Brexit for the whole UK  
What's the latest #Brexit news? Catch up on the latest developments with our weekly briefing   
2018 in Ireland will see:An abortion  referendum.A visit from the Pope.....well that's gonna be fun. 
.@M_AndersonSF raises Good Friday Agreement concerns with EU Brexit negotiator  
Ministers 'will quit' if #Brexit is watered down: Top Tories warn May not to give in to Hammond on softer deal  
The Government's hard #Brexit strategy is driving away skilled workers from the EU #LeaveWatch 
Funny. Tories have (almost) always had my vote until now. Won't vote for Brexit loonies though so they've lost me. I won't vote BluKIP. 
John Rentoul: DUP backs Theresa May on Brexit, says @peston. 
UK to step up support for start-ups, infrastructure ahead of #Brexit  
Brand May is fatally damaged. And she is taking Brexit with her. 
A year after the Brexit vote, fears about academics leaving to work in other European countries are becoming reality  
 “Abortion referendum to be held next year in Ireland” 
WATCH | It's a year to the day since the Brexit Battle of the Thames! We must ensure our fishermen aren't shafted in Brexit negotiations!  
Just cycled to s London to interview Chancellor at fintech firm previewing this important speech with Brexit implications - also cancelled:  
Philip Hammond pulls out of Brexit speech tonight citing tower block blaze. More like Number 10 has got to him 
BIAFRA: THE PROPOSED PLAN WHICH NNAMDI KANU HAS FOR ALL ETHNIC NATIONS IN BIAFRALAND AFTER BIAFRAEXIT REFERENDUM  
Our Brexit spokesperson, @HywelPlaidCymru joins cross-party meeting to discuss making sure Brexit works for each of the UK's countries.  
Great cross party meeting on Brexit and devolution in London this morning @columeastwood @UKLabour @Plaid_Cymru @theSNP @ConorMcGinn 
If the relationship between Downing St and HM Treasury had completely broken down over Brexit I imagine it might look something like this...  
Sacked by the Times for lying, sacked from Tory shadow cabinet for lying, promoted to FS by #may after lying to the people about #brexit  
Heads up 'Soft Brexit' brigade: Brits want Brexit in larger numbers than ever before, even among remain voters. The game is up. Via @YouGov 
DUP backs @theresa_may and @DavidDavisMP vision of Brexit, not @PhilipHammondUK  
BIAFRA: IPOB HIGHEST COMMAND SHOULD HOLD HAND ON AREWA YOUTHS ULTIMATUM AND ANNOUNCE DATE OF BIAFRA REFERENDUM  
Brian Taylor just said @NicolaSturgeon should make clear #ScotRef would be at end of Brexit. She's been shouting it from the bloody rooftops 
Another classic Brexit delusion: "We want to be more like Singapore." Guess what: Singapore economy thrives because of... high immigration. 
There is no way for Britain to leave the EU without a hard brexit according to British judge. So that´s it. Jobs done. 
The BBC are so biased against Brexit the government should abolish the TV license 
On Brexit, @LewisMacdMSP tells Nicola Sturgeon: "She can't be sitting at the top table and heading for the exit at the same time." #fmqs 
FM calls on all MSPs to agree that Scotland needs to be represented in #Brexit negotiations #fmqs 
Is #Breturn possible? "The door to Europe is always open," says German FM Gabriel echoing remarks by French President #Macron on #Brexit  
FM: I think one of the most shameful aspects of the Brexit process has been the disregard shown for the Northern Ireland peace process #FMQs 
Another #Brexit hit to the economy and to the #NHS : 
Revenge of the 'Remoaners' — Some warnings about the dire consequences of Brexit are starting to come true pic.twitter.com/DujQMTkjVx 
One thing that @timfarron attracted criticism for was trying to give space for Leave voters to come round to realising Brexit bad for them 
Germany's #Merkel says EU ready to negotiate #Brexit, declines to speculate on '#Breturn' following last week's #GeneralElection in the UK 
Bank of England warns inflation may rise more than thought  
Yes, Brexit has unleashed mass hatred, says Julie Burchill – of liberals for the masses  
Brexit! Independence! Brexit! Independence! #FMQs 
@NicolaSturgeon describes the EU referendum as 'divisive and unnecessary'. The hypocrisy is breathtaking. #FMQs 
"70% of Brits think that Brexit must be enacted - including a majority (53%) of Remain voters" - @YouGov 
i see the first minister's attacking the tories for calling a divisive referendum. #fmqs 
Brexit minister @SteveBakerHW says  "no change" from clean Brexit plans 
All Brexit statements these days are a variation on "we must remove our head from our body, but only in a way compatible with life" 
More signs of movement towards realism on Brexit by some Tories. They need to go further. 
Soft Brexit? @lesleyriddoch must-read on how EEA/EFTA isn't as easy at it sounds. 
According to @YouGov the proportion of voters wanting the Government to deliver Brexit has now risen to 70%  
There will be an abortion referendum in Ireland despite Pope’s visit  
Poll: Six out of 10 Scots want Nicola Sturgeon to drop a second independence referendum  
Remainer Hammond leads the Cabinet revolt against a true Brexit.Typical Establishment who will put Britain last. Time to go, Chancellor!  
No money available for housing, for the #NHS, for welfare, for the disabled, but billions available for Brexit! @JolyonMaugham @marcuschown 
Labour's position on #Brexit is incoherent & unacceptable. It attacks the interests & futures of the young especially.  
Claire Bradley of @ChildLawCentre says that young people are angry about brexit and feel lied to #chartingbrexit 
Well, this all bodes well for our ability to negotiate Brexit doesn't it?  
Britain must not be taken in by the “soft Brexit” snake oil peddlers  via @BrexitCentral 
Edel Quinn @Age_NI outlines real impact of Brexit for older people. Huge number of EU based regulations that benefit OP. #chartingbrexit 
70% of Brits think that Brexit must be enacted - including a majority (53%) of Remain voters  
Research says #Brexit Britain can flourish even without a deal  
The cost of #Brexit - retail sales fall as inflation rises  
Brexit economic consequences are being felt now as Hard Brexit policy starts to take effect and currency & growth prospects for  sink in  
Here's hard-nosed reasons why we must keep option of #indyinEU wide open. Scotland still damaged by "soft" Brexit:  
Also independence is an insurance policy against brexit in the same way chopping my leg off is insurance against stubbing my toe  
I don't think politicians will stop Brexit anymore. Reality will stop it. I'm putting all my money on reality. 
Day after day the cost of Brexit piles up   
***NEW VIDEO***OUT MEANS OUT! Brexit in peril as they rally behind a "soft Brexit"Please RT Follow me on Youtube 
% of Brexit negotiating time elapsed: 11Progress made negotiating Brexit: 0 (both big and fat)This may get updated #brexitshambles 
It's about keeping options open. People whose first preference now is to stay in the U.K. may change their minds when Brexit deal clear.  
until Brexit  
Handy little guide to the universe of everything Brexit.  
The #HousingCrisis is as important as Brexit and we need to talk about it!  
This morning the EU has scrapped roaming charges for mobiles. We won't benefit after Brexit  
And I wonder if Macron would have succeeded without the rest of Europe seeing what a total fool Britain had made of itself with Brexit.  
There is no soft or hard Brexit:  There is Brexit, or there is staying in the EU. 
Retail sales sliding.Inflation rising.Wages squeezed.-This is Brexit 
'Cabinet resignations' if May gives in to demands to water down Brexit 
My autocorrect still doesn't recognise the words "Brexit" or "Corbyn".It lives in a happier world than I do.#Remain 
Hammond wants a "soft Brexit". So does Ruth Davidson. Can a weakened Theresa May hold them off? Would she even want to? New video on the way 
Bloody bargain indeed. Brexit means more austerity, more cuts, higher taxes, did I mention more austerity more cuts? We can't afford Brexit.  
UK recession risk in next few years is "high", says Pimco. "The debate over how Brexit will proceed is likely to escalate this fall."  
Mobile roaming charges abolished working together through EU, for brexit Britain now a point for negotiations or we'll lose it.  
2016: BOO, evil right wing papers swung Brexit. Howl.2017: LOL, evil right wing papers have no power over voters. Choose one, lefties. 
BIAFRA: IPOB HIGHEST COMMAND SHOULD HOLD HAND ON AREWA YOUTHS ULTIMATUM AND ANNOUNCE DATE OF BIAFRA REFERENDUM  
Remember everyone, we are still only two disks into the Brexit boxset.Plenty more to come. 
In regard to brexit - the odds are rising significantly against patriots and soon it will be necessary to decide on what action to take! 
This would be like increasing our economic growth rate by a third every year for twelve years! #Brexit 
Ignore this "stability" nonsense. The Tories WILL knife May before the main Brexit talks start in October.. 
Roaming fees are now abolished in the #EU!  But if we #brexit and leave the single market it could be €50 to listen to a Spotify song :/  
Varadkar announces abortion referendum for next year  
Roaming charges abolished today in the EU, so you won't pay a penny extra over your UK phone tarrif when in the EU! Until Brexit. Enjoy! 
BREAKING: Britain's retail sales plunge by more than forecast as rising inflation hits home  
This is properly worth a read on how difficult it is going to be for the Government to deliver on the Brexit promises they have made.  
I know our current bunch of Tories aren't the brightest, but how do you hold a *secret* *referendum*?   
This election was all about Brexit, but not in the way people think. Persuasive analysis by @hugorifkind  
It's Brexit, Stupid.  
Support for holding a second independence referendum has plummeted to just 27%, according to Survation polling.  
13% of negotiation time goneNo unified Gov Brexit approach Public mood changing UK economy tanks as EU boomsTories own the mess  
... so on the basis of this - Brexit would mean a short period of free regulated roaming before Brexit ends it  
Read all of our #Brexit briefings in one place -  
London’s MPs have the power to change the course of Brexit | Simon Jenkins  
If there is not enough money to properly fund our emergency services, education and social care, there is not enough money to fund Brexit. 
Of course we must leave the Customs Union on #Brexit. Otherwise can't benefit from trade deals with the growing parts of the world economy. 
The losers who want to drag Britain down. Pro-Brussels establishment stitch-up on Brexit is already under way.  
Ministers warn they will quit if May gives into Hammond's attempts to backslide on Brexit | Non-EU spouse compromise  
Where is #Biafra ex footballers Kalu Nwakwo, Okocha.Guardiola is now championing #Referendum of his people Catalonia 
Still no DUP deal, if The Conservative Party can't do a deal with these 10 MPs who need us more than we need them, Brexit will go SWIMMINGLY 
Promises made by incompetent populist leaders almost never get fulfilled. A note to those still believing in the Trump/Brexit miracles.  
To be honest @Peston @afneil @BBCNews could stop #Brexit tomorrow by simply asking the question:"What will Brexit really cost the UK?"  
Britain must not be taken in by the “soft Brexit” snake oil peddlers, warns @JLongworthLML 
During the decline of the Roman Empire short periods of stability would be ended by new downward lurches. #Brexit #Remain 
Roaming charges gone under EU law - exactly the sort of thing that will depend on negotiation/ nature of Brexit  
Great news @campaignforleo to hold referendum on #repealthe8th next year. Irish women are counting on it! @IrishFPA #womenshealth 
Yes everybody has right to self determination and unity by force is slavery #Biafra demand #Referendum @ProfOsinbajo 
Bloody EU! This is outrageous! I love getting charged extortionate fees for using my phone abroad! #Brexit now!  
FT leader on May & #Brexit: "Time to think of the national interest rather than the narrow party interest". Can she?  
New laws to cut mobile roaming in Europe, but uncertainty over what happens for UK customers after Brexit  
London’s MPs have the power to change the course of Brexit | Simon Jenkins  
In Dáil last night I welcomed new Taoiseach's tasking Simon Harris with organising referendum on 8th and called on him to name early date 
Today the EU says goodbye to rip-off roaming fees. Another benefit we risk losing after Brexit #RoamLikeAtHome 
Majority of Scots want second referendum dumped as 60% say no to IndyRef2   
Politicians think we have all accepted Brexit. I have not & will continue, like a fart in a thunderstorm to make & create a stink. No Brexit 
So glad that following Brexit vote, we will spend £350m a week on the DUP's sectarian agenda. Was it you who voted Tory? 
Half of skilled EU workers that Britain will need after Brexit now plan to leave  
People on TL suggesting May lied to Queen. Unlikely.May believes deal-making is just so easy.  That is the problem now and for Brexit. 
Eighth Amendment referendum to be held next year, Leo Varadkar says  
Will Brexit undermine the Premier League, cutting it off from footballing innovations in continental Europe?  
.@LGrahamOSP2015 "The Scottish people have given Sturgeon a message that they don't want another independence referendum."#BBCGMS 
Mobile roaming charges end in the EU today. Another benefit that we will lose if Brexit happens. 
Brexit is "business friendly" like fags are "lung friendly." 
Consider how badly Mrs May has played her own cards. Gambles & loses. We really want her anywhere near the high stakes Brexit negotiations? 
EU looking on in disbelief at what an act of national self harm Brexit Shambles is & are offering us a get out. They are friends indeed.  
Theresa May faces more pressure than ever to deliver what she calls "the promise" of Brexit  
not met one person who regrets Brexit but met many remainers who have switched sides & now want out realising wat a dictatorship EU is  
No we don't, all we regret is that the globalist elite of Labour & Tories are dragging out our Brexit so as to water it down to nothing.  
It's taking a long time to do a deal with the DUP. I wonder if the Brexit negotiations will be as tough as this. 
2022As five year parliament ends, still no Tory-DUP deal. No Bills passed. Brexit has come and gone with no deal."A success," says May. 
Commentators talk as if Britain can easily have a soft Brexit via the "Norway deal." That's not looking likely  
Today, I am setting out a way forward for devolution post-Brexit – read more here:  
I'll just leave this statement by a leading Tory brexiteer sink in #GrenfellTower #brexit  
Big moment tonight - setting tone of government's approach to #Brexit - how far will @PhilipHammondUK go? 
60% of Scots polled by Survation want @NicolaSturgeon to drop her future plans for another divisive referendum.   
Rees-Mogg Britain could slash environmental & safety standards a very long way after Brexit: A promise not a warning  
Thank God for brexit. Look what those terrible immigrants are up to now. All that "help" and "community".  
BREXIT BOOST: Britain would be '£156 billion a year better off WITHOUT a deal with EU'  
Labour supporters should ask why Corbyn is helping the government achieve a Tory #Brexit which would wreck much that Labour holds dear. 
If Corbyn opposed Brexit Tory Remainer MPs would be in a strong position to block hard #Brexit; instead he tacitly helps the govt.#Remain 
BREXIT BOOST: Britain would be '£156 billion a year better off WITHOUT a deal with EU' Time to get started & leave 
Of course we can fight Brexit. And must. It's collapsing all around us - and politicians can only defy reality for so long. 
Whilst the majority now see the Brexit apocalypse, those in the bunker, the Tories, their press, Farage, et al, attempt one last rally.  
Philip Hammond 'wants UK to stay in customs union after Brexit'  
Labour rules out cross-party Brexit approach until Theresa May drops 'no deal' rhetoric  
Brexit is now going to be very different - there's no time for a proper deal, so these are our temporary options  
Britain will enter the Brexit negotiations in Brussels next week with its 'head held high', officials insist  
Britain has changed forever....and its incredibly sad#London #terrorism #Islam #religionofpeace #illegalimmigration #Trump #auspol #brexit  
Anyone else fed up of hearing EU demands? Hold your position Mrs May and don't water down Brexit! Pls don't let EU chip away making bad deal 
Corbyn is helping block a Tory Remainer MP rebellion by tacitly assuring the govt that he will help it defeat such a revolt.#Brexit #Remain 
Our politicians had better stop swindling us - soon. Rule out 'Hard' Brexit and the whole process is exposed "as an enormous lie". From @FT 
May's failure retain majority in recent British election introduces even wider array of Brexit scenarios  
Philip Stephens: A path that will avoid Brexit calamity  
Conduct a Referendum now to avert looming carnage in Nigeria  
Brexit is looking increasingly like an episode of Jackass 
Taoiseach committing to referendum next year. We'll certainly be holding him to that. #repealthe8th 
71% of voters back Brexit.No, the general election wasn't a rejection of it.Another MSM narrative fail. 
Jeremy Corbyn MP: My vote for Labour was NOT a vote for Brexit  via @UKChange 
.Opposition to May's Brexit is growing daily - City of London, Wales, Scotland, N Ireland & even her OWN cabinet!. 
Britain could slash environmental and safety standards 'a very long way' after Brexit, Tory MP Jacob Rees-Mogg says  
Instead of Brexit, let's see politicians getting tough on the causes of Brexit  
This is what Europe thinks #Brexit should look like  
Theresa May 'calms' fears over ‘soft Brexit’ by hiring big Eurosceptic to exiting EU department. He's a twat btw  
Tories planned to further deregulate building regulations as first priority in Brexit legislation  
My #Brexit letter in tomorrow's @FT  @EdwardGLuce @Erik_Jones_SAIS @SAISHopkins @CTR_SAIS @vali_nasr @alanbeattie 
Try it again Dave "Should the people of Scotland be allowed a say on their own future when the Brexit details are known?" G'wan G'wan G'wan 
May is being told to either reverse Article 50 or seal a 'Soft Brexit' deal for Britain  via @BIUK_Politics 
No Brexit negotiations until we have a government but can't have that until May has done a deal with a cult that doesnt believe in dinosaurs 
The so-called Nigerian scam works when a victim hooked would rather keep coughing up than admit they've been had. And so it is with Brexit. 
This is why the Tories actually want a ‘no deal’ Brexit  
The misjudgments and lack of thinking-through over this DUP deal are as nothing to the complete hash May will make of the Brexit deal. 
Forbidding or warning againstan independence referendumbecause you disapprove of the likely resultis not exactly impartial advice! 
Do you - like me - have a wee sneaky feeling#RuthDavidson's trying to distract us allfrom Brexit & her WM ToryGov's incompetent conduct? 
How to make the most of #Brexit? @Juergen_Maier joins Business Reporter @Telegraph and shares #leadership insights 
*Brexit Explained*  
Did people know that Brexit meant leaving the single market? Two weeks before EU ref, only 22% of Leavers thought full access was at risk.  
Abortion referendum to be held next year   
Brexit Inflation is already increasing poverty levels in Britain. You can change your mind #BrexitChoice #StopBrexit 
'We WILL be leaving!' Moment Farage MOCKS EU politicians for revelling in election result 
Excl: Hammond and Rudd's Brexit bust up with Theresa May in a bid to force her to rejig negotiating strategy; 
BREXIT BOOST: Britain would be '£156 billion a year better off WITHOUT a deal with EU'  
Are the Tories finally ready - a year on - to deal in hard facts on the economy, immigration & Brexit, instead of sloganising?  
PollAfter a year of procrastination and posturing, Brexit time has finally arrived.How do you wish your Brexit be served?Result67% None pic.twitter.com/TnOTsRPsi8 
Wanted. 1. 10 Tory Remainers to defect to Libdems. 2. New Libdem leader to offer to back Labour government in exchange for 2nd referendum 
'Majority of Brits REGRET Brexit referendum vote Labour MEP lashes out at Theresa May. Oh no we don't regret Brexit!  
Theresa May and the Tories lust after a tax haven #Brexit for the rich, and the end of the welfare state for the rest of us. #Remain 
Theresa May has had almost a week to FAIL to make a deal with DUP allies on a few things. No wonder she expects to make a bad Brexit deal 
Tory MPs will 'pull the pin' on hand grenade if they feel Theresa May betrays Brexit  
Theresa May would do well to let Nicola Sturgeon in on Brexit negotiations.The FM is beyond doubt the most strong & stable politician in UK. 
In my opinion, the only mistake the #libdems made in the election was offering a 2nd referendum. They should have run a cancel Brexit ticket 
BREAKING: 17 MSPs support a motion welcoming the decision by the Catalan Government to hold an independence referendum on October 1. 
#Brexit Thread (with *4* bonus PSs, that's value for money)Brexiteers suddenly want to use Single Market to protect us from Corbyn  
Despite the triumphalism of Brexit advocates, the U.K.’s cross-Channel rival France is better positioned for growth  
Surprise! Surprise! "British public wrong about nearly everything to do with the EU referendum, survey shows"  
WTF is a "Safe" Brexit!?  
Since the day after the ref, the problem's has been the same. Her Majesty's Opposition does not oppose Brexit.Half the voters have no voice 
It's increasingly clear that the only substantive justification now offered for Brexit is humouring those who made mistake of voting Leave. 
Very welcome commitment by Taoiseach @campaignforleo @SimonHarrisTD to bring forward legislation for 2018 referendum #RepealThe8th 
.Hope he fires "a missile directly at No.10 [to] show divisions in Brexit strategy at the heart of govt". via @FT 
.@timfarron. As the only leader of main 3 national parties to stand up against #Brexit, you have my full respect.   
Nick Timothy: Brexit Still Has to Mean Brexit  
1) Fascinating pattern emerging in some #Brexit "intellectuals" following Corbyn SurgeThey now want to hide behind the EU Single Market  
He'll be remembered for being weird about gays and you'll be remembered for student debt and the AV referendum. Sit down.  
Referendum on #repealthe8th to be held in 2018 according to Taoiseach @campaignforleo 
Look at what's happened to the number of British citizens seeking German passports  
The Remainer elite is using figures like George Osborne in the service of Brexit-bashing, writes @FraserMyers  
Proud to be asked to take on responsibility of @dfatirl and Brexit - huge challenges ahead but looking forward to it 
We knew LibDems not very democratic in opposing Brexit. We now know they are not very liberal either. We should just call them ".         " 
#brexit = nurses pay capped, cuts for schools, less police, dementia tax. It's a financial burden we don't need. #brexit makes us poorer.  
How about re running the Referendum and watching all those young people vote this time.  
If Hammond succeeds in subverting Brexit, his Party will pay a terrible price. May should note  
May's chief of staff & ex-housing minister 'sat on' a report warning of the vulnerability to fire of such high-rise blocks. i.e. They knew. 
German MEP David McAllister is one of our #scotnight guests at 10:40. He's pulling no punches on #Brexit  
Good dialogue today w/ Iraqi National Congress delegation led by Aras Habib Karim about Kurdistan's referendum in Sept and Iraq's elections.  
Brexit is what happens when a country listens to people like Allison who have absolutely no idea what they are talking about.  
I truly hope that the new @LibDems leader retains the anti-#brexit approach. The country needs that voice. Public will get behind message. 
Two Ministers have quit the Brexit department days before negotiations start, one saying 'Brexit cant work'#Shambles 
I sense the drive to leave the EU is quickly evaporating. UK crying out for a leader with enough courage to call out Brexit & face it down.  
Congrats to Simon Coveney on being appointed Minister for Foreign Affairs with special responsibility for Brexit  
Brexit. We can't go around it, we can't go over it, we'll have to go through it.  
The Tories are Using the Scottish Independence issue To take the "Whole UK" Minds off Brexit Tory Insanity Wake up folks! Its a Cover up Job 
Yeah, cos she's making everything up as she goes along. No plan, brexit will ruin our country. No brexit is our goal. We fight.  
"Brexit can't work" says minister responsible for Brexit as they quit.  
UK is in a hell of a state. @Theresa_May this is all happening on YOUR watch. Forget F*****g #Brexit and start being a PM. #GlenfellTower 
Great news. @campaignforleo says @SimonHarrisTD is charged with bringing forward legislation for a referendum on 8th in 2018 #repealthe8th 
Varadkar says Harris will begin preparation for referendum on Eighth amendment in 2018 
Ireland is preparing for Brexit talks with a "rock star" prime minister at the helm  
The far right Tory #Brexitscam was rooted in a perverse dream of total deregulation at any cost. 
Giving Brexit notification in March and then holding an election in June has been shown to be political opportunism 
Some people are saying Cable should help with brexit. They seem to have forgotten the  £1b+ he cost the country when he undersold Royal Mail 
No thanks. We prefer to run our own country.  We had a referendum & the majority voted to leave the EU.  We will be leaving the EU.  Le fin.  
Brexit vote the biggest vote in UK history.If politicians think We will just sit back whilst they betray the vote they are deluded  
Dr Joseph Garcia has opened the Referendum exhibition. marking the 50th anniversary of Gib's 96% vote to stay British  
"Idle folly has trapped the country between an EU rock and an ultra-hard Brexit." I agree: No Brexit is best  
.@timfarron led @LibDems from a low point & has got us on the up.His stance on Brexit spot on.We owe him gratitude 
Could the Conservatives having led us to Brexit now lead us to Breturn? Me for @prospect_uk (). 
Corporate tax rate, 2017UK: 19%Canada: 27%Germany: 29%Australia: 30%France: 33%US: 39%#0urWorld #Brexit #GE2017 
Tomorrow @ScotNational @LesleyRiddoch analyses the options for a soft Brexit  
I agree. Disagree on Brexit but @timfarron is a thoroughly decent and good man. British politics is better for him being part of it. 
Take notes: Turnout higher than originally stated. 31%, instead of 22%. #PuertoRico #statehood #referendum #pr51 #usa 
This remains one of best examples of why post-Brexit non-tariff barriers bigger threat than tariffs 4 UK exporters: 
If you don't believe Brexit is good for the country, please please consider coming to this to keep our voice heard.  
Tim Farron resigns good has there ever been a more useless politician worse than Tim 2 referendum soft Brexit that's Tim nothing else to say  
Please can we put Vince Cable in charge of the Lib Dems, Brexit and the campaign to "Stop Awful Stuff Happening All the Time'' 
UK debt (% of GDP)2007: 43.7%2009: 65.8%2011: 81.8%2013: 87.3%2015: 91.1%#0urWorld #Brexit #GE2017 
If the Government's Brexit department were a business, the receivers would have been called in long ago. 
Statement on inaccurate news reports related to UNAMI role as concerns the referendum as announced through an order of the KR-I Presidency  
I don't believe Farron resigning as LD leader has anything to do with being a Christian, more he saw his anti-Brexit stance isn't a winner 
Thanks for your advice on Brexit, David Cameron – but nobody will be listening  
"unity of purpose" - the EU referendum has brought total 'disunity'.The only fact is that we are still in the EU. 
."There are NO big trade deals the UK can do post Brexit" 
"Brexit has simply accelerated a debate on Irish Unity that was inevitably going to happen anyway" @mattcarthy 
The clarity of @timfarron's message on Brexit led me to vote LibDem for the first time ever. Thank you Tim indeed.  
I like my eggs how I like my brexit: Extremely soft, and if possible could you substitute it for something less fucking awful please thanks. 
Hard Brexit wanted by Tories to "cut red tape" e.g. red tape like building regulations 
The final reckoning for the Brexit shambles will be ugly  
How fitting! UKIP leadership selection starts next Friday, 23 June, the first anniversary of our glorious referendum victory! #ComeBackNigel 
Despite all of the talk of Brexit, immigration & workers, the Tories took just 6 Labour seats in pro-Leave territory. The strategy failed. 
Vote Leave spent £3.9m with big data company AggregateIQ. This is was used to send fake news / facts to targeted folk in the referendum. 
People in Britain would "clearly" now prefer a soft Brexit, Ryanair's Kenny Jacobs says  
Britain could slash environmental and safety standards 'a very long way' after Brexit, Tory MP Jacob Rees-Mogg says  
Anybody asking questions about DUP involvement with Big Data company AggregateIQ during the referendum? If not why not? @MichaelLCrick 
As someone who's also a "1989-era eurosceptic" this is an excellent analysis - The true saboteurs of #Brexit  via @FT 
."Govt must ask itself, did general election give PM the mandate for the Brexit she sought?I would suggest not". 
The breakdown of total research grants and funding for HE institutions shows how they are funded and who by #Brexit  
Badenoch on Brexit: The newly elected MP for Saffron Walden @KemiBadenoch on the so-called 'divorce bill' 
Did people know that Brexit meant leaving the single market? Two weeks before #EUref, only 22% of Leavers thought full access was at risk. 
Anthony Hilton: Business must get off the fence and stop Brexit  
This was supposed to be the #Brexit election, but to everyone’s surprise, it was usurped by  hunting  
Ken Clarke tells Theresa May to change course on Brexit "Both parties are hopelessly split on the issue." >>  
V proud of my team with latest @TheAHDB #Brexit report on prospects for grains. Essential read 4 whole chain  
Another threat of violence from a Leaver. #Brexit must be stopped precisely to prevent threats of violence being rewarded.  
New @theSNP Westminster leader Ian Blackford says independence referendum option will act as insurance policy during Brexit talks 
May's obsession with ECJ over Brexit 'daft', says former senior judge.  
#Brexit Dreamteam. Retweet after voteWho could lead best deal? #yourvoice #followback @piersmorgan @KTHopkins @jeremycorbyn @theresa_may 
European frustration over #Britain’s confused & muddled approach to #Brexit boils over: 
May is being told to either reverse Article 50 or seal a 'Soft Brexit' deal for Britain  via @BIUK_Politics 
50 years since the 1967 Referendum exhibition opens at JMH. 3 rooms of material including old films opens to the public today.  
Hard Brexit is the only Brexit voted for. The rest is high treason.  
Britain does not have a government, it is ruled by a self-interested clique caring only for themselves & their rich friends.#Remain #Brexit 
Thanks, Guy, for making it clear to even the most dreamy Remain voter that Brexit is irreversible.  
#TheresaMay where are you going to get your nurses from after #Brexit?  #StopBrexit #StopBrexitNow #Remain #NHS @NHSMillion 
hard brexit is like asking your housemate if they want anything from the shop, hearing them say "yes", then going out and buying a lion. 
Keith Brown says Tory positions have included "no brexit, soft brexit, hard brexit, open Brexit" and what he calls "shexit: shambles Brexit"  
As only UKIP are the only *unequivocal* party of Brexit, by extension of Davis' (spurious) arguments, *no one* wants Brexit!  
My rather heated interview on @theJeremyVine on BBC Radio 2 debating Brexit with Chuka Umunna: . (40:50-50:30)#Brexit 
I see Corbyn and his warped minions are blaming the fire in London this morning on May. I'm surprised they didn't blame brexit! 
Just heard someone from the "new media" claim that the MSM ignored the phenomena of Brexit and Trump. Yerrssss. 
This is exactly why Brexiteers need to counter the 'soft' Brexit rhetoric and regroup. A #GlobalBrexit at risk! 
So if England gets knocked out...Do we call it Brexit?#PakvEng #CT17 
It doesn't matter how many people are now 'behind Brexit' and 'voted for it', being a minority doesn't make me wrong. It will be a disaster. 
When even Ken Clarke says there's no going back on Brexit, you wonder why Pres Macron invites us back - or tabloids talk of Remoaner plots. 
Just a reminder @theresa_may We voted BREXIT on 23 June 2016The door to France might be half open but the door to the UK is nailed shut. 
Since this is an echo chamber and I am preaching to the converted about Brexit, I thought would try to convert all you dog lovers instead.  
Well done to @BarryGardiner for calling out Tories new plot to scapegoat Labour for their Brexit failings! NEVER work with the Tories.  
"A successful Brexit."  The phrase that put the moron into oxymoron. 
Very, very sad! Thomas Rid is one of the best. But not the only European having such thoughts post-Brexit... #braindrain 
It's just occurred to me that we could end up with no UKIP *and* no Brexit. As if it's all been a horrible dream. Wouldn't that be nice? :)  
The EU wants Scotland involved in #Brexit negotiations:  
Loving the slow, shared, deaths of Brexit & the Conservative Party, as we know it. 
Brexit: why we are doing this. #Brexit  
That's now three days straight of bad economic news. Will government take note in their #Brexit policy? 
Ruth Davidson has told Therasa May Brexit Negotiations must not trade away any fishing rights. 
Tories must hold very tightly onto nurse, to save Brexit and the country. (Gerald Warner for Reaction @reactionlife) 
It can't. But also, as some of us have been saying forever, Brexit will consume so much civil service resource.   
Corbyn should amend for his disastrous performance in EU ref & Labour should promise to hold 2nd referendum if they get in power.  
Derek Mackay needs to come clean on this murky business. Were donations for another referendum used for GE campaign? 
There is only one Brexit - which can only be achieved by leaving the single market and customs union, @JLongworthLML on @bbc5live 
A very sensible comment by one of the few Conservative Party politicians who has never been afraid to keep speaking the truth about Brexit   
This is a study in May's deal-making, ahead of Brexit.  
€100bn exit bill. Threatening to open Calais border. Taunting us with more demands. Simply rude and pompus.Thank god we left.  #BREXIT  
Ireland is preparing for Brexit talks with a "rock star" prime minister at the helm  
A better heading and article would be: Why Brexit will not happen.  via @FT 
Cracked the 7000 followers on Twitter today. Onwards and Upwards as I campaign on impending Brexit negotiations for EEA+CU ie softest Brexit 
The British people just voted on June 8th against Hard Brexit, no matter what you say Nigel 
Student leaders from Northern Ireland, Ireland & Great Britain voice collective concern regarding Brexit:  
2/ But, as senior backbencher pointed out, what about the 'great repeal bill'? How can Brexit get done without legislation? 
PM 'must listen' to other parties over #Brexit says Cameron  
71% of voters in the #GE2017 were enthusiastic or accepting of Brexit, just 28% against! So let's get on with it! 
We must regroup and stand up to the political elites on Brexit!   
I can't do it in 140 characters but in 1993 the Danes were given 2nd go at EU referendum. Are we headed for similar here? Here's the detail:  
Ha. Lovely reply to the notion that the only Brexit is hard Brexit...  
#Brexit: Does @Theresa_May have any answers? @GuyVerhofstadt issues five pressing questions. Please share:  
Stephen Glover argues that a soft Brexit - along the lines of the deal Norway has with the EU - is no Brexit at all 
All the times @CamAnalytica said it worked for @LeaveEUOfficial.  #brexit  
If that Brexit make-belief was the Tories being "honest", goodness knows what their next offering of contradictory nonsense will look like  
Problem with press/unionist position on Indyref, is that it leaves Scotland with absolutely no options if Brexit deal is the worst it can be 
Scotland voted overwhelmingly for proEU parties, ScotTories should stop banging on about Scotref & Brexit & get on with their day jobs.  
If you can't stomach another election, I hope you have an appetite for more austerity & cuts. Otherwise make it clear you don't want Brexit. 
"Fake Brexit" is EEA membership initially envisaged as transitory, that gets repeatedly renewed & eventually leads to re-entry into EU. 
Discover the stories of EU citizens living in limbo since the EU referendum. #citizensrights now! It needs to stop.  
Feeling uncrushed. How about you? Your bluff has been well and truly called Mrs May @theresa_may.Soz, but the country doesn't want Brexit  
Despite Brexit  
The last thing we need is Brexit. So much is wrong with the UK and it's OUR responsibility to sort ourselves out. Blaming EU doesn't help! 
Five days away from negotiations on Brexit. All we know is that Gove and Baker have been added to Tory team. No reaching out to anyone.  
Being told by accounts called things like "Brexit Tory" not to politicise Grenfell. Housing *is* political. 
Don't buy into DiddyDee-Dee's *82% voted for pro-Brexit parties* nonsense. It's totally spurious. 51% think #Brexit bad for UK (Survation).  
I was one of the 48%Now one of the 20%The only number that matters is 100%I am, & always will be 100% against any form of Brexit Clear? 
Nick Timothy: Brexit Still Has to Mean Brexit  
I voted Labour for an MP who voted against A50. I will never accept #brexit  - it is childish & totally unnecessary. 
Ruth Davidson has told the PM that the government must not trade away any fishing rights in the Brexit negotiations  
Theresa May gambled & lost, while Europe is united. This shows again: it’s better to reform the EU than to leave or destroy it. #Brexit  
BREXIT #ENGvPAK 
Where is Teresa May? When it's about terrorism or brexit, she's all up on our screens 
You will be pleased to know that our new Brexit minister, like his boss, has absolutely no idea what he's doing or talking about. #5days 
Every time I weaken & think we should have soft Brexit, along comes someone like Juncker, Tusk or Verhofstadt & reaffirms leave decision.  
Germany, now France, extending a friendly hand to Britain. Take it, Britain. Take it before the #Brexit brakes can't be slammed. 
The only Conservative to have won a majority since I was three years old says May should go for a consensus Brexit  
Anti-Brexit stitch up has started despite 87% of voters voting for the 2 parties which promised to enact & respect the people's decision. 
NEWS! Definition of phrase ‘a bit f**king rich’ to be altered after David Cameron offers Brexit advice  
PM needs Brexit Cabinet ,Chancellor Foreign Sec  Business DEFRA etc to meet 7 am every day to review progress or other and to give direction 
Stop the lie that 85% of voters supported parties pledging to honour the referendum result. They didn't.  #GE2017 #NotinMyName 
Tory blame game:-Perhaps it was austerity-Perhaps it was hard Brexit-Just don't mention the word 'May' 
Like May & yourself over Brexit? Nicola has shown that she clearly governs for ALL of us in Scotland. Mitigating harsh Tory cuts for the /1 
Brexit should still mean Brexit  
Daniel seems determined not only to worsen UKs economic health but also to throw the Irish Good Friday Agreement on the fire for #brexit. 
My local cafe has now taken Brexit off its menu entirely, and replaced it with raw tripe. 
Leo can show real leadership from the start by announcing a date for referendum to repeal 8th amendment  
Nicola Sturgeon actually believes that all nations in UK should be represented in the Brexit negotiations - they impact on devolved matters. 
The DUP will demand real Brexit  
Tories planned to further deregulate building regulations as first priority in Brexit legislation  
Theresa May is delaying DUP talks till NEXT week. How is she supposed to negotiate Brexit for us when she can't even negotiate with the DUP? 
Just 28% of General Election voters 'resistant' to Brexit. Majority of Tory & Labour voters enthusiastic/accepting.  
'@LordAshcroft Poll: 71% of General Election voters back Brexit.  
This Brexit thing is unravelling fast. I think a strong & stable leader will say 'no more, let's stop this'.   
Lab & Con proclaimed they were pro-Brexit during #GE2017 Surely he's not inferring we abandon Brexit because Libs gained a couple of seats.  
Ready for #blockchain + 9 others #FinServ opportunities in 2017? {#ai #fintech #cybersecurity #brexit #rpa}  
This Brexit thing is all going just tickety-boo.  
“Bridges is said to have quit on policy grounds, convinced Brexit couldn’t work ... There is some disarray.” 
YES to an independent #Kurdistan: I declare my support for the referendum on September 25th on independence of Kurdistan region#DrWidad 
Brexit's a clever way of re-branding austerity. Every sacrifice we'll be called upon to make will be to resource this indefinable aspiration 
Is anyone else thinking the 9 month delay to using article 50 & the election were plots to try & stop Brexit altogether? 
What extra options should be put on the #brexit agenda? #yourvoice #followback 
#Brexit: Its amazing that the an EU negotiator is the only one now fighting for the 48% of Remain voters in the UK. So much for democracy.  
Britain could stay in EU, but only on poorer terms, says EU chief #Brexit negotiator Guy Verhofstadt  
Who is 'overturning democracy'? Democracy only gave Brexidiots an advisory referendum. Parliament should recognise it was only won by lying. 
Well then your one of the people responsible for the Brexit Chaos that's coming. Well done!  
The Scottish people don't want Brexit no matter what the unelected Farage says. 62% Remain vote.#ScotRef 
David Cameron urges Theresa May to consult Labour on Brexit strategy 
The Tories lost London, not because of Brexit, but because they ruined it for anyone who isn't rich. 
2) So using lack of single party majority to excuse breaking Brexit pledges is  a pol class stitch-up treating electorate with contempt. 
Ministers quit @DExEUgov #brexit department days before negotiations start, one reportedly saying 'brexit cant work'  
UK PM May faces calls to soften #Brexit as political limbo drags on. More updates in our live blog  
What I KNOW matey is that that 88% of people voted for pro Brexit parties -that's Labour and Tory.It's a matter of record. Know your facts!  
Guy we are shocked and depressed at TM's stance. We don't want Brexit. #NotBargainingChips 
Hey @UKLabour just so you know, please don't mistake my vote for you as a vote for Brexit eh  
Labour would back freedom of movement to retain single market access after Brexit  
May to continue with her hard Brexit plan!  
Isn't climate change denial, creationism, and the insistence that Brexit is beneficial, all really the same illness? 
This is the former Europe Minister who said in EU Ref Bill debate: 'no need for supermajority, referendum ONLY ADVISORY.' Hansard 16/6/15.  
From 'every second counts' to 'Brexit? meh!' - fully exposed as too scared to debate, we can't let May fail us on #Brexit #TheresaOut #GE17 
Agreed, be tough on Brexit, tough on the causes of Brexit.  
No #Brexit rather.  
The Hindu, India: "All you  to know about #Catalonia's #independence #referendum."  
Non to Brexit? Emmanuel Macron has left the door open to the UK staying in the EU  
#UKIP again in trouble re misuse of public funds. Was UKIP's referendum spending also illegal?  
Brexit benefits? No NHS! #StopBrexit Speak it - Share it - Demand it. .@BrexitBin .@DefeatBrexit17 .@EUflagmafia .@DefeatBrexit17 
May finally unites Brexit Britain - Eye 1446  is out now!  
I genuinely believe @AMDWaters will restore UKIP as a force to be reckoned with. We imploded after the Brexit vote... time to fight back!! 
With the Conservatives losing their majority, their position on #brexit needs to change  
Message to Students Please stay registered #GE2017 #AutumnElection #brexit #remain #StudentVote #WhyVote #tactical2017@TheProgAlliance 
Protecting Good Friday Agreement a priority, says European Parliament’s chief negotiator on Brexit  
Nicola Sturgeon has asked Theresa May for seat at Brexit talks in Brussels next week 
Tories - people who know the price of everything and the value of nothing. 
Sturgeon goes on about brexit being bad. How BAD would indy be? She wont even accept the welfare powers given, cos she's incapable of using. 
Tomorrow roaming charges are abolished in the EU - putting an end to huge bills. In 2019 we leave the EU and they'll be back  #Brexit 
Scottish Greens reassert independence referendum support in wake of General Election  
No body voted for hard, soft, poached, coddled or fried BREXIT.WE VOTED TO LEAVE GET ON WITH ITWE VOTED BREXIT ONE YEAR AGOJEEZ  
Nigel Farage to The European Parliament:Don't get confused about #Brexit direction"The only certainty in this mess is WE WILL BE LEAVING!"  
What if....Remain had won the referendum? Would that have only delayed Brexit?By me, at @FT 
FM @NicolaSturgeon has written to the Prime Minister ahead of Brexit negotiations beginning:  
Wow, it's almost as if what was predicted was correct. This was clear to anyone who read @IanDunt s excellent Brexit book.  
"During Brexit negotiations, the door will always remain open for the United Kingdom." 
Perhaps the most ridiculous self obsessed self destruction mission in history. No to #brexit time to #remain with our EU friends! 
EU growing ‘impatient’ with Britain, says #Brexit negotiator Verhofstadt  
Repeat after me: Brexit is far from a done deal. @JolyonMaugham writes:  
Guy @GuyVerhofstadt there is no British side. We are a divided nation, the majority don't want Brexit. We are being held hostage by May.  
Nicola Sturgeon brands speculation about impact of #GE2017 on her plans for independence referendum as "nonsense"  
Read @NicolaSturgeon's letter to Theresa May on the #Brexit negotiations, which start in just five days.  
Wonder which bits of red tape that quietly keep you and yours safe and breathing will be first under the Tory Brexit knife? 
Nicola Sturgeon writes to Theresa May demanding immediate guarantee for EU nationals & place on Brexit negotiating team for devolved admins  
The Brexit effect: UK wages are falling at the fastest pace since 2014, adjusted for inflation  
1. First Minister hours after Brexit: 2nd indyref 'highly likely'2. FM days after General Election seat losses: I need time to reflect 
A ‘no deal’ Brexit is the perfect cover for the Tories to bring about their small state agenda | @mattzarb 
Why would you let a clype like @NicolaSturgeon onto any #brexit negotiations, be running off to the EU telling them everything. 
Sandeels and seabirds: Protecting our seas in post-Brexit waters #ornithology  
Tories vs Labour on Brexit  
Sorry, but "Brexit means Brexit" apparently.Therefore all Brexits are Brexit. Logic. You're welcome.  
Nicola Sturgeon has written to Theresa May saying a "new proposal is urgently needed" on Brexit  
Nicola Sturgeon letter to PM on Brexit talks  
The purpose of both the EU and remain is to break the referendum vote by wearing the people down. This is why we suffer interminable delays. 
Denial?The SNP won the election in ScotlandAnd Brexit makes yes polling move into the 60 percentile  
There seems to be a concerted effort from EU leaders to make clear Britain can change its mind on Brexit. Interesting. 
WATCH: The political elites are rising up once more. We, the patriots, democrats & Brexiteers must regroup. We must fight for a true Brexit.  
This is so important. Brexit is a Tory psychological spasm inflicted on the whole country. The Tories must own Brexit. Labour disown it.  
The great tragedy of Brexit: all the things we won't do b'cos we're too busy spending next 10 years trying to keep our head above the water.  
.If UK gov include you in Brexit talks they will have proved to be  undermine UKgov putting EU commission on pedestal 
Asking folks to "get behind" #Brexit is like asking folks to get behind a raving lunatic off his head on tabloids...  
Me for @prospect_uk on what the General Election means for Brexit.  
Weedling out of more austerity shows it is political ideology,NOT necessary. It's been an economic disaster,compounded by #Brexit #ToriesOut 
No flavour of Brexit 'acceptable' to me. When voters discover full horror of Brexit and demand Ref, I'll work socks off for #Remain option 
May could have committed UK to a "clean" non-SM/Customs Union Brexit, or to A50 in March.But not both.  Former could not be done at speed. 
Thank you, Guy.  UK Govt / Brexit is shambolic.  It's been built on lies & dark money. 
Delay to deal with DUP means likely postponement of Queens speech; and possibly Brexit talks 
Theresa May Has No Mandate To Pursue An Extreme Brexit As If Nothing Has Happened  # via @HuffPostUKPol 
Theresa May has signalled she will not compromise over Brexit despite growing demands for a change in approach  
May has lost her majority - she can't carry on with a drive towards a Tory hard #Brexit  
I see Cameron has come out of the woodwork now offering Brexit advice. Can he not see the whole mess is his fault in the first place? 
EU referendum,Trump: now you know: Pay to sway: report reveals how easy it is to manipulate elections with fake news  
Press Release: People want Brexit no matter what the political class say @UKIP MEP @Nigel_Farage  #Brexit #UKIP 
#Brexit: Macron says 'door remains open' to UK remaining in EU until talks end  
Lots of analysis being done on link between referendum and election. Here's one interesting piece of work  
Retweeted David Jones (@DavidJo52951945):Brits should be backing the DUP, they are a pro UK, pro Monarchy, pro Brexit patriotic party 
#CallKaye 'Scotgov to discuss #GE2017 and economy but unionist parties want to discuss 2nd referendum, so we're discussing that'. Hmm... 
What's brilliant but overlooked about this is that still 49% of voters are enthusiastic about Brexit.  
Great piece. Debunks myth that "soft" Brexit is a good fall-back. It isn't: we should still be striving to Remain.  
Working together across tribal lines is going to be crucial to pushing for a progressive agenda and fighting against a 'hard' Brexit  
NEETs cost the UK economy £77bn a year. Breaks my heart Soft/Hard Brexit will be a distraction for the next few years #everychildincluded 
Why would tax-dodging #Brexit press billionaires hate an EU that aims to clamp down on tax avoidance #Remain 
sturgeon says she wants scots government to have a role in brexit talks. after her stuff about a "private" chat w/dugdale, who'd trust her? 
This would have been a great Remain campaign slogan last year. Weirdly though, it's now becoming a useful phrase. #leadnotleave #brexit  
Theresa May said she was too busy for debates as she was focused on Brexit. But here's what she was up to last night  
What if Remain had won?New post coming up, based on the question below.  Was Brexit likely to happen anyway, in medium to longer term?  
Cameron, Clarke, Major, Hammond all want change on Brexit policy.Is May too dogmatic to accept this? 
BREAKING: Britain's wages grow at slowest pace in 2 years as unemployment remains at 4.6%  
The people have spoken , they don't want to give Theresa May a mandate for Hard Brexit 
"The problem with Mayism is that you eventually run out of your own time to negotiate Brexit"My take on the aftermath of a Brexit election  
David Cameron tells Theresa May her Brexit is doomed  
I've been distraught about this for a full year now. Brexit feels like a violation of everything I believe in. 
Why we must now consider the possibility that Brexit might never happenMe in @timesredbox 
On EURef2: We should be able to choose between accepting the Brexit deal or rescinding the Article 50 notification.  
Apparently @NicolaStugeon reassures donors that she's keeping the cash for a referendum that might never come.  
#Brexit has made the UK a laughing stock around the world. Time to admit it, and fix it.  
UK faces a potential vet shortage post-Brexit according to Veterinary Regulator |  #Brexit @RCVSpresident @RCVS_UK 
If I phone #BBC & say a soft (i.e., no) Brexit is now inevitable, will they broadcast it & put me on TV?They seem to for anyone else. 
Verhofstadt: UK welcome to change its mind on Brexit but rebate etc wd go. "Like Alice in Wonderland, not all the doors are the same." 
Exactly so...#Brexit issue now centre stage again and clock ticking in Brussels.  
Brexit red line on fishing rights, this is what we want 
This time last year I thought we had climbed the Brexit mountain. I now feel we are half way back down...  
#Nurse applicants in UK from other EU countries fall 96% since #Brexit vote, aggravating shortage of nurses in #NHS 
According to @BBCScotland UK: Brexit political shambles slowing economy Scotland: SNP to blameSo very biassed #FakeNews not journalism 
Hard or Soft Brexit? Can soft Brexiteers explain how you get to stay in the Single Market & control your borders? ..... 
The Chancellor is preparing to lead a battle within Govt to soften Brexit by keeping UK inside the customs union  
BREXIT bullshit from Labour, whose core historic mission is to impede trade & free exchange. EU is a giant impediment to free world trade. 
Finally an accurate description of the difference between Hard and Soft Brexit.  
French President Emmanuel Macron said the "door still open" for the UK if it changes its mind on Brexit  
Delighted my friend & Cons for Britain Co-Chairman @SteveBakerHW appointed Brexit Minister. He's a hero of Referendum & this is v reassuring 
Theresa May won't compromise over clean Brexit | Davidson makes fishing a red-line  
May needs to listen to other parties on Brexit, says Cameron  
This by @IanDunt is an incredibly clear and helpful explanation of the varieties of "soft Brexit".  
It would be nice to think the Scottish Tories had something other than a referendum to discuss. Like policies.  
#Libdems blocked this Referendum for 5 year. Tories in power 1 year, result chaos! Join us  
The only people saying a Tory/DUP deal will 'risk peace' are the same Remain people who said Brexit would 'risk peace'.It won't.  
Tory & Labour led us to Brexit with policies that never worked for everyone. Now they say they will deliver a Brexit that works for everyone 
Apparently there are two very different types of Brexit:Hard Brexit = Actual BrexitSoft Brexit = Not Really Brexit 
Stuart is right. Suspend Brexit now!  
They lost seats because britnat LDs & some Lab voters switched to Tory as they actually preferred Tory hard brexit to SNP; they STILL lost! 
Underneath my column a reader brilliantly compares the Brexit position in Parliament to the end of The Italian Job.  
David Cameron suggests 'softer' Brexit as May weighs options - politics live  
A soft Brexit means no Brexit. Where is democracy of 17.4M voters, ignore at your peril! via @MailOnline 
The outlook for Brexit is far better than 24 hours ago says @isaby 
Labour wants a Brexit that protects jobs. That's fine in principle. For my next hols, I want somewhere that offers sun, sea, sand & skiing. 
Labour rules out working with Theresa May on Brexit until she dumps 'no deal' rhetoric  
Philip Hammond 'wants UK to stay in customs union after Brexit'  
We had a referendum on it. Haven't you heard ?  
3/3 in meantime, @scotgov will focus on trying to influence Brexit talks - a Tory led hard Brexit is simply not acceptable post #GE2017 
I greatly respect David Cameron - but just gently: if he wishes to play a part in Brexit negotiations he could have stayed in Parliament 
The appointment of @SteveBakerHW as a @DExEUgov minister provides huge reassurance that Brexit remains on course  
My cartoon - hard, medium or soft… however you spin it… #Brexit in a nutshell #r4Today 
Ed Balls predicts another election next year to resolve Brexit deadlock  
The young generation in the UK should push for a second referendum and ally with affected businesses. Not too late. But time is running out. 
#r4Today no Gisela Stuart, many like me voted Labour not in support of Brexit but to get Leave cheerleading hard Brexit Tory out 
The "door is always open" if Brexit is reversed, Emmanuel Macron tells Theresa May  
Gisela Stuart is totally wrong about 80% supporting Brexit. Remainers voted TACTICALLY, to stop the Tories, not to support Brexit . #R4today 
Brexit talks start in 5 days, led by a UK gov with no idea what it is doing. Immediate @scotgov focus is on that. 
Rupert Murdoch one of the ordinary folk valiantly fighting for #Brexit against the elite of teachers, doctors, IT pros, etc.#Remain 
David Cameron calls on Theresa May to embrace ‘softer’ Brexit  via @FT 
We had a referendum last year, we voted BREXIT.Nothing has changed, BREXIT was never about conservatives or labour.BETRAYAL IS NIGH  
Uncritical interview of Brexiter Gisela Stuart, followed by uninterrupted monologue from Lord Sassoon- BBC Brexit propaganda back #r4today 
Mrs May hasn't a clue how to handle Brexit. She has a country behind her that's at best ambivalent. Second referendum now seems sensible. 
Afraid my ex Labour colleague @GiselaStuart in denial re impact of #GE2017 result on @BBCr4today. Her damaging hard Tory #Brexit is dead. 
The Brexit that the Mail so enthusiastically supported was always going to create a doctor shortage. How did they think it could be solved?  
Got Gisela Stuart on #r4today telling Corbyn and McDonnell what they must do on Brexit. Given her record, she'd be the last person to heed? 
#brexit referendum => devaluation of £ => inflation => lower real wages & living standards   
Anti Europeans never gave up after the 1975 referendum, I want the same rights to maintain my principles &pursue my goal to remain in the EU  
A Deal to Save Brexit: Nigel Farage Should Take UKIP Into DUP Merger  
Everyone in EU wants UK back. Without calling brexit completely dead, could brexiters admit there is no plan & we have 5 yrs of rethinking? 
Column: friends don't let friends Brexit without a mandate.  
Other useful Brexit epithets include:  'Abandon' 'Jettison' 'Forget About' 'Drop' 'Ditch' 'Relinquish' and 'Bury'.  
If David Cameron had listened a bit more, we wouldn't be in this ridiculous Brexit mess. Cheeky git.  
Anyone wanting second referendum on EU membership had the option of voting for LibDems who pledged one; they achieved just 7.4% of the vote.  
David Cameron says the UK election ups pressure for softer Brexit  
Not at all. Labour Party do not support a hard Brexit. Conference which makes party policy voted in favour of remaining in single market.  
I'd love a figure for how much Brexit's cost so far. We could stick it on the side of a bus: 'This is the sum that could have gone to #NHS'. 
Rubbish and major part of the problem. Brexit advocates do not know what they are talking about.  
Bad timing: Calling the election, Focussing on #Brexit, Police cuts, NHS cuts, Manifesto objectives & now #MexicanWave #TheresaOut 
Theresa May is unfit to drive Brexit through. Take away her keys | Rafael Behr  
Sorry to ask an awkward question @theresa_may, but how much of our money have you spent on Brexit so far? 
Road to Brexit is paved with amusement (Danish) and brave faces (British)  
There's a Norway option in the Brexit talks. So what does that mean? Here's a simple guide  
The great scandal of the May Govt is something we all seem too polite to push her on - the total cost of Brexit so far. 
Will Puerto Rico's latest referendum move it closer to statehood? Not likely, @fivefifths reports  
the election could mean a less damaging Brexit and more funds for NHS and social care  @TheKingsFund @bmj_latest 
Buried Tory internal hatreds. break out in open Brexit warfare as party reels from humiliation of worst reckless self-harm by PM ever. 
This is the *only way* for the Tories to remain in Government: outflank Hard Brexit Labour on the Remain side.  
If, as we were told, the Referendum was a mandate for a Hard Brexit from whence comes the mandate for a soft one? We, voters, must be asked. 
Now's the time for mass protests. Our friends in Europe are watching. Brexit will destroy our country. Let's act.  
EU may force London's "clearing" business to relocate after Brexit  
Minister Harris says Referendum on the 8th should be held next year.  Let's finally set the date.  
Guess what? The media isn't even covering this story properly. Brexit was more important. Kmt. This country is regressing. 
Germany sees U.K. nationals dash for citizenship as Brexit looms  
JP Morgan: we cannot stay in the customs union.#Brexit  
UKIP Nigel Farage return to politics to save Brexit:  via @YouTube 
PM 'must listen' to other parties over Brexit says Cameron  
Macron and Schauble suggest UK could still back out of Brexit. Labour must explore that chance rather than echoing Tory myth of soft Brexit 
Britain should hit pause on the Brexit negotiations and rethink  
EU27 contrary to hardline Brexiteers narrative isnt antiUK & sees Brexit as sad & destructive act. They're bemused & surprised at EU hatred  
2. "Advani ji is far above others if election is done through a referendum or direct voting by the people, of the people & for the people." 
Amazing really. The whole country hostage to a bunch of stupid old fucks. That's really what Brexit and everything subsequent comes down to.  
The budget referendum passed!  The residents of Colchester spoke loud and clear what they want for our kids and our town!! #ProudBAPrincipal 
We need  a national, cross-party movement that opposes Labour and the Tories on Brexit. It's the only thing that will stop the madness. 
Brexit then around the corner, the election.  
UK could stay in EU despite #Brexit vote, @EmmanuelMacron says 
Oh honey you wanna talk about Brexit oh honey that's me leaving a tricks house before he invites me to breakfast ohhh honeyyyyyy 
Brits Becoming Germans - Because of #Brexit. Going native. On #TheDay  @dwnews #citizensrights @hannahcleaver2 
Kurdish independence in Iraq will take more than a referendum  @CengizCandar 
I am torn between wanting #Brexit to completely fail leaving the UK an economic basket case and hoping it is all a dream and won't happen 
Labour Brexit policy is a Schrödinger's cat policy. If you examine it, it is simultaneously both alive and dead. 
Whether some like it or not, we voted for #Brexit and I along with 17,410,741 others expect it to be carried out.  
So the Corbynite/Momentum response to the hard Brexit criticism is simply to ... change the meaning of "hard Brexit" 
A powerful French president and a toothless May equal hard Brexit . We are sleepwalking towards lost jobs, low wages, isolation and poverty 
No one is warning Britons what Brexit (and it will be hard) really entails. If Labour wants to govern, it must do just that - and very soon 
. The Voice of Reason from Scotland "SNP MEP Alyn Smith has called for a second UK wide referendum on the EU". 
#Labour #BrexitPlease - just read and RTCorbyn and Brexit and "just wait and see"Gobsmacked 
#Brexit is only happening because the referendum garnered anti-govt & anti-establishment votes. The true will of the people is to remain. 
Ministers warn Theresa May that trying to pass hard Brexit laws through Commons now will be “our Passchendaele”;  
"Now witness the firepower of this fully armed and operational Brexit strategy"  
UK's May faces calls to soften Brexit as political limbo drags on  
Nice out isn't it? Look, some health woo woo.Brexit? What's Brexit? Never heard of it, mate.Is there some cricket on? Anything. PLEASE!  
#Brexit and the #Tories... are on #TheWrongSideOfHistorypic-@williamjordann 
BREXIT like last year's fad diet found not to work & clog your arteries. MPs are like the publishers still trying to push books on it. 
We have a hung Parliament, a Brexit in turmoil, and #TheresaMay is in France doing Mexican waves at a football match?#CrisisTeam 
.The Tory War on May's Brexit begins.....The Tory Remainers were waiting for her in the long grass all along. 
1 May acknowledges country's lack of faith in her. 2 Reps from main parties negotiate Brexit.3 NHS Funding removed from party politics?  
What ya gonna do? Roll the tanks into Poland? #Brexit is freedom, never forget that.  
I have to admit that I find this race a lot less interesting than others. i don't think this is a Bernie v. estab referendum, or something 
'of those voting Labour last week, 43% would like to prevent Brexit happening at all....Corbyn needs to think about that'  
'There is no soft Brexit deal which will be better than what we have already inside the EU.'  
Ultimately Soft Brexit is a bit shit. It’s like being in the EU without the political influence. And Hard Brexit is bonkers. So… 
Theresa May didn't have time for a single debate because she was "planning Brexit" but she's now got time for Mexican Waves at the footy. 
Brexit wave: a bit like a Mexican wave, but oh god we're all alone somebody hold me  
if UK backs away from Brexit, not looking forward to putting up with a whole round of dopey new terms like Breturn & Breunion & Breconsider 
DUP under investigation for very big dirty money laundering for #Brexit: see . Brexit gets worse by the minute. 
If only @timfarron had courage to tell the truth @LibDems would be a force in Parliament The BREXIT that works for the 100% is called REMAIN  
Lots of ppl interested Pesto, just none of 650 in HoC with guts enough to stick necks out & save country from this nonsense of Brexit  
Puerto Rico's governor vows to make the US territory the 51st state after statehood won in a non-binding referendum  
"Idle folly [of Cameron & .May] has trapped UK between EU rock & ultra-hard Brexit" says Martin Wolf..  
My advice to @UKLabour oppose Brexit stop austerity and do everything you can to raise spending on young and the poor the disabled & cut vat 
UK well placed to begin Brexit negotiations with clear & consistent negotiating position.  
Theresa May has lost her mandate for Brexit - MPs should make that clear, writes @stephen_dorrell  
The EU referendum was advisory. Clearly Brits can't cope with advice. 
Cameron, probably being paid 100s of  a minute, tells a conference that GE result means a 'softer' Brexit. Did he read Tory manifesto? 
Lib Dems ready for Brexit compromise. Thanks for that Tim. First lets see what the Monster Raving Looney Party think  
'It is open to Vote Leave to create separate legal entities...to spend as much as necessary to win the referendum' Nice one, Steve!  
THE GUARDIAN FRONT PAGE: 'May told: UK can still back out of Brexit' #skypapers 
Hear why @hilarybennmp thinks we should stay in the customs union #brexit #newsnight 
Wonk Hilary Benn gets it all wrong - its not about wonk data, its about having a Brexit that works for the many, not the few #newsnight 
@DavidLammy would be brilliant in senior shadow cabinet role. He understands the arguments against Brexit from so many diverse communities.  
DUP will not accept anything less than a hard Brexit. Good for them, worthy partners against a left wing conspiracy.  
Oh look who's new minister for Brexit? Steve Baker - the man accused of illegal Brexit funding plot  via @MailOnline 
Theresa May said she couldn't debate Corbyn as she was busy preparing for Brexit negotiations. What is she doing at France v England?! #FB 
Wednesday's Independent:"Labour piles pressure on May to drop hard Brexit" #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @BBCHelenaLee) 
If you pursue Hard #Brexit @jeremycorbyn you'll be doing exactly what Farage, Banks, IDS, Rees-Mogg, Murdoch, Dacre & Desmond want.#Remain 
Brexit is a chaotic project based on unsound notions & prejudice deserving limited respect, it should be subject to criticism and abolition.  
:@geor97 No we were not allowed: May in her pomp decreed we the taxpayers were not permitted to ask the cost of the bonkers Brexit project. 
John Oliver very strong on Brexit. What we are doing is insanity! Still laughed for 5 minutes at "pointlessly written on cheese" 
The Tories want to drop austerity so they can engage in a debt-fuelled spending spree to bribe voters to support them & hard #Brexit.  
Tomorrow's paper:  Hammond pushes Tories to ditch Brexit trade plan #TomorrowsPapersToday 
Non to Brexit? Emmanuel Macron has left the door open to the UK staying in the EU  
Don't blame it on the sunshineDon't blame it on the moonlightDon't blame it on the good timesBlame it on the Brexit.  
Back from 4 days in Italy where Brexit seems even sillier, self-obsessed and pointless. Our reputation is zero. Another big gain for leavers 
The Guardian front page, Wednesday 14.06.17 – May told: UK can still back out of Brexit  
Walking into Brexit negotiations like...  
On the first night, Monseiur Macron, you'll be visited by the ghost of Brexit past...  
Defiant May signals she will not compromise over hard #Brexit #premium 
May says "no change" to her Brexit strategy. She asked for a strengthened hand & ended with up no mandate. Her Brexit position has to change 
But for those less easily distracted... explicit from President Macron that UK still welcome to stay in EU. Brexit not inevitable.  
The Danes. The Germans. They all know Brexit is a disaster waiting to happen & this is what friends do. They help you get out of the mess.  
May's obsession with ECJ over Brexit 'daft', says former senior judge, adding she confused ECJ with ECtHR.  
Tim Farron calls on Theresa May to form cross-party Brexit negotiation team  
Theresa May makes her negotiating stance on Brexit clear...  
David Cameron tells the FT: 'There will be pressure for a softer Brexit' and now 'parliament deserves a say'  
Losing to 10 men How is Theresa May supposed to walk into Brexit Negotiations after this shit smh 
This whole thread demonstrates the chaos of the British approach to Brexit. Turns out David Davis' 100 pages don't really cut it.  
Ruth Davidson Froths at the Mouth about Scottish independence? Yet its the Brexit mess that caused this mess! Not Independence!! 
Labour rules out working with Theresa May on Brexit until she dumps 'no deal' rhetoric Quite right 
FT Exclusive: Former UK prime minister David Cameron says Theresa May should embrace a 'softer Brexit'  
Tomorrow's Daily Telegraph front page today: 'May: I'm sticking to my #Brexit blueprint'  
Thanks @GuyVerhofstadt let's leave the #Tories to their petty arguments that caused this mess for all of us. We don't want them or Brexit  
The accelerating loss of appetite for Brexit is being dressed up as merely a preference for a soft Brexit, but that isn't what it really is. 
So even with her precious Brexit she still wouldn't get the outcome she wanted. Oh how delicious 
Macron meets May and says UK can 'always' change its mind on Brexit  
#UPDATE Macron says 'door always open' for UK to stay in EU even after May says Brexit talks will begin  
Brass neck much? Cameron trying to tell May to soft pedal on Brexit  
Again again again. They get caught out but why should they care. However, lies always come back to hurt us. And Brexit will hurt.  
THE INDEPENDENT: Labour piles pressure on May to drop hard Brexit #tomorrowspaperstoday 
David Cameron calls on Theresa May to embrace ‘softer’ Brexit  
Here's a poem entitled "57 Varieties of Brexit", which documents my fatigue with the word as well as the concept.  
Harriet Harman: It's in the national interest for Corbyn to stop a Tory Brexit  
What is "clearing" and why is $574 billion of trade at risk in London? Here's a quick guide  
Steve Baker Appointed Brexit Minister  
It's becoming clearer and clearer. The Brexit backslide is on.  
It's all bullshit this "hard or soft Brexit" we voted to LEAVE THE EU "LEAVE MEANS LEAVE"!! 
The Nats are not happy with the SNP's alleged misuse of their referendum funding.  
Heart goes out to @MrBrendanCox, cruelly robbed of his selfless, passionate wife #JoCox: Overflowing with goodness. Killed by Brexit hatred 
The UK's prime minister has been told to abandon her Brexit election claim that 'no deal is better than a bad deal'  
Westminster politicians are positioning for a 'Soft Brexit'. That would mean the continuation of open borders.  
Absolutely convinced #SNP must stand its ground on #ScoRef, let Brexit/DUP chaos unfold and be in a state of readiness. 
Oh god we're going to get absolutely mullered at Brexit aren't we  
i: Brexit clock is ticking, EU warns #tomorrowspaperstoday 
British news media should keep one of those permanent clocks in the bottom left corner counting down the minutes until Brexit 
EU would "open doors" if Britain decided to reverse Brexit decision, Wolfgang Schaeuble says  
DUP will not accept anything LESS than hard Brexit, says former Arlene Foster aide   
Woman wants to defeat the British govt!Woman also wants to negotiate Brexit as part of British Govt's team!Is it just me?  
In any future GE the SNP have to stop the BBC making all elections in Scotland parochial affairs & hammer Lab and Tory on their hard brexit. 
Yeah. What did you vote in #Brexit? Also, what did the average Brittish vote in the Scottish referendum? You guys are so funny and blind. 
Macron says the 'door is open' if Britain wants to change its mind about Brexit  
Thanks Brexit. Bottom of the table in growth. That's hard work from workers and business owners down the drain for a Tory vanity project.  
Brexit: EU 'open' to change of heart, say France and Germany  
The big difference between the SNP and Corbyn's Labour is that the SNP want to stay in the EU and Labour's manifesto is for a hard brexit. 
Brexit: Macron says 'door remains open' to UK remaining in EU until talks end  
SNP: All the money raised on #ScotRef website is ringfenced to fight a future independence referendum  
Should Gisela Stuart be made a Baroness and invited to the cross party Brexit Discussions? Retweet for cross party reach. 
This (micro thread) is the beat of the drum we've been banging. Read & share to fellow Remainers/Progressives. We have to pull together now. 
Mexit at Brexit  
Lol! Because it's irrelevant. As it has been in almost every referendum in the history, with only a few exceptions. 
It's been suggested that Gisela Stuart be made a Baroness and invited to be at the forefront of the cross party Brexit negotiations. I agree  
Today KDP &PUK agreed on a framework to revive regional parliament before Kurdish referendum vote on 25 Sep 2017. Referendum is Kurdish need 
So, my colleague wrote this about possible Brexit options and their associated ironies. This is one reason we have great universities btw...  
Gordon Brown loses majority: resigns. David Cameron loses referendum: resigns. Theresa May loses majority:clings on   
There's a Norway option in the Brexit talks. So what does that mean? Here's a simple guide  
It would be marvellous if our government could treat a Non Binding Advisory Referendum as Non Binding and Advisory.  Like it says on the tin  
Tim Farron calls for greater unity between the various political parties as the country heads into the Brexit...  
Brexit 'started as internal Tory party dispute' says the European Parliament's #Brexit co-ordinator @GuyVerhofstadt  
Once again the EU has a consistent line. UK has not left until it has left and Brexit is reversible if we want it.  
Scottish Greens reassert independence referendum support in wake of General Election  
Plenty of Brexit choices now available. Suicide BrexitNot really BrexitPerhaps BrexitMini BrexitCheese BrexitBrexitishor#remain 
The 'door remains open' to cancel Brexit, the French President has declared 
Britain would be welcomed back if Brexit were reversed, Germany's Wolfgang Schaeuble says  
Dear Team Jeremy, please tell @jeremycorbyn we don't want #Brexit. Best deal for jobs, economy & society is to #Remain. @JeremyCorbyn4PM 
Hi Mr Macron. We've all decided we don't want Brexit. Thanks.   
'The door remains open, always open, until Brexit negotiations end.' Macron. It's awkward; this being on the wrong side of history.  
Amazing Lab-Tory generational divide has opened up since 2015. Driven by Corbyn, Brexit or tabloids? Must be all 3 to be this dramatic.  
There's now even more pressure on British consumers as inflation rises to a 4-year high  
The EU is telling us: stay, you'll be so welcome. What a blessed relief it would be to shed the #Brexit nightmare & return to normal! 
Germany, now France, extending a friendly hand to Britain. Take it, Britain. Take it before the Brexit brakes can't be slammed.  
Nice one!Scottish Greens reassert independence referendum support in wake of General Election   via @TheCommonSpace 
Apparently May was too busy thinking about Brexit to debate Corbyn but now we have no government she's in France watching the footy. 
Ministers leave UK Brexit department in sign of tension with May  
Here is a thread, but the short version: EU halting brexit talks because there is currently no UK government they recognize  
French President Emmanuel Macron said the "door still open" for the UK if it changes its mind on Brexit  
Choices are a hard Brexit or remaining in the EU  via @FT 
Let's not cut off our noses to spite our face. The offer is there to reverse the unfolding disaster that is Brexit.  
Half the UK wanted to remain, and those who didn't vote remain must still be unclear what "Brexit means"; it's not strong & stable for sure!  
At least the UK has a spare £100bn to spend on a Brexit bill ensuring no more EU nurses and fruit pickers ever make it to these shores.  
Top 10 challenges/opportunities for #FinancialServices in 2017. {#ai #blockchain #brexit #cybersecurity #regtech #fintech #insurtech} 
France and Germany agree #GE2017 = weak mandate as Macron tells May: “door remains always open until #Brexit negotiations reach an end."  
So here's a thread with my assessment of where #Brexit stands after the election, triggered by the debate about soft and hard 1/ 
Breaking.We in KDP suggested new ideas to reactivate Parliament even with Goran Presidency, unity 4 referendum and an independent Kurdistan. 
BREAKING: PM @theresa_may confirms Brexit talks will begin next week after meeting Macron  
#brexit 1 year onIf voting now, how would you vote ?Please vote and retweet 
Brexit, product of unstable ideas, opinion & whim deserves no reverence & in its phoney absoluteness, is subject to condemnation & abolition  
.@theresa_may says she told President Macron the timetable for #Brexit negotiations remain on course and will begin next week  
#Macron on #brexit: the possibility of reopening the door remains until the #UK actually departs. #UKtoStay 
You ain't wrong Mr Macron #Brexit #EU 
Macron suggests UK could change mind in front of May - French & Germans now interpreting GE2017 as reduced mandate for Mrs May's Brexit 
"The door is always open" - French President Emmanuel Macron on whether Britain could change its mind on Brexit  
The general election, I said.Brexit would then finally settle down, i said.I can then quickly finalise my Brexit book, I said. 
Could the penny finally have dropped?It may take longer but eventually it will be recognised that Brexit is an undeliverable, phoney whim.  
Brexit talks to start next week, Theresa May confirms  
Ministers Reassure MPs Brexit Policy Hasn’t Changed  
.Is May is trying undermine the 'Will of the People' by continuing with Brexit after she LOST her Mandate for it?. 
The Latest: French President Macron says that he wants Brexit negotiations to start as soon as possible.  
French president @EmmanuelMacron echoes German finance minister Schauble in saying 'door is always open' if UK changes its mind on Brexit 
#BREAKING May says Brexit talks 'on course' and will begin next week 
Please try and drill some common sense into @theresa_may.Please sit her down and explain the stupidity of Brexit to her.Thank you   
Are we now allowed to ask the cost of Brexit, how many civil servants David Davis employs, what've they done & what's the point of Liam Fox? 
Can you pay for dinner Emmanuel? I used to, but since #brexit the Euro has gone through the roof!Theresa #May meets Emmanuel #Macron #Paris 
#GavinBarwell a poor excuse for a man with NO electoral MANDATE! kicked out by his #VOTERS! NOW IS TRYING TO WRECK #BREXIT! #BBC #SKY #TORY 
Macron, asked whether he now expects a soft Brexit, says May is best placed to comment on that. (Does she know?) 
May confirms Brexit negotiations will start next week.... 
Thread alert. This tells you more about Brexit progress than anything ministers have told us.  
#BREAKING Macron tells May he hopes Brexit talks start 'as soon as possible' 
Macron says he wants Brexit talks to start "as quickly as possible" - 77 days on from Article 50, negotiations havent begun 
#Brexit summarised in 10 seconds.  
Beware the Gove bearing gifts...He knows Brexit will bring economic pain, so wants to make sure Labour help Tories shoulders public ire.  
No need for Freddie Pargeter to worry about his A Levels. Post-Brexit there’ll be lots of fruit-picking work at Home Farm. #thearchers 
Brussels plan could force euro clearing out of UK after Brexit  
If you pursue hard Brexit too you'll lose gains made, Jeremy.   
The state of this. UK government can't even offer a date to start Brexit talks  
Petition to Jeremy Corbyn: My vote for Labour is NOT a vote for #Brexit#Remain #LibDems #GE2017 
The UK is drowning in Brexit chaos. The EU just threw us a lifebelt. If we don't take it, we have a death wish.  
Please spare a thought for 50, 60, 70+ somethings like me who don't want Brexit of any kind. It isn't all about the young. 
."Scottish Greens remain committed to a referendum on independence". 
Former PM Major says May doesn't have a mandate to pursue the hard Brexit she was planning  
No matter how many times you tell #Brexit junkies that UK is sovereign, can control borders, does trade with world...they won't believe it 
The #TRAITOR & FAILED #PM #JohnMajor speaks for the Failed #EU! NOT FOR #GREATBRITAIN! #Brexit #BBC #SKY #TORY #NEWS #UK #CONSERVATIVE #UKIP 
Or perhaps they need a Department for Exiting Brexit. #BrexitExit 
And another thing...May's obsession with ECJ over Brexit 'daft', says former senior judge  
Britain's inflation rate is the highest since June 2013. The Brexit squeeze is well under way  
Important thread on the (botched) (non) start of Brexit negotiations from @JenniferMerode 
EU talks with Robbins/Barrow cordial, but Brussels think British gov still does not get Brexit 10 
Brussels not convinced British know what they want, seeing no clear mandate for Brexit. 9 
Encouraging Ministers calling for fresh, cross-party approach on Brexit. But should mean real change. Single market should be back on table 
@NicolaSturgeon Everything you've said and done on #Brexit has been correct. Others now following. Stand your ground on #ScotRef, Nicola. 
A Brexit Britain will be a powerful force for freedom and prosperity on the world stage—and robust ally for the U.S.  
If Lord Bridges (a substantial figure) quit @DExEUgov rather than was sacked, most significant Brexit resignation since Sir Ivan Rogers. 
FFS. No more elections please. We haven't even implemented the referendum result from a year ago. 
Which (IMO) is why a cross party approach to Brexit is a bad idea. Best to leave the Maybot holding the baby. 
“Bridges is said to have quit on policy grounds, convinced Brexit couldn’t work,” said one Whitehall figure. “There is some disarray.”  
We need @Nigel_Farage to return to save Brexit and Britain! Pod 1 with @DavidCoburnUKip and @JamesDelingpole#UKIP 
Only Brexit can save our values from decay. 
Departure of "gargantuan brain" Bridges is blow to Dexeu. Clashed with Team May and despondent re Brexit challenges  
Brexit won't happen. It's dead in the water. Sit back and watch the show. Also, spread the word.  
#GE2017 was a vote of confidence in Theresa May’s direction of travel for #Brexit – says Conservative MP @SuellaFernandes  
.Even more #BrexodusBrexit threatening "tens of thousands of jobs in Britain". 
There is another view: Brexit is simply undeliverable, and secretly many Tories know this to be the case.   
European Parliament Brexit negotiator says EU citizens in the UK and UK citizens in EU countries "can't live with" any more uncertainty.  
not hard to imagine support for Brexit will crumble as economy slows and declines in real wages pick up - hard for May to blame anyone else 
Ministers leave UK Brexit department in sign of tension with May  via @FT 
Typical of the weasel Michael Gove to suggest that everyone who voted Labour is happy with Brexit. Wrong - we wanted a change of government. 
Steve Baker, new Brexit minister, is the only known person to have received ££ from the shady CRC apart from the DUP  
If we are to get the COMPLETE Brexit we voted for then we need to hold the politicians feet to the fire. June 23rd marks one year on. 
There's no viable #Brexit option. Shrewd, well-researched and precisely argued - a must read by @Dannythefink 
Some British media outlets reacting to DUP-CON deal like they did Brexit: "Civil war imminent in Northern Ireland". It isn't. 
Brexit: Britain can still stay in the EU if it wants to, German finance minister says | The Independent  
Brexit + hung parliament + wages now falling in real terms could prove a potent combination for an already stuttering economy. 
OUCH! A searing column by Martin Wolf on Brexit, #GE2017 and limited options for UK 
Entirely consistent with conversations I've had with snr figures in Merkel's party since #Euref -they just wish #Brexit would go away  
YouGov has released numbers on #GE2017 vote by age. Stunning age gap—and unprecedented (outside of Brexit vote).  
The only good Brexit is a... 
If you are interested in making sense of Brexit from any side, this book is sensationally good.   
Tony Hilton reports that Nigel Lawson believes #brexit will deliver a significant short-term hit to the UK economy  
Smart @guardian piece @mattzarb: #Corbyn pulled working class #Brexit voters back to Labour. Lesson here on Dems regaining #Trump defectors. 
I'm 72 ,a long distance runner and trust me I intend being around for many years to give brexit hell! Young have been robbed by brexit. 
So, wow - Wolfgang Schaeuble, German finance min. "If [UK] wanted to change their decision, they would find open doors." @Bloomberg #Brexit 
They've been consistent on that. Nobody wanted Brexit esp not in Germany 
Britain would be welcomed back with open arms if Brexit were reversed, Germany's Wolfgang Schaeuble says 
Each day, the Georgia 6 special becomes more important as a referendum on Trump and the GOP.  
The Tories got us into this Brexit mess and have to get us out – this is no time for cross-party consensus  
Theresa May has lost her mandate and Commons majority for an extreme, job-destroying Brexit. Me on @LBC 
#GE2017 has changed the direction of #Brexit. Please share our summary of the @Guardian's report and our editorial:  
With spreading backlash to Trump, political story to examine of past year may not be Trump, Sanders, Brexit.  It may be (I hope) Macron. 
Similar to how 75% of young Britons were against Brexit. Young people have grown up connected to entire world 24/7. Shocked by isolationism. 
Today I received Archibishops Bashar Warda and Nicodemus Daoud Sharaf to discuss situation in liberated areas & the referendum in Sept 2017.  
A 361% increase: Record number of Brits become German citizens. Our cover story @SPIEGELDAILY #Brexit  
It is SO important to remember this. Brexit was NEVER a "people's movement" only masquerading as one pushed by selfish, greedy elite.  
Thanks for all your hard work over the years @RogerHelmerMEP a true #Brexit hero  
Europe's new finance rules could put 83,000 UK jobs at risk after Brexit  
THAT MAN signed Maastricht without putting it to the people.... dont underestimate the ambitions of us who voted #brexit ...  
Disarray in Britain’s Brexit department as two ministers leave  
So the Brexit Fairy isn't just going to make it all happen one night? Not even if the Brexiteers leave straight bananas under their pillows? 
Am I only one surprised no one seems interested that German fin min Schaeuble says EU has "open doors" to UK changing mind on Brexit? 
No divisive referendum? Yet we get a divisive EU one, an unnecessary election, another one likely, DUP in power and peace threatened in NI. 
Martin Wolf: Sleepwalking towards a chaotic Brexit  
Doing a Brexit deal with the Tories wld do as much 'good' for Labour as going into government did for the Lib Dems! We wld be the scapegoats 
John Major: "The views of the 48% cannot be brushed aside." Yes they can, otherwise there was no point in holding a fucking referendum. 
I voted labour to try and get the stupid Tory's out and I think Brexit is bullshit, I want Brexit to fail dismally 
At last some sensible language about #Brexit plus pragmatism & optimism  
Wonder with appointment of thick curmudgeon hardcore Brexiteer Steve Baker as #Brexit junior minister whether May learnt anything last week. 
The Tories wanted the damn referendum to spike UKIP-They own it and the consequences lock stock and barrel Ms Soubry 
Winnie Ewing was one of the pioneers of Erasmus. Depressing that Scots students will be deprived of it post a Brexit that 62% of us rejected  
Brexit may happen without a deal if Britain "wastes" more time, EU's chief negotiator says  
People of Britain, wake up! The conditions of Brexit are not in UK but EU control. We are a corner shop bargaining with a supermarket chain. 
The Brexit years will go down in history as Britain's age of shame, disgraced & destroyed by a decadent self-serving Tory party. 
"The true saboteurs of Brexit"New post by me at @FT, on the ones who cheered on May's flawed approach to Brexit. 
Those who cling to the hope that Brexit will collapse under the weight of its folly have been given a fillip  
It was like F1's own mini Brexit talks. SFI as May and Checo as Juncker."Um, any chance we could..?""Nope""Right, what about...""Nope" 
Number of Britons seeking German citizenship nearly quadrupled last year  #Brexit  
Lib Dems on @SteveBakerHW becoming Brexit minister. "Far from softening her stance on Brexit, May is...putting a fox in charge of henhouse" 
Meanwhile, in the real world, EU citizens, both British and from the #EU27 are feeling the negative impact of #Brexit #citizensrights 
Very significant & welcome words from German Finance Minister Schaeuble holding door open to UK escaping Tories' disastrous extreme #Brexit 
The Prime Minister should set up an all party cabinet committee on Brexit says Liberal Democrat leader @TimFarron 
No 'Hard/Soft Brexit'. UK needs a #GlobalBrexit to pursue the vast opportunities with the rest of the world. Think Global, think big. 
A Deal to Save Brexit: Nigel Farage Should Take UKIP Into DUP Merger An interesting viewpoint ! 
Number of Britons granted German citizenship increases 361% in the year after Brexit  
The SNP must stand its ground on an independence referendum | talkRADIO  via @talkRADIO 
new Brexit minister @stevebakerhw letter to May from last year demanding exit from Customs Union and Single Market: 
Steve Baker, shop steward for the Tory hardline Brexiteers, appointed a Brexit minister -  
Gove, Raab, Baker - all off the backbenches in a Hung Parliament - all good news for a more sensible Brexit. 
Stats du jour:Brits applying for German citizenship: +361% EU nurses applying to work in the UK: -96%#Brexit 
Don't worry, Brexit fans. Steve Baker has been brought on board to ensure that the catastrophe continues as planned. 
Boom - Steve Baker, effective and well liked euroscep shop steward given a job in govt at Brexit dept 
Interesting choice: and it gets him off the backbenches where he is (a very effective) leader of the Hard Brexit party.  
Good news for people worried about the Gvt slipping back on Brexit - Steve Baker new Parliamentary Under-Secretary at Dpt for Exiting the EU 
You Brexit, you bought it.  
PM appoints @SteveBakerHW the head of the Tory Brexiteer European Research Group - as a minister in the Brexit Department 
Wow. now here's an appointment. May has given lead Brexiteer MP Steve Baker a job as minister in Brexit dept. 
Leavers will take heart that this means no selling out on Brexit...  
Only those pesky foreigners seem to have any idea of the implications of Brexit. What has Davis and co been doing?  
This old lady on my train is having a racist rant about 'bloody foreigners taking over the country'.Can anyone identify her?#Brexit  
Former Foreign Secretary says #Brexit will defeat the government unless it recognises that everything has changed  
If Brexit becomes "too negative", Randox will expand in Donegal - interesting comments by its CEO Dr Peter Fitzgerald in @Derry_Chamber mag 
What is this utter crap that is being pushed now, 85% voted for Brexit parties!?!? Mistaking remainers for leave supporters! We ain't thick! 
Nigel Farage: Britain Needs A Prime Minister Who Truly Believes In Brexit  
In #Seanad I called for incoming Taoiseach @campaignforleo to fix date for #repealthe8th referendum as his 1st priority @labour #time4repeal 
.@jameskelly tells us why Nicola Sturgeon must ignore the critics and stand her ground on an independence referendum  
'Brexit isn’t just about the Tories leaving the EU ... ' says @GuyVerhofstadt . Now there's an idea ..... 
Yup. We want a proper Full English Brexit not a skimpy Continental Lite. 
Tim Farron calls for greater unity between the various political parties as the country heads into the Brexit negotiations. @timfarron 
So many questions relating to the SNPs use of election and referendum finances.Iceberg ahead! 
Northern Ireland can burn, people can die; Theresa May's Tories will let nothing stand between them & power & hard #Brexit.#Remain 
The next referendum shock could be in...Spain  
The "Article 50 notification was not valid" theory is the Birthism of Brexit law.  
The older people believed the tax-evading printed media, the younger want to retain citizenship. We must retain our EU citizenship! #brexit 
Welsh First Minister says there's no mandate for hard #Brexit & transitional deal is needed with consensus across UK 
Theresa May has lost her mandate for Brexit - MPs should make that clear, writes @stephen_dorrell 
Brexit: Theresa May thinks that no deal is better than a bad deal.DUP: Theresa May thinks that a bad deal is better than no deal. 
Good account of Lab's success by @MattZarb incl his view that w/o Corbyn's support of #Brexit, May would've won big  
DUP will not accept anything LESS than hard Brexit, says former Arlene Foster aide   
Brexit negotiations are gonna go well...   
'I reject soft and hard' @michaelgove blasts Remainers who 'make Brexit sound like a punishment'  
On Sky at 3:30 looking at this cross-party Brexit idea and whether Labour will play ball. 
This is anti Brexit bullshit. Can someone give me the dates that new regs came in requiring them to speak English.   
Brexit:This is amputating the body to save the boil. 
It's delusional to claim the election result was a vote against Brexit, says @RossjournoClark  
BREXIT Consequences  
Talking to Sky news at 3.30, on Labour, election, Brexit 
Your #Brexit point? NOPE! FACT The 3 parties who wanted a re-run #EUReferendum - #LibDems, #Greens, #SNP ALL lost votes heavily. #JobsBrexit 
Germany says the UK is still welcome to change its mind on Brexit  
Lord Buckethead has agreed to lead Brexit negotiations  
@duponline Thank you DUP for defending Democracy when others are conspiring against #Brexit You've given us Hope! 
Surprising number of ministers who've spent 11 months preparing for Brexit are now leaving government as talks begin  
It is crystal clear.The £400k+ donations were for a referendum campaign & not the SNP general election campaign.Refunds are now due.  
By 48% to 42% those sampled by YouGov say Cameron's calling of the referendum was a bad thing 
:-) - Schauble at his usual cheeky best - agree or disagree with him and his methods, but the man is a legend #Brexit  
Brexit maths. What happens when you add one impossible demand to another impossible demand? Well guess what? It's still impossible. 
Britain would be welcomed back if Brexit were reversed, Germany's Wolfgang Schaeuble says  
Ah, Brexit. Never have so many been so fucked by something so dumb 
With luck we're beginning a long journey back from the brink, towards mitigating or even avoiding the consequences of the bloody referendum. 
Is there any other? DUP will not accept anything LESS than hard Brexit, says former Arlene Foster aide   
Oh, come on. We can find at least a dozen more ways to say "Brexit means Brexit" before we admit we haven't a clue.  
John Oliver introduces the solution to Britain’s Brexit woes: Lord Buckethead.  
It seems a long time since anyone mentioned how 'German car manufacturers' would ensure a quick, good Brexit deal. "Within minutes" ... 
[Brexit negotiations]"Mrs May, what can you offer the EU"*may slides a piece of paper over the desk*"This just says please be nice to me" 
France is on the verge of an astonishing political transformation  
Last Thursday voters rejected cuts, poverty and shrinking opportunities - overwhelmingly so in London. Govt's hard Brexit plans not popular  
Hand in GoveThe sun shines out of our behinds...#TheSmiths 
If God didn’t want Brexit, He wouldn’t have given us Jacob Rees-Mogg …  
#Brexit negotiations must be delayed, for at least a year. Best is to withdraw Art 50. 
There has not been a bid to break up Britain, there is a mandate to hold a referendum at end of brexit talks, time you stopped lying 
Gove cross-party #Brexit talks call: an admission that no-one has a right to negotiate with the EU on the UK's behalf. 
There are only two types of #Brexit 1, Brexit2, Civil unrest on a monumental scale 
We have to insure that #Brexit hardliners don't #gaslight this country like #GOP in the US. 
Ministers say there will be no 'Soft Brexit'  
I am sure that Britain that has to negotiate Brexit with 27 heads of states, is quaking about a channel with less than 1% of Indian viewers  
.@EU_Commission takeover bid for London Euro clearing house business warning of hard #Brexit costs if we leave #SingleMarket.@MichelBarnier 
A plucky prof is trying to prove the Leave campaign lied last year. The clock is ticking. Me for @guardian  #brexit 
1. The language of "hard" vs "soft" Brexit is so misleading. We need a good, clean exit which minimises disruption and maximises opportunity 
Perspective: Britain still has no clue what to do about Brexit  
Labour & Tories having civil wars about single market, having deceived electorate just 4 days ago. Parties honest on #Brexit were punished 
Maybe if John Major had campaigned for Tories a lot more during the election then his party wouldn't be in this mess with DUP & Brexit 
John McDonnell response to inflation figures doesn't mention Brexit once  
"we want a Brexit that works for everyone" = "we want an eight-legged badger" 
Last night: @edballs at @thestrandgroup predicted another election next year to resolve Brexit deadlock @IndyVoices 
Your guide to single market, customs union & what soft Brexit really is, explained simply and with a minimum of fuss  
"There is no plan-anywhere in government for #Brexit."  #wato 
PM's in-tray;1. Do a DUP deal without being mugged2. Recast Brexit plan in 5 days3. Write Queen's Speech that will pass.Quite some mess. 
John Major says government needs to consult widely on Brexit. Says views of 48% cannot be brushed aside. Says 'hard' Brexit wasn't endorsed. 
Wise, measured words on R4 Wato from John Major: concerned about May's DUP deal & GF Agreement; about unrealistic Brexit expectations 
brexit vote has caused the economy to slow and is set to get worse  
Thread on Ruth Davidson's many Brexit faces   
#SirJohnMajor:" A hard~ #Brexit was not endorsed by the electorate in this..election." The voices of the 48% cannot be brushed aside."#wato 
80% of the electorate just voted for parties backing Brexit. 
John Major completely correct which must mean soft #brexit @Open_Britain 
Major gets to his final point - in his view hard Brexit was not endorsed by electorate...don't underestimate ambitions of Remainers 
Devastating and wise about potential impact of DUP deal on GFA and about TM's approach to Brexit. @BBCRadio4 #wato 
Agree - is there any way we could make him caretaker PM? I'd much rather have him heading up the Brexit negotiations that May.  
Fascinating to see Vote Leave wheel out its "big beasts" to defend Hard #Brexit. Could it be they are sensing it is slipping away? 
I'm a one. A 'soft' Brexit is a myth, & at bad best is a time-wasting device before we return to EU membership. Best junk Brexit altogether.  
John Major carefully setting out why hard Brexit is now off the table. @BBCRadio4 "Time to end the spin. People need facts not idle hopes" 
Major adds: hard Brexit impossible after the election result 
Major says deal with DUP makes it imperative Govt consults more widely on Brexit - suggests there is no majority for Brexit now in the UK 
Sir John Major: a hard Brexit was not endorsed by the electorate in this particular election 
Macron Meets May: Unstoppable Monsieur Europe vs floundering Madame Brexit  
Important news update: c'mon m Barnier you can do it.  We British have been negotiating with ourselves over Brexit for the last year !  
All I can hear is one big media enabled hissy fit from Irish and Scottish Nationalists that the pro Brexit #DUP can help out the May Govt. 
& if only you'd fought against #Tory austerity that trolls the streets of your constituency & rest of Britain there'd have been no #Brexit  
Macron Meets May: Unstoppable Monsieur Europe vs floundering Madame Brexit  
"There'll be riots on the streets if we don't get #Brexit"No there won't. Lots of red faced Kippers & foot stomping, but that's about it. 
Theresa May negotiating Brexit:"Pick someone at random from Yellow Pages, they'd be better than her."@simon_schama 
The United Kingdom, going into Brexit negotiations  
Scottish Greens reassert independence referendum support in wake of General Election   via @TheCommonSpace 
Schaeuble Says U.K. Welcome Back if Brexit Was Overturned  RT @suffolkvillage @acgrayling 
Day after Brexit nearly a year ago, I warned political class would try to sabotage it. Now it's happening.  
#TORY #Brexit policy has not changed apparently! BUT KEEP UP THE PRESSURE EVERYONE WITH YOUR MP TO PROTECT BREXIT!  
Political support grows for cross-party approach to Brexit negotiations  
@DavidDavisMP I voted against the Tories and Brexit. Many voted Labour as lesser of two evils. This does not mean they support Brexit at all 
There will be a destruction of the tory party if they renege on the Brexit they have set out since last june  
Are you a nurse from the EU willing to talk to the media about the impact of Brexit? DM or email digital@rcn.org.uk #nursingcounts 
Meanwhile, Theresa May fires 1/2 her #Brexit negotiating team a week before talks, EU lead negotiator says "I can’t negotiate with myself." 
Can you please press WM to include .@NicolaSturgeon, .@fmwales & reps from Northern Ireland at the Brexit negotiations? #iameuropean 
As #Tory splits on #brexit re-emerge, it's worth recalling that many #Leave campaigners promised we'd stay in #SingleMarket : 
Divisive referendumBrexitSpot electionHung parliamentQueen's Speech delayRisk to peace in NITories - How is this "strong and stable"? 
Just think where we'd be if more than a third of 18-24s had bothered to vote in the referendum.  
Those using the misleading term "soft Brexit" need to be honest about what they mean:  
Co-head of PKK umbrella group Cemil Bayik says independence referendum democratic right & no one should oppose it  
Ministers Reassure MPs Brexit Policy Hasn't Changed  
Theresa May has lost her mandate for Brexit - MPs should make that clear, writes @stephen_dorrell 
There's an obvious culprit for rising inflation - and it isn't Brexit, says @RossjournoClark 
Harriet Harman: It's in the national interest for Corbyn to stop a Tory Brexit  
LORD HOWARD MAKES EVERYTHING CLEAR ON BREXIT STANCETory/Labour agree on leave single market, end free movement etc82% of electorate  
Theresa May should admit British public rejected hard Brexit, says EU chief  
Scottish Greens reassert independence referendum support in wake of General Election  via @TheCommonSpace 
£143 million was a cheap price to pay for killing Brexit.Talk about massive ROI  
Leader, Steve Crowther tells @SkyNews that Brexit is in jeopardy despite 83% voting for parties committed to Leaving. Time to stand up  
Some want a hard BrexitSome want a soft BrexitSome just want BrexitThe biggest group doesn't want Brexit at all 
SUCH A MASSIVE ISSUE! Brexit and the coming food crisis: ‘If you can’t feed a country, you haven’t got a country’  
£350m a week to the NHS? How about a 96% drop in EU nurses arriving to work in the UK since referendum  
Britain would find "open doors" if it changed its Brexit decision, Wolfgang Schaeuble says  
BrexitCentral's @matthew_elliott: 'Overwhelming mandate for Hard Brexit'  
He means HIS legacy of #austerity...which helped create the  turmoil of #Brexit; poverty ...(fill in the blank)#GeorgeOsborne-#SitDown 
Britain would be welcomed back if Brexit were reversed, German's Wolfgang Schaeuble says  
As Theresa May negotiates with the DUP, are views on #Brexit changing in key EU capitals?  
BREAKING: Sinn Fein MPs fly to Westminster to ‘take seats and topple Tory/DUP government’  via @Your Brexit 
I'm getting really sick of austerity being glazed over and Brexit getting so much airtime. 
I understand May’s Brexit plan now: aim for an outcome so bad that it goes  negative, then cast it to uint32 and BAM, best result ever  
Senior Tories want cross-party commission on Brexit. Labour should say no; let them sort out their own mess if they can. If not, election. 
My future self just arrived in a time machine and said everyone in 2025 is very excited about the preliminary stages of Brexit negotiations. 
But @George_Osborne Govt have to do this, as ploughing ahead with Brexit will ditch any pretence of fiscal responsibility they have left.  
Brussels negotiators brutally troll Theresa May as Tory chaos threatens to delay Brexit talks 
May sabotages Brexit team with Remainer minister days before EU talks. She thinks she can get away with anything! 
"I can't negotiate with myself" says EU's top #Brexit official, urging the UK not to 'waste' time @Stone_SkyNews  
A record number of British people took German citizenship last year  
It would have been nice if Vote Leave had admitted possibility #brexit could be a "debacle" during the referendum campaign  
Our first edition @EveningStandard has today's 2.9% rise in inflation caused by Brexit devaluation  + @tombradby on May & latest on Lions 
Markets are even more efficient than we thought – they realised Corbyn was going to end up as PM *the day after* after the Brexit vote.  
In an historic referendum, Puerto Ricans voted to go from being a U.S. territory to the 51st U.S. state. Congress, your move.  
Friends! True! Apart from the ~85% of voters who last week supported Parties committed to Brexit, literally nobody wants Brexit any more.  
The UK negotiating team on Brexit SHOULD be; David Davis. Jacob Rees Mogg. Nigel Farage. Scare the hell out of the EU. 
It's NOT the 'confidence' of her MPs that Theresa May needs but rather that of conservative minded voters. Deliver us a complete Brexit. 
Asked if situation means softer #Brexit @faisalislam #BorisJohnson replies: "A great Brexit". That sounds familiar:Make Brexit Great Again?  
EU's Brexit negotiator warns the UK: "I can't negotiate with myself"  
You cannot call yourself a socialist and back Brexit. The two are mutually incompatible. Brexit will hit those who need protection the most  
Brexit will hit the poorest in society the hardest. Those on fixed incomes. The elderly. The poor. The vulnerable. We all know this.  
Brexit misconceptions: "you're married to a Brit, your children are British, you'll be fine." EU nationals are finding out they're not. 
After Brexit there was a race for Number 10, this is the story of what happened. Theresa Vs Boris: How May became PM @BBCTwo Sunday 9pm 
John McDonnell: "I think people will interpret membership of the single-market as not respecting that [#Brexit] referendum."  He's right. 
Soft Brexit is cutting off your nose to spite your face.Hard Brexit is cutting off your face to spite your nose. 
 ...and in another screeching U-turn: Calls for an ‘open Brexit’. 8/8 
Trump is welcome in the UK anytime. He is a key ally,brexit supporter, he is pro British & we are pro USA.  
Reach out!  I'll be there... It's what the First Minister has been doing since December's white paper on soft Brexit.  My column 
 Screeching U-turn: backs Theresa May’s hard Brexit plan. 5/8 
That Conservative unity on Brexit in full (in today's @FT) 
The referendum has not harmed growth, investment or confidence. The *possibility* of a Corbyn Government could be a different matter. 
Ruth Davidson’s apparent support for a softer Brexit is welcome but it’s just one of the many positions she’s had. Here are a few. 1/8 
The Richie Allen Show 'I Think We Can Prove That The Election Was Forced On May By The Elite To Stop #Brexit'  
Living standards now falling. Direct result of #brexit  
We’ve got to make sure the people within the establishment of government don’t undermine the Brexit vote @JLongworthLML on @BBCRADIOKENT 
Number of Britons becoming German citizens rose 361% in 2016.“Link to Brexit seems clear,” German stats office said  
when daesh threatened Hewler & Kirkuk, PKK supported KDP, abt independence referendum PKK supported it. In both cases, AKP dropped KDP. 
If the Tories sabotage Brexit, they will deserve to lose to Labour. At least the left is honest about the sabotage.  
730 days to negotiate Brexit, ambitious for exit deal alone. Government tho wanted entire Free Trade Deal. 77 days gone with no negotiation. 
Is there anyone who still believes Brexit is a good idea. I don't remember voting to poorer. #brexitchaos 
England’s growing wine industry in ferment over Brexit  
BREAKING: Turkish President Erdoğan says Northern Iraq's referendum decision is a threat against Iraq's territorial integrity - @CNNTURK_ENG 
TURKEY: Erdogan says Iraqi Kurdish referendum threatens unity of Iraq 
Voters wanted to kick out tories so voted tactically.  Don't believe the lie that combined Lab+Con votes constitute brexit support 
UK manufacturers call for #Brexit rethink  
Lord Buckethead has ‘agreed to lead Brexit negotiations’  
I am no fan of Corbyn but let me be clear @TheresaMayPM should you allow them water down Brexit I will never ever vote #conservativeagain 
Reminder that the Treasury's worst case Brexit scenario was for inflation to reach 2.7% a year after EU referendum. Now 2.9% 
SOS Please throw the 48% a lifeline to help stop Brexit 
"Institutions may find solutions using #blockchain and #cryptocurrencies" on #Brexit in @IBTimes #bitcoin #regtech   
#Brexit isn't just about the Tories leaving the EU, it's about the whole UK. Everyone’s voice should be heard.  
All this Brexit focus, is further proof that the news media aren't prepared to discover why people voted for Corbyn's Labour 
Ruth Davidson is playing the long game. Her influence can help soften Brexit | Alex Bell  
This is the reality of the devaluation of the £ post Brexit: rising cost of living & falling earnings = less money in people's pockets.  
So inflation now ten times higher than before the referendum. God bless #Brexit. What a triumph that is proving.2.9% in May 
Thread (Brexit problems by Bill Cash's ex researcher)  
A 52% majority you cannot even change the rules of a golf club! #Brexit is NO DEMOCRACY! #hungparliament #StopBrexit #GE2017 #reshuffle 
The UK's current #Brexit position:"I'd like to cancel my gym membership, but still use the pool and sauna free of charge, please..." 
Brexit Secretary Davis Says U.K. Committed to Leaving Single Market - BBC Radio 
RT @acgrayling #Brexit can be cancelled at any time - Just needs political will & majority vote from MPs  
Every month, #Brexit'ers cost the country more.They must really hate hearing foreign voices.  
Before Brexit vote, £ was €1.30, inflation 0.5, growth was highest in EUNow £ is €1.13, inflation 2.9 and growth lowest in EURethink...  
Despite repeated lies of the media, the DUP does NOT seek a "soft Brexit" They want a soft border with the Irish Repubic as does David Davis 
Theresa May signals austerity is over and overhaul of Brexit plans - but don't believe her, as she lies quite a lot!  
Take it from Donald Tusk, President of the European Council: 'Only alternative to a hard Brexit is no Brexit'. So what is soft Brexit? 
EU Juncker TOLD Theresa May to call snap election to make Brexit easier (yes, I'm sure that was the reason)  
ill prepared brexit ministers facing Cherry and Starmer day after day will be wishing May never trigger A50. 
UK inflation up to 2.9% in May, from 2.7% the previous month, #Brexit working hard to make Britons poorer#Remain 
Douglas Murray’s shattering account of what Europe has done to itself tells us Brexit now more important than ever  
Oh dear, not very bright are you.BREXIT will reduce tariffs & lower prices when it happens.Which might be never.BREXIT NOW.  
Brexit dept has lost 2 ministers & a SPAD in recent weeks. Would be concerning in any department, but in this one at this time: v alarming 
Has been one of the sharpest MPs on Brexit.  
"Softer" versions of Brexit involve difficult trade-offs for any British government committed to leaving the EU  
Theresa May losing half her Brexit ministers days before talks with the EU  
Remind your fellow MPs we voted to leave the single market if they give us a "soft" Brexit the voters will remember Tories selling us out 
As they say in US: "There's a new sheriff in town."Imagine #TheresaMay on other side of table  to #Macron..#Brexit 
Concerned that people voted Lab when they're pro EU. Unless Lab position on Brexit changes, young Remainers may become disillusioned again. 
The EU's chief Brexit negotiator: "I don’t know what hard Brexit or soft Brexit mean...I need a British delegation"  
Labour politicians crowing that the Tories R in chaos should look to their own ranks where frontbenchers R contradicting Corbyn on #Brexit 
4. There is no other way to a "softer Brexit". Pretending otherwise is a waste of time while the A.50 clock continues to rundown to 2019 
Hard Brexit? Soft Brexit? What's going on?  
Jeeez. Those cabinet meetings are so dull. Brexit blah ..blah..brexit blah.. #LazontheLoose 
DUP supports Conservative #Brexit agenda, and any reports otherwise "are made up nonsense", says IDS  
Boosted Macron to talk Brexit with UK's May. Read more:  via @Reuters TV 
The EU's Brexit negotiator tells Britain not to "waste time" in starting talks -- "I can't negotiate with myself"  
"Our position is clear. We never wanted a hard #Brexit. We want a fair #Brexit that respects the rights of EU & UK citizens" @giannipittella 
Without a fundamental rethink of the UK position and redlines there is no "softer Brexit"  
Why do politicians keep lying and saying the electorate rejected #brexit. It did not.More than 80% of people voted for pro Brexit parties 
What remarkable, and unacceptable, circumstances the #Brexit folly creates.  
In January @UKandEU set out what cross-party, pragmatic, evidence-based analysis/approach to Brexit would look like:  
Hague urges May to adopt Labour-style approach to Brexit and to set up cross-party commission -  
William Hague urges Theresa May to adopt Labour-style approach to Brexit - politics live  
Pernicious Brexiter lie emerging: as both Con & Lab manifestos said leave SM/CU this 'proves' 83% of voters support hard Brexit. 
May loses 1/2 her Brexit ministers days before talks with EU.Pressure growing for a cross-party approach to Brexit.  
Used to have huge respect for @RuthDavidsonMSP but success in Scotland has gone to her head and she now wants to sabotage #Brexit 
There has never been any intention to carry out BREXIT.Doris campaigned for Remain, as did most of her cabinet & civil service.  
A humiliated @NicolaSturgeon still thinks she has a voice+ is shouting that all parties must be involved in #Brexit talks. In her dreams 
Spot on. She said she understood that the #Brexit vote was a vote for change and then governed on tramlines  
If referendum victory to Brexit (leave the EU) is betrayed by Gov they will see a revolt like no other, we will not accept Brussels rule. 
UK economy slower in 1st quarter than all others in EU. Services, retail & car sales all down + hung parl. Awkward backdrop to Brexit talks. 
Only Brexit can save our values from an abyss, writes @MelanieLatest  
As we are back to wondering what EEA means:read the House of Lords @LordsEUCom report on Brexit options.It's great.  
I voted Labour Thursday, joined @LibDems yesterday over #Brexit 
Ruth Davidson told Theresa May she must pursue softer “open Brexit” which prioritises free trade over migration  
Where are the 1967 Referendum poster babies now? 50yrs after the yes vote, #ThePointNITV meets one of the faces that helped push the cause. 
Either we stick our heads in a noose or the planes don't fly and food is rationed. #Brexit is a very, very bad idea. 
Lord Rose reckons election result shows people have changed Brexit views. Yes: 84% now support exiting single market  
Theresa May docudrama about EU Referendum set to air on BBC Two  
Just be honest and admit the whole idea of #brexit is a terrible idea. "Soft" brexit is pointless. 
There are dissertations to be written on the links between Brexit, masculinity and imperialism. I might write one. I'd definitely read one. 
Do you know what the electorate will do if Tory and Lab MPs ignore the referendum result? I'll tell you... They'll vote Tory or Lab. #Baaaa 
The even bigger story:  May losing half her #Brexit ministers days before talks with the #EU were meant to start 
Realised, hearing Gove on #r4todayI'm relaxed about the inevitable failure of the Tories & their Brexit. They're tone deaf & out of ideas 
"We now go live to Brexit Britain"  
There's a Norway option in the Brexit talks. So what does that mean? Here's a simple guide  
You won't see a more comprehensive Brexit  analysis than this thread. Also features a remarkable twist at the end.  
Remainers need a well  organized voting block so we can say to Labour, if you don't play ball you don't get our votes.#Remain #Brexit 
UTurn from Ruth Davidson suggests she has picked up huge public concern in Scotland over inevitable damage from hard (or indeed any) #Brexit 
PLOT: Establishment MPs plan to water down and kill off proper Brexit. The public anger will be huge!  
An interesting thread from eurosceptic @davidallengreen on why the practicality of Brexit, if not the principle, was a serious non-starter.  
Those who went on about overturning the result of a democratic referendum distracted from the real choice at play: jobs first or tax haven 
Govt wants a consensual Brexit. British business must now speak truth to power #customsunion #singlemarket #immigration & Govt must listen 
John Oliver's plan for Theresa May: send Lord Buckethead to negotiate Brexit  
@UKLabour -listen to this and understand.  We lent you our votes to oust the Tories.  We do not support #brexit.  Ignore that at your peril. 
Why are we so arrogant in the UK that we actually believe the UK government are going to determine the kind of Brexit we have. 
Oh @squires_david, "Harden my Brexit!" indeed  
Ruth Davidson has spent months fervently arguing for a hard Brexit. Her latest move is yet another massive u-turn. Take note, UK media. 
Welcome words from @fmwales. Time for UK Govt to work properly with Scotland, Wales and NI to find a new Brexit plan  
12. And now the UK government is in a Brexit hole of its own making, and the memories of the cheering are of no help./ends. 
Oh dear, Govey, now comic figure, is back on R4 Today & back pedalling on Brexit, but it's all evasive waffle & hot air, Boris without jokes 
My inexpert, just-based-on-my-own-bubble feeling is that they've p***ed off this demographic really badly with Brexit.  
Gove claiming Remainers want to get on and leave. How dare he! Liar, liar. And thx, Labour...your hard Brexit being used to justify approach 
Will those who advocated Leave please tell us now, without slogans, the tangible benefits people will feel every day because of Brexit?  
10. Then a general election explicitly to quash Westminster "opposition" to Brexit. More cheers.  But madness, given A50 clock now ticking. 
Theresa May has suppressed intelligence on a suspected Russian assassination on British soil  …#Brexit #Remain 
Michael Gove now talking about maximum possible consensus on Brexit. This is a very significant change. 
9. Article 50 was to be notified as a sign of the virility of Brexit. So it was, without the UK being properly prepared. But loud cheers. 
WORRYING: Pro-Leave Brexit Minister David Jones replaced by yet another Remainer at May's top table.  
If things keep going in this direction, Remainers will be out of a job. Let's make it happen. Hard brexit is dead. Let's stop it all totally 
Half the Govt's Brexit ministerial team has resigned or been fired on the eve of negotiations starting. The depths of fiasco grow each day.  
Brexit would be a 'virtual death sentence' for so much that many millions in the UK cherish and value.  
4. Key problem of Brexit is not principle but practicality. It just cannot be done easily, if at all. So reliant is UK on EU law and policy. 
We should all be protected from Brexit, full stop. Stop this bloody madness.  
2. I am not against Brexit in principle. If UK were not a member of EU, I would not campaign for it to join. Am a 1989 era Eurooceptic. 
1. All along the point of the Brexit tweets on this account has not been to "oppose" Brexit but to show how complicated it would be. 
A year on Leavers must be able to point to many benefits of #Brexit . I'd like to know what they are. Give it you best shot, Leavers 
 A project to make a difference in the Trump, Russia, Brexit world and make sure it never happens again:  
“An almost whole new Brexit team. What was that about needing stability because negotiations started 11 days after the election?”  
MAY: I'm going to get a good deal.INTERVIEWER: With the DUP? Brexit? Your own party? Which deal are we talking about?MAY: idk pls help me 
Brexit papers sounding obsessive, shrill & mad. There came a time when they had to give up on the black shirts. Causes become unfashionable. 
When you have a realistic choice between the foaming mad Brexit party & the Brexit party with Remain bits which do you choose? 
Debate on hard or soft misses the key point...there is no sort of #Brexit that benefits British people & jobs. 
Love this from John Oliver... send Lord Buckethead to negotiate Brexit!  
This Brexit mess simply demonstrates that you should take no heed of backseat drivers who can't drive and certainly never give them the keys 
Justice Minister Dominic Raab:- said "Feminists are...obnoxious bigots"- wanted a second EU referendum...if *Leave* lost  
There is no such thing as "soft" or "hard" Brexit. This frame is not useful in describing the two paths this country has as it leaves the EU 
Anti-Brexit. Pro-Brexit. Anti-Brexit again. Ruth Davidson’s changes of mind aren’t principle, they are cynical career-promoting opportunism. 
"Of course I talk to people from different parties" about #Brexit - Michael Gove tells @BBCBreakfast  
EU may force London's "clearing" business to relocate after Brexit  
Something I'm sure the Brexit-voting over-65s are totally fine with  
And for all fantasists: Brexit can't be delayed. Article 50 triggered a legal time limit and can't be extended without all EU27 agreeing. 
As Barnier's impatience grows, saying no time to waste in Brexit talks, it's clear UK needs time & clear thinking.  
#TalkingPics Brexit stage right- David Pope @davpope from the @canberratimes 
May the farce be with you - Queen's Speech and Brexit talks' delay as PM tells MPs she 'messed up'  
Now Britain and the EU can't agree on when to start Brexit talks  
So May apologises to Tory MPs for "election mess"Why should anyone trust her judgement on anything - including Brexit negotiations - now? 
SNP abandons £1m fundraising appeal for second referendum 
If a relatively simple deal to prop up a minority Government is this difficult for May how is she supposed to negotiate Brexit? 
#Brexit hasn't yet even imposed controls on flow of people from EU. Yet 94% reduction in nurses from EU, which our NHS desperately needs. 
Ouch. You can’t possibly have someone as incompetent as @theresa_may” to lead Brexit negotiations" - @simon_schama 
UK chose to:- hold referendum- make A50 notification in March- hold general electionEU didn't.UK still not prepared for Brexit talks. 
FM @NicolaSturgeon under pressure to drop plans for another divisive referendum after election losses. Read more:  
Britain: The End of a Fantasy (I'd add '...maybe') by @fotoole is a devastating read on Brexit inconsistencies.  
Simply put, Manufacturers would prefer to kill #Brexit before it kills them.  
The best one minute explainer on #Brexit by @LordBuckethead. 
There are people discovering the stuff about Brexit they should have known last June.And some of them are in government.#r4today 
Gove on @BBCr4today - ask what hard Brexit looks like for environmental protection in UK. Does he still regard Habitat Directive as absurd? 
Lets Remain in EUnity & be part of this exciting European family of democracies. Dont let Murdoch's disastrous Brexit damage climate action  
UK employers plan to keep hiring despite Brexit and slow growth  
Exclusive: 'Crash' in EU nurses working in UK since Brexit referendum  
“Crash” in number of EU nurses registering to work in UK since referendum: NHS faces worst nursing workforce crisis for 20 years, says HSJ 
Theresa May says she wants to build a consensus on Brexit. This must include other parties to be genuinely representative. 
Labour don't want a hard Brexit. We want a super soft one protecting workers & human rights, free movement etc -   
97.8% of Puerto Ricans who voted in referendum said ‘yes’ to joining the US  
Calm down – Brexit is still on course, writes @DouglasCarswell 
I have been pointing out May's flawed approach to Brexit in post after post since last August....  
George Bridges resigns as Brexit minister – has the unravelling begun?  
Fintan O’Toole: Theresa May faces Irish obstacle on the Brexit tracks  via @IrishTimesOpEd 
Hung Parliament may mean a softer Brexit. What would you prefer? #BeterCallPaul 0344 499 1000 @paulross @TheSun 
Brussels insists on power to control euro clearing after Brexit  
"Poetic and powerful" proposal by Scottish designer wins £1,000 Brexit passport design competition:  #Brexit  
"Referendum recommended for treaty with Aborigines" The Canberra Times, 14 September, 1983  
Patriots, Trump, Chelsea, Brexit, Madrid and now this. Why is god making us suffer. 
Statehood Wins Puerto Rico Referendum After Opposition Parties Boycott Vote  
John Oliver introduces the solution to Britain’s Brexit woes: Lord Buckethead.  
Journey to statehood still long for Iraq Kurds, despite expected landslide 'yes' in September referendum  
Puerto Rico's governor vows to make the US territory the 51st state after statehood won in a non-binding referendum  
Iraqi Kurds' referendum now a weapon for regional control | Analysis  
#5Things- Tech tumult- Brexit means..- China bears awaken- C-suite shuffles- Shares slip  
The UK already had a nurse shortage. The Brexit vote is making it even worse.  
SOFT BREXIT makes the referendum result pointless!Soft Brexit is 'UTTERLY MEANINGLESS', blasts political analyst 
May's key ministers hold 'secret talks' with Labour to force soft Brexit: media   
We're gearing up for a fight since once it gets passed the industry will use CA's referendum system to try to take it down 
The victory of the statehood vote in #PuertoRico referendum is 'false,'  @fdejesusfebles tells @jhsthethird 
Manufacturers call for Brexit strategy rethink  
British pols secretly plotting 'soft Brexit'...  
Oh how the UK media like to spin a yarn.This whole 'soft Brexit' thing is of their manufacture.Same Brexit team is in place, ready to go. 
7 USC §6810(a) & (b) make it a federal crime to disclose how a flower handler voted in a fresh cut flower referendum. 
Puerto Rico governor vows statehood push after referendum win  
.@PLegrain: Theresa May's electoral imbroglio may offer an opportunity to get Brexit right (or less wrong).  
This Brexit-Themed Porno Made Me Think Long and Hard About Myself  pic.twitter.com/wbvjOlTzYt 
Labour and Conservatives 'in cross party talks to secure softer Brexit'  
Why can't someone start a 'Come Together' movement and reverse 'Brexit' as the single most destructive idea of the century!  
We are told massive lies about EVERYTHING by those desperate to stop BREXIT and socialists craving power by any means  
Michel Barnier warns UK it faces cliff edge 'no deal' Brexit  
Puerto Rico's governor vows to make the US territory the 51st state after statehood won in a non-binding referendum  
Both main party leaders were utterly silent during the referendum, yours included. Neither the PM or Corbyn were loud enough.  
Sad but not unexpected. Union bosses telling members to buy WRP memberships to vote in unity referendum. #ableg 
'Austerity is over' May tell Tories Should have said 'until UK hard-Brexit's & then it's back on full bore'  
What Nietzsche's philosophy can tell us about why Brexit and Trump won  
May will screw us on Brexit and then quit. That is the plot of these traitors. 
In Out In Out, #Brexit all about.You do the jokey govt and u-turn around,That's what May's all about.#newsnight 
John Oliver introduces the solution to Britain’s Brexit woes: Lord Buckethead.  
Theresa May faces losing half her Brexit ministers days before talks with the EU  
Brexit:The country lost £10 and found 50p. They put the 50p on Strong and Stable, a certainty that came in last. Turned out to be a Donkey. 
Listen to today's show on the cholera epidemic in Yemen, Puerto Rico's referendum & Jared Kushner's real estate:  
Jeremy, many of us listened to you & gave you the benefit of our vote; now please listen to us:Brexit is wrong & needs to be reconsidered.  
No Brexit negotiation. No Brexit. The country doesn't want it.  
Seems Tory MP @AlanMakHavant didn't get the 'Whatever the fuck happens from now on *DO NOT* say strong and fucking stable' memo.. #ToriesOut pic.twitter.com/uEPuu0n0Pt 
Mark my words, brexit will be postponed indefinitely within the next few days at which time it will be gone forever in any useful form. 
That prune May has been conning us for a year and the election charade was no doubt organised by her globalist instructors to destroy brexit 
Breaking News: Tory Brexit Minister has resigned!! 
. @sarahwollaston to me after 1922: "reality of a different [HoC] arithmetic is we are going to have a different kind of Brexit negotiation" 
They lost referendumThey lost the electionExactly what are the libtards waiting for 
A view of Brexit and the GE from the other side of the pond. Absolutely fantastic piece & required reading.  
Uh oh!!George Bridges resigns as Brexit minister – has the unravelling begun?  #ToryChaos 
Hard Brexit is a non-runner. Soft Brexit is faffing about for years for a deal that is not as good as the one we already have.  
PKK leader Bayik supports the planned referendum on independence in Iraqi Kurdistan. "It is a democratic right,no one should be against it"  
Opinion: Hopes from the UK's Remain camp that a weak May and a strong Macron may help soften Brexit is unlikely  
BC Liberals say referendum no longer required for transit funding or road pricing.  
Huge Poll for big 2 parties only. (Retweet after vote)Your votes for General Election and EU Referendum? #yourvoice #followback  
What is this mad idea that it need to be "parked"? Support for indy is rock-solid in polls, with Brexit trainwreck still to come. 
How Ireland's border became a bigger Brexit issue  
Going to be pretty upset when they discover Jezza has always supported hard brexit  
George Bridges resigns as Brexit minister – has the unravelling begun?  
Confused.Tory MPs were defending manifesto a week ago. Now they cheer when it's torn up. Hypocrites or feeble?What omen for stable Brexit? 
Really glad young voters came out to oppose #Tories but @jeremycorbyn missing a trick. Younger overwhelmingly wish to #Remain / NO #brexit  
It was definitely Brexit that got me into politics - Jeremy Corbyn supporter Eve Rae tells #newsnight 
Survation: 47% want soft brexit ie single mkt & customs union, 36% hard brexit, no single mkt/no customs union  
If true, I'm delighted RT TELEGRAPH: Tories and Labour hold secret talks on soft Brexit  
John Oliver & #LordBucketHead are right, Theresa May has turned #Brexit negotiations into a complete "shitshow"#Newsnight pic.twitter.com/s6kmUpMqUn 
To suggest that everyone voted according to brexit and no other issue demonstrates the naivety of many commentators and voters. #Newsnight 
leader of your party called the referendum! 
Sky News coverage is now aimed solely at cancelling Brexit, by any means necessary. @Ofcom need to take action. 
Hannan apparently selling an EEA/Norway position on Brexit. One in which we do what the EU tells us. #sovereignty #newsnight 
Has anyone noticed we're talking about hard & various other kinds of BrexitBut no one has come up with a plan for any of themIt's all BS 
Can I just say that for many this election wasnt just about brexit. I voted for ths NHS SCHOOLS DWPCUTS/DEATHS SANCTIONS HOMELESS #newsnight 
i.e. No Brexit.  
Don't care whether Brexit is poached or boiled. We are NOT staying under jurisdiction of ECJ which stops us kicking out jihadists. 
."PM's new Govt descended into chaos on 1st day - Queen’s Speech delayed & vital Brexit negs plunged into doubt". 
Tuesday's Telegraph: "Tories and Labour hold secret talks on soft Brexit" #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @hendopolis) 
"The DUP position is very helpful to the Conservatives in terms of managing Brexit" @JonTonge tells #newsnight 
Sturgeon since 6/16: all UK nations must be in Brexit debateMedia: Meh.Davidson now: all UK nations must be in Brexit debate.Media: Hail! 
blatant exageration to lie proportions, 85% do NOT support brexit #newsnight 48% +++ never wanted it in the first place! 
Think key part of SNP setback is they've been way ahead of Scottish public's awareness of what Brexit really means. That's about to change 
A cross-party agreement over Brexit would be in the national interest. Election was about Brexit: no party got a mandate to negotiate alone  
THE NATIONAL: FM: Hard Brexit is dead in the water #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Philip Stephens: The upside to the post-election chaos – it promises Britain Brexit salvation  
In general terms, membership of  @CommonsEUexit select committee more important for Brexit than any front bench appointment by any party. 
William Hague: "Brexit will defeat the Government unless it recognises that everything has changed" #premium 
With Davies signing for £500k and possibly Wisdom for £2m we may as well let Rowett negotiate Brexit #dcfc #dcfcfans 
The mission of Brexit supporting newspapers is avoiding EU scrutiny of the aggressive tax avoidance of their owners 
If Gove or Raab had wanted to shape Brexit they would have stayed on @CommonsEUexit committee - but have taken ministerial jobs instead. 
If you put in an offer on a house and survey came back and the house was about to fall down, would you still buy the house? #Brexit #bbcnews 
Secret talks between senior Tories and Labour MPs on a soft Brexit - and a cross-party commission. The times they are a-changing ...  
Why was nobody interested when Scotland/SNP went through all this by the bucketload during Independence referendum? 
.@FT: Stop wasting time urges EU's @MichelBarnier #Brexit  
"It's become comical that every holiday becomes a referendum on Reince," said one Trump adviser  
Their removal, at a stroke, strengthens the non-partisan scrutiny of government's approach to Brexit by @CommonsEUexit. 
I prefer "no Brexit"  
Brexit UK: a middling country with little native industry cutting itself off from its biggest trading partner  
There is nothing Gove and Raab can do in their ministerial jobs to affect Brexit more than they would have done staying on @CommonsEUexit. 
In an historic referendum, Puerto Ricans voted to go from being a U.S. territory to the 51st U.S. state.Congress, your move.  
I see @NicolaSturgeon has come to Westminster to tell us " a hard Brexit" is no longer an option. Her Party stood on that and lost 21 seats! 
So Gove and Raab both off the @CommonsEUexit select committee.A removal far more important re Brexit than their ministerial appointments. 
Corbyn can't nationalise rail etc under EU rules. So he shares hard Brexit ideals with Jacob Rees Mogg. Bad ideas make strange bedfellows.  
TELEGRAPH: Tories and Labour hold secret talks on soft Brexit #tomorrowspaperstoday 
It's not the 1922 Committee that will save Conservative fortunes but rather Conservative voters and any dilution of Brexit will see them off 
Ruth Davidson is clearly out to sabotage Brexit. 
The UK's prime minister has been told to abandon her Brexit election claim that 'no deal is better than a bad deal'  
John Oliver: send Lord Buckethead to negotiate Brexit – video  
Don't tell me! Tell Jeremy @jeremycorbyn Tell him you don't want Brexit  
Huge Poll. (Retweet after vote)Your vote/opinion of #Brexit during EU Referendum and now? #yourvoice #followback ? 
#TheresaMay  chief of staff Gavin Barwell admits #Brexit "cost us #election ": 
I'm a #Labour voter and I don't support #Brexit, nor does my husband and at least another 16 people I personally know that voted Labour. 
As things stand the Labour Leadership are key allies for the current British Government to deliver their cherished hard brexit 
Refreshing to see a journalist notice or at least report this.  NS has stuck to her principles on Brexit, RD is a shameless opportunist 
I want the Labour party to give up Brexit. 
Davidson hasn't supported staying in single mkt/EEA - the only soft Brexit. her open Brexit= good trade deal same as May/Corbyn 
Dominic Raab returns to the Ministry of Justice. He's an old friend of Liz Truss, as you might guess from his comments on the Brexit case:  
The abject disappointment of #Labour remainers is now clear. Did they really vote for Brexit Policies virtually identical to May's ? 
Starting in 2010 with #austerity then #Indy then #Brexit then #snap election then #DUP... the longest car crash in history... 
So DUP pushes customs union while Davidson demands single market: a soft Brexit that meets 52 & 48 in middle. Just as it always should have.  
This happened all over Scotland during the Referendum  
Only I can deliver a strong and stable #brexit  
BFE: Mr. Davis wants suggestions on how to proceed with the Brexit negotiations. Says he'll "take them on board!" Why not drop him an email?  
Soft brexit is not really brexit at all.It was a term invented AFTER the EU ref for remoaners to give us EU membership in all but name  
@J_amesp @carolecadwalla @johnmcdonnellMP Why on earth "respect" a referendum where "big money" bought the leave vote - that is delusion 
NHS facing major crisis after Brexit leaves hospitals 40,000 nurses short  
Cambridge& Edinburgh have lost more than 300 top EU researchers due to Brexit. Good luck savaging something from wreckage of Brexit.  
UKIP have no elected MPs, they do not speak for you. Election result shows no desire for hard Brexit  
"The point of no return". My op piece for @Jerusalem_Post regarding the #Kurdistan Region independence referendum.  
London & Paris make plans to build backup bridges of research collaboration in case Brexit really screws things up.  
Tomorrow @ScotNational FM: Hard Brexit is dead in the water - Sturgeon calls on May to seek UK-wide consensus before negotiations with EU  
BREAKING: "Our view on Brexit has not changed" says TMB chairman: "We don't know what it is." 
1. Democratic-leaning Puerto Rico votes for statehood in referendum. 2. GOP controls Congress.3. End of story. 
Anger over Brexit and austerity caused the Tories to lose seats, Theresa May's new chief of staff has told the BBC.  
If she tries to impose a Brexit policy with DUP votes thats the end of the Tories for the foreseeable  
Many of us loaned our vote to Labour to break May and tories, now help us to break brexit #stopbrexit 
Well if I am to believe reports on the news, all Tory and Labour voters support Brexit. Imagine that Joshua @eyejosh 
My thread on May and how she has got away with her hopeless approach to Brexit.  
Labour’s vote share increased by 12 points in the strongest Remain-voting areas #Corbyn #GE2017 #Brexit #Remain 
To get a good Brexit deal, Britain needs a PM who truly believes in it. That person is not Theresa May.  
While politicians waffle on about #Brexit health and social care quietly collapses through lack of staff .  
Jeremy, the youth of today listened to you, now you should listen to them; generally they don't appear to want any Brexit.  
So @SkyNews have completely given up on any pretence at balance re Brexit. Along with @BBCNews they are leading the Brexit opposition.  
Strange to watch Scottish nationalists willing Ruth Davidson to fail in her efforts to push for Scottish interests and a soft Brexit. 
Davis can only do this because Corbyn & McDonnell have put Labour in a position where they can be used as the excuse for hard Brexit.  
Majority of Britain's MPs elected on manifestos pledging to end freedom of movement... Hard #Brexit is the only Brexit on the table.  
."May said she was seeking a mandate to negotiate HER SORT of BrexitThe result DENIES her THAT mandate" 
Anecdotally, I have yet to come across any Labour voter who supports "brexit" - it is just Jeremy's ideology 
Theory (no real evidence yet): post Brexit vote Cameron/Osborne strategy of blaming austerity on immigrants & scroungers lost credibility.  
NHS faces its worst nursing workforce crisis for 20 years and Brexit is to blame  
May's greatest betrayal has been of Tory members who voted for her as leader as they thought she'd be less loopy about Brexit than Leadsom. 
.@LastWeekTonight calls upon @LordBuckethead to lead the #Brexit talks:  
There is no “soft Brexit”: it does not exist as a serious or credible option  
Strong EU referendum effects in @YouGov estimates of how voters moved between parties between this election and the last one. #GE2017 
After election setback, U.K. Conservative Prime Minister  May faces pressure to soften Brexit approach  
EU 'to delay Brexit talks by a year' because of Theresa May  
You'd expect Tories to listen to this; but Lab should, too: Brexit threatens collapse of already weak UK tax base = NHS etc funding  
Gibraltar wants de-colonisation not re-colonisation. Brexit or no Brexit, it would still say no to shared sovereignty with Spain. 
.@Nigel_Farage: Britain needs a PM who truly believes in Brexit - and that person is NOT Theresa May  
Angry Remainers, they're officially a thing now. Theresa May's chief aide admits Brexit cost Tories seats in elxn  
Theresa May has lost her mandate for Brexit - MPs should make that clear  
Business calls for softer Brexit in aftermath of election  
John Oliver introduces the solution to Britain’s Brexit woes: Lord Buckethead.  
'@snp calling for cross party #brexit collaboration & immediate guarantee of #citizensrights for EU nationals in UK 
Sharp fall in EU nurses coming to UK - yet still Labour backs a Hard Brexit.  
DUP want Farage involved in Brexit negotiations  
Girl = Cameron, skateboard = Brexit, May = bike and the man is England, slowly drowning after after they all screwed us 
John Oliver and Lord Buckethead recap the British election and what it means for "Brexit"  
Seriously, and it matters more than ever now - what the f**k is Labour's position on Brexit exactly?  
Some brass neck Boris, you know she's on a surefire suicide mission and you're just hanging back, you third rate Churchill wannabe. 
Exclusive: The EU insists on having the power to relocate London's lucrative euro clearing business after Brexit  
PM won over MPs tonight by being apologetic, frank & very direct. With new No10 team it's 'May unscripted'. Time to get on w/ govt & Brexit 
Staying in Europe's single market and customs union could now be realistic Brexit options  
Joyful zeroing in on 'Lord Buckethead'. And excellent explainer on all the fun of the Brexit fair.  
Yeah but at least we have got our country back innit #Brexit  
Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP says it's 'self-indulgent' to criticise @theresa_may as he staunchly defends the Prime Minister 
The people have spoken against Hard Brexit. Get over it! 
Hard or soft boiled, medium rare or well done? How does the EU think the UK will take its #Brexit? My blog:  #GE2107 
Manifesto breakers plot half-in, half-out #Brexit #IfIEditedTheStandard 
Labour Brexit policy in chaos as senior MP backs remaining in ‘reformed’ EU single market  
The union is dead, they just don't know it yet! We will be lucky if our economy will survive Brexit.  
Number of EU nurses coming to UK falls 96 per cent since Brexit vote  
The U.K.'s hung parliament raises business hopes for a softer Brexit  
What changed then? SNP won, Tories are second, ScotRef vote was not altered. Referendum still on, just a matter of when. 
Oh really?"Cabinet ministers opposing hard Brexit sidelined May today by reaching out to Labour MPs & EU leaders" 
Was the #brexit view of the candidate you voted for part of the reason you chose them ? #GE2017 
Hard and soft or May's "clean" Brexit now so passé. The new buzz phrases: "open Brexit" (Ruth Davidson) and "sane Brexit" (Andrew Adonis). 
Conservatives aren’t up to the Brexit challenge | Letters  
During mtgs in Kurdish Region I underlined UK view on proposed referendum, which should have the support of the government in Baghdad. 
There are some pretty widespread concerns about any Brexit at all.  
Very welcome. Hope it works better than @ScotGov attempts to reach out to her on Single Market & soft #Brexit which she rejected  
I fear we are heading towards a Brexit backslide.  
John Oliver breaks down how UK elections will affect Brexit and what Lord Buckethead can do to help  
Shortage of EU nurses - Brexit Shortage of UK nurses - this prat #channel4news 
Farage the NEGOTIATOR? DUP pushes for ex-Ukip leader to be given role to protect Brexit  
A "Soft Brexit" would mean the UK would not really have left the European Union, says @Nigel_Farage  #FarageOnLBC 
At Irish embassy speech by John Bruton, ex Irish PM. "UK is almost acting that Brexit is something that is being done to them by others. " 
My column says Macron favours hard Brexit for economic, strategic and domestic reasons  
Why do they keep saying " what sort of Brexit " one where we bloody leave the EU . You know not in the EU like New Zealand or Japan !! 
PM's chief of staff says 'austerity and Brexit lost us the election'  
#Conservatives feeding frenzy to devour #TheresaMay  self indulgent.UK looks  like banana republic. Priority is x party talks on #Brexit. 
She's lived in the UK for 11yrs, married a Brit & her kids were born here. But she might have to leave after Brexit.  
Consumer spending drops in Britain for the first time in 4 years  
Ed Balls says idea proposed by "highly respected" @YvetteCooperMP for cross-party approach to Brexit won't fly: Govt & Corbyn won't do it 
.@Nigel_Farage says he fears Brexit is now going to be "watered down" after the election. Agree?  #FarageOnLBC 
The UK pound's optimism for a soft Brexit is being drowned out by the political mess at Westminster  
Ed Balls says he thinks there will have to be another election during Brexit talks to decide terms @thestrandgroup 
This ace post by @GreenBenali sums up how I feel post-election. I for one will continue to hold Labour to account & that starts with Brexit.  
There can be no compromise. Brexit means leaving the Single Market and Customs Union. That is what we voted for in 2016 and again last week. 
A little-known UK rule threatens the post-Brexit future for a huge number of EU citizens in Britain. @IsaCNN reports  
Tories cant begin Brexit talks, cant do Queen Speech Cant govern What keeps em there? self-entitlement @chakrabortty 
Our joint academy report listing UK institutional dependency on EU funding highlights #Brexit implications  
Once and for all: it was Spain who decreed that the Catalan independence referendum would be unilateral; WE wanted to come to an agreement.  
A bruised PM has a golden opportunity to demonstrate her worth by getting a grip of Brexit talks & obtaining a good deal to trade worldwide. 
I didnt vote for a soft Brexit on June 23rd last year , or June 8th this year . I wanted to Leave the EU , no strings attached. 
“You might as well pick someone at random from the Yellow Pages. They’d be better than her!” @simon_schama on Theresa May and #Brexit  
And as a bonus you get pictures of squirrels rather than idiot bollocks about Ruth "Brexit is literally nothing to do with me" Davidson. 
I'm a Labour voter in my 50s and I'm a hard remainer too. I voted Labour to beat the Tories and their awful manifesto - not for Brexit 
Watching the news this evening, the SNP still think a referendum should be held. Sturgeon still thinks she calls the shots. Incredible. 
What the hell are we doing to ourselves & our NHS? #Brexit is a f**king nightmare. EU nurse applicants drop by 96%   
If Farage is included in Brexit talks, Labour voters can take the credit. With a Tory majority there’d be no chance. 
PM's openness gained full support at the 1922 committee. We MPs will support her to deliver a sensible Brexit & stable Gov @Conservatives 
Bad news. David Davis says his 100 sheets of Brexit facts MUST be etched on panda hide before negotiations can begin.  
Cameron cocks up EU referendum, called for party reasons. May cocks up election, called for party reasons. We need party that CARES ABOUT UK 
Let me be quite clearI do not support the Tories I do not support Tory Brexit I lent my support to Labour I do not support Labour Brexit 
Any future referendum must have a short time scale. You cannot let the bbc have 2 years free reign at undermining the vote. 
What Nietzsche's philosophy can tell us about why Brexit and Trump won ...  
More thinking to be done, but I’m increasingly sure that the commentariat’s errors on Corbyn are bound up with erroneous readings of Brexit. 
5) I saw Brexit as the ultimate confirmation of the political power of the right-wing tabloids. It seems I greatly overestimated that power. 
Can't help but feel your constant slagging of the PM is somewhat responsible for UKIP voters turning to Labour. Brexit now in danger. 
So Corbyn’s woolly Brexit stance did not stop him from tapping a metro-progressive cultural identity newly enlivened by May’s illiberalism. 
I hope you inform them that Ruth does not represent Scotland at the Brexit table. This is what is being pushed 
Statement from @RuthDavidsonMSP after meeting the PM. Priority on the economy in Brexit, and leaving Common Fisheries Policy.  
if this doesn't represent the complete uncertainty and chaos that the unstable Brexit is causing then nothing will 
2) The Brexit vote was not (as I thought) a “free kick” for voters fed up with the cuts but too cautious to switch party allegiances. 
1) The referendum felt like a measure of the youth-turnout ceiling. But in practice it was a ceiling-raiser, ie a moment of politicisation. 
Assuming the referendum is the people's final word is like assuming a teenager means it when they say "I hate you." 
Does public know that #brexit and leaving #Euratom will deprive cancer patients of vital radio therapy?  
-Queen's speech delayed- Brexit talks delayed- manifesto in the bin- under the thumb of DUP. May was right about a #CoalitionOfChaos 
ESTRAGON: Well, shall we get on with the job of Brexit?VLADIMIR: Yes, let's get on with the job of Brexit.[They do not move.] 
Interrogating my serial underestimation of Corbyn's electability, I have hit on a thought: it mostly stems from a misreading of Brexit. 
FT EXCLUSIVE: The EU insists on having the power to relocate London's lucrative euro clearing business after Brexit  
So the Tories soft Brexit / single market call appears to have lasted only one meeting?   
@BBCNews now leading us to believe it was @RuthDavidsonMSP idea for shared talks about brexit. Check what @NicolaSturgeon said 6 months ago! 
Why not report the PM's apparent answer to that?  @RuthDavidsonMSP call for an 'Open Brexit' brushed aside?  
Tell your MP that there is *no mandate* for Theresa's Brexit - sign up here! #Brexit @bestforbritain 
Poland Vows Referendum on Migrant Quota Amidst EU Pressure @BrietbartNews 
'Astonished' German MEP says UK must NOT be punished as Brexit will damage BOTH sides  
"It's become comical that every holiday becomes a referendum on Reince," said one Trump adviser  
Today:Nurse registrations down 96%Queen's Speech & Brexit delayedDirty deal with fundamentalistsNo idea on Brexit#LaughingStock 
Here is Pep Guardiola reading the manifesto in favor of holding a referendum on Catalan independence, June 11.  
More post-arithmetic politics: the leader with 62% of Scottish seats shouldn't be making demands about Brexit, but the one with 23% can   
Pushed on approach to Brexit by a Brexiteer at the 1922, PM replied it's important to 'listen to all voices in the party...'. 
Treatment of #DUP wholly unfair, clear that arrangement concerns economy and opportunities of Brexit, not devolved social policy in NI 2/2 
Just out of 1922 committee PM was humble and steadfast and certain that we have to get on with the job of government and negotiating Brexit 
.@RuthDavidsonMSP @ScotTories - many who live in Scotland voted Tory AND Brexit.  Stop causing unnecessary division.  
Still, there are big debates in UK politics where I will want to make my voice heard. My @FT column on Brexit:    2/3 
Report: Climate Skeptic Nigel Farage Could Gain Major Role In Brexit Deal  
.@RCorbettMEP asks whether May's #Brexit plans have been turned on their head after the general election  
Gutted u were not re-elected. I hope you can somehow use your skills and experience to do something about Brexit 
ICYMI today I blog on why for the first time since the Brexit vote it is possible the UK doesn't leave after all  
.@NicolaSturgeon says a hard #Brexit is "dead in the water" and questions the future of Theresa May's government  
Brexit may mean ‘nursexit’: 96% drop of EU nurses registering to practise in the UK since July 2016  
Betting against Brexit: Why one strategist says the UK won’t leave the EU  
Q) Have you seen the Muffin Man?A) Let me be very clear I will help secure a stronger economy & a brighter future for Britain post Brexit.  
Davidson appears unable to realise that it is Brexit that is responsible for the SNP's decline & the rise of Conservatives in Scotland 
WE NOW GO LIVE TO BREXIT  
Self-inflicted... #fleshwound #TheresaMay #Brexit #UK #election #europe #MontyPython @TheBuffaloNews  
Both parties will look daft when they realise they were frightened & bullied into Brexit by foreign dark powers & billionaire tax avoiders.  
My thoughts on what the #election result (& so-called #DUPCoaliton ) could mean for #Brexit & #BrexitNegotiations : 
Ruth Davidson on her meeting with May. Says she's certain the PM will put the "country’s economic future first" in Brexit negotiations.  
SNP Westminster leader in waiting Ian Blackford wants Belfast govt in Brexit talks. Sturgeon doesn't want DUP involved in government. Clear? 
FM: "There has to be a change of approach...every voice in the UK has to be listened to." #brexit 
There are people discovering the stuff about Brexit they should have known last June.And some of them are in government.#bbcpm @bbcpm 
Based on 23% turnout?  Puerto Rican turnout in elections is usually in the 70 - 80% range. 78% turned up for 2012 referendum.  
This is the end of hard Brexit and may be the beginning of Bremain 
I thought Cameron's cynical decision to call the referendum was supposed to stop the eternal Tory civil war over Europe? That went well then 
Queen's speech delayed. Brexit delayed. Economy now on a shoogly peg. This is known as Strong and Stable. 
To @UKLabour:  Brexit or the entire remainder of your manifesto.  The two are incompatible and LD won't support Brexit.  Which do you want? 
Majority of Brits want Brexit to be negotiated by a cross-party team - 30% want the Tories to negotiate them alone  
Scottish Conservative leader Ruth Davidson says free trade should be at the heart of a Brexit deal 
Utter bollocks from @faisalislam: 'Tory eurosceptic caucus lost seats". Creeping media agenda to dilute Brexit is not what people voted for 
Theresa May's chief of staff Gavin Barwell: Austerity and Brexit cost us  
Lord Buckethead has agreed to lead Brexit negotiations  
What if lots of others think the same? Would it ever be right to think again about this Brexit thing? Brexiteers? Hello? Hello?  
As other parties bicker and confuse on #Brexit @theSNP make a clear and coherent case to remain in Single Market. 
Staying either in the Customs Union or single market would negate Brexit. It must be a complete Brexit, not a mangled halfway house. 
Theresa May currently at bargaining stage of grieving process#hungparliament #Theresamay #Brexit #Election 
If Farage find his way onto our brexit team negotiators it won´t be long before he is leading the country to greatness. 
The asymmetry of potential Tory rebellions over Brexit (spoiler: hard Brexiteers look away now)  
Number of EU nurses moving to UK drops 96 per cent since Brexit vote  
 Watch: "Voters rejected job destroying extreme Brexit": @NicolaSturgeon  
Davidson - I do think there can be changes in the offer on Brexit as we go forward 
Davidson - I made it clear to PM we have to reach out and work with others on Brexit 
"We will deliver a red, white, blue and Orange Brexit"#GE17 
No single party in UK can make #Brexit happen. Because no party has anything approaching unity within it on *how* to make it happen. 
Did you have an option of a watered-down Brexit on your ballot paper? I voted to Leave, not for Remain in disguise  
Election:Very depressing state of affairs.If May will go and Corbyn will be PM. The two of them need to focus on BREXIT as priority 
All talk of leaving the EU has subsided in all other member countries who have watched us. It's time to stop this #Brexit nonsense. 
middle aged blokes from Gravesend who voted Brexit to save the NHS saying young people voted Labour on false promises 
'A matter for doctors, not politicians' - couldn't agree more. Call a referendum & get the 8th out of the constitution asap #repealthe8th 
This election was about austerity and services. Brexit was a distraction and nothing else.  
Look at the complete mess #Brexit has caused. All this because bigots don’t want hard working Polish in the UK. Scrap it NOW. Queen's Speech 
Farage the NEGOTIATOR? DUP pushes for ex-Ukip leader to be given role to protect Brexit Brilliant idea! 
Elections 2 be boycotted until referendum date announced. #Zoo will grind 2 a halt! #FreeBiafra 
EU citizens can vote in local elections. If they did so as a block in May 2018 that would have a devastating impact on #Brexit parties. 
Orange Order asks DUP for a Drumcree march#PIP#Foodbanks#Brexit#DementiaTaxA March!! DUP priorityWTF!!! 
There's been a 96% drop in nurses registering to work in the UK since the EU referendum  
Because you all definitely want to know this, a hard Brexit (WTO) would lead to a 3.5% import tax on EU-sourced vellum. You're welcome.  
IT'S JUST ANOTHER MANIC MONDAY! #CHAOS If hard Brexit is dead, the odds on a chaotic one have shortened  
Since Brexit? Or since introduction of English language tests? EU nurse applicants drop by 96% since Brexit vote   
Was the non-Tory vote about reversing Brexit? Minority of Lab voters and only just over half of LDs say they want to stop Brexit happening.  
So essentially, Labour are pushing for hard brexit, dressed up in same fluffy "cake and eat it" language as Vote LeaveThanks, that's clear 
So apart from May delaying Brexit talks & the Queen's speech, ditching manifesto promises and dancing to the DUP tune, it's going super 
It's a means by which Labour could be punished for its #Brexit stance without risking handing yet more national power to the Tories. 
In this week's Shoot Oursleves In The Face Brexit Special:  
The crescendo of parrots screeching '80% of votes were for Brexit parties' is more dishonest and ignorant than 'strong and stable'. 
It's some way off, but if Labour is still wedded to #Brexit all #Remain'ers should vote #LibDem, Green or SNP in the 2018 local elections 
#Brexit is becoming toxic. Talk to your friends, family, neighbours and work colleagues, explain how it makes no sense. Build a momentum! 
Calls for DUP to reveal source of €500k Brexit donation  
There must be something in it for Jeremy @jeremycorbyn , because there is sod all in it it for me. Brexit works for no-one. No Brexit.  
the floor is discussing brexit with the fam  
After the way Sturgeon reacted to the nurse on QTand her attack on kezia, is it any wonder no-one trusts her..keep her north out of brexit.. 
Shameful and concerning that #Brexit is preventing our NHS from hiring the nurses is desperately needs #LeaveWatch 
Number of EU nurse applications drops from 1,304 in July 2016 to 46 in April 2017   #NHS #Nurses #Health #Brexit 
No one gives a fuck about Brexit right now. Why are they all so obsessed with it like it's the only issue we face as a country? 
The Tory right sees #Brexit as a chance to create a tax haven for the rich that will never recur. They will do anything to get it.#Remain 
Airbus threatens to move jobs over Brexit: the plane giant lays down Brexit terms to keep wing production in UK (£)  
96% drop in EU nurses registering to work in Britain since Brexit vote  
Tory voters said having the best party on Brexit and best PM were most important factors; for others, it was parties’ motives & promises...  
2/3 The public didn't 'demand Brexit'. 52% of them did. The public didn't (indeed couldn't) vote for a hung parliament. 
As EU threatens year-long delay to Brexit negotiations, UK says it should be plenty of time to get at least another 3 or 4 elections in. 
And still: 62% of SNP voters resistant to Brexit. Let's keep focussing on what we have, as well as what's lost.  
Theresa May justified the election saying she wanted a stronger mandate to negotiate Brexit.  She's ended up with a weaker mandate. RESIGN!  
John Oliver introduces the solution to Britain’s Brexit woes: Lord Buckethead.  
John Oliver digs deep into the Brexit bucket on #LastWeekTonight  
Labour Brexit position, my understanding: single market membership as stands not aim, but not ruled out as interim. Keener on Customs Union 
Here's last night's story on the recent British elections, the status of Brexit, and an international space lord:  
Number of EU nurses applying to work in Britain plummets 96% since Brexit  
Poland Vows Referendum on Migrant Quota Amidst EU Pressure: 'The Public's Voice Will Be Heard'  via @BreitbartNews 
Theresa May will "prune" Tories' election manifesto and pursue "softer" Brexit, David Davis has hinted  
EU nurse applicants drop by 96% since Brexit vote 
Remember @theresa_mayBrexit means Brexit 17.4 million people voted for it.  
'You stuck your beak in' Radio host blasts Gina Miller for 'thrusting herself' into Brexit  
The Queen’s Speech and the Brexit talks have been postponed – this is not a functioning government 
This is a tragedy. Especially when many Brexit voters voted because they were told by a bus it would improve the NHS  
Tories keep claiming there "isn't appetite in the country for another election". I think there is. Let's have a referendum to find out 
The election was supposed to be about Brexit and leadership, and those who agreed tended to vote Conservative. But not everyone agreed...  
So. Queen's Speech delayed, Brexit Talks delayed, Manifesto Gone. Any more recent promises that @theresa_may can go back on? 
Vladimir Putin has sent a warning to United Kingdom, telling them “Brexit will never happen” if left to the Elites! 
BIAFRA: THERE WILL BE NO ELECTION IN BIAFRALAND UNTIL THEY GIVE ME A DATE FOR REFERENDUM – KANU  
"These figures should act as a wake-up call to the Government as they enter Brexit negotiations" says @janetRCN  
The time is right for a coalition across all parties – to negotiate an EU deal - ratified in a second referendum.  
This Brexit-themed porno made me think long and hard about myself  pic.twitter.com/1JtdhYd7wp 
Last time they had a referendum in 1975, 67 pct voted Remain... yet for 40 years folks campaigned to leave. Shd they have "gotten over it"? 
Queen's speech delayed, Brexit talks on hold and Tory majority gone. Seems like  a bad week for Theresa May, maybe she should just resign. 
Timely report from Harvard University on why May's extreme damaging #Brexit would be a disaster for jobs and investment in Britain  
Europeans will be full of respect though. 'Oh you don't have a Brexit policy because your queen is looking at horses. That's fine.' 
Worth pointing out that DoH and NMC both say this reduction is partially due to changes in language testing – but neither deny Brexit effect 
Hold on a minute! Weren't we warned that Brexit talks would begin days after the election? 
This idea was floating around a lot in the early days after Brexit vote. Then disappeared. Now back.  
96% drop in nurse applications since #Brexit. We spoke to several EU nurses earlier this year. Watch our film here:  
Farmers say crops will go unpicked in British fields this year directly due to the Brexit vote... Hope this will be propely reported. 
Nursing crisis being worsened by Brexit as UK sees 96% fall in applications from EU states  
Pollsters have had another poor showing, after botching the previous general election and the Brexit referendum  
See John Oliver nominate Lord Buckethead for Brexit negotiator on #LastWeekTonight  
John Oliver breaks down how UK elections will affect Brexit and what Lord Buckethead can do to help  
It's a democratic affront for the Tories to negotiate Brexit propped up by DUP. Press pause now and get a pan-political team to speak for UK 
Wow... 96% drop in the registration of new #NHS nurses from the EU since the brexit referendum (07/2016 - 04/2017). 1 in 9 posts vacant. 
Won't be as easy to justify Brexit support when people see operations cancelled due to Nursing shortages. 
Start date of #Brexit talks uncertain, says UK government  
The 'democratic' unionist party continues to ignore the democratic will of people here on Brexit @columeastwood 
There is value for Labour in Brexit being seen as a "Tory project", which is why they'll be wary of cross-party approach. 
Concern grows that formal Brexit talks could be delayed by the fallout from Britain's shock election  
More time needed for Brexit talks? Just do them on the District Line, where a '1 minute' wait for a train is equivalent to 4 human hours 
AN ELECTION WAS CALLED TO GET A MANDATE FOR BREXIT.  BOTH PARTIES WANT HARD BREXIT. BOTH PARTIES LOST. DO THE MATHS.  
Breaking news: Theresa may say,s she is unavailable for brexit negotiations on july 12th, as she is busy with her orange walks...... 
Proud? No, me neither. Absolutely embarrassed doesn't cover it.EU nurse applicants drop by 96% since Brexit vote -  
Agreed that there shld be collaboration, however > 84% of the electorate voted for a party advocating a hard Brexit. Why wld we go soft?  
The Queen's Speech is delayed. UK is hurtling through #Brexit negotiations with no government. You may as well try self governance, UK. 
There's not one benefit to be delivered from Brexit @jeremycorbyn @johnmcdonnellMP @Keir_Starmer ? When are you going to tell the truth? 
Cross party approach to #Brexit : sensible way forward.  Presenting EU with a united front in best interests of the country and the economy 
Post-referendum:Remain: OK, let's get ourselves a deal like Norway and Switzerland.Leave: Don't be silly, they're basically *in* the EU. 
Ridiculous. McDonnell says SM membership wld be interpreted as not respecting referendum. But back then: nobody is talking about leaving SM. 
Staying in Europe's single market and customs union could now be realistic Brexit options  
Are we missing the most obvious deal.Con & LDs - Supply and confidence in exchange for a third referendum/referendum on the Brexit deal 
There's Boris Johnson turning to answer me asking what kind of Brexit he wants. 'A good one' he said. Tories don't agree on what that is.  
ECJ ruled against this vile policy, which is why keeping EU asylum law on the books post-Brexit matters. A deal with homophobes won't help.  
So, why did the #DUP spend so much campaigning to leave the European Union? #Brexit #GE2017 #JC4PM #mayresign 
Corbyn can't save the NHS with a hard Brexit. Because he'll have no nurses.  
5. A note on Brexit. Labour needs to play this very carefully. It might have mopped up some Leave votes, but its voters are Remain  
EU Nationals not applying for jobs in NHS anymore.Don't feel wanted in UK.Another reason Brexit has put NHS in crisis @BrexitBin @NHSMillion 
Here's our piece from last night on the UK Election and upcoming Brexit negotiations... 
Few, if any, could now reasonably deny - that the holding of the Brexit referendum has totally screwed up the stability of this country. 
We'd rather have the devil & the deep blue sea than De Vil and the DUP A so-called government with NO MANDATE cannot start Brexit talks  
.@Jane_CollinsMEP urges DUP not to use Ireland border argument to derail Brexit  
Westminster now:Queen's Speech may/may not be delayedDUP deal may/may not be agreedBrexit talks may/may not go ahead 
How Ireland's border became a bigger Brexit issue  
Brexit Secretary Insists UK Will End Free Movement as MPs Push for ‘Soft Brexit’  
'early Brexit wins will create the momentum for a good business deal'  
Like how those 'down at heel grubby children' have to pick up the tab for Brexit; an idea forced through by out-of-touch oldies like you?  
Exactly. Let's drop this intellectual dishonesty that the election proved that 80+% of the electorate wants hard Brexit  
British parties all gain if they share #Brexit pain. Via @Breakingviews  Our live blog  
Proof that this was not an election about Brexit. Londoners voted for party, in spite of its Brexit policy.  
Brexit talks won't start next Monday after all, despite Theresa May repeatedly saying they would #DUPCoalition 
And if anyone thinks that's some kind of endorsement of the Brexit position in Labour's manifesto they have another think coming.  
Here's Gove's argument against the Good Friday Agreement, which he called the result of a "rigged referendum"  
Oh FFS!! The Queens speech has been delayed so has Brexit talks No Manifesto No mandate No majority just utterly clueless..#GetCorbyn 
A Prime Minister enfeebled & with little power, ridiculed across the world for her horrendous political judgement. Brexit negotiations? No. 
F.A.O Government. We, the intelligent people, want Nigel Farage involved in negotiating Brexit. Please re tweet into the 1000's if you agree 
Theresa May has lost her mandate and Commons majority for an extreme, job-destroying Brexit. Me on with @NickFerrariLBC this morning: 
May turning up to Brexit negotiations whilst representing a government that isn't really a government.  
The approach to #Brexit "has to change" says SNP leader @NicolaSturgeon 
Sturgeon: 'look again' at BrexitDavidson: 'look again' at BrexitSturgeon: and involve other partiesDavidson: and involve other parties 
'Can someone tell the EU we'll need to delay Brexit negotiations for few days, this goat's skin doesn't dry like it used to'. #QueensSpeech 
The threat of riots from the far right is literally the only reason to go through with Brexit now,I say let them.Better than the alternative  
"Jobs, Brexit, democracy, education...usual sort of stuff. It's all here. You can read it later. Right, be lucky! I'm off to the races."  
"Short term memories, short term plans, shouldn't be allowed to vote!!!" -votes Brexit and dies of old age three years later-  
Is it just me totally peed off with #brexiteers claiming 80% voted for #Brexit in the #GE No, they didn't, the majority voted against #May 
EU 'to delay Brexit talks by a year' because of Theresa May  
When will you BREXIT from the Middle Class? #UK #London #brexit 
4) This - supported by Labour May says back to original hard brexit planA new kind of politics … 
May says Brexit talks start next week. EU says next year. Nobody knows when Queen's speech will happen. What a mess.  
The Queen’s Speech and the Brexit talks have been postponed – this is not a functioning government  
3) This - David Davis uses Labour position to put Hard Brexit back on the table  
#Labour #Brexit1) Thread - Labour give kiss of life to hard brexit in 4 TweetsThis-Hard Brexit dead on Friday morning as results come in  
“The Tory Cabal, cooking up a job-destroying extreme Brexit, approach is dead in the water": @NicolaSturgeon #skynews 
Why one of London's most exclusive boroughs rejected Theresa May and voted Labour  
There are people discovering the stuff about Brexit they should have known about last June.And some of them are in government.#wato 
International opinion on UK as attractive and welcoming place to live and work drops to all-time low  #brexit #ge2017 
.@Theresa_May called #GE2017 to pursue a hard & destructive Brexit. The people rejected this: there is no mandate for hard Brexit. Pls RT:  
Lord Buckethead helps John Oliver explain Brexit negotiations  
HOW can UK negotiate BETTER trade DEALS than EU27 while SIZE MATTERS more than all? #Brexit #stopbrexit #GE2017 #hungparliament #reshuffle 
96% fall in nurses from EU registering to work in NHS since Brexit  Time to positive case for immigration! 
Important call by @yvettecoopermp for cross-party commission to conduct Brexit negotiations  
Brexit won't make London any less open to talent and innovation, Mayor @SadiqKhan says  
Queens speech *postponedBrexit talks *delayedTories In bed with DUP/KKKMay is a risk to U.KCrush her @jeremycorbyn CRUSH HER 
The people have spoken: there is no mandate to pursue a hard & destructive Brexit  
UK election result 'may delay Brexit talks'  
Remember May's 'Coalition of chaos' attack on Labour? Now Queen's Speech/Brexit talks delayed as DUP deal unresolved  
Permanent problem of Brexit negotiation timetable is every Minister has to be in Commons for tight votes if other parties don't cooperate. 
Project Fear! Oh no, wait, this is just Fear- EU nurse applicants drop by 96% since Brexit vote  
#Brexit: researchers find consensus among public that #EEA 'Norway model' might be best in short term 
Pm @theresa_may called GE triggering#brexit wastes 2 months risked national interest for party gain & losses she is criminally irresponsible 
Since last summer’s Brexit vote arrivals of nurses to Britain from Europe have fallen by 96 per cent  
The Queen's Speech may really be delayed! First, it can't be written until DUP deal done. Second, 19 June clashes with Brexit negotiations.  
I have yet to hear any Politician speak so eloquently about British Politics & Brexit as does Jacob Reece Mogg. 
Well done May and RuthYou've wrecked the UK, you've wrecked the economy, you've wrecked Brexit and now you've stoked terrorist violence  
It’s delusional to claim the election result was a vote against Brexit, says Ross Clark.  
#Brexit negotiations must be delayed!#Austerity must be ended & reversed!#TheresaMay's position is unsustainable!#MayMustGo #ForTheMany 
Country has rejected #TheresaMay's direction of travel on #Brexit & #Austerity! May should neither be heading EU negotiations nor be PM! 
Charles Moore's solution to the hard Irish land border Brexit nightmare? "Recreate the concept of the British Isles"  
'Sensibles' versus 'Creationists' seems a fitting description of the Brexit divide.  
Brexit delayed, Queen's Speech delayed, manifesto commitments axed. If only there was someone ready for government.  
Brexit vote has led to a “crash” in the number of European nurses registering to work in the UK  #Brexit #NHS 
EXCLUSIVE: Cabinet 'sensibles' plot soft Brexit  
Trinity could attract ‘star academics’ after Brexit if pay restraints eased  
Memo to Ruth Davidson: Staying within the EU's Common External Tariff would be "Closed Brexit", not Open Brexit. Maybe not Brexit at all. 
This is huge. Mrs May may become Mrs Maybe.No Queen's speech means no government.Brexit talks likely delayed.The Irish hold the key.  
How about we have a referendum on whether or not to have another election? 
Nicola Sturgeon calls for a "four nation" Brexit negotiating team  
Re-upping my Sat thread after No 10 now say no change to Brexit plan. Winning neither personal nor Brexit mandate, No 10 isn't listening.  
How long does it take to write: "My government will cling to power for as long as possible while muddling through Brexit" 
EU nurse applicants drop by 96% since Brexit vote  
84% voted for parties who want to leave Single Market. Help us secure the Brexit you voted for. Sign up:  #GE2017 
There were two big events on 19th. Queen's Speech now delayed, I wonder if the start of Brexit talks will be.  
'Theresa May & David Davis have the skills to get the best Brexit deal' - Tory MP Andrew Mitchell to @juliaHB1  
Puerto Ricans voted in favour of US statehood but only 23% participated in the non-binding referendum  
Even if May had won the election, she still would not have been a good prime minister for Brexit.By me, at @FT 
I know this is an echo chamber, and all that, but Brexit is already a toxic failure. (Now I sit back and wait for "stick to cycling" tweets) 
Quite extraordinary. May asked for a mandate for her Brexit plan. She didn't get one, & now proceeds as though she didn't ask at all.  
BBC understands Queen's speech to be delayed "by a few days" until agreement with DUP finalised. Brexit talks also due to begin June 19... 
If people rejected Brexit they would have voted Lib Dem, Green, SNP or Plaid Cymru. They are the anti-Brexit parties  
EU nurse applicants drop by 96% since Brexit vote  
This by @Freeman_George is 1. scathing about where it all went wrong 2.astute on voters' muddled signals re Brexit  
Number of EU nurses applying to work in UK down by 96% since Brexit vote  
Roadmap for a sane Brexit. My article in today's Standard:  
David Davis admits Government may pursue 'softer' Brexit  
Soft Brexit is nothing more than lipstick on a pig or a gilded turd. There is only Brexit and I don't want it. 
UK media have proved themselves to favour Remain.They've leapt on this "soft Brexit" bollox, as it clouds the whole thing.Lies, damn lies. 
There is now talk that Theresa May will delay both #brexit talks & the Queen's speech which indicates the Tories aren't fit to govern. 
 EU position papers just published on #Brexit website for transparency & public debate on #Article50 negotiations  
It's #Brexit.Not 'soft Brexit' or any other manufacture of UK media.Remember how they tried to con at EURef?Don't believe their lies now. 
There was absolutely nothing in #Election2017 to signal that people want a watered down #Brexit Yet Remainers are telling us there was. 
DUP WANT FARAGE INVOLVED IN BREXIT NEGOTIATIONSSupport for Nigel to help carry out Brexit 
So this morning both the Queen's Speech and opening of Brexit negotiations have been delayed... 
A message for the deluded media: Anyone who thinks the #DUP want a soft #BREXIT does not understand the DUP or the BREXITEER #ArleneFoster 
No mandate from the British people for a “soft” or “open” Brexit. Clear analysis by @TheBluetrot @LeaveEUOfficial 
Pound falls below $1.27 on the prospect of Brexit talks being led by an unstable government  
So:-Queen's Speech may be delayed-Brexit talks may be delayed#gettingonwithgoverning 
A soft Brexit is like a blunt guillotine, it isn't going to kill any less. Give me no guillotine any time. I really don't want any Brexit 
Article by @Andrew_Adonis @EveningStandard on a new cross party alliance on a 'sane' Brexit  
Hung parliament should end Tory claim that #Brexit policy is their gift alone. Time for consensus. 
NATIONAL PRIDE IS STARVING MILLIONS OF BIAFRA CHILDREN'S DEATH TO MAINTAIN COLONIA SYSTEM? NIGERIA IS A UNION OF NATIONS REFERENDUM NOW   
"It's become comical that every holiday becomes a referendum on Reince," said adviser to the president  via @politico 
Today's @EveningStandard editorial - why realism requires a new and welcome approach to the Brexit talks   
And so ..the Battle over Brexit begins..... @George_Osborne 
DUP discover a magic money tree, probably the same tree that will pay for Brexit, whilst nurses starve. Nice! 
PLEASE SAVE US FROM HARD BREXIT, RUTH  
The DUP want Farage brought to the table in Brexit negotiations  
Are DUP talks delaying date of Queens Speech? No10 very unclear on whether it will still be 19June - or if Brexit talks wd start then either 
It really couldn't be any worse for Tories who called the referendum + election and screwed up both. Catastrophic isn't the word. #Brexit  
Ruth Davidson says she supports staying in the single market, adding to soft Brexit voices in the Conservative Party  
Brexit should be negotiated by cross-party team - not extreme right wingers - please RT 
And Brexit negotiations start next week. El-em-ay-oh.  
First day back at work and Labour already on Brexit policy number 2.  
Seems on even first #Brexit negotiation detail the UK lost out to Ireland.   
After this result, a Tory cabal cannot be allowed to negotiate Brexit alone | Yvette Cooper  
Call it off, The young people now realise their vote counts, they don't want Brexit they want peace and a cleaner safer World. 
"Brexit Crunch"Noun. The effect of May triggering A50 2-year period and then calling election leading to a hung parliament. Painful. 
Big responsibility for the #libdems as #Labour climbs into bed with Tories on hard brexit contrary to the wishes of millions. 
Extreme Brexit is dead after #GE2017 and @ChukaUmunna is “delighted” by that  
Britain's Brexit minister warns talks with the EU could be delayed  
Today's @EveningStandard exclusive on the Cabinet battle between the 'sensibles' & 'creationists' over soft Brexit + @sebcoe on Usain Bolt 
Can anyone who supports Brexit just leave, and let us have our country back. Go & live with your money offshore or something. 
I am 47 and voted Labour, yes I have 3 kids a mortgage and a car. Also I never wanted that referendum Cameron gave us to get his majority 
The best Brexit line so far, courtesy of @mrjamesob "Fish........passports........meh." 
Telegraph: 137 Labour MPs including Ed Miliband saw their seats back Brexit in the referendum – more than half of the parliamentary party. 
Barcelona great Pep Guardiola calls for support on Catalonia's independence referendum as he appears at rally  
when the maths paper tries to be relelvant with brexit @Leaving_2017 
Corbyn wants a hard Brexit Labour MPs have woken up to discover they are hostages to Momentum and that effectively, Labour no longer exists 
Reminder: Brexit negotiations due to start in 7 days. 
Those that still want Brexit think they have nothing to lose.Those that don't want Brexit know we have everything to lose.We all lose. 
How does Ruth plan to scupper a hard Brexit with absolutely no power over the Tory MPs in Scotland? They vote with the whip.  
An even bigger irony is that all the comfortable pensioners who voted for Brexit WON'T be around to pick up the tab for that. 
Our #Brexit choice is not between hard & soft but between good & bad. We must work together to maximise opportunity & minimise disruption. 
Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP says negotiations are not a 'macho process' 
[during campaign] we need the xenophobic vote![during election week] we need you, open-minded youth![after election] nah hard Brexit lol 
Nicola Sturgeon calls for May to pause Brexit negotiations  
Macron looking powerful, 5Star bruised after Italy local elex, Merkel strong in polls, means EU feeling increasingly confident #Brexit 
Applications from EU nurses to work in UK down 96% since Brexit vote  
Labour needs to understand - young Remainers and tactical voters will desert them if they implement the results of a flawed referendum. 
The U.K. election result spells bad news for the E.U, and Brexit  
EU 'to delay Brexit talks by a year' because of Theresa May  
Now we face new, multiple crises in N Irish politics: an executive suspended for 6 months, Brexit raising fears of a hard border... 8/10 
The number of EU nurses registering to practice in UK down 96% since Brexit  #NHS #Health #Brexit 
Puerto Ricans voted in favour of US statehood but only 23% participated in the non-binding referendum  
Same PM, same Brexit secretary - oh and people still voted to leave the EU. Shame some seem to forget the result. No half in, half out. 
Applications from EU nurses to work in UK down 96% since Brexit vote  
I was incensed by her ref to 'the opportunities of Brexit' on Friday. There is no opportunity; it's all damage-limitation. 
Irony of hard Brexit approach: You put your whole project at risk by being unable to budge. But more pragmatism & you'd be in better place. 
Read again: Hard Brexit will hit hardest in rural Scotland  
HEAVER: Corbyn created an exciting movement similar to Farage's Brexit bandwagon. This is the future. Read:  
Brexit: The age of the shit analogy. 
'I think there is a mandate for a softer Brexit than the one Theresa May was arrogantly pursuing' says former Labour party adviser  
We want #Brexit  
interesting how everyone bent over backwards to "understand" Trump/Brexit voters, but not the young people who voted for Corbyn 
'I need a mandate for hard Brexit' says May'No mandate' says electorate.I have no other setting says Maybot 
“Hard” and “soft” Brexit are code words for leaving or staying in the EU.  
John Oliver flew the real Lord Buckethead to NYC to pitch him as a Brexit negotiator for Theresa May.  
Why did the DUP pay for a four page glossy wrap around Brexit ad in a newspaper not even circulated in Northern Ireland? Hmmmm  
>>5 I wanted the Tories out. I wanted a hung parliament. In no way do I support or endorse a Labour Brexit. Are we all clear now?  
Brexit talks won't start next Monday after all, despite Theresa May repeatedly saying they would 
To prove Brexit has to mean leaving the single market first explain why we took six months to choose to do so.  
7. Brexit may be beyond *any* politician. No PM could do it. But. 
Here we see the real nastiness behind #Brexit - blatant threats of violence and intimidation.This must not be rewarded.#Remain 
3. So protected was May from serious criticism, because of Brexit partisanship, mistakes were getting bigger.  Hubris. 
Two unanswered & wholly unconnected questionsWhy are DUP pushing for Farage/Banks to have Brexit role?Who bankrolled DUP during Eu Ref? 
2. Any criticism of May was "remoaning". She had to be defended without question, all along she was making a successful Brexit less likely. 
 @NicolaSturgeon: Brexit talks must reflect the fact that people across the UK have rejected a hard Brexit.  
Eighty-five per cent of us voted for pro-Brexit parties. The parties that wanted another referendum - Greens, SNP, Lib Dems - lost ground.  
Farage the NEGOTIATOR? DUP pushes for ex-Ukip leader to be given role to protect Brexit  
Here I am again. All questions on the the new UK government, Theresa May, Brexit, DUP and anything else, very welcome. Can answer all day.  
The DUP And Brexit's Bad Boys: Even More QuestionsVia @Byline_MediaHad to refer this to the ICO and EC too. 
NO DEAL: David Davis confirms UK could still walk away from Brexit negotiations.  
#VictoriaLIVE - 40% voted JC/Labour because of radical manifesto to change this country. NOT because of Brexit. 
Brexit's knackered - it's got nothing left to promise. 
"The PM does not have a mandate to pursue an extreme #Brexit now"- @ChukaUmunna 
FPTP means there is no practical means by which Remainers can electorally punish Labour without shooting ourselves in the foot.#Brexit 
In the last year Ruth Davidson has argued against Brexit, then for a hard Brexit, then for an 'open Brexit'. Politics is great huh? 
Britain already has a four nations approach to #Brexit with a government represented by Scots, NI, Welsh and English MPs. No need for #SNP. 
Many feel that #Brexit is now in doubt:   
Brexit is god's way of explaining the EU to Brits 
Brexiteers hold key positions in Cabinet:Johnson (FCO)Davis (Brexit)Fox (Intl Trade)Leadsom (HoC Leader)Gove (Farming)Patel (DFID) 
Surely, 'walking away' from a bad Brexit deal ought to mean abandoning Brexit, not not pressing ahead with it regardless 
Brussels doubts Theresa May can stick to Brexit timetableConcern spreads in Brussels that May has 'lost control'  
There has never been a mandate to commit economic suicide. There has never been a mandate to make us poorer. Brexit will deliver both. 
I wonder how many of those who voted Labour realise that their #Brexit policy is identical to Tories' job-destroying Hard Brexit? 
Farage the NEGOTIATOR? DUP pushes for ex-Ukip leader to be given role to protect Brexit  wow DUP might be what's need 
Number of EU nurses registering to practice in UK down 96% since Brexit vote, according to figs obtained by Health Foundation 
Calls to abandon Brexit are just playing into Tory hands, at this point. Better to quietly enjoy seeing it unwind. 
Concern spreads in Brussels that May has "lost control over her own government" and is in no shape for #Brexit talks  
Davis talks with the same confidence and awareness about Brexit as Jay from the Inbetweeners talks about girls.   
Having spent 7 weeks telling us Brexit negotiations would start 11 days after the election, David Davis now admits it probably won't happen. 
"No matter what happens with #Brexit, London will remain open to innovation and talent" @MayorofLondon @SadiqKhan #LondonIsOpen #LTW 
Pep Guardiola calls on the international community to support the Catalan referendum on independence   
#VoteLabour PS) Night of the election Davis was saying Hard Brexit was overNow, thanks to Corbyn & McDonnell - it's back on  
Brexit Still Means Brexit! May's Mistake Not What Most Suggest  
Morning!1. No deal not an option. 2. EEA/Single market is still on the table, and there is no mandate to leave it. 3. Let's not Brexit. 
.@jeremycorbyn ran a great #GE2017 campaign... a shame he didn't put same effort into #EUref, he could have helped to stop Brexit disaster.. 
Some Midlands Lab MPs, (where Labour did actually lose some seats) nervous about single market talk. Promised voters no Brexit backslide. 
"The campaign went wrong - it didn't work," says Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP regarding the Conservatives' General Election campaign 
"Her manifesto didn't win, people don't have confidence in her, DUP will disrupt peace process and in the meantime #Brexit is going on"  
Davidson and Sturgeon are both in Westminster today and both will be trying to put pressure on May to soften Brexit. #TeamScotland 
Brexit Secretary @DavidDavisMP asked whether it's time to consider a soft #Brexit. "We're trying to get a deal for the 100%," he explains.  
Time for a more intellectual and strategical approach to #Brexit with a Conservative heavyweight.  
Dear old people complaining young people are voting for the feckless unknown: you voted for Brexit 
Brexit options v limited: a hard 'Canada' deal or soft Norway/EEA, latter has costs too, or stay in EU (no costs)  
How brilliant, the DUP has asked May for Farage to be on the brexit negotiating team. Don´t you just love those patriots. 
Yes. You need to drop bs phrases like "jobs first Brexit". How about facing the truth - Brexit enriches the few & is bad news for the many! 
Farage the NEGOTIATOR? DUP pushes for ex-Ukip leader to be given role to protect Brexit. How Brilliant. Well done.  
See also: Brexit wasn't just delivered by angry w/class voters in north. These new movements surely broad (not nec stable?) coalitions  
Labour say Theresa May doesn't have a mandate for hard Brexit, but want to leave the EU single market. I'm genuinely confused. 
23% of Puerto Ricans Vote in Referendum, 97% of Them for Statehood -  
Gisela Stuart: If parliament fails to implement Brexit, it is a failure of British democracy |  #Brexit @GiselaStuart 
One of the useful things about Brexit is how shallow it has shown most people's ideological convictions to be. 
advisory referendum replete w propaganda & lies & pos interference was electorate split confused & ill-informed so lets have independent 
..Davis' position essentially reflects wishful thinking that WTO Brexit do-able and that EU would suffer as much as UK in no deal scenario.. 
Youth want NHS, housing, and education system their parents enjoyed = delusional fantasistsElderly wanting Brexit = will of the people! 
A combination of David Davis and Nigel Farage negotiating Brexit would be like Krytonite to the EU. Give them what they fear! #Brexit 
David Davis says Brexit deal is like buying a house - and you'll get screwed by the other side if you're not prepared to "walk away...  
If #Brexit didn't happen who honestly believes businesses/universities/trade organisations would be telling government to take us out again? 
The Brexit Secretary confirms we’ll have to leave the Single Market - saying we can’t control our borders and stay in the Single Market. 
David Davis tells LBC the Brexit process is still continuing: “80% voted for parties who wanted to leave the EU”  
Philip Hammond is believed to be positioning himself as chief advocate of a softer Brexit  
Ruth Davidson is a threat to Brexit. She wants to de-prioritise immigration. Sorry Ruth, that's NOT what we voted for.  
For clarity. David Davis has stated UK Govt wants some form of "soft border" with Rep of Ireland. DUP also want this. NOT a "soft Brexit"!!! 
Just think this this man could have been starting his new job today getting ready for #Brexit negotiations. Instead we have more #ToryChaos 
I'd just like to thank David Cameron again for holding that referendum. Did us a world of good. 
In supporting hard #Brexit Corbyn is aligning himself with Murdoch, Dacre, Farage, Banks, May, Gove and Trump. Some socialist!#Remain 
Priority for all us in Wales must be to defend these jobs reliant on membership of the single market. May has no mandate for extreme Brexit.  
We have no Brexit plan. We have no consensus, in either of the main parties, in parliament, or in the country, about what we want. 
The architects of 'Project Fear' explained it & were accused of lying by the Brexit leaders now claiming everybody knew it was true.  
Who laundered Brexit £££ with DUP?   Do we have a right to know?? Arlene Foster: 'An organisation in England that wants to see union kept.'  
Can you explain the diff between Tory hard Brexit and labour still leaving the single market/ending fom? I can't work it out? 
Puerto Rico's governor vows to turn the US territory into 51st state after statehood wins in non-binding referendum.  
Puerto Ricans voted in favour of US statehood but only 23% participated in the non-binding referendum  
Labour still all over the place on Brexit. No coherent position at all, no recognition of EU27 free movement and sequencing red lines.  
That explains the huge swing to the anti-Brexit lib dems last week...  
UK could remain in single market after Brexit, says Labour MP  
So SNP compromise brexit plan for Scotland rejected by Tories. But DUP can now make brexit demands? What union of equals is this? 
If elections are about listening to electorate, it's hard to understand why both main parties so deaf to widespread concern re hard Brexit 
'Hard' v 'soft' Brexit a false distinction. There is only one Brexit. The rest is negotiating access to EU and how much we're ready to pay. 
A hard Brexit is more likely than ever. And it may be best for Europe. My thoughts in a thread. 1/ 
Will Theresa May have to soften her Brexit terms? LBJ's rule, the numbers are all. Our Commons tally today;  
David Davis sticking to hard Brexit. Someone please tell him there was an election where they asked for a mandate and didn't get it #R4Today 
There is no “soft Brexit”: it does not exist as a serious or credible option  via @BrexitCentral 
He also told a lorry load of porkies during the EU referendum which won't be forgotten. Did anyone say £350m extra per week for the NHS?  
The BBC is anti Brexit and anti British. I'm about to go live on Periscope to cover this topic. Do join me! 
Politicians call on DUP to reveal source of €500,000 #Brexit donation  Latest DUP dark money @IrishTimes @adamramsay 
My cartoon - David Davis assures us that he & his government are fully prepared for #Brexit negotiations #r4Today 
It's the young voters I feel sorry for. They will suffer the consequences of Brexit the longest. No Brexit is better than any Brexit. 
Just think Corbyn, Stramer and Thornberry would've started today dealing with this massive #Brexit issue. Instead we have more #ToryChaos 
Important we "have the option" of being able to "walk away" from a deal - #Brexit Secretary David Davis  #r4today 
David Davis parroting old sound bites, gungho for Hard Brexit & completely in denial that Tories have no majority in parliament #R4Today 
After Labour spend weeks avoiding the issue, now clearer than ever they support a damaging hard Brexit outside the single market  
She asked for a stronger mandate to negotiate Brexit - didn't get it..so does Brexit really mean Brexit? 
Davis not budging on hard Brexit. Notable that he uses McDonnell demand to leave single market as justification. 
'I'll be in charge of the details' of #Brexit david Davis tells #r4today. Is there a more terrifying sentence in English language right now? 
So David Davis still has no idea about brexit negotiations. Absolutely embarrassing to be represented by these people. #r4today 
Theresa May's new Cabinet to meet for first time since election, with some ministers poised to demand softer Brexit  
'Battle of Brexit' #TheresaMay #May #MayDay #ElectionDay2017 #Election2017 #Juncker #PrayForMay #Brexit #BrexitNegotiations @nrc 
You're welcome & been very distressed by EU citizens in UK treatment to date but hope HMG will finally settle matter in Brexit negotiations  
'@georgegalloway: Corbyn's surge can be placed in the same drawer as victory of Brexit and even Trump.  
Hard or soft Brexit? Sounds like toilet paper. Any Brexit is s*it. Just needed to get that off my chest this Monday morning. 
Does "soft" Brexit exist..  
There is no Hard or Soft Brexit. Brexit means Brexit and OUT mean completely OUT of the DRAINING DICTATING EU. 
How can the Tories negotiate Brexit when they now must also bow to the whim of the DUP. The Tories must end their desperate cling to power. 
Meet the world's unlikeliest socialists, in London's poshest district  
The difference between a 'soft' Brexit and a 'hard' Brexit is the same as the difference between being a little bit pregnant and pregnant. 
SCOT goes POP!: It would be a historic error for the SNP to reverse policy on an independence referendum  
Firms 'totally unprepared' for post-Brexit migration fall, think-tank finds  
With a weakened hand, & Commons that won't accept No Deal, Govt needs to involve other parties in Brexit: Sky Views: 
Farage in meltdown because the reshuffled cabinet is more Remain than Brexit. Someone should tell him it's not his business, never has been. 
Not a 'threat' but good news: 'EU threatens year-long delay in Brexit talks over UK's negotiating stance'  
Except many are already resiling from that position using the "soft Brexit' escape hatch.  
Barry Gardiner and Keir Starmer (and even Jeremy Corbyn) sound more pragmatic about the single market than the Hard Brexit John McDonnell 
Corbyn galvanised youth vote yet supports an extreme Brexit which will damage the life chances of our young people the most 
Am writing a post on how even if May had won thumping majority, she would be a bad Brexit prime minister. The election has not changed this. 
Once, I thought like a Tory, I reasoned like a Tory. Then came Brexit and May, I joined the @LibDems, I put the ways of Tory behind me. 
headlines of the day from Reuters:BRITISH BREXIT MINISTER DAVIS SAYS BRITISH PM MAY IS FINESAYS MAY WAS NOT SOBBING WHEN I SAW HER 
UK business confidence hits rock bottom. Brexit threat to London's Euro clearing house #StopBrexit 
So choices are a) hard (destructive) Brexit orb) soft (pointless) BrexitSo let's add c) #nobrexit and not follow a narrow advisory ref 
BBC in full on demonisation of the DUP. How dare they support Brexit and the Union of Great Britain and N.Ireland? 
Stay in the EU, UK bosses say. @FT :They like the quality of the EU process. Beginning of the end of #Brexit ?  
BBC in full cry this morning suggesting we must stay IN the single market and IN the customs union. Thus - Brexit undone. #traitors 
EU threatens year-long delay in Brexit talks over UK's negotiating stance  
Exclusive: 'Crash' in EU nurses registering to work in UK since Brexit referendum  
There is no “soft Brexit”: it does not exist as a serious or credible option.  
Davis doing a round of media interviews this morning. If there's a softening in the Brexit position this is where we'll find out. 
An ecstatic Chuka Umunna on BBC informing us a "hard Brexit" cannot now happen. I await a Conservative repudiation of this. Or not. 
Goal of hard Brexit should be promptly abandoned before PM's rhetoric does any more damage, says @thetimes leader.  
Was agreeing with everything Hesletine said about May & Brexit. Then he lied 2008 economic crisis caused by overspending not banks. Naughty. 
FM @NicolaSturgeon will be in London to meet @theSNP group. She'll call for pause in Brexit talks and cross-party advisory group  
Scotlands FM in London today to demand 4 nation approach to Brexit. Welsh FM (Labour) doffs cap to Westminster 
Off to London to meet new @scotlibdems MPs and to discuss Brexit and Independence. Our team have an important and pivotal role. 
One of the many problems with  UK politics is that there is no formal means of challenging Brexit, or the expressing the will if 16m people. 
British growth falls behind the rest of the EU following the #Brexit vote @guardian 
The powerlessness of Britain in the #Brexit negotiations is exposed by the @FT 
A Brexit Strategy for a Weak UK Government by Ngaire Woods - Project Syndicate.   
A difficulty place to be but hoping #GE2017 will result in change of policy. Insufficient buyin to Hard Brexit & time for crossparty rethink  
if people really regretted EU referendum vote last year, they’d have supported the rabidly pro-EU LibDems who polled just 7% of the vote.  
Puerto Rico overwhelmingly chooses statehood in non-binding referendum 
Country votes for a kinder, gentler govt, says it's disillusioned with Brexit, the young want a voice. Mrs May's response? Send for Gove 
Puerto Rico votes for U.S. statehood, but this questioned referendum won't be the final word  
Here's the Brexit-type ad being used by @BelfastAirport in RoI - hoping a weak £ makes it more cost competitive v Dublin for some flights. 
The softest #Brexit is no Brexit! In which case businesses would give a collective sigh of relief.  
Brexit author who promised to eat his own book if Corbyn gained seats just delivered  
Will someone please warn Corbyn & @Keir_Starmer?Remind me, why *are* we doing this #Brexit thing...?  
Business calls for softer Brexit in aftermath of election  
Preparing for ‘Brexit,’ Britons Face Economic Pinch at Home  
I agree and see Brexit in exactly same way - @UKLabour wld do very well to see this is the majority view & keep 'No-Brexit' option open 
Jeremy Corbyn MP: My vote for Labour is NOT a vote for #Brexit - #Remain ers Sign the Petition!  via @UKChange 
Puerto Ricans vote for statehood in referendum  
Brexit reminds me of Lost. None of the writers had a clue where the plot was going and it piled up complications for far too many seasons. 
Puerto Rico's voters have backed U.S. statehood in a controversial referendum  
Puerto Ricans voters back statehood in non-binding referendum vote that saw participation rate of just 23%:  
May might be forced to go for soft Brexit, but any hope that EU leaders will offer beneficial deal to a discredited PM is for the fairies 
#PuertoRico voters overwhelmingly chose to become the 51st #US state in a referendum Sun, though just 23% of elegible voters participated  
Puerto Ricans cast referendum vote in favour of US statehood – video  
#TheResistanceWhat Nietzsche's philosophy can tell us about why Brexit and Trump won  via @voxdotcom 
Labour & Tory manifestos committed to Brexit & ending free movement. 84% electorate voted for these parties so clear mandate for Brexit 
UK Snap Election Results in Even More Conservative CoalitionSends Social Justice Brits into FitBREXIT WILL PROCEED 
PIP calls status referendum a ‘resounding failure’ -  
Puerto Rico Overwhelmingly Votes On U.S. Statehood In Non-Binding Referendum - NPR  
From @keiranpedley For the first time since the E.U. referendum it is possible we won’t leave the E.U. after all  
Puerto Rico votes in favor of US statehood in nonbinding referendum  
As remain campaigner Damien Green becomes Theresa May's second-in-command in the Cabinet, how has the election changed your view on Brexit?  
Meanwhile £ continues to drop against Euro.We can rule out #ScotRef as being the cause.That leaves #Brexit and/or May's #CoalitionOfChaos 
Ministers to demand softer Brexit as Cabinet meets for first time  
Puerto Rico closed schools because it's bankrupt but spent millions on a meaningless referendum most voters boycotted. 
Slash EU regulations on wildlife protection and drug safety trials after Brexit, Michael Gove urges  
I can't quietly sit here and watch #SteveHilton, who dragged the Conservative Party to the left, pretend to be in favour of Trump/Brexit 
Europe File: U.K. election result makes a mess of Theresa May’s path to Brexit  
Democracy involves ongoing debate. Brexit is costing UK money, jobs, security, family unity, with no benefit. #Remain is the best deal. 
Puerto Rico's governor announced that the U.S. territory overwhelmingly chose statehood on Sunday in a nonbinding referendum. 
Brexit may not be Brexit; Le Pen party annihilated. Our turn to stomp out Trump & racist, vile alt right in America.  
What connects Brexit, the DUP, dark money and a Saudi prince?  
"Any negotiation is almost pointless at the moment ... nobody has any idea what she (May) wants and nobody trusts her.” Ouch #EU #Brexit 
Fuck me, this is Brexit! Right here!!!   
Puerto Rican voters endorsed a nonbinding referendum for statehood  
While the US investigates how Russia interfered with their election, is there any UK agency investigating foreign influence on #Brexit? 
Puerto Rico Votes For Statehood In Referendum Marred By Record Low Turnout   
Employers 'totally unprepared' for migration fall after Brexit, study finds:  by @AlanJonesPA 
A majority of Puerto Ricans voted in support of statehood in a nonbinding referendum on Sunday.  
REPORT: Meddling EU Urged Theresa May to Hold Snap Election in Hopes to ‘Derail’ Brexit  
When will our politicians have the guts to admit that they know full well that Brexit is a disaster that mustn't happen? 
Do or die for Theresa May as #DUP meeting, leadership battle rumors and #Brexit negotiations loom large 
Should we now call it Brexit or Brexit Shambles? 
Business speaks up for softer Brexit in election aftermath 
Brexit?...we're just fine and stocked up with food...so if you need to borrow some ketchup to put on your flag, pop by and we'll oblige.. 
Brexit is a fuck of clusters. Prices going up & we haven't even left yet. Division, uncertainty, weakness & instability. Good job "people"! 
Puerto Rico referendum backs calls for island to become 51st US state  
Exclusive: Theresa May invites Dracula to supervise Blood Banks. 
Would you add that the turn out was about 23 percent ; historically low for this of referendum 
Sorry Jess -Corbyn is still unelectable Labour LOST, many of the votes Lab got were a protest against hard Brexit Corbyn is ruining Labour  
give us our GODDAMN referendum now and give us our goddamn bodies back. fuck. 
IRONY KLAXON: Brexit campaigners funnelling dark money through Northern Ireland to fund “Take Back Control” adverts  
How Do You Like Your Brexit In The Morning - Hard, Soft, Smooth, 'English', Or Late?  
With the recent parliamentary result in France once again showing the lies of Brexit, I think this worth reposting:  
Puerto Rico voters back statehood in referendum marred by boycotts  #FoxNewsWorld 
And now the DUP allegedly demands failed Farage should be a Brexit negotiator. He shouldn't be within a million miles of NI or Brexit talks.  
Contrast cldnt be greater: omnishambles Britain v France where Macron's grip on power got even tighter. He told me he wld make Brexit tough 
Ex-British chancellor: No 'hard Brexit'  
Not to pick on one person but..Why do millions of people in UK still believe a decent #Brexit EU trade deal without FoM is possible?  
Labour was lent millions of votes from tactical remainers hoping to block May's hard brexit power bid.Labour needs to back Single Market  
There's so much in this from Fintan O'Toole on Brexit & election that is quotable that you might as well read it all  
Sometimes a liberal, tolerant, open society has to fight to defend itself.#Brexit #Remain 
UK tourists will pay more because of #Brexit, the falling pound and countries' price rises, Thomson's owner says  
Jeremy Corbyn has been handed the chance to stop a Brexit disaster. He won’t.  
Without (surely) May intending to do so, no scheming demon could deliberately make Brexit less successful. 
Let's hope Labour is seeing sense on Brexit.  
If an imaginary demon had been charged with the task of sabotaging a successful Brexit, It would do no different from May. 
SAN JUAN, Puerto Rico (AP) - #PuertoRico's governor says the #US territory has overwhelmingly chosen statehood in nonbinding referendum 
The Latest: Puerto Rico's governor says the US territory overwhelmingly chose statehood in non-binding referendum.  
So how does Jeremy Corbyn  explain why he supports "brexit", following a Subverted referendum AND with 4.9 million citizens disenfranchised? 
Just had a thought. The government that promised to implement the result of the EU referendum is now gone. That was the '15-'17 government. 
BREAKING: Puerto Rico's governor says U.S. territory has overwhelmingly chosen statehood in nonbinding referendum. 
PUERTO RICO REFERENDUM- Become U.S. state: 97.1%- Independence: 1.5%- Status quo: 1.3%Turnout: 23% 
With all the debate about indyref2 worth remembering Scotland once again got a UK Tory Govt we didn't vote for & a Brexit we didn't vote for 
Let's just cut to the chase: Theresa May is finished, the Tories will implode over Brexit & Brexit will soft. Corbyn will be PM. 
Puerto Rican voters heavily favor statehood in an early count of referendum results  
The #Brexit press made it impossible for British governments to take a constructive European stance within the EU. Saboteurs.#Remain 
Puerto Ricans vote overwhelmingly to become a U.S. state, but turnout for the non-binding referendum was only 23% - results 
Remember "soft Brexit" = staying inside the EU. Looks like we will be sold out by the Conservatives  
The @Conservatives won this election & voters chose @theresa_may to lead. Let's support her, deliver Brexit & get on with the job #GE2017 
Remember, Art 50 signed by now discredited, lame-duck PM whose bid for 'hard Brexit' mandate failed. UK can & should now reconsider 'Brexit' 
EXCLUSIVE Some of May's most senior ministers are now plotting a soft Brexit  @bpolitics @TimRoss_1 @Brexit 
Seems to me everyone saying indyref2 is dead is by implication also saying that brexit means brexit and the UK will make a success of it. 
*Tories Brexit Shambles*  
THE TIMES: May signals soft Brexit in cabinet reshuffle #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Curtice: "90% of yes voters in the 2014 referendum voted SNP in the 2015 General Election - only 75% of yes voters backed SNP in #GE2017." 
In Puerto Rico referendum, 97% support statehood, but low turnout could undermine the nonbinding vote  
THE TIMES FRONT PAGE: 'May signals soft Brexit in cabinet reshuffle' #Skypapers 
DUP ready to demand that NIGEL FARAGE takes part in Brexit negotiations   I do hope so.  Nigel is the man for the job 
Remainers have been far too nice regarding #Brexit. Being nice doesn't work. Politicians don't listen to nice reasonable people. #Remain 
Putin backs #Brexit. Here's Seamus Milne Corbyn's Director of Communications shaking hands with Putin.Join the f..ing dots. #Remain 
Next Tuesday, when Macron tells Maybot she can't have tariff free access to the Single Market without FoM Brexit will be over. Happy days! 
I'm a Green Party member, and opposed Brexit. But voted tactically for Labour in a very marginal seat. It worked! Labour majority 3k. 
Last summer UK sleepwalked towards hard/chaotic Brexit despite only minority support  Next few months will see if that can be reversed. 
International & regional reactions to Kurdish referendum were expected and understandable.No big surprises. Referendum is democratic process 
*Brexit Shambles*  
The demented insistence that Brexit would be a good thing in spite of ever growing evidence to the contrary was to save Conservative face. 
Reminder for those arguing what election means for #Brexit. The *referendum* didn’t necessitate Hard Brexit. It was Tories that got us there 
The EU referendum was called to shore up the right-wing end of the support base before the 2015 election and minimise losses to UKIP. 
Shout out to @rj_c for pulling my coat to boycotts of the Puerto Rico referendum for statehood!  #boycott #Boicot11J 
Excl: Boris calls for an end to Tory plots to oust PM (for now) - but warns her against any Brexit “backsliding”;  
Theresa May says she intends to serve a full term. If her party supports her then Corbyn will win next time round and Brexit diluted down. 
When @wwwfoecouk warned about dangers of #Brexit to environment, we weren't bluffing. @michaelgove now Env Secretary 
The DUP could insist on Nigel Farage having a role in Brexit negotiations  via @MetroUK 
Tory insiders lobbying May to dilute Brexit.Nigel Farage, welcome back. 
In Europe they call Brexit Briddance 
There is no “soft Brexit”: it does not exist as a serious or credible option   
Brexit is exactly about the NHS, austerity, good public services etc. Brexit will make all the issues to do with those much, much worse.  
What on earth is a 'jobs first brexit'? As distinct from a 'race to the bottom', 'red white & blue' etc? All the same and all a mistake. 
Brexit: Will of the people.Election result: Not will of the people. 
Some of Theresa May’s ministers are plotting to soften her plans for a hard Brexit  
Astonishing writing. If you only read one thing on Brexit, it must be this. Here is a sample. h/t @nicolas_veron  
I voted labour and will never ever agree with brexit. #remain 
Nick Clegg's five point plan for Mrs May to rescue herself and, more important, the country from the Brexit mess  @FT 
After listening to Corbyn's pro Brexit rhetoric today, I am absolutely certain I was right to vote LibDem.Labour hoodwinked a generation! 
Yeah she's already shown her willingness to defy her boss with her repudiation of the Rape Clause, Brexit and Welfare Reforms....oh wait 
Absolutely bewildering how any #Kurdish political party can stand against an independence referendum because of the leader who initiated it. 
Catalonia has .CAT we have .KRD, we plan independence referendum in sep. they in Oct.  Once independent, both will have new internet domains 
Calling for another referendum and eventual cancellation of this headlong rush to oblivion is what we're trying to do for "us". 
Slow dawn for Remainers here on Labour's Brexit stance. 
Brexit talks will begin in 'next couple of weeks'  
RT Remainers are using the election to try & steal our Brexit vote.If they think that is every going to happen they are seriously mistaken  
I voted Labour and 100% reject Brexit too. How about you?  
UK: 6 point lead for #Corbyn's #Labour (S&D) over #Cons (ECR). #GE2017 #Brexit 
If Brexit is going so well, why is the Brexit camp still arguing about why we should Brexit but still have neither a plan nor a method? 
"Slash EU regulations on wildlife protection after Brexit" urges new Environment secretary Michael Gove   
It's (near) official.Hard Brexit looks like an ex-parrotHopefully we can send Brexit the same way  
Important to note that hung parliament was the 1st big success in stopping Hard #BrexitOnly because neither Labour or Conservatives won  
As the education secretary Gove wanted to remove climate change from the national curriculum. The Donald likes this.... #reshuffle #GE2017 
And this is why Jeremy Corbyn should bide his time and let the Tories lie in their Brexit bed of nails.  
I'd hate to break this to you Mrs May, but the only "successful Brexit" is no Brexit at all.  
 A realistic assessment of where Britain finds itself and how damaged and maligned it has become. #Brexit 
Most of them would say No to Brexit!I voted to stop May & her Brexit, not for JC to carry on with it! 
Hopefully @michaelgove @DefraGovUK  will bring agri food and environment into #Brexit conversation...we've waited long enough 
PM Theresa May says government to focus on social issues and "a successful Brexit" as she finishes Cabinet reshuffle  
Brexit WILL happen. It will free us from the shackles of the EU and enable us to rebuild our country and trade freely with the whole world. 
President of Catalonia (@KRLS) retweets Barzani's tweet about Kurdistan's referendum; Catalonia to have independence referendum on Oct 1.  
The floor is referendum  
Michael Gove's post-Brexit vision for UK farming makes interesting reading in wake of appointment as Defra secretary  
DUP may demand that Nigel Farage has a role in Brexit negotiations, in exchange for supporting a Tory minority govt.*Thumps head on table.  
Those claiming that "82% of voters endorsed hard Brexit" are wrong. Many Remainers voted Labour tactically - to remove May's Brexit mandate.  
Puerto Rico statehood easily winning a landslide after opponents boycotted the referendum, but turnout appears to be very low  
Remain LOSTThey really LOSTYes, Remain actually LOSTGet it, Remain LOSTSaying Brexit won't happen is PURE delusion. 
Happy election week: Front National decimated in French legislatives like hard Brexiters in UK. Populists undead but Trump + Brexit a blip? 
Supporters of the independence of Puerto Rico have boycotted the non-binding referendum, while the government pressures for statehood.  
We will need to have #indyref2 in next couple of years, if only to end the divisive talk from unionist parties about a referendum. ;) 
Some in Cabinet urge PM post elex to park "ideological" Brexit for "pragmatism" w/ "fewer things ruled out": Story:  
We should send Perez to negotiate our Brexit agreement. #F1 
.@UKLabour seems to think that the best response to May's hard Brexit manifesto being voted down is ... hard Brexit.  
If you voted Labour and now have a Labour MP, tell them you didn't vote for Brexit. They need to know. 
"One thing we can say for certainty, there is going to be a referendum on Irish unity."- Gerry Adams TD 
Villagers who voted 'No' in Erdogans referendum threatened & forced 2 leave their homes, they're labeled terrorists:  
Putting the bursting of May's Brexit bubble together with Macron's liberal landslide, chauvinist populism starts to seem "so 2015/16" 
Looks like @EmmanuelMacron will have a strong and stable government ready for the Brexit talks 
I honestly can't find any young people that want Brexit at all. 
My article in today's Mail on Sunday. No secret deals, no bribes... and NO hard Brexit  via @MailOnline 
This was my official response when I heard the news 4 minutes ago.. 
To all Scottish farmers and fishing folk who voted Tory: how thrilled are you to have your post Brexit lives in Michael Gove's hands? 
.Bored of Elections?Bored of English nationalism?Bored of Brexit?.........#NoBrexit 
Time to pile up the comments. here's @michaelgove, newly sent to DEFRA, telling farmers Brexit wont cost em a penny   
Brexit negotiations will be awful. Economy will tank! Tories will own entire mess & get slaughtered at next election  
Chance of smooth Brexit fades after British election chaos  
Sky Sources: cabinet ministers privately lobbying PM to alter  Brexit plan from "ideologically driven" approach to "pragmatic Brexit" 
Theresa May urged to ditch her Brexit approach for pragmatism  
Is it time to rethink #brexit ? 
Theresa May faces tough questions on Brexit at crunch meeting  
Hugely significant - and a great contextual example to use in a Brexit/EU/single market question in the macro exam. Capital is footloose.  
Question to the Corbyn fans - genuine interest/not snark - do you just not care that much re Brexit now? 
Have the referendum and see who is right!  
Former Cabinet Minister Lord Heseltine gives his view on Brexit - almost one year on from the Leave campaign's victory.  
Not *quite* the formidable image May wanted to project going into the Brexit talks.  
That is exactly what you are doing by taking a pro Brexit stance. The young want to remain in the EU - respect their vote 
Farmers: you wanted Brexit, now you've got Gove. Ask your kids who were in education when he was minister how that went. 
This is the way the French look at it. #GE2017 #Brexit  
Congratulations Andrea! Please ensure we get the complete Brexit we voted for in the referendum & reaffirmed this in the election.  
Bit wound up by all these politicos crowing over Gove being given Defra as if unimportant - #Brexit makes this a massive job 
Snap elections.... Coalitions....Brexit.....Reshuffles.. When the F**K are the Tories going to concentrate on the day job.. 
."Brexit is thus FAR from being a DONE DEAL"By @fotoole 
Gove, the man who said the UK can slash environmental regulations post-Brexit. What the f*** has the environment done to deserve that!  
Brexit author who promised to eat his own book if Corbyn gained seats just delivered  
This from the party that just wasted 7 weeks of crucial Brexit preparing/negotiating time and £143m on #GE2017 that horrendously backfired. 
Just in case you're wondering what Brexit means - it includes less safe drugs and bulldozing wildlife sanctuaries. 
Given the amount I've written re food security, 21st C agri and Brexit I should have something to say re Gove going to DEFRA. I have nowt. 
Michael Gove is back - grappling with post-Brexit farm subsidies and pre-Brexit green agenda. My take:  
The leader we need is the one big enough to tell the electorate #Brexit looks less like a good idea as each day passes & we need #2ndEURef 
Would you vote for Katie Hopkins if she stood as a UKIP Candidate Retweet for NO Fav for YES 
DEFRA is possibly most complex and dull of all the Brexit jobs - reworking EU-dominant agriculture and environment law and policy at speed. 
Oh, and Andrea Leadsom gets the monumental complexity of the Great Repeal Bill plus 7 or 8 other Brexit bills, all w/o a majority. Such fun!  
Andrea Leadsom appointed Leader of the House of Commons. Congratulations, @andrealeadsom. Let's get the clean Brexit we need and deserve! pic.twitter.com/rCCqJGJ7bq 
Actually I transposed my food and rural affairs. But I presume you got the gist. Gove will be sorting out farmers and fisherman post Brexit 
I see Michael Gove gets to explain the Brexit deal to Britain's farmers.  
The Gover is back! @michaelgove is the new Environment Secretary. Wise move by May to appease the Brexit wing of the Tories #reshuffle 
Gove to Defra. Sort of poetic justice to force him to preside over British agriculture as Brexit completely destroys it. 
Hilton: UK election a disaster for May, puts Brexit at risk  @SundayFutures @FoxNews 
"The election means that May must abandon her hard Brexit and work with those who want a softer option”Theresa May: 
Extraordinary: Scottish Conservatives basically acting as a soft-Brexit party-within-a-party  
PollAfter a year of procrastination and posturing, Brexit time has finally arrived.How do you wish your Brexit be served?Vote  
So in the critical role of getting complex Brexit legislation through Commons at speed over next year is...Andrea Leadsom.Ho ho.  
Gina Miller is calling for a cross-party Brexit committee. Do you think this is a good idea?  
Pollsters have had another poor showing, after botching the previous general election and the Brexit referendum  
If Labour can't get their act together, we need our own Macron to launch a new party, anti-Brexit and sensible attractive policies for all. 
Boris Johnson says Theresa May is the best person to deliver Brexit.....while standing next to a lamppost with Number 10 on it  
Note to Journalists: No need to mention the referendum anymore. The general election supersedes it. The "will of the people" has now changed 
52% of us voted for Brexit: we all knew what it meant. It means a free UK unencumbered by the EU. There can be no compromise. @Number10gov 
I'll have respect for the Leave point of view as soon as they name one practical, tangible benefit that Brexit will bring to our daily life. 
The election is over; we should unite & put the national interest first - vital that @theresa_may has strong support for Brexit negotiations 
Let's inject a little sanity FFS, we must abandon brexit altogether!! 
Britain: The End of a Fantasy: "the idea of a single British people united by the Brexit vote is ludicrous."  
Exclusive interview: top Labour source ‘How we won on #Brexit in #GE17’  
My opinion on the #PuertoRican referendum & 3 things you do today #Boicot11J including watching #UnitedShades  
-@froglanefarm They recognise you can pay for Brexit or the #NHS.They're sticking with option one.Hunt is presiding over its phased decline. 
It's time for Labour to start listen and to act to #StopBrexit in the national interest. Any form of Brexit is bad for Britain.@UKLabour 
The key question - why "respect the result" of the criminal scam which is May's/Mercer's/Putin's "brexit" , Jeremy - do explain to us 
If just a few Tories were so disgusted by Brexit and now, the DUP, that they joined other parties, we could be saved from this horror... 
Anna Soubry talking more nonsense. The election nothing to do with choosing a 'soft' or 'hard' Brexit - if only we'd mentioned Brexit more!? 
Remember when President Obama wasn't welcomed back after he said you would be bottom of trade deal if you voted Brexit? Me either. 
EU threatens year-long delay in Brexit talks over UK's negotiating stance  
#Brexit negotiations start in days, but 1st the Govt must come to terms with a party that believes dinosaurs wear little hats & sing hymns. 
Only one issue matters now: the need to respect the people's will and ensure the Brexit vote isn't betrayed  
Theresa May's weakness is underlined as she announces only limited changes to her cabinet  
Why did you and Booby Johnson run away and hide after the referendum?National interest my ARSE  
“Conservatives calling for a new leader are inviting Brexit chaos”, says Iain Duncan-SmithIt sounds fine to me, do put country above party pic.twitter.com/NNOnbLcKV4 
The DUP will make the Conservatives deliver a proper Brexit. 
Ireland's first gay leader will struggle more with Brexit than bigotry  
Exit-#Brexit altogether is back on the table, you mean. There is no such thing as a 'soft' or 'lite' or 'open' Brexit.  
Starmer must be a secret Tory spokesman. Labour are being stupid about Brexit. Dooming all those 18-24s to lose their freedom of movement 
Voting Labour by you, me & millions of others desperate attempt at damage limitation. It was not green light for hard Brexit.#2ndreferendum 
We're working on one: addressing the lies of the leave campaign + highlighting benefits of the EU in an emotional+simple way.  #Brexit  
2/33.Understand not assume the alliance of voters we just created4.Navigate the electoral tightrope that is brexit 
I'll be on BBC World Service soon, talking about Catalonia's independence referendum & what #PepGuardiola has to do with it #referendumCAT 
@J_amesp @carolecadwalla OK labour big-wigs. Please do explain to us why you "respect" the outcome of a Referendum subverted by "big money" 
Was PROUD of our Queen whose overruled muslim mayor to invite Donald & confirmed she wanted BREXITOUR QUEEN WANTS HER COUNTRY BACK 
Going to grab some popcorn, watch Brexit crash & burn, watch govt stumble from failure to failure..no need to push Indy, it will come to us. 
I wanted to vote lib dem, but I and my family voted tactically. We do not support a labour brexit. 
I still stand by this. And with every passing hour I think it's closer than ever. Hard Brexit is a dead duck.  
Take it from Varoufakis – Brexit will be a greek tragedy  
Yes absolutely correct Michael. If the British people had wanted Hard Brexit they'd have voted Tory in their droves. They didn't.  
If like many u voted tactically 4 labour 2 rid yr constituency of Tories. Tell him it wasn't a vote 4 #Brexit Sign   
.@JolyonMaugham Ok, I'll have a go. I'll NEVER vote #Brexit. NEVER. My vote was tactical to #stopbrexit . Are you listening @jeremycorbyn ? 
This election created no mandate for watering down #Brexit There must be no backsliding  via @telegraphnews#ReesMogg 
Shuffling of shoes not of Cabinet posts: highlights May's fragile hold on power just UK about to enter Brexit negotiations....  
No half Brexits , no compromise, no soft Brexit .....  we want the real deal.  
Anyone out there celebrating what has come to pass for success on the Left care to address McDonnell's support for a Hard Brexit? 
Estimated two-thirds of younger voters backed Labour, with Brexit their main concern. They need something better than this în return.  
There's no Tories in Edinburgh after #GE17. Do you think Scottish Tories softening on Brexit has anything to do with this? 
Pep Guardiola joins call for referendum on Catalan independence | World news | The Guardian  
Trying to walk a balance between a) gloating at Brexit Tory woes and b) objecting to Corbyn Lab ppl gloating at mine is frankly exhausting. 
"Brexit is a back-of-the-envelope proposition" superb by @fotoole Britain: The End of a Fantasy  via @nybooks 
The argument that Brexit would inevitably lead to dissolution of the United Kingdom now looks far weaker  
Lidington: professes belief in Rule of Law, PhD in legal history, competent minister, sane on Brexit complexity.Good start for MoJ. 
Yer da:Translation: Scottish for "Your dad". Male aged 30-60. Ill-informed and/or intolerant. Voted Brexit. Hates Wenger. 
Critics of the #EU often complain it is slow & bureaucratic. But 1yr since the #brexit referendum & the UK still doesn't know what it wants.  
The man at the Foreign Office, the man in charge of the Brexit Department and the man responsible for International Trade are all Brexiteers  
Interesting on Lidington. Sane on Brexit: "limbo...ten years"  
Nick Clegg in point here in @FT Time to stop pretending that #brexit trade-offs don't exist  
Absolutely bizarre that Labour's McDonnell thinks we should have a hard Brexit. It will make Labour manifesto impossible to deliver 
David Lidington appointed Justice Secretary.  He told MPs that the EU referendum was "advisory" 
Well done to our Best for Britain champion @EdwardJDavey in #Kingston&Surbiton, let's stop extreme #Brexit together #GE2017 
"I think people will interpret [continued] membership of the Single Market as not respecting [the EU] referendum" concedes @johnmcdonnellMP. 
Brexit-lite back on the table as Britain rethinks its options after election  
Hard Brexit, soft Brexit, good Brexit, extreme Brexit, and now we have clean Brexit! How about 'just get the bloody thing done' #Brexit?! 
President @masoud_barzani has called on people of #Kurdistan on Sunday to take part in Kurdistan referendum on independence  on September 25  
.I have an even better idea - it's called NO Brexit!. 
Turning into victory lap for Remainers. Ex Europe Minister Lidington is Lord Chancellor. Soft Brexit here we come.  
Brexit means Brexit.  
The only Brexit we should go for is a hard one.A soft one just won't satisfy anyone.#Brexit  
Jeremy Corbyn MP: My vote for Labour is NOT a vote for Brexit - Sign the Petition!  via @UKChange 
What happened in the UK election? May tried to make it all about Brexit -- and failed:  
New First Secretary Damian Green last month. Advocates compromise to secure Brexit deal.  
.@jeremycorbyn I support many Labour policies but I don't back #Brexit. Let's become consensual contemporary democracy by staying in EU 
.@jeremycorbyn End Labour calls for Brexit. UK must stay EU 
I'm certain that #Brexit economic effects will completely will make a complete nonsense of both Labour & Tory manifesto plans. 
Brexit can be stopped. We are a sovereign nation. If we change our mind who can stop us? Not the Brexit Elite. 
Looks like DUP and Banks are going to try and shoehorn Farage into a Brexit position. If she bows, the whole government is corrupted. 
Sat in a room full of Leavers right now. 15 people + me. All of them agree that they want Brexit Binned now, no 2nd referendum. Get it done.  
Unity referendum - an imperative and a winnable objective.  
If you voted Labour and oppose Hard Brexit it's time to let Jeremy Corbyn and J. McDonnell know. 
In a party of clowns, Damian Green's a proper grown up who was a real asset to the Remain campaign board. Hope for a softer Brexit.  
No appetite for another GENo energy for another GENo stomach for another GEBollocks!I have no stomach for BrexitBring it on. 
At some point in next year, time will be called on the damned Brexit. It's inevitable & I think most former Brexiters know it.  
According to George Osborne, there are no longer the votes for a “hard Brexit” in Britain’s Parliament  
If Brexit is thwarted in any way, then make no mistake, the British people will rise up - and have the right to do so. 
I hope @labour MPs never, ever vote with the Tories again on #Brexit whatever their leader tells them to do... 
If the unionist parties really thought the election shows voters don't want independence, why aren't they forcing a referendum *on* us? 
Ex-British chancellor: No 'hard Brexit'  
In essence, the 2017 electorate got to choose between Brexit within two years or a Hung Parliament.  Electorate chose a Hung Parliament. 
EU threatens year-long delay in Brexit talks over UK's negotiating stance  
Referendum: 4 very strong signs Biafra is gaining grounds  
“Hard” and “soft” Brexit are code words for leaving or staying in the EU", writes Jacob Rees-Mogg MP  
Corbynites' tone of angry triumphalism reminding me of Brexiteers after the referendum (albeit without the actual victory) 
Indeed EU is the greatest peace & prosperity project ever invented & Brexit will be seen historically as selfish and destructive act by UK 
A caravan of people who support Puerto Rico's independence are rejecting the referendum and demanding the freedom of Puerto Rico.  
PM throws away a majority, then does a deal to form a weaker govt. May is in no position to get a deal for a Brexit she has no mandate for. 
A softer Brexit cd mean staying in customs union, only modest retrictions on free move & no dogma on ECJ:   @CER_EU 
Amazing how effective use of the word 'access' is when blurring your Brexit position to the public. Both parties have used this technique.  
Pro-Brexit parties got ~85%, pro-single market parties got ~12%. Desperate stuff for some to now claim it's a mandate for "soft Brexit"  
I'm told Damian Green will effectively now be the Deputy PM - ie, May's No2. Could upset Brexiteers as he was a Remainer. Brexit softening?  
Our chair @stephen_dorrell makes it clear that May has “no mandate” to negotiate a hard #brexit  
As a staunch Remainer, I made a calculated decision to vote Labour because a potential hung parliament would end the chance of hard Brexit. 
First secretary of state a very strange, mercurial position, not always in use. But could potentially suggest a softening of Brexit position 
If Tories give into DUP - e.g. by putting Farage on the Brexit team - they won't have to choose between party & country. They'll f*** both. 
People of Puerto Rico cast their vote in today's referendum on whether they should remain a US territory, statehood or pursue independence.  
So Labour wants a "Jobs First" Hard Brexit. I wonder what Nissan, Financial Services, Farmers, Nurses & Universities have to say about that 
Jesus. Could the big black hole of Brexit get any murkier? DUP, Vote Leave, Leave.EU all in cahoots..FBI investigating Farage. But here? Zip  
Less than ONE WEEK AGO, lies. Just like lies of a strong Brexit deal, NHS funding, Mental health help & assistance to the most vulnerable.  
Hung Parliaments are, for liberals, great in principle, but this is worst moment to have one for any government wanting to do Brexit./ends 
Labour faced both ways on Brexit. They can't do that if it becomes their decision to make 
Like Maria butI used to vote Tory I lent my support to Labour Unlikely to againI do not support Brexit I am voting Lib Dems  
Theresa May justified the election saying she wanted a stronger mandate to negotiate Brexit. She's ended up with a weaker mandate. RESIGN!  
In other words: how many job losses are tolerable in a jobs-first Brexit? 
Crucial test for Labour position: Is its test of Brexit still that it delivers 'exact same' benefits? If not, what does 'jobs-first' mean?  
Coming up - #Brexit backlash. Stay with us. #AMJoy 
@jeremycorbyn @UKLabour ignore the youth & loaned remainer vote at your peril. We do not want Brexit.  
There's a major battle going on right now in @UKLabour  between Leavers & Remainers. Time to put pressure on Corbyn to abandon hard Brexit! 
Domestic legislative side of Brexit needs government confident of getting complex legislstion through quickly.Do not have that on any view. 
This is the kind of selfless attitude that makes me proud to be part of the Brexit resistance. 🖒  
If you voted Labour and want Corbyn to know that you utterly reject hard Brexit- sign this:  
Pep Guardiola joins call for referendum on Catalan independence  
1/2 Pep Guardiola speech supporting the democratic referendum in Catalonia dated October the first.(part 1)  
The Tory party was always the Remain party , interesting to see Labour saying exit EU and SM respecting the referendum  
#SuggestNewJobsForTheresaBlackmailer: GIVE ME A GOOD DEAL OR IT'S HARD BREXIT! VOTE ME OR DOOMLET ME STAY OR APOCALYPSEPiss off 
EU officials are struggling to hide their impatience with Britain  
That's Airbus, guys, planning to leave Britain because of Brexit.  
Brexit.  
Economy v rocky;weak and wobbly minority govt;impending leadership battle in Tories; poss new election; Brexit talks: a DIY horror movie! 
Oh, now the DUP want Farage to be involved in Brexit talks?The Thick Of it was never even this good.  
Now that the DUP are have international attention, could we please have an investigation of their dodgy Brexit funding?  #DUPCoalition 
Pep Guardiola joins call for referendum on Catalan independence  
A 'jobs-first' hard Brexit? That will be an interesting trick to pull off... 
Osborne, Soubry etc. using election to fight #Brexit  – but Tories and Labour BOTH promised to end Free Movement.   
Puerto Ricans vote in referendum on US statehood  
Allowing Farage anywhere near the Brexit talks is the surest way to ensure we get the square root of two-tenths of fuck all. 
Beginning to think that May's overtures to the DUP are going to expose the dirty secret of dark money during #Brexit. 
DUP may demand Nigel Farage has a role in Brexit negotiations, in exchange for supporting Conservative minority govt  
Because it was me that told Cameron to offer an unnecessary referendum and told May to hold an unnecessary general election...  
"Trump told Prime Minister Theresa May that he did not want to come until the public supported his visit" So Never? 
The Sunday Times report DUP want @Nigel_Farage as part of the Brexit team in government.  
So much is being written about Theresa May's failed gamble that we urgently need a new word like Brexit. I propose "famble". #UKElection2017 
Scottish Unionists can't afford to let Ruth become their Nikkla. When Ruth is wrong, she needs telt. And she is WRONG over her Brexit play. 
A chillingly accurate diagnosis of what Brexit really means, and what sort of a state the Tories and their cheerleaders have landed us in.  
May won the election but lost it. Corbyn lost the election but won it. Brexit looks softer. DUP looks medieval. Youth deserve a big wet kiss 
.@ScotGov ready to start talking about #Brexit anytime : BBC News - SNP: May's Brexit policies 'must be scrapped'  
I am never going to be a Brexit apologist. I will never have to look anyone, least of all my kids, in the eye and apologise for Brexit. 
Can't even do a deal with DUP, what chance Brexit? What's that smell coming from the stable? It's strong. It's horseshit. 
This begs *A LOT* of questions. Banks said he didn't fund DUP #Brexit campaign - so why is DUP giving him and Farage leverage?  
Brilliant piece exposing contradictions in UK wanting everything & yet nothing from Brexit.  
Remember all the RW commentators who claimed that saying ppl voted Brexit on a £350m lie was 'insulting the intelligence of the public'? ... 
I think our best hope now is a Weird Brexit.  
Labour Manifesto page 28;"Freedom of movement will end when we leave the EU"84%+ voted for parties committed to so called, "Hard" Brexit  
If hard Brexit is dead, the odds on a chaotic one have shortened  
My thoughts on #openfarmsunday at #RSPB Hope Farm with a nod to the election and Brexit  
RT #Brexit can be cancelled at any time -Just needs political will & majority vote from MPs @UKLabour @Conservatives @LibDems @TheGreenParty 
I hate #BrexitI hate what it's done to the #UKDivisiveness, xenophobia, economic uncertainty, we've become regressive, insular#Remain 
Full & varied agenda when I visit Belfast tomorrow to meet parties & assess Post election landscape. #Brexit  
I am convinced that #Brexit has been deliberately sabotaged with the elite taking careful and calculated steps! It's obvious it's off agenda 
1. Cameron resignation 2. Fake Tory leadership contest3. PM4. May stalls until 31 March5. Calls election the self sabotage no #Brexit 
3) if country was presented with a clear choice, Brexit or prosperity, with the facts, we'd choose the latter. There's no question 
I'm writing a follow up to All Out War covering the Government and Brexit since May took over and then the election. What should I call it? 
#GE2017 #BrexitThread1) UK really is in a nightmare scenarioNeither major party reflect majority position of UK on the biggest issue 
I think most MPs realise Brexit would be a disaster. Free of party discipline they might be brave enough to say it. A dream I know! 
On hope, Brexit and class, this post-election take from @robfordmancs must be heard  
Brexit may have set in motion the events that bring to power the most radical left PM in UK history  
I know it's a dream but wouldn't it be great if MPs forgot political tribalism and came together to sort this mess out? Particularly #Brexit 
May won't include devolved Govs in Scot & Wales yet DUP goons want Sir Nigel Farage of #Brexit @ EU talks? How much damage can UK sustain? 
The @TheSundayTimes reports that senior DUP figures want @Nigel_Farage as a Lord or with a senior role in Brexit.  
Extraordinary. DUP wants May to give Farage a role in Brexit talks. What part of UKIP's electoral annihilation do they not understand?  
We're seeing today that Labour's #Brexit position still one hell of a mess, & that's why they avoided talking about it in election campaign 
Both the EU referendum and this GE were in the interest of the Tory party .. you would all sell your own grandmas for self gain 
Labour: Starmer's six tests. Not much point starting #Brexit negotiations then ...  
READ | Scottish Tory Ruth Davidson is looking to defy the will of the British people by calling for a fake Brexit! 
Short-term thinking has led us to long-term Brexit chaos : the big issue  
Nick Clegg: Theresa May must break with the rightwing media and Brexit-obsessed backbenchers who held her hostage  
So Labour now supports what May called for and got labelled an "extreme Brexit". Interesting times.  
The excrable Peter Mandelson telling us in the MOS how we should conduct #Brexit.The day we have listen to this eejit it really IS all over 
Corbyn McDonnell "Access to the Single Market on a Tariff Free Basis" Weaselly slogan. Includes words we want to hear, but it's Hard Brexit 
The man wants to leave the single market even now, when he really doesn't need to have the policy. Was always Brexit.  
Had Corbyn mobilised the youth vote against Brexit in the same way he did for #GE2017 - would we be in this mess? 
Puerto Rico heads to polls in referendum on becoming 51st state  
There's a grave danger of the brewery going out of business while this lot try to organise the piss up. I really don't want Brexit, any kind 
Is it really too much to ask that politicians now actually address the cold hard facts, & own up to the sums, of what Brexit really means? 
Iain Duncan Smith: Conservatives calling for a new leader are inviting Brexit chaos. We must get behind Theresa May  
I just published “No secret deals, no bribes… and NO hard Brexit”  
Which of the below is in the country's best interests as we enter the Brexit negotiations? @MaajidNawaz 
May wanted a mandate for a hard Brexit. Now Europe expects a softer tone  
May: Deal with DUP securedMay: Whoops, my mistake, there's no dealMay: We're still negotiatingGlad she's leading Brexit negotiations... 
Hearing that Brexit Sec David Davis is being urged to say he'll run for the leadership by some Tory MPs. But he isn't biting at the moment. 
Anna Soubry trying to political point score to derail Brexit,young didn't vote against Brexit,they voted for £27k of free education #bbcsp 
He was a committed leaver that supported remain for Party reasons. I'm for a clean Brexit and it's good to hear him support that  
.@TheEconomist - 'no one had prepared voters for the scale of hardship they would endure in Brexit's name'  
Campbell obstructs whenever he can, he's a saboteur.He doesn't want Brexit & still believes it can be stopped & won't rest until it has  
.@Feorlean, the @scotgov Brexit minister, tells Sunday Politics Scotland that Theresa May should scrap her entire Brexit policy  
The majority of the British public were in favour of the Iraq war but very few people admit to it now & I think this will happen with Brexit 
Heseltine, predicting, accurately I think, serious trouble for Tories and possible end to Brexit over next 2 years 
Absolutely. I think it's important we all let @UKLabour know on what conditions they've had our vote. It's all about stopping #Brexit! 
bit bored of middle aged men announcing to everyone how i, as under 30, feel about brexit? 
Lab must realise that much of the increase in its vote came from the 48%. Vote won't stick unless Lab changes its Brexit stance 
Understand why people think chances of a soft Brexit have increased - but so has the odds on a car crash 
Best thing wld be to form cross-party approach to Brexit & throw open to parly. But can't see either party being principled enough to do so 
Piece in @mailonsundaySTL p. 14. @theresa_may must launch multi-party talks for compromise on Soft #Brexit for unified #BrexitNegotiations 
We do. Both Labour and the Tories now proclaim they want a Hard Brexit. It's what we all feared. Ideology before the national interest  
We need:1. Money for schools2. Money for NHS3. Developing forgotten areas4. Welfare (fair)5. No Brexit to have money for all this. 
We may well find that soft Brexit could be more realistically secured by a Tory minority government with a different leader, than by Corbyn. 
Means either a) no Brexit or b) you exit and your laws on how planes fly, what chemicals you can use etc etc etc evaporate. Really odd.  
There is no such thing as a 'jobs first Brexit' - 3.4 million jobs rely directly on Single Market membership. #LabourBrexit 
Flawed question.  So called 'soft' Brexit is not Brexit at all.  We need to LEAVE all the EU constructs otherwise we are still in the EU. 
Guardiola reading Manifesto for Catalunya's independence referendum scheduled for October 1st  
Conservatives always put national interest first - vital the PM is given strong support for key Queen's Speech and Brexit talks 
We need Farage appointed head of the brexit team. Had May have done this she would now have the lead she was hoping for. Call Farage. 
Britain needs a PM more than @Conservatives need a new leader We must reach out to #labour in the national interest &deliver a soft Brexit  
Dear Remainers who voted Labour,I hate to say I told you so, but ... I told you so.Corbyn is sticking with hard Brexit.  
Peter Mandelson suggests Labour MPs should support cross-party approach to Brexit  
As it seems clear Salisbury Convention doesn't apply to minority Government you Remain peers must feel emboldened to prevent Hard Brexit now 
The Prime Minister is now at odds with both the country and her own party's leaders over #Brexit  
Once again, a massive turnout in #Barcelona for a demonstration in favour of #democracy, for a #referendum on #Independence from #Spain 
Impressive images from #Barcelona People who demand to vote. And they will! Democracy year 2017 in Europe, people #lovedemocracy #referendum  
Spot on @campbellclaret - Labour didn't win, BREXIT remains THE dividing issue, we need a new type of politics    
Let's talk about Brexit post election !  
Amazing country Catalonia. Random Sunday in sunny Barcelona and thousands demonstrate suporting the Catalan referendum on independence.  
Conservatives said to be now exploring all options in a bid to cling on..... 
Brexit has now shown us just a little of the destruction it causes. Time to pack it in & come to our senses. It is self destructive madness. 
Hang on David.We voted for BREXITThis soft or hard bollox was invented by remoaners to con us out it.Dont play their game 
Ignores fact FPTP system gives little chance 2 exercise nuanced vote. Many Remainers voted Lab more to stop hard #Brexit than b/c Lab fans! 
Without doubt there is no one better than Farage to lead Brexit. He knows the EU & their bosses better than anyone else. Appoint Farage. R/T 
Jeremy Corbyn says he expects a general election in months and Labour is ready to lead Brexit talks   
LIVE on : Pep Guardiola reads manifesto in favor of referendum on independence of Catalonia (English)  
Statement: #PDKI supports souther (Iraqi) #Kurdistan's decision to hold a referendum on independence. #Twitterkurds 
Holidaymakers facing rising costs as a result of falling pound following Brexit  
I'm old. I blame #Tories for stealing everyone's future via #EURef #Brexit 
There is no such thing as a 'soft #Brexit.' Brexit, remember, means Brexit: 'soft' means staying in without any say; absurd. Just junk it.  
Being PM in Brexit Britain is like simultaneously seizing a poisoned chalice while being offered the captaincy of the Titanic. Who'd want it 
Ardent Brexiteers cannot keep a cap on election blow up by claiming 85% of voters chose Hard Brexit manifestos - it's not what majority want 
Saying "We need a Brexit that works for us" is kinda like saying "I need a punch in the face that emulsions the spare bedroom". 
"This election wasn't just about #Brexit, it was about challenging an economic consensus which has impoverished so many people." #Marr 
.@YvetteCooperMP Lab must do 3 things 1 challenge May & dodgy DUP deal2 push to set up X party Brexit team 3 prepare for another election 
Ruth Davidson: Tories need to listen to other parties on Brexit  
Reminder: here are the four main models for a post #Brexit UK  
3 qs on DUP deal. What effect on: 1 - NI peace/UK Gov neutrality? 2 - equal rights? 3 - getting Brexit deal/Irish Gov reaction/open border? 
I've had *so many* angry Labour voters tell me Lab don't want hard Brexit. It just means they don't know what hard Brexit, or Lab policy, is 
Is he taking the p***? PM asked for landslide majority for hard Brexit. Country emphatically said NO. Hard Brexit is dead.  
New hero. This @fotoole piece is superb. Brexit's toxic messaging = phone populism harvested by elite  
Given that Brexit will dominate the next 2 years, I'd like to hear @jeremycorbyn suggesting a grand coalition so that all can have voice 
Could not agree more.  More politicians have to put the country before party politics.  Must happen on #Brexit -  cross party Brexit team  
Scots Tory leader who saved party warns May: I'll scupper hard Brexit  
We need a cross-party team to negotiate Brexit  
3 votes in this house that Labour won't get again if they don't ditch Brexit and we're in a marginal 
.@Cajardine justifies @LibDems position on 2nd EU referendum because it was in manifesto [er, so was #indyref2 in @theSNP manifesto] 
Lib Dems still cannot square their support for a 2nd Brexit referendum with the circle of their opposition to a 2nd indyref. 
Hahaha. Brewer pinning the imbecile Jardine down on the Lib Dems' comical referendum hypocrisy. 
SNP say shock General Election result is 'comprehensive rejection' of hard Brexit  @StephenGethins 
Scotland to have second referendum anyway because it’s full of awkward bastards  pic.twitter.com/VA0JO6xV6q 
No. Wrong. We must unite. Stop the Hard Brexit.  And prepare for an early General election later this year or early next year.  
Jeremy Corbyn says Labour wants to ensure tariff-free access to EU single market post-Brexit  
WATCH | Vile Michael Heseltine calls Brexit a "cancer" after 84% of voters backed clean exit.He'll NEVER respect the will of the people!  
NHS cost-cutting plans revealed as Brighton hospital trust faces losing 400 EU staff over Brexit #Brexit #Remain 
For clarity: SNP 10 years include 2 during Banking Crisis, 7 constrained by Tory budget cuts, 3 GE 2 SE 2 CE #IndyRef & #BrExit PERSPECTIVE! 
This point needs making. If young people were voting against Brexit, they would have voted LibDem Both Con + Lab manifestos promised Brexit 
Queen's Speech scheduled for same day that Brexit negotiations are supposed to begin...Whoever is scripting this election needs a payrise 
Totally agree with this. Brexit is a huge moment for the UK, so we should send our best negotiators and not just the best Tory negotiators.  
Corbyn needs to understand quickly that the young who put him in power and have most to lose do. Not. Want. Brexit.  
What they have said, Jeremy, is that they don't support a hard Brexit manifesto. The question is: did you hear that?  
Brexit Act 2017EU treaties shall be treated as still having effect for purposes of EC Act 1972 notwithstanding UK not being member of EU. 
Even among its on-paper supporters, Brexit has become a sunk cost fallacy. Can we just admit that and pull the plug?  
This from​ Rees-Mogg is excellent guide to where UK.stands on Brexit - simply insert "not" into each sentence, starting with headline.  
Soubry re May: "I dont think she does have a majority for leaving the single market, more important people dont want HArd Brexit & "No Deal" 
The DUP (which Arron Banks pays for) is pressing Theresa May to give Nigel Farage a Brexit negotiations role  
Any referendum is trumped by a General Election. "Access to" single market is a meaningless phrase - Labour need to commit to MEMBERSHIP!  
4) when anyone, even McDonnell says "access to SM",they're misleading you,there's no such thing.  It's as meaningless as Brexit means Brexit 
There is no mandate for #Brexit.There never was.We should call it off, apologise to the EU, and #RemainInTheEU. 
Brexit negotiations continue.  
GE17 is unfinished business, it is not job done. It is a clear message that the country does not want May or Brexit. No time to sit back. 
Take a second to let this sink in: our PM is about to start Brexit negotiations when her own MPs think her position is untenable. A fiasco.  
Jacob Rees-Mogg: This election created no mandate for watering down Brexit. There must be no backsliding #premium 
There has to be legislation if there is Brexit. Inescapable. But perhaps one with no daft title, or lots of smaller Bills in discrete areas.  
We voted for a COMPLETE Brexit. If the Conservatives try to sell us out then I suggest a revived UKIP and we force a political revolution. 
Heseltine tells the Brexit truth no Tory MP wants to admit (save Ken Clarke): "There is no good deal available".  
#GE17 was about #Brexit mandate. PM disagrees w Scots Tories & DUP about Brexit: how can her govt be anything other than coalition of chaos? 
Lord Heseltine predicts Government will last about two years with an election following 'totally artificial' #brexit negotiations  
Let's find out if it's true that Labour and Tory voters all now support Brexit, as some in the media claim. Which best describes you? (rt) 
A project like Brexit should only be undertaken when there is a very large majority for a clearly defined project. #Brexit is neither. 
Soubry talking pure BS.“The people rejected hard-Brexit” by booting some of the most ardent & vocal pro-EU Remainer MPs from office?#bbcsp 
Oh I forgot this on the list ! The Conservatives forming a coalition with some crazed homophobes to get Brexit through parliament  
.@Conservatives Lord Heseltine warns that unless party deals with 'cancer' of Brexit the next election will make @jeremycorbyn PM  
From where I'm sitting....real consequence of elex is not likely demise of Theresa May  but re-opening of battle over Brexit. 
Four reasons why May is now wrong person to lead #Brexit negotiations (written in car so sorry for handwriting)  
Lord Hes calls Brexit the cancer knowing away at the Tory party. Says May should give party time to replace  her to get it right  
If the Conservative Party won't give us a COMPLETE Brexit, then perhaps UKIP has a future after all. 
Hard Brexit  is one of reasons we lost election - @Anna_Soubry 
Over 80% of the electorate voted for parties who want to leave the European Union, time to implement the will of the people.#Brexit  
Anna Soubry now saying that we must NOT have "a hard Brexit" #bbcsp God I am sick this Remain-bot. 
"I think people will interpret membership of the Single Market as not respecting that referendum," @johnmcdonnellMP confirms to @Peston 
We vaguely remember a distant time when we weren't covering a referendum, election or leadership contest 
WATCH | McDonnell: Continued m'ship of SM not respecting referendum. Fake news from Remainers who suggest #GE2017 was vote against Brexit. pic.twitter.com/K6rCsYepTe 
Yes, that's indeed a spanner in the "no deal" stance... unless Ireland gets separate deal. Who would've thought Brexit wld be so complex?  
'Brexit is the cancer at the heart of the Conservative Party' says Lord Heseltine #GE2017 
Do you want a second EU referendum vote? 
What I'd give for 1.proper breakdown of who turned out to vote Thurs 2.analysis of how Brexit vote might've gone with that electorate 
What connects Brexit, the DUP, dark money and a Saudi prince?  
.@jeremycorbyn: if you truly want a "jobs-first" #brexit as you said on #marr this morning then you'd better start fighting for no brexit. 
'We aren't going to win Brexit negotiations, there is no way Europe will let us leave on better terms than we have now' says Lord Heseltine  
Labour should hold a convention to determine its #Brexit stance. Over 60% of Labour voted Remain. Probably more now. Realistic proposal? 
Heseltine: I do see Brexit not happening....there is no Government with the majority to get through the legislation. 
Curiouser and curiouser, said Alice, as she wondered about Brexit...  
It is with the deepest regret as a Tory MEP that these soft Brexit ideas now coming from Labour leader of the opposition & not UK government  
Heseltine trying to bludgeon Conservative Party into Brexit compromise with threat of "Jeremy Corbyn a handful of seats away from Number 10" 
Brexit so far ...Lowest growth in the EU£ down 20%Inflation risingDiscredited PM, replaced by clown ?Probably end of N. Ireland peace 
Brexit author who promised to eat his own book if Corbyn gained seats just delivered  
Stop Brexit now in the national interest?Please vote and RT 
At Labour's Brexit launch @Keir_Starmer clearly said it was an "open question" whether Britain would stay in single market 
"May went to the country asking for a mandate on Brexit only to lose her Commons majority" 
Brexit bill £800b & choice is Theresa May & Westboro Baptist Church or Paul Mason & the knife of long knives against Labour moderates.  
... Corbyn says he wants "Jobs First Brexit negotiated as soon as possible" - in Euratom, in Horizon etc - this has to be EEA 
"Brexit is the cancer gnawing at the heart of the Conservative Party" ~ Lord Heseltine  
Corbyn: "we didn't win the election, had an incredibly good result"..His first demand is what he calls "Jobs First Brexit" - sounds EEAish 
Given speculation re @RuthDavidsonMSP's views on #Brexit it's worth a reminder of words in *Scottish* Con manifesto  
Theresa May is "a dead woman walking," George Osborne says  
Corbyn serene: has taken down a Tory PM, possibly halted a hard Brexit + put Labour in a position to win next time. Wow. I mean wow! #marr 
50mins of #marr and no mention of what happens to spending cuts to NHS, schools etc. Ignoring why people voted Labour, wasn't about Brexit 
Brexit can't be delivered because nobody believes in it. Not even Mrs May. Total international humiliation  
...and the mess continues as the Brexit clock counts down.  
Memo to Andrew Marr. The DUP look for an electronic border with the Irish Republic. This is NOT the same as a "soft Brexit" #Marr Stop lying 
'Hard #Brexit' is over, & 'There is no “soft Brexit”: it does not exist as a credible option'  via @BrexitCentral 
#Brexit could be a disaster, particularly for health & social care. If I had to negotiate it, I would include @Keir_Starmer in the team. 
TMay called GE17 to secure Brexit mandate & failed. Message from the result, surely,  was that she have nothing to do with negotiations. 
At the start of the #Brexit negotiations, now is the time for the biggest ever march for our place in the EU #UniteforEurope 
Labour didn't win the election. It won 30 seats, stymied a hard brexit & punctured austerity. So let's not pretend it didn't win anything. 
People have got heartily sick of Brexit. Even its most ardent supporters now realise their wallets matter to them more than their racism. 
It's so clear. Remainers within the Conservative Party are now seeking to seize this moment and subvert Brexit. What a hateful crew. 
Soft Brexit? The only softness is in the heads of the people who advocate such half-baked and ill-thought out notion  
.@SophieintVeld says the EU has an interest of a good outcome of the Brexit negotiations & says UK will not be "enemies" #marr 
Lord Heseltine - ditch Brexit or Corbyn becomes PM. 
'Brexit is the cancer gnawing at the Conservative party,' says the consistently wise Lord Heseltine on #Marr. It's gnawing the country,too. 
Lord Heseltine - "it's not about changing the leader; it's about changing the [Brexit] policy." #Marr 
"Brexit is the cancer gnawing at the heart of the Conservative Party" says Michael Heseltine #marr 
Heseltine "Brexit is the cancer gnawing at the Conservative party"I suggest he is a cancer gnawing at a democratically expressed result 
A must-read: “Soft Brexit” does not exist as a serious or credible option, says Martin Howe QC on @BrexitCentral  
Osborne states hard truth for May: any deal with DUP needs her to abandon "no deal better than bad Brexit deal" coz they need open border! 
"Hard Brexit is the route to political ruin for Tory Party" @George_Osborne signalling start of renewed Tory civil war over Europe 
Osborne: no majority for a hard Brexit in the Commons. Correct. Nor in the country. It's over. #marr 
During the election, fox-hunting was apparently a bigger issue on social media than Brexit.  
"Britain simply will not get the right Brexit deal if we have the drift and division of a hung parliament". T May, announcing the election 
Hi @SophyRidgeSky, can you explain your clear anti-Brexit line-up today? Do you believe your guests are representative of the nation? Thanks  
Our Chair @stephen_dorrell is clear - the #Brexit that Theresa May sought before this election is now impossible 
I gave up a while ago. Can you all sort it out please? How about cross-party talks on big issues like Brexit?  
David Davis urged Theresa May to hold her calamitous snap election. This man is in charge of Brexit negotiations. He must resign, too. 
Heseltine on R4: 'Brexit is the cancer gnawing at the heart of the Conservative party'. Swing that mace. 
Rachel Weisz: 'My parents were refugees. Brexit feels like a death'  
Extraordinary to think, despite BBC nonsense coverage, Nicola Sturgeon is the ONLY party leader who won a mandate to negotiate Brexit? 
As Ken Clarke forecast in march 2017, it #May "soon be hard to find anyone who ever thought #Brexit was a good idea, or remotely affordable" 
Congratulations to our Best for Britain champion @DavidLammy reelected in #Tottenham. Let's stop extreme #Brexit #GE2017 
A more consensual, cross-party approach to #Brexit negotiations is the best way to achieve a good deal for Britain 
#Brexit was "won" by a vicious, sustained, xenophobic campaign by a mafia of right-wing press barons. It will damage our economy hugely. 
Cameron cocks up EU referendum, called for party reasons. May cocks up GE, called for party reasons. We need party that CARES ABOUT THE UK. 
Brexit will enable us to escape EU restrictions that prevent UK govt and its agencies from awarding contracts to UK companies in preference. 
If you want to know how useless May will be in deal-making on Brexit, look at her so-far botched, ill thought-through deal-making with DUP. 
The BBC agenda is clear. The #GE2017 result means Brexit must be diluted if not stopped. It's the BBC that needs to be stopped. 
My piece for the @Independent on the police and security implications of Theresa May's flawed Brexit strategy  
This is the end of hard Brexit  
After her disastrous election @theresa_may has no mandate to pursue a job-destroying Brexit or to leave with no deal  
Brilliant scorching vitriol from @Robert___Harris. Brexit as disaster movie. Theresa May lit the fuse. The bomb is primed. The clock ticks..  
Peter Hain now lying through his teeth on BBC insisting the DUP insist on a soft Brexit. They don't. They want us OUT of the EU. 
Maybe if Corbyn hadn't whipped the PLP to vote with the Tories over Art 50 & then backed a Tory hard Brexit?  
@campbellclaret saying what a lot of us are thinking let's park #brexit until we have a functioning stable state.  Just not the time! 
the idea of a single British people united by the Brexit vote is ludicrous. 
Election upshot: UK damaged internationally BUT hard Brexit less likely, Scotland & N.I. stay in UK, & newly strong EU may not seek revenge. 
'Drop hard Brexit plans', leading Tory and Labour MPs tell May  
Following a triumphant general election campaign, Theresa May and her team head to Brussels for Brexit negotiations.  
Brexit still has the potential to blow up both main parties.  
Tories can elect new leader without then having a General Election.They should elect a Brexiteer Leader to ensure #Brexit happens.  
Do all these Labour voting remainers understand LP position on Brexit? Not that different to the Tories and certainly not to remain. 
As a remain voter even I am disturbed at the clear anti Brexit bias evident on this show.....not good Sophie. This smacks of 're education' 
This election created no mandate for watering down Brexit. There must be no backsliding  
Whoever ends up leading the Tories must recognise hard Brexit is dead & they need to work with other parties. 
Any Leavers on this show at all? Brexit a major topic this weekend but there's no one representing the 52% who voted for Brexit.  
Paula Rego, Untitled No.1,1998 series on unsafe abortion, response to a Portuguese referendum on hugely restrictive abortion laws #womensart 
Is that… a U Turn? Seriously, if May carries on with the line she's the only person qualified to negotiate Brexit, britain may die laughing.  
UK in denial: that's why it's impossible to proceed with Brexit. Permanent leadership crisis ahead until Brits make their choice.  
I imagine Brexit might come up. Just one Leave campaigner in the line-up to represent the 52%.  
No cherry picking - but rejection of May's Brexit means EU27 may allow UK to seek softer version says @CER_Grant 
Today's #German press: "Heres the mix. Living standards sink, #Brexit chaos blares, government shaky: GB needs someone to rewind the tape"  
Off to @bbcbreakfast to discuss political chaos created by @theresa_may Hard Brexit is over and DUP coalition must be rethought. 
Sadly there is nothing I disagree with in this piece by @drphilhammond on #NHS #workforce post #Brexit We must fight together #RespEd 
How much money have #Tories squandered in time of 'austerity'? A referendum, a Supreme Court case and #GeneralElection17 don't come for free 
Brexit talks cannot go ahead. May will be laughed at. BREXIT NEEDS DITCHED! 
Brexit author who promised to eat his own book if Corbyn gained seats delivered  
So all this #Brexit fuss over EU payments making up less than 1% of GDP could lose us more than 4%? Even worse - 10% - of our economy?  
The press are desperately trying to stop Brexit - spinning stories at every turn....They are the monkeys, but who is the organ grinder?. 
How to choose the next Prime Minister – and influence Brexit  
The leaders of the rest of Europe must be looking over at the UK wondering who they'll be dealing with by the end of the weekend #brexit 
Bumbling Bullingdon boy Boris back in the frame, Brexit led by tottering Theresa, dangerously dotty DUP prop up Tories. What can go wrong? 
In the eyes of the EU, UK is now very weak. Option 2 would suddenly turn weak situation into one of strength. Or Ultras risk losing Brexit.  
May: 'Discredited, humiliated, diminished' Our best weapon to defeat #Brexit.  
Brexit is on the ropes. There's not a second to spare to start prosecution of LEAVE LIARS b4 22ndCarpe diem folks 
Theresa May tells Angela Merkel she'll begin Brexit talks as planned this month  
What a mess. How is May going to get the #Brexit Great Repeal Bill thru the Commons, let alone the sometimes bolshy House of Lords? 
Boris Johnson reportedly plans a leadership bid, though he says that's "tripe"  
The rise of the remainers is about to begin. May’s Brexit strategy lies in ruins | Simon Jenkins  
RT EU Negotiators watched this & asked is this man really chief UK #Brexit Negotiator & laughed #Marr #Bbcsp  
Just plain stupid to go for an arrangement much less favourable than one we already have. Inevitable must happen: Cancel the damned Brexit 
What does the result of British election mean for PM May and #Brexit? #GE2017 
Our local takeaway has just launched their "Brexit Burger" unfortunately they don't know how to deliver it 
Yes, there's drama. But don't be distracted. Tory Brexit is still killing the economy.  
David Davis = Hard #BrexitLeave Single MarketLeave Customs UnionControl ImmigrationReject ECHR & make UK law supremeStop paying EU fees  
#WorstPrimeMinisterInHistory as she's too scared to debate, and clearly too rubbish to negotiate (#Brexit)  
UK election will complicate Brexit talks, warn EU leaders  via @FT 
British Election Backs Blacks and Breaks Brexit  
Ruth Davidson flexing her muscles on the big issue facing TMay - the approach to Brexit.  
Airbus may look beyond UK unless Brexit demands met - Sunday Times  
Rachel Weisz: 'My parents were refugees. Brexit feels like a death'  
Yep....the Brexit vote shocked them into reality...and Labour energised them  
Top Tory Bernard Jenkin calls on Conservatives to back Theresa May for the sake of Brexit  
The people of #WestPapua across the country are signing the petition to #LetWestPapuaVote #Referendum. SIGN & SHARE:  pic.twitter.com/reQB1Yy3Wa 
No matter who forms a government this is the end of hard Brexit #GE2017 
#CLIMATE #p2 RT  UK fishermen may not win waters back after Brexit, EU memo reveals  #tlot #ccot 
RubbishMany of us voted Labour *just* to stall Brexit. Since neither main party showed respect to Remain we aimed for hung Parliament. Done  
Barzani, Abadi speak on Mosul, first talk since declaring Kurdish referendum  
@jeremycorbyn Labour should acknowledge Remain Voters. Brexit vote was about austerity and failure to address regions 
I believe the young came out to vote.  Not making the same mistake they did with the BRexit vote.  Hope our young wake up.  #auspol 
Supporting Scottish self-government isn't same as harping on incessantly about a referendumIt's committing yourself to an attainable goal 
So @theresa_may is now not only a threat to the #BREXIT process but a threat to the internal security of the UK by jeopardising the GFA  
Oh yeah.The Brexit that May negotiates is going to be SPECTACULAR.  
EU Brexit sources tell me they think Theresa May has lost control of her govt - spoken to no-one who thinks negotiations will start Jun 19 
Whoops. Can't wait for actual Brexit negotiations.  
Awh man. What a crack team we have representing us in the Brexit talks. 
Cannot wait for these Brexit negotiations to start. Going to go so smoothly.  
Gosh this bodes incredibly well for the Brexit negotiations doesn't it?  
Would *you* trust Theresa May to negotiate Brexit on our country's behalf?  
HARD BREXIT is the gentlemen's way of taking back control of the People's Sovereignty that was stolen unlawfully & handed to a foreign power  
Good to know a week from the start of Brexit negotiations that we are all safe in the hands of a first-class crack negotiating team.  
1. The majority of elected MPs oppose "brexit", there is no majority support for it and the Referendum was subverted by Putin and Mercer. 
They're supposed to start negotiating brexit in just over a week. We may not have a government. What a carry-on. 
Theresa May personifying the word incompetent. Brexit negotiations should be fun. 
If they can't even organise a deal with the DUP properly, what hope is there for Brexit? 
On June 8th you asked us to endorse Brexit. We didn't. #NoMandateMay 
I'm glad that these are the people who will negotiate Brexit for us and not some bunch of incompetents. 
Brexit talks due to start in 8 days. Tories struggling to form a working majority in parliament before it starts...  
Divided and stunned by Brexit, Britain is turning into America  
‘The minute that Sturgeon talked about another referendum, that was it’  
What connects Brexit, the DUP, dark money and a Saudi prince?  via @IrishTimesOpEd 
chaps we are happy to announce we have formed government that is pro brexit and (may sighs and nods at dup members) against reverse vampires 
This is the end of hard Brexit  
The 'Brexit' blunder continues to bedevil Britain  
Brexit, pursued by a bore.  
Stuff about Brexit Negotiations is BS. Officials will start. UK does not have an agreed stance yet. 
I'm actually against a 2nd referendum. I'd rather just see the Brexit process collapse under the sheer weight of its own stupidity. 
No matter who forms a government this is the end of hard Brexit  
Dear Europe please can we plead temporary insanity and forget this #brexit thing 
Piglet is a Brexit voting Tory dickhead and I'm so angry someone has sullied his name with these memes.  
Theresa May didn't get her Maj because of Corbyn's Election Bribes & Tory punitive Manifesto.  Brexit was drowned out.  EU Ref result stands 
Drop her own Tory “hard Brexit” plans in favour of a new “national” consensus - now you're talking #crossparty  
Watch Ruth Davidson full interview:'look again' at Brexit'include' other partiesunease over DUP 
So if we don't have a Prime Minister next week, who shall we send in to negotiate #Brexit? Can we send @stephenfry? Or @sueperkins? 
I really suspect this might be the key. Achieving Brexit would be a logical contradiction. Idiots can get support for it, but not implement  
1. Only idiots want Brexit: voters, politicians, commentators.2. Brexit is hard to do.3. Idiots can't achieve hard things.4. Ergo... 
"Let's get to work", as if nothing had happened.On her Brexit mandate, which she doesn't have.Q: Will May still be there on 19/6?  
Brexit author who promised to eat his own book if Corbyn gained seats just delivered  
A) who cares what ex-leader of a defunct party thinksB) no one voted for any particular type of BrexitC) Farage is a Trump-Putin troll  
Indeed. My original Brexit won't happen column, written 2 days after the vote, was premised on Boris as Pm. Could yet happen  
Why don't they take their internal squabbles elsewhere? Brexit negotiations begin in days, May has no credibility, Britain needs government 
@RuthDavidsonMSP @theresa_may Excuse me, but 17.4m people voted for Brexit and main reason was control of borders and halt to free movement! 
Was UK "dog's breakfast" really so bad? Union breakup less likely. Govt moving away from hard Brexit. Labour revived but Corbyn not in No10. 
“You can’t possibly have someone as incompeten as Theresa May” to lead the Brexit negotiations ~ says Simon Schama  
Hammond "signalled that his backing for May was conditional on her moderating her Brexit stance"  
Brexit blues with a bottle of Trump.  
The 'stop #Brexit' movement is gaining yet more momentum. This is brilliant. Labour must take note. 
#Brexit must & can be stopped. The fight is now really beginning. 
A Tory/DUP coalition is exactly why so many millions in the UK remain closer to the EU than they do to unprincipled Brexit government.  
Is the Conservative Party preparing to betray #Brexit?  
Economy heading for Brexit cliff-edge; weak Tory Gvt propped up by DUP ultras; BoJo lining up to be PM. Still think we're 'better together'?  
Very good piece by @CER_Grant on what a softer Brexit (for lack of better terms) might look like  
."May stuck to her formula- 'Hard Brexit' - 'It’s ALL about immigration'She KEPT her base & lost EVERYONE else". 
The idea we are in a position to secure a 'good' Brexit deal now is laughable. The @Conservatives gambled with our future and they lost. 
*Brexit Shambles*  
With the brexit negotiations starting a week on Monday@theresa_may's crack negotiators set off early. 
Back to THE question: What's point of 'Soft Brexit' when it's a no-influence, expensive, much poorer version of what we have already? 
German Chancellor Angela Merkel and Theresa May have agreed Brexit talks will begin as planned in the "next couple of weeks" 
This Toryism is for a soft Brexit within the single market. It rejects DUP's bible-bashing bunkum. It is humorous & human. It is moderate. 
Just realised the DUP is going to have more influence in Brexit Neg. than SNP when we voted overwhelming to stay inside the EU! Shameful 
Drop hard Brexit plans, demand MPs  
David Cameron's decision to hold the Brexit vote will go down in history as the most expensive and destructive decision in political history 
Vote Cameron get Brexit + May. Vote May get Boris. 
We need a huge demonstration march early July. Anti Brexit. Tories out. Progressive coalition to Remain in EU. Fund NHS. Education. Etc. 
He would not do this, of course, but Boris certainly has the chutzpah and lack of principle to do a complete reverse-ferret on Brexit. 
Rethink hard #Brexit plan – we could sink it, Scottish Tory leader Ruth Davidson warns Theresa May #premium 
Exactly. Election result could be the making of Brexit, let's have Cross party, consensual approach.  
Boris is lazy, May a control-freak.Neither ideal for Brexit, but perhaps one more likely to just let civil service get on with the task. 
SundayTimes: Chancellor Hammond conditioned his support on putting jobs & business (not immigration) first in Brexit  
.@RuthDavidsonMSP says the Conservatives need to "listen" to other parties on #Brexit  
May wanted a mandate for a hard Brexit. Now Europe expects a softer tone  
Significant that Gavin Barwell - May's new chief of staff - was anti-Brexit and is pro-migration - olive branch to liberals. 
Brexit negotiations after the UK election.  
Philip Hammond's support for May is conditional on her putting jobs and business first in Brexit deal. See Sunday Times 
#Tories and #Brexit...and #Trump are on the wrong side of history.#21stcentury 
It is insane when the country is so divided and unstable that we should be engaging in a project as huge and divisive as #Brexit#Remain 
Poll: Who would you prefer to lead Britain's Brexit negoatiations? Please vote and RT. 
#Brexit reminds me of Mussolini's claims to be restoring the Roman Empire - All bombast & bluster without any reality to back it up #Remain 
As you noted in the next tweet, one problem with a referendum will be rig attempts. Another: an ignorant populace can't make wise choices.  
Don´t let your MP`s or those negotiating brexit forget that our fishing waters are ours, ours alone and not up for Grabs. 
*hums GoT*Tory leadership race: King's Landing intrigue Second election: war of the four kingsBrexit: Winter is coming. 
why was there an obsession with hard brexit after referendum? It never had to be, did it? 
On the contrary, if they stop a disastrous Brexit, they achieve the aim of most people who voted for them  
The British people have spoken against Hard #Brexit . Get over it, Nigel . 
It's utter BS - I voted Labour (I would have much preferred to have been able to usefully vote LibDem) and I'm absolutely opposed to Brexit. 
Your angry, petulant, nativist version of Brexit lost. Get over it.  
It's not actually how it works.  The people voted in an advisory referendum.  The advice should have been weighed against expert advice. 
Tories spent £1,200,000 on negative anti-Jeremy Corbyn social media adverts 
Can't wait for brexit to be negotiated by a woman that thought 'LET'S GET THE GUYS WHO DON'T BELIEVE IN DINSOSAURS TO HELP US' 
in 7 years the Tories have decimated the country with austerity, divided the nation over Brexit and now risk the peace in NI 
2016 - Brexit & Trump surprise the world in odds-defying shockers2017 - EA announce all DLC for a game will be free #Battlefront2 #EAPLAY 
The end of hard Brexit whatever happensMembership of the single market and customs union are now back on the agenda 
Maybe I was ahead of the curve but for #UKIP to succeed, it must rebrand & shout out its other strengths apart from being Brexit champion.  
Brexit author who promised to eat his own book if Corbyn gained seats just delivered  
What connects Brexit, the DUP, dark money and a Saudi prince?  
Pandering to the right of the party & UKIP to have a referendum was an atrocious Tory mistake. Pandering to the DUP would be unforgivable  
. @TheresaMayPM  should not resign. She won. And she made this bed of nails. She should lie on it. #GE2017 #Brexit 
Should brexit negotiations be dealt with by a cross-party team ? #GE2017 #brexit Vote , retweet , follow. Thank you 
A new PM would not have to call a General Election.Gordon Brown didn't.First priority is to ensure #Brexit happens.  
Theresa May’s failure to win a majority has put Brexit in doubt  
Rachel Weisz: 'My parents were refugees. Brexit feels like a death'  
A confidence deal is done.Government is formed.DUP will get a morsel or two tossed to them.Don't be distracted, #BREXIT is the thing now. 
Brexit's difficult and important. It should be above party politics. A war cabinet strikes me as a damned good idea.  
Why Norwegians now want a referendum on quitting the European Economic Area  via @BrexitCentral 
In summary. The #DUP is pro British, pro Brexit, pro Business, pro Israel and anti terrorism. The media witchhunt against them is incredible 
DUP deal to focus on Brexit, pensions and dinosaurs being a hoax  
Ruth Davidson: Tories must 'look again' at Brexit plan after election losses 
para 3 of Negotiating Brexit commits to scrapping May White paper and "retaining benefits of single market" Try reading before you bloviate  
55% (17.6m) voted for parties who campaigned against Hard Brexit or "Leave with No Deal"#HardBrexit is deaddon't let anyone say otherwise 
Party leaders today:Theresa May: playing Game of Thrones Jeremy Corbyn: working on BrexitNext election make sure you #VoteLabour 
you seem unaware that Labour Manifesto expressly opposes May hard version of Brexit. Read the Manifesto  
Absurdity: Believing that the imperfections of the EU merit even one 10th of the disruption and loss that would be caused by hard #Brexit 
Nationalism: An efficient emotion stirring tool to make people believe the lies of those who want to control them. #Brexit #Remain 
May appoints chief Remainer. Pro-mass immigration, career politician.We cannot trust this Prime Minister with Brexit!  
Brexit negotiations should be conducted by a multi-party committee 
Brexit. If no deal can be negotiated for any reason we leave the EU automatically 2 years from triggering article 50... 
Watch this space: hard Brexit out of single market and customs union makes no sense. People speaking up now  
UKIP forced the referendum. Leave campaign won on lies. On Thursday the country rejected UKIP. Any PM taking Brexit forwd is a coward. 
Having let Brexit happen by their apathy, UK younger voters came out big time to deliver a message to Theresa May.  
Good news. A pro Brexit pro Union political party will help sustain stable government.  
Ideal result for Labour. Forces Tories to deal with Brexit shit-show of their own making. Disenchantment in them will only increase further. 
Scottish media all over Ruth Davidson and MPs right now but won't be able to find em when Brexit hits the fan 
Tories said they had sent someone to negotiate a coalition and they came back with confidence and supply? That bodes well for brexit.  
Brits are gas.After #brexit they tweeted 'What's EU'? After #GE2017 they tweeted 'What's DUP'? What's next?After breakfast? What's weetabix? 
Tired of Brexit and Grexit talk? Try Rexit, the insect killer  
Of course, first we get Brexit. Then all human rights will be stripped out, the internet restricted and they'll redraw the voting boundaries 
Want more Gilbert & George? Here they are talking life, art, fashion and Brexit with our artistic director #RASummer  
@RuthDavidsonMSP acting like she's FM and now demanding the same concessions on Brexit the real FM asked for and was refused. Total chancer. 
#Churchill knows it. #UK #Brexit #TheresaMay #EuropeanUnion #Peace  
Theresa May's arrogant call for an early election backfired and her stance on Brexit has been rejectedWhat now?  
Glad you're calling 4 X-party alliance, inc Tories. Tories shld wise up: only way to negotiate Brexit credibly is w X-party team, inc Labour  
It would be a historic error for the SNP to reverse policy on an independence referendum  @JamesKellyHear, hear! 
I support the historical decision of the Kurds in Iraq to hold an independence referendum on 25/9 
RT #Brexit can be cancelled at any time -It only needs political will & majority vote from MPs #ItsNotRocketScience 
Corbyn's Queen's Speech should include 'we are withdrawing Art 50 notification' - #Brexit is very bad for the young who support him.  
What??? She's spent the last year championing a hard Brexit in almost every parliament speech she's made! This is nonsense  
Jeremy Corbyn MP: My vote for Labour is NOT a vote for Brexit  
If Ruth Davidson gets a seat at the Brexit table and the leaders of the devolved nations don't it will be a disgrace. An utter disgrace 
Party which caused Brexit result the way it resulted and eventually this mid term , it's done deal. For them, it's Job well done.  
Scottish Conservatives​ leader @RuthDavidsonMSP​ calls for "open Brexit" and says "healthy" to involve other parties in negotiations.  
"Corbyn's gains are being used to undermine Brexit - he's become a weapon of the establishment": @Tom_Slater_ on @SkyNews 
Scotland defenders marking Harry Kane like he was the Yes box in a referendum. 
A friendly reminder of what Brexit means.  
I reckon this DUP stuff could be great for Brexit - if we can get the government to Google "Northern Ireland" it could be revolutionary. 
If you can translate into native-level English from the languages in red, the EU really wants you! (Brexit-related eligibility permitting...  
BUCKFAST 2BREXIT 1#SCOENG 
Know why May lost?1 Mistakenly thought she had a mandate2 No strategy behind "Brexit means Brexit"3 Cozied up to Trump@GOP, be warned. 
A gentle reminder to who it may concern, the #Brexit mandate.  
Our #GE2017 manifesto warned women must not pay the price 4 Brexit as they did austerity. #JoinWE to fight with us 
“You can’t possibly have someone as incompetent… as Theresa May” to lead the Brexit negotiations - says @simon_schama #newsnight 
Your periodic reminder: there’s no such thing as a good #Brexit deal.  
I am a Remainer through and through - v disappointed in Corbyn over Brexit but my vote Labour in Kensington in no way "pro-Brexit"! 
There was an advisory referendum. People were fooled by industrial strength lies into voting leave. Crazed May saw it as her path to power. 
“What’s been ignored is the debate between hard Brexit and soft Brexit” - @simon_schama tells #newsnight 
Brexit needn't be delayed by Britain's election result, Angela Merkel says  
Brexit is a scam, don't fall for it 
Former UKIP leader @Nigel_Farage says UK may be headed towards “Norway-type” Brexit #newsnight 
I have no confidence in Theresa May to negotiate #brexit She has lost authority to represent us and should resign Please RT if you agree  
.. that said Corbyn is utterly vindicated in approach to A 50 - referendum means process had to start -that was enough for Labour leavers 
17,410,742  want #Brexit. Not a 'deal' that keeps us bound into #EU in all but name. They #voted for a free #UK, not a submissive one. 
Merkel's chief-of-staff Peter Altmaier choses his words carefully but opens door a crack to UK changing its position on Brexit #newsnight 
No compromise, @DavidDavisMP. The 17.41million  who voted for #Brexit and the millions more who accept the #EUref result, demand that! 
Come to conclusion we should scrap Brexit. We're too weak and unstable to undertake such massive change right now. I know. Will of the peeps 
To make a coalition with the #DUP @theresa_may will have to guarantee free movement in Ireland. #Brexit is kind of finished isn't it. 
Tweeted 2 days ago. Now clear that the nation does not want #HardBrexit & did not vote for it in the referendum. Complete rethink needed.  
#Brexit #GE2017Brexit, immigrant bashing, Election, DUP allianceWhat's needed for decent Tory MPs to jump ship? 
Theresa May begins Brexit negotiations pic.twitter.com/QkHXaZTipc 
Theresa May heads to Brexit talks pic.twitter.com/281zSg3KIU 
How can a prime minister who has no credibility and is on borrowed time negotiate Brexit?She can't What a messUK is a laughing stock  
Unplug yourself from #MSM #Leftie #SJW brainwashing.Europe is NOT the home of the 3rd world.And, yes, they must go back.#Brexit #Nexit 
Ruth Davidson: Tories need to listen to other parties on Brexit  
Scottish Conservatives​ leader @RuthDavidsonMSP​ says it will be "healthy" to involve other parties in Brexit negotiations.  
No compromise, @DavidDavisMP. The 17.41million Brits who voted for Brexit and the millions more who accept the EUref result, demand that. 
It may just be that #Remain MPs are wisely keeping quiet while #Brexit inevitably self-destructs as it shows itself to be all wind & bluster 
Is it too much to hope that #Brexit politics with its bluster & false promises disappears up its own idiotic & pointless vacuity#Remain 
Some derivation of.."all she does is talk about Brexit" a staple of the voxpops in target seats in North -from Wakefield to Bury to Chester 
But who gave the Tories exclusive brexit negotiating rights? Not the referendum. Using the best minds from all sides makes more sense 
Tory campaign assuming "the North" uniformly populated by Brexit obsessives far more patronising to North than Labour taking it for granted 
My guess? Tory leadership contest in the Autumn. Let May sort out the cabinet, get Brexit talks started (with David Davis leading them). 
17.41million Brits want Brexit.Not a 'deal' that keeps us bound into EU in all but name. They voted for a free UK, not a submissive one. 
I have eatenthe pagethat was inmy brexit bookand yeahyou were probablyhopingfor it allForgive meI was a cowarda snakeand a slug 
NEW Ruth Davidson: Tories must 'look again' at Brexit plan after election losses 
Personally, I'm banking on @uklabour membership to encourage #Corbyn to scrap #Brexit @dbfamilylaw @starbie99 @atatimelikethis @doan1935 
Many peddled idea of a strong gov't knowing it wasn't so, painting critics as saboteurs. Keep that in mind when they write about Brexit & EU 
The rise of the remainers is about to begin. May’s Brexit strategy lies in ruins | Simon Jenkins  
"Brexit is complex. I think I will buy that introductory reader written by the man literally eating it as penance for his poor analysis."  
Ex-media adviser to @theresa_may: "A ritual humiliation by a very angry Tory party. She is alone, Friendless, held hostage." #MayMustGo 
Almost all the Tory MP's in Scotland were elected in rural farming and fishing constituencies. Brexit is going to be brutally funny. 
Media, Left, & Remainer ‘liberal’-elite couldn’t give a toss if May stays or goes per se.They want to stop Brexit, & May is the main proxy 
Theresa May's massive gamble (and its stunning result) must not derail #Brexit  
We *will* get to the bottom of the DUP's £435k Brexit donation. It will take time & money. Please chip in if you can  
Brexit author who promised to eat his own book if Corbyn gained seats just delivered  
Piers, there is no good Brexit deal.  
"All is not lost: Jeremy Corbyn is not in power and the mad priests of hard Brexit have been temporarily laid low"  
#Brexit can be cancelled at any time -only needs political will & majority vote from MPs @atatimelikethis @doan1935 
When will most Remainer MPs grow a spine & stop ignoring the duty of an MP as outlined by Burke & reiterated by Churchill?#Remain #Brexit  
So sad. After Brexit, the Brits are so poor they're resorting to eating books. 
UK govt should now withdraw A50, reach out to Brussels and confirm full involvement in upcoming EU reform. Lead not Leave #brexit 
The Government should consider including @KateHoeyMP somewhere in the Brexit team... 
Here is @GoodwinMJ who tweeted "if Jeremy Corbyn polls more than 38% I'll eat my new Brexit book" eating his new Brexit book. Lovely stuff  
Absolutely. I voted Labour tactically. I do not want Brexit and I'm not the only one. 
Get in tae these Corbyn-voting, Brexit-loving weirdos, Scotland 
If Brexit was an effort to close the door on immigration, latest UK parliamentary election seems to have embraced diversity.  
If you aren't already doing so, please follow @LeaveEUOfficial. Let's get this done! Let's have our clean, brilliant, ambitious Brexit. 
3. Why did @Arron_banks claim you were DUP's mystery benefactor? ie that you funnelled extra £425,000 for Brexit  through Northern Ireland? 
that's just one page. it's like pledging Brexit and delivering Norway option. 
Mathew Good man, eats his book live on #SkyNews He was wrong about #Corbyn polling more than 38% votes in #GE2017#JC4PM #Brexit  
Chris Grayling: Theresa May set out the only way to pursue a deal.Ruth Davidson: We need to look again at approach to Brexit. 
The Lib Dems are missing a trick. Should be pushing for a coalition with the Tories in exchange for a soft Brexit. 
The only way for @theresa_may to claw back any semblance of credibility is to announce an immediate halt to #Brexit 
Political fact is: Tories cannot deliver hard Brexit or no deal threat now. Until they admit it, all Tory politics = denial. 
Significant intervention Ruth Davidson tells #C4News "it's really clear" we need to "look again at the way we approach Brexit." 
This is the end of hard Brexit  
Pretext for Tory line change on Brexit? I predict fiscal scare and growth downturn: OBR says "hard Brexit to tank GDP" -then reverse ferret 
Jeremy Corbyn has been handed the chance to stop a Brexit disaster. He won’t.  
Wheels Come Off May Wagon: aides resign + #Brexit screwed - we now have A DEAD PRIME MINISTER WALKING  #GE2017 
...obviously you can't finish Thatcher revolution if Corbyn is PM! Therefore they may now retreat towards soft Brexit and/or major delay 
If we think the nation is angry and divided now, just wait to see the consequences of Brexit being reversed. 
For the Tory right Brexit always about finishing Thatcher revolution: low tax, low wage economy with no human rights law. But... 
If it knocks Theresa May's disastrous hard Brexit off course, it could be a real bargain....  
Davidson and another Tory in last hour: stopping Corbyn more important than Brexit. Confused? Here's why... 
Defeated Tory candidate on PM: "No team, no authority, no popularity, no way to realise the manifesto, no strength for Brexit, no plan" 
Brexit: Hold my beer  
Much as we would love Brexit killed, staying in the EEA is not killing it. Its a compromise. Ask NIgel, he sold his voters the Norway model.  
8. We have perhaps our last opportunity now to think about Brexit. Ask for a pause, & reflect on the damage this agenda has & will cause. / 
'Can Brexit be reversed? Can Article 50 be revoked?' - Of course it can - and the sooner the better!   
7. Those Tories now baying for blood - they supported May, in pursuit of the hardest Brexit,against all common sense. Take a good long look. 
Tories have lost mandate for hard Brexit, says George Obsorne  
The stupid "them and us" mentality that has led us to the Brexit fiasco. Brussels looks on in sorrow and bafflement not in jubilation. 
5. We've been led into a disastrous Brexit by first Cameron, now May. Her judgment has been appalling. Esp triggering Art50 before election. 
Theresa May's election failure has put Brexit in doubt. My Sunday article for @IndyVoices 
Tories lose mandate to leave single market without a majority, Brexit Secretary suggests  
It would be a historic error for the SNP to reverse policy on an independence referendum -  #ge2017 #ScotRef 
Operation Kill Brexit is well underway. If you care about leaving EU, demand Brexit is delivered. #OperationKillBrexit @LeaveEUOfficial 
By calling a snap election at a time of national crisis, @theresa_may has shown that she lacks the judgement to handle Brexit. Both must go. 
Rachel Weisz: 'My parents were refugees. Brexit feels like a death'  
Tories: *pursue illiberal policy and a hard Brexit, call Lib Dems saboteurs*Tories: "Why won't you join with us in the national interest?" 
The Tories put their Brexit vision to the people and they rejected it. The people have spoken, the Tories have no Brexit mandate.  
From austerity to Brexit the Tories have the master plan on how to destroy Britain for everyone but the 1%. #ToriesOut 
Philip Stephens has it exactly right: Without mandate for hard Brexit, UK and EU have another chance to get it right  
After 6 months of chaos, Uk's now got weakest Government ever propped up by sectarian gangsters, amidst crisis in NI & a Brexit catastrophe. 
"DUP Brexit campaign manager admits he didn’t know about its mysterious donor’s links to Saudi" openDemocracy  
Sinn Féin will remind Leo Varadkar of his Brexit commitments - @PearseDoherty at the Seán MacDiarmada Summer School  
I voted Labour and don't want Brexit. Where I am my choice is labour or Tory unless 20000 others join me in voting Lib Dems or green 
Cabinet source says impossible to have leadership race with Brexit clock ticking as would take 2-3 months so only option is for PM to dig in 
@JDBakewell   Time for Brexit negotiators to be cross-party.  Keir Starmer for Labour! 
Over 80% voted for pro brexit parties 
.@RuthDavidsonMSP tells @BBCNews Tories need to work with other parties to "look again" at #Brexit  
That I don't think anyone now trusts our Prime Minister to do a good Brexit deal for the country.  
2014/09/18 Scotland rejects indy2016/06/23 UK votes for Brexit2017/06/08 DUP in UK GovernmentAt the end of the day, you've got to laugh. 
If your idea of best person to negotiate Brexit is David Davies then how disasterously wrong is your idea of "the best deal for Britain"? 
This is a Brexit negotiator!  
Look back on GE17 in 10 yrs time, ask yourself was Brexit worth not forgiving the Lib Dems? Britain deserves better than two party politics. 
Oh England, i know you thought brexit was bad but it was only a warm up. Just wait until you meet this lot.  
The fallout could include the end of Theresa May, a new election and even the reopening of the Brexit decision  
All these pundits who say Hard Brexit is off the table now were saying it was inevitable three days ago.With Brexit nothing is inevitable. 
The Mogg.A sensible voice always.#Brexit will happen, the Remoaners have no way to stop it now.  
Yes, let's kick Brexit into the long grass & then forget it  
still a risk of Corbyn & May being complicitNeed to keep pressure up to examine process and question Brexit mandate 
Well said. The Tim Montgomerie claim that all pro-Labour & pro-Tory votes can be taken as active support for hard Brexit is disingenuous.  
#TheresaMay claims #DUPCoalition govt 'will put fairness' in everything it does. Fair to ask where DUP got its mystery Brexit cash.#GE2017 
Few people in the country can have better shown that they have the temperament to lead the UK's Brexit negotiation team (6/6) 
ICYMI: before the election results, Brexit Secretary David Davis said that no majority means no mandate to leave SM:  
Not with a majority of 12. That's why she called the election. Idea it was to "ram through hard Brexit" was 100% wrong. 
Strong and Stable Hand Strengthened Will of the PeopleHard Brexit Coalition of Chaos For the Nation's sake Mrs May, please go 
I voted Labour and 100% reject Brexit 
Big Q for future: has Brexit so empowered the extremes as to doom the Cameron project of building a modern Toryism able to govern the UK? 
Brexit was won by a coalition of hard left + nostalgic right, in which the left was the senior partner. 
Leaked document shows ‘secret’ government studies into impact of ‘hard’ Brexit  via @LondonEconomic 
That the winning argument for Brexit was a (deceptive) promise of more govt spending should have been a warning to anti-EU Tories  
Robin is right; we allowed the Tories to make the election all about a "divisive" 2nd REFERENDUM, not about independence itself. 
Jeremy Corbyn has both honesty and integrity, May has neither, I know which one I would trust with Brexit #bbcaq 
Brexit talks are a week away and Britain is without a fully functioning government  
David Davis is a tough straight talking pro Brexit sensible chap who would make a great PM. I hope he succeeds May. #JustSaying 
Theresa May is too weak to: • command a commons majority• reshuffle her cabinet• keep her advisorsBut still wants to negotiate Brexit. 
In different circumstances, people would be pushing grand coalition for Brexit negotiations. 
It doesn't. Having gambled UK economy on Brexit, Conservatives now gambling with peace in N. Ireland. Will risk anything for themselves  
I think @DavidDavisMP should replace May as Tory leader & PM.He's the best person to lead UK through Brexit. Smart, tough operator. 
An explanation for Tory billionaires' obsession for illogical Brexit is that EU wants to close in on their tax havens 
In case you missed it, the secret DUP Brexit donor's links to Saudi intelligence service:  
Quite. One of my relations loathes Corbyn but voted Lab to eject his local hard Brexit Tory MP  
May assumed a mandate on Brexit re leaving Sing Mkt, customs union, ECJ etc. Davis said no maj = no mandate so surely time to think again? 
Yes. Labour need to rethink views on Brexit.  
Good that May's chiefs have gone but fundamental problem is May herself - and her complete failure to reset public policy after #Brexit vote 
Support this lady to make Brexit great and to make Britain great again. @AMDWaters #UKIP #AnneMarieWaters 
This is really an excellent summary of the key questions on Brexit government has - so far - dodged.  
Wounded May soldiers on as election shock complicates Brexit...  
Yes - to claim all voters in Labour & Tory seats are now actively for Brexit... is the new deliberate misrepresentation by hard fanatics.  
5) short of invading Spain, it's difficult to see what May could have done further to shrink our options on #BrexitIt's almost admirable 
Utter cr*p. We're not supporting Tories, & did more to oppose them since 2015 than Labour did, on #Brexit for sure but also welfare  
now we need illegal hunters to be prosecuted & stop moves to use Brexit to weaken animal welfare laws  
She should go now, every day she leaves it will damage our ability to negotiate a good Brexit deal.  
The DUP took a shit load of money from the Saudis to directly influence Brexit outcome. How is that legal? 
Cheers to Brexit! German Chancellor Merkel enjoys a beer with Mexican President Enrique Nieto in Mexico City  
Hard Brexit is a) choice of the EU27 b) policy of the Tory government c) impossible because no majority for it in parliament. #PopCornTime 
#GE2017 #Brexit 1) Thread Firstly, Theresa May has deliberately set up Brexit as an aggressive conflict rather than a calm negotiation. 
No, I think if people were now asked to vote on Brexit knowing Theresa May would lead negotiations, a majority would now vote to Remain.  
Tim Montgomery on #bbcaq is wrong to say that everyone voting Tory or Labour now want Brexit. They do not. It's complex, not binary. 
The brexitears are calling for trouble on the streets. They know we're in the end game now. Brexit is dying. Keep pushing. X 
I fully support working with @duponline - v sound on Brexit & UK union. We are not merging or going into coalition; just supply & confidence 
PM must widen her circle and build consensus to secure good Brexit deal & economic stability 
The reason many pro-EU voted for Labour over Tories when both offer 'hard Brexit' is one of tone. May echoed tabloid hostility to EU #bbcaq 
Labour's Shadow Health Secretary @JonAshworth on the #Brexit negotiations #bbcaq 
I don't think anyone wants another election at the moment, nor another leadership election. Let's get on with Brexit & stop the infighting 
It's also bollocks. In what way has May been trying to address divisions caused by pain of austerity or concerns over Brexit? Silently?  
#GE2017 #BrexitPlease RT to any Tory/Brexit supporting friends  
Sad in many ways, though understand why, Nick Timothy quit.He was main architect of #Brexit including need to leave Single Market. 
May was toast even before the poll. Issue is when. Impending Brexit negotiations complications to her teaching post at St Trimians destiny.  
The swiftest way to a republic is to politicise the monarchy. You guys are losing yr minds. This is all Brexit blowback face it. 
Since when has a minority overruled a majority?remain lost the referendum labour lost the GE ,,FULL Brexit remains the wish of the majority 
God. Theresa May was right. Weak government incapable of negotiating Brexit with some really alarming ties to Northern Ireland 
We can continue to harm and undermine the UK by staying on the path to Brexit or we can admit the huge mistake and recover from the madness.  
Things voting Labour in Scotland won't solve: London rule/democratic deficit, Brexit 62%, Trident, return of Tory Govts, Scottish Labour 
Larry, the 10 Downing Street cat:- 2 General elections- 2 Referendums- 1 EU election#HungParliament #DUPCoalition #Brexit  
Many millions still hold on to the view that Brexit is a serious political misjudgement, destructive, divisive and in the end undeliverable.  
4/~ Timothy spot on: austerity, hard Brexit and what I called "graduates without a future" created pro-Labour coalition 
3/~ Plus, May's decision to opt for hard Brexit was her choice; for mono-party control over negotiations ditto. May & her advisers culpable 
"'Everything is subordinate to the need to stop Corbyn, including Brexit' one influential Eurosceptic tells me." - Quite right.  
It was all to do with the awful manifesto, not Brexit 
The Tory's Queen's Speech will be 1)  commitment to Brexit 2) free massage and foot rub for everyone in East Belfast. 
Soft/Hard Brexit were terms invented by those in denial who wanted a way to stay in the EU in all but name. Muddying of the water. 
Europeans looking at Brexit and Corbyn and wondering how "moderate" UK became so radical. 
Brexit will redefine austerity. It will just become a way of life.  
Rachel Weisz: 'My parents were refugees. Brexit feels like a death'  
Huge Poll. (Retweet after vote)When should @theresa_may stand down? #GE2017  #brexit #yourvoice #followback ? 
If the Tories want to hold on to power, they need to adopt a far more consensual, unifying approach. No more right-wing Brexit bullying. 
We need the finest political minds to collaborate over #Brexit & future of NHS & social care. Insular, isolationist politics doesn't work 
I think the Conservative party should be made to pay back the £130m wasted on this election and whatever was spent on Brexit referendum 
Merkel: EU ready to continue Brexit negotiations despite Theresa May's election upset  
A leader that can't stand up to her own close advisers in private is definitely who we need to lead Brexit negotiations. 
Angry millennials got their revenge for the Brexit vote by backing Jeremy Corbyn  
DUP is right in middle of same illegal Brexit mess I've been investigating. Pls support excellent work of these 2 Mainstream media not on it  
Forgive us the indulgence of watching the 1922 Committee squirming as they're exposed as the hypocrites and opportunists that they are. 
The Conservative Unionist Negotiation Team for Brexit have requested that their acronym is not used | NewsThump 
"The one thing I would say to Corbynistas is that your policies would be impossible under the EU. Support Brexit!" - @Tom_Slater_on #SkyNews 
Remember when we warned you Brexit meant cosying up to unpleasant people, both inside and outside the UK 
30/ Somehow, JC and @UKLabour succeeded in making the election about Brexit in Remain-voting areas and cuts in Leave-voting areas. 
My view is a cross bench group to work on Brexit would be in the countries interest.  
Would it be too much to ask for a cross party group to work on Brexit. One Country 
This election wasn't about BREXIT, the national debt, NHS, terrorism, it was about fox hunting.The whole country was talking about it.  
Congratulations to our B4B Champion @vincecable back in Parliament to fight the progressive cause. Together we shall stop #Extreme #Brexit  
Where have gloating #Brexiters gone? Can't they cope with "will of people" when it says we don't want destructive #Tory #Brexit? #GE2017 
I have said repeatedly on social media that @theresa_may was the wrong person to negotiate #Brexit -She will be responsible #brexitshambles 
Having sacrificed #UK future through #Brexit to save their skins #Tories now content to destabilise N Ireland #peaceprocess 
We shouldn't be ploughing ahead with Brexit even on a cross-party basis. Only when a major party speaks for the 48% can we solve the crisis.  
Whether you voted for or against Brexit...we really need to postpone it until the UK gets itself in some semblance of order and sanity 
Only way forward is cross-party commission to manage brexit for the good of ppl & country not as a partisan matter. 
Theresa May continuing as PM with the DUP is SIMPLY not in the 'National interest'. It's to keep Murdoch happy & 1%. #MayMustGo #Brexit 
We must now uncover where the DUP got their £435k Brexit donation. Please chip in here so @PeterKGeoghegan & I can: 
#May banging on about #Brexit & certainty.FFS UK is more divided than ever.Cancel Brexit, resign, we must start over 
Maybe nowSturgeon will realise tht when we said NO at the referendum,she should have honoured that verdict at the time,it was loud and clear 
England fan at Hillhead Bookclub"We've got Smurf's Chum IPA on draught""Faaack that. Pint of Carling and a Vodka + Brexit chaser" 
Brexit is most of two years away and literally *anything* could happen next week. (Personally, I'm hoping to be invaded by the Culture.) 
This! Delighted that Indy & hard Brexit are dead but gutted we didn't win. We need actual, not moral victories. More hard work ahead.  
Tories would lose mandate to leave single market if they lose majority, Brexit Secretary suggests  They lost it! 
Most-read on  right now:What connects Brexit, the DUP, dark money and a Saudi prince  
Young voters rose up to hobble #Brexit Britain  
There’s a crisis looming in Europe. And in spite of Brexit, we need to be paying attention to it. @TheCanaryGlobal 
The premise hasn't changed; Brexit is a disaster for Scotland. Westminster will not protect Scotlands interests. We still need a way out. 
NEWS! The Conservative Unionist Negotiation Team for Brexit have requested that their acronym is not used  
Jeremy Corbyn MP: My vote for Labour is NOT a vote for Brexit - Sign the Petition!  via @UKChange 
What worries me is May’s lack of judgment in following bad advice. How the hell is she going to defend UK interests in #Brexit negotiations  
Pre-election: "every vote for Labour weakens May's Brexit hand"Post-election: "every vote for Labour vindicates May's Brexit stance"  
Labour's Shadow Health Secretary @JonAshworth on the #Brexit negotiations #bbcaq 
There has never been a mandate for any form of #Brexit. 37% of an electorate is no licence for anything. Withdraw Art 50, return to normal.  
6/ Which makes JC's decision to force his party to accept Brexit a tactical master stroke. 
Sign our petition & tell your new MP no #Extreme #Brexit Ensure the first email they get is from YOU #TheFightIsOn   
Tories will now struggle to rally around any negotiating position on Brexit - whoever is leader. Will require imagination to avoid chaos. 
Problem for Tories: don't want early election but badly split on hard/soft Brexit. 
But doesn't explain how Scotland avoids jumping out tied to England with no Brexit parachute. Is the answer to give up?  
3/ But one of the curiosities of #GE2017 is that some Remainers believed voting for @UKLabour was an anti-Brexit vote nevertheless. 
Nice trolling, Piers. 84% of voters just endorsed parties committed to Brexit, Nick Clegg got sacked and the SNP took a hammering.   
Brexit? Downing St’s abrasive, ill-judged insistence that “no deal is better than a bad deal” is probably dead meat.  
'No turning back' on independence #referendum: @masoud_barzani's senior advisor #TwitterKurds 
Not true. Both Labour and Tories committed to Brexit in their manifestos and they won most of the vote. 
I hope Scottish unionists are happy: they now face the chaos of Brexit with a zombie PM propped up by a small club of political Neanderthals  
This is what Europe thinks #Brexit should look like  
When it's convenient.... #Brexit  
.@janetRCN: Theresa May has more than Brexit to resolve and must not be consumed to the detriment of patients and the people caring for them 
Now is the moment. Carpe Diem! @Nigel_Farage @UKIP #Brexit  
The best way to brexit is to do what the EU think we will, which is go very quickly. We save money, avoid trouble and put pressure on them! 
The Theresa May who is seeking a deal with DUP without thinking through wider consequences is the same who wants to do UK's Brexit deal. 
What's a hung parliament and how will it affect Brexit? Here's a quick guide  
If Brexit wasn't enough, a deal with the DUP shows the utter contempt with which the UK Government holds the security of Northern Ireland. 
Listen to me discuss how @Conservatives will deliver true Brexit w/ support from @duponline on @BBCr4today 1:13:42: 
Brexit negotiator in Brussels told BBC they are talking to Corbyn and respect him. Implied they'd prefer him!  
Scottish Tories likely to support freedom of movement in order to remain in the Single Market. #Remain #Brexit 
In some ways, this *is* best possible outcome for Labour. Much improved outcomes, but no direct responsibility for the Brexit nightmare! 
Brexit needn't be delayed by Britain's election result, Angela Merkel says  
Aware that this is naive but Brexit deal needs to win support from both sides of the House. Should form a cross-party "war cabinet" for it. 
From before election but still stands. Detailed argument for why May is a bad prime minister for Brexit. This is part one of the thread.  
Terrific explainer of Corbyn's inadequacies, May's inadequacies, and the mess that Brexit and a hung parliament leaves Britain in.  
If I were May:1) let Farage win Thanet by-election. 2) let him co-negotiate Brexit 3) thus unite right & stop mad leftBut she's daft  
We are now witnessing the Butterfly Effect of Brexit. One yes/no question on EU has led to the potential collapse of the NI peace agreement. 
Flashback February 2017 - Secretive DUP Brexit donor links to the Saudi intelligence service  
#TelegraphView: Theresa May's authority has been badly damaged, but focus must now turn to Brexit  
The Tories will tear themselves apart over Brexit. There's only one way we can mess this up - by being disparate. Wake up 
With 63% of the Scots popular vote now being Unionist, Ruth should now be in the U.K. Team at Brexit talks @ScotTories 
It's actually spot on. If people had not suffered from decades of economic savagery, there'd be no Brexit. That needs to sink in a bit 
I will pledge to campaign for Softest Brexit based on UK rejoining EFTA, signing EEA & retaining Customs Union at least for 5 ys transition  
Was the election a reminder that it's not just delivering Brexit that matters but dealing w/ causes of the vote too?  
Just caught up with Camborne Redruth & Hayle result. Stunning performance by Labour's Graham Winter. Now a marginal with hard Brexit Tory MP 
Seems like Teflon Theresa is shifting blame on Fiona Hill. If Fiona is to blame, Theresa is obvs easily led. Brexit going to go well then 
So, Theresa's plan is hammer Brexit through as she wanted all along and negotiate on the world stage with her lot and a bunch of loons. 
Anything is possible if enough of us stand up against the ESTABLISHMENT 
It must be clear to everyone who values  future of UK that we are not in a position to negotiate Brexit and shd ask for a suspension of A 50 
Yes Labour did not get into power but..hard Brexit is dead..neoliberalism is dying..mediabias exposed..Centre Left is mainstream#GE2017 
Wait, so @theresa_may spent £100m on an election to lose her majority ... And we should trust her to make a good deal on #Brexit??? #GE2017 
Brexit needn't be delayed by Britain's election result, Angela Merkel says  
Called an election about Brexit, then spent the next 50 days trying her hardest not to talk seriously about Brexit.  
Princess Yachts to recruit 100 staff as Brexit boosts business.  pic.twitter.com/WZdG1WUvAK 
That's the thing - any #Brexit costs.And there are virtually no benefits.So why are we doing it?  
Totally disillusioned and horrified by UK politics since #Brexit ref. We're being mocked and ridiculed worldwide.CANCEL BREXIT. SIMPLES. 
Paralysed, powerless & discredited leader now has to negotiate a good Brexit deal? God help us. 
May has NO MANDATE to conduct Brexit negotiations. BREXIT NEEDS BINNED! #NopBrexit 
There'll be other elections soon, with other manifestos. Democracy is a constant, minds change. Brexit in any form is not yet a done deal 
We said it before the GE, the GE result has confirmed it bigly! The country doesn't want you or your divisive Brexit Mrs May @theresa_may. 
This bank is bucking the Brexit trend and moving jobs to London  
Chris Leslie doing what Labour Right does best, divert from Tory failure, they did it post Brexit doing it again now, need to be forced out 
I rejoined yesterday, after feeling Corbyn hadn't done enough to prevent hard Brexit. His election campaign has really changed my mind. 
@remainophile  if Brexit costs country 100bn to leave and loses us 30bn pa do Leavers still want to leave? Let's see deal 
DUP deal to focus on Brexit, pensions and dinosaurs being a hoax  
1. Asked senior DUP figure about potential priorities in any talks with Theresa May. On Brexit - 'maximum access to single market'.. 
BBC now gearing up their leftie crap to continually undermine TM until she goes - no balanced  support for Brexit - remove licence fee now  
How important was Brexit in the so-called ‘Brexit election’? New post by @MattWhittakerRF  
Not even the strongest leader can deliver good deal on Brexit. The best deal ever is to Remain. 
Rachel Weisz: 'My parents were refugees. Brexit feels like a death'  
An ultimate humiliation for @NicolaSturgeon would be  for Theresa May to give @RuthDavidsonMSP seat at Brexit table 'speaking for Scotland'. 
What both sides must realise. The prospect of stopping Brexit ended Thursday night. The prospect of a hard-Brexit ended Thursday night. 
But they fooled a lot of people into thinking Labour was #Remain or soft (in SM) Brexit. I'm genuinely fascinated to see what they do next  
I'm nostalgically recalling days pre-2016 when plan seemed to be Holyrood spunkiness then referendum in early 2020s. That was a *good* plan. 
Brexit by timetable continues.  
Conservatives joining with DUP over Lib Dems, shows they would rather give up on  rights than even pause for thought on Brexit. 
we've all had a feverishly exciting 2 days but this is serious now. We lack a functioning govt in a time of arguable crisis (Brexit, terror) 
WE NEED #ToriesOut2017 NOW! Before they get feet back under table with DUP and before Brexit talks. PUSH THEM OUT! #TheresaMustGo 
David Davis and Philip Hammond pushed for Theresa May to call the election, sources say  
Secretive DUP #Brexit donor links to the Saudi intelligence service  
After her disastrous election, @theresa_may has no mandate to pursue an extreme & job-destroying Brexit. Pls RT:  
#Brexit and the Irish Border, Jan 2017. Has anyone published a workable solution? (genuine Q) Brexit and the Border  
Ruth Davidson planning Scottish Tory breakaway as she challenges Theresa May's Brexit plan  via @telegraphnews 
Jeremy Corbyn has been handed the chance to stop a Brexit disaster. He won’t.  
From the Dutch paper @Trouw: May goes into the #Brexit negotiations   
What the hell is the BBC? This AM's prog disgraceful: Lab won? Tories finished, DUP disaster, Brexit dead. All interviews pro Lab. Appalling 
Well of course they are. The website's called Make Our Planet Great Again. Meanwhile Brexit has pulled the plug on a brain drain of our own  
Guys, this Brexit thing? Let's not do it. 
May keeps saying she won't do something and then doing itNo credibility Incapable of negotiating Brexit - or of governingShe can't last  
Oddly, I don't recall the "Cameron's Brexit blunder has set men in politics back decades" think pieces.  
That's what Labour get when you have a candidate who is (a) clearly anti-Brexit and (b) anti-Tory in one package. Congratulations David.  
How to save the Tory Party in three easy steps. 1. Remove May now. 2. Forget Brexit. 3. Install Philip Hammond as PM. 
Has the irony sunk in that stitching together a gvt for coherent approach to Brexit w DUP now risks tearing open an Irish hole in UK itself? 
Rather than allying with extremists to cling on, surely a real leader would be trying to put a cross-party brexit negotiating team together? 
A Petition asking Govt to form cross-party group to negotiate Brexit deal. Anyone? 
May: we must respect the will of British people who voted Brexit General Election: you didn't get enough votesMay: ok this is different 
Rachel Weisz: 'My parents were refugees. Brexit feels like a death'  
Don't see why this isn't being suggested more openly. Election showed we want more consensus on Brexit deal  
The #DUP are pro Union, pro Brexit and anti terrorism. Any wonder they are now being demonised? 
Votes for the Remain-supporting Ulster Unionists fell by 31,655 between 2015 and 2017, while votes for Brexit-supporting DUP rose by 108,056 
Brexit negotiations may start soon but probably with the distraction of another Tory leadership campaign and looming general election. /1 
.@BarryGardiner has been a revelation these last few weeks. Along with @EmilyThornberry and @Keir_Starmer - they should be the Brexit team  
Theresa May "was in tears" - the story behind a humiliating election, from 15 insiders  
Today's FT: unnamed minister says it will be impossible for #May to push through #brexit legislation: "In practical terms, brexit is dead."  
A friend suggests that May & Foster's Brexit talks will be carried out by the Conservative & Unionist Negotiating Team... note the acronym 
Shots fired for soft Brexit.  
The referendum was a year ago, so it is a *teensy* bit late for the old "OMG how could Westminster destabilise NI like that" hot takes. 
We should have another referendum ASAP. The young would vote as on June 8, #Remain would win,  #Brexit chaos would end. 
LANDSLIDE BREXIT WIN- 84% backed parties committed to leaving EU- Con, Lab & UKIP promised to end open borders  
Excellent thread this, well worth a read. 
MPs are going to rally round pm (if aides sacked) cos of Brexit but one told me "no way in hell she'll be in charge for next election" 
It took a single vote to expose their rank idiocy & defy their narrative. No wonder talk of a second referendum makes their buttocks clench.  
Far from rejecting Brexit, we have just elected a House of Commons 90 per cent of whose members are pledged to leave. 
After yesterday, what support I had for Brexit has truly died. 
All of the newspapers, commentators & pundits who described Mrs May as the best thing since sliced bread also described Brexit as brilliant. 
Looks like we'll be sending the Conservative and Unionist Negotiating Team to discuss Brexit terms.Can't think of a suitable acronym  
"MAYXIT" #TheresaMay #UK #Brexit #BritishParliament #EU #JeremyCorbyn #UKElection2017 #UKElection #UKVotes #MAYXIT 
On R4 @OwenPaterson = latest Leaver backing May, fearing change in PM cld undermine #Brexit. My view: Brexit most hurt by weak PM continuing 
I agree. The referendum asked the wrong question, making an erroneous link between the EU and two deeply divisive  topics. Hence, mess. 
The dark mystery over who funded the DUP's six figure Brexit campaign  
Re Today-A PM calls an election at the peak of her honeymoon and with Lab voters split over Brexit - this was not an easy election for Lab. 
A year ago world looked better. Brexit couldn't possible happen. Paris had been signed. Trump was meant to be an amusing anecdote... 
Not even the Tories are stupid enough to have a leadership election before #brexit negotiations. I'm almost sure of it. 
Tories and DUP is a more natural fit than 2010 LibDem coalition; and vital for stability, delivering Brexit and to keep Labour out of power.  
Leaves the door open. I'm happy to keep fighting for no Brexit but we might have to make some concessions or it'll be far far worse 
#DUP in 1975 referendum on joining #EU - the constant exorcisms should liven up #Brexit negotiations  
Brexit diminished our stature in the world – and now Theresa May has made things much worse  
Who do you believe the next UKIP leader will be ? #ukip #brexit #farage #evans #whittle Vote , RT , follow and enjoy all our polls  
#Brexit can't work ask any: farmer, doctor, teacher, scientist, police officer, factory worker, fisherman, nurse, dentist, #MayMustGo 
The last thing this country needs right now (or ever!)is Brexit! #NoBrexit 
Please don't stray off the path David. We voted to return UK to its Pre EU status .Remain call that hard Brexit. We call it independence. 
It went against all my principles voting Tory iso UKIP, but we needed to ensure Brexit. You have my support. 
One tweet from an excellent thread. Why was there no election discussion on Brexit and its impact on the Northern Ireland border?  
Too simplistic, I suppose, to have imagined a "government of national unity" to negotiate Brexit? 
Come on people. Brexit is oh the ropes. Let's get this action against the Brexit liars over the line this weekend.. 
Good points @GavinBarwell on @BBCr4today Conservative share of vote up to 43% and PM the best person to lead Brexit negotiations 
Today's surreal political meme: countless papers informing us that Ruth Davidson is, and has always been, agin a dramatic form of Brexit. 
I think, perhaps, May would have been better to rerun the referendum. 
A weak Government split by differences over the way forward on Brexit (Davidson, Hammond) and leadership ambitions. 
Theresa May gambled for a stronger mandate to negotiate Brexit. And came out with a hung parliament  
Can the UK revoke Article 50 until we sort out a proper government, then hold second fully binding referendum? 
You can wake up at 6am at the weekend and already find people on Twitter hard at war against Brexit and the Tories. We are relentless. 
Pressure grows on May to abandon 'hard Brexit' in wake of election humiliation  
NB: Fight to retain our LGBT rights after Brexit. Now is NOT the time to remain silent! #samesexmarriage #itsokaytobegay #irishlgbt  
The state of democratic UK now where elections /referendum results are not accepted.  
I'd love it if @jeremycorbyn just turned up at the Brexit negotiations and said... "but I was invited..."  
Ruth Davidson planning Scottish Tory breakaway as she challenges Theresa May&#39;s Brexit plan  
Vote Leave in meltdown, Brexit is going to fail big time.  I've never had so much fun.  
Wounded May soldiers on as election shock complicates Brexit  
Election results 2017 LIVE: May FINALLY focuses on Brexit as she vows to stay 5 more years  
May is a totalitarian Tory. It's all about power and sod democracy regarding Brexit. Quite shocking - #MayOut asap 
Blundering, incompetent May does not know what she's doingDoes not understand how things are linked Worst person to negotiate Brexit  
Merkel ready for Brexit talks - We bet she is!!!!  
May focused on Brexit as if Brits really wanted it, Corbyn sidestepped the issue  
I'm declaring Murdoch and MSM are "DEAD" after getting Trump /UK/ Brexit/ Turnbull/ Qld elections.all WRONG!) (social media rules)  #auspol 
In light of #GE2017, German Chancellor #Merkel says she believes the #UK will stick to the #Brexit timetable, adding that the #EU is "ready" 
Folks also noticing you're on your THIRD Brexit stance in a year. A real conviction politician. 
Blame Crosby? Let's ignore the Tory track record of policies concerning the young, old, sick and those in need? 
Catalan public workers caught in referendum crossfire  
Did I miss the bit where May said the electorate had now weakened her hand in Brexit negotiations? #GE2017 
It is difficult for Theresa May to claim a mandate for a hard Brexit after her dismal electoral performance  
Idea Tories can keep May temporarily to negotiate Brexit through grubby deal with DUP shows complete contempt for British public.  
Opinion | Britain’s Brexit election: How things came unglued as PM Theresa May squandered her working majority  
Viewers want @piersmorgan in charge of Brexit. What do you think?  
Merkel says EU is 'ready to start Brexit negotiations'  
Merkel said Britain was part of Europe regardless of Brexit, and that she wanted country to remain a good partner 
Angela Merkel urges speedy #Brexit talks after UK vote  
"We want to negotiate quickly, we want to stick to the time plan,” Angela Merkel says regarding Brexit talks.  #world 
Germany ready for Britain to begin Brexit talks, Angela Merkel says  
BROKE: The British election was a referendum on Donald Trump.WOKE: The British election was a referendum on Bernie Sanders. 
This not very good piece fondly quotes young Remain voter who loves Corbyn, without informing readers that Labour manifesto backs Brexit  
Puerto Rico's governor to hold Sunday referendum on possibility of island's statehood.  
Merkel assumes May will stick to Brexit talks plan  
Many young British voters felt compelled to vote for the first time because of "Brexit" and austerity cuts  
May's #Brexit battle cry - "no deal is better than a bad deal" - isn't just wrong; it undermines negotiations.  
There's a whiff of payback for "Brexit" in the surge of young Brits who voted for the Labour Party  
Forget Brexit, @DominiqueP_C just BRENTERED. #WynonnaEarp 
#GE2017Not Only Will #TheresaMay Mess Up #BREXIT..BUT She Will Also Implement Her 'Nasty Tory' Pledges..!#HungParliament#DUPCoalition 
Nigel Farage: They Are Going To Reverse Brexit  via @yournewswire 
The UK election result spells bad news for the E.U. and Brexit  
Theresa May could be ousted by her own party if she goes for Hard Brexit: How the EU talks have changed #GE2017 
After financial meltdown, brexit Trump..."we didn't spot it" is an increasingly threadbare excuse 
Jeremy Corbyn has been handed the chance to stop a Brexit disaster. He won’t.  
Brexit/Border matter here. EU supports us re: Good Friday Agreement. W’minster can't just break treaty. Dublin MUST pay attention & speak up 
Brexit Gladiator Nigel Farage Prepares for Return to Political Battlefield  
Brexit In Jeopardy After May’s Election Disaster  
Catalonia announces October 1 independence referendum in defiance of Spain's central government  
Forget Comey, Trump, Brexit. Alex Honnold climbed a 3000 ft cliff without a rope.  via @newyorker 
Thoughts on the future of Brexit from the FT comments  
Not content with fucking up the referendum & fucking up the election, she now wants to fuck up Ireland. 
I think it's more Theresa said "this election will be about Brexit" and everyone believed her. When really it wasn't, it was about terror.  
Incidentally, that's biggest weakness of calling #ScotRef now. Scale of Brexit upheaval & problems isn't evident yet. But it will be by 2019  
My mum is savage af  #brexit #GE2017 
Pretty sure David Davis was saying as far back as October that people voted for what was the best deal for the country, not Hard Brexit.  
.@NileGardiner: “[@theresa_may] has vowed to move forward with #Brexit and ensure that Brexit will take place.” #TheStory 
#Brexit 'negotiations'. 
In an era of election surprises, Britain didn’t disappoint. And Brexit had surprisingly little to do with it.  
Matthew Goodwin said he would eat his book on Brexit if Tories didn't get a majority. The replies here are glorious:  
The unionist surge in Northern Ireland might save Theresa May but what do people there think about Brexit?  #GE2017 
.@UniofOxford’s Ngaire Woods identifies 3 classic negotiating mistakes that the #UK is at risk of making | #Brexit  
Leadership contest would be 'CATASTROPHIC' ahead of Brexit, IDS warns amid election shock  
It is getting very tiresome hearing pundits who didn't get the result they want, such as Brexit, Trump or Corbyn, say "no-one" predicted it. 
It is possible that Ruth Davidson may yet save us from self-destructive Brexit  
I'm in Barcelona, just leaving a dinner party where a journalist told me that the referendum will be a "neverendum." Not a sure thing....  
No More Excuses Get on with BREXIT  
The only Treasury analysis so far published shows there is no Brexit deal that doesn't hurt British jobs, businesses and prosperity.  
I voted Tory until Brexit. I am extremely saddened that Theresa May has sold their soul to retain the prime ministership. The DUP, why? 
DUP transferred £9,000 from Brexit donation to party funds - The Irish News  
EU Boss: 'Still don't know UK position on Brexit'Here it is: We are Leaving ALL parts of the EU - Sooner the Better 
#Brexit causes such hatred on the left because it was more about denouncing left-wing liberal filth than simply leaving the EU. 
“I think another referendum definitely was at the forefront of people’s minds” - @rossbrannigan95 tells #newsnight 
ahmad turk: the needed everyone supporting barzani for the #Referendum process. #twitterkurds 
This is really sinister: #May's #DUP crutch linked to 'Saudi dark money’ & influencing #Brexit  via @skwawkbox 
Catalonia calls independence referendum for October  
Are we really, really to believe that no one saw this coming ? Doesn't bode well for #Brexit negotiations if they couldn't even flag this 
This is one of the key misunderstandings of the campaign: many Brexit voters were registering a rejection of DOMESTIC "austerity" policy.  
This is a really big deal. Arms length Scottish Conservatives pushing for softer Brexit remove May's majority:  
Senior Brexit campaigner Arron Banks denies offering 'six-figure bribe' to DUP in exchange for Leave.EU support  
Ffs brexit will cause issues on the irish border and we've been talking about it since June last year  
The Tories are doomed, ukip are dead, Hard Brexit is snuffed out and the young people are motivated. I'm off to bed feeling optimistic... 
PM's plans for hard Brexit in disarray as opponents say she has no mandate #GE2017 
I should've added that although No Deal/WTO option is now dead, it is laid to rest next to Remain.Time to all move on to smart Brexit.  
Know what I get from this most of all? However unpredictable things now are I was not the only one still thinking "my God, Brexit is lunacy" 
The one kind of person worse than the evil man is the good man whose acquiescence facilitates his evil deeds.Tory Remainer MPs#Brexit 
#Brexit revenge-Labour beat the Conservatives by 20 votes in Kensington maybe the poshest most Tory place in Britain 
Dup going to implement brexit against the wishes of their own community #sinnfein tells #newsnight 
.@nadhimzahawi  concedes if PM said she did not have sufficient mandate for Brexit talks before election she can't have one now #newsnight 
everything about brexit leads back to the troubles  
I'm quite certain that if young voters had turned out & voted, as they did yesterday, in EU ref there'd be no Brexit. #WillOfThePeopleMyArse 
Brexit diminished our stature in the world – and now Theresa May has made things much worse  
Cameron gave us a referendum because he was sure he couldn't lose. May, election same reason. Tories treat UK like personal vanity project 
Top level Remainers are FINALLY trying for the anti-Brexit push we've been waiting for. It all depends now on whether Corbyn joins them. 
I was only obeying orders! The slithery excuse of every Tory Remainer MP. #Brexit #Remain 
'The road map for the Brexit negotiations is now waste paper'  
Ken Clarke apart there is not one Remainer Tory MP who is not a spineless coward unfit to go anywhere near the mother of Parliaments#Brexit 
May & Davis shd note fate of empty slogans in election. "Brexit deal that works for all"? Good luck finding one with only winners, no losers  
Theresa, we hardly knew you. Cartoon by Rayma Suprani of Venezuela/USA. @raymacaricatura #brexit #theresamay 
The Remainer Tory MPs are the lowest form of sniveling cringing crawling gutless spineless political nothings!#Brexit #Remain 
When #Kensington goes Labour you just know that #TheresaMay has rubbished the country with hard Brexit and austerity. 
So here we are, June 9th, 10 days before Brexit negotiations, with no Stormont government and mass confusion over the NI Brexit border. 
Ruth Davidson says "open Brexit" which prioritises economics  & free trade over immigration must be agreed with other parties - Telegraph 
Brexit, if it doesn't fall over, will be a very, very hard wake up call for Theresa May and all those who voted for it. 
You'd think we'd have learnt our lesson after the EU referendum and actually thought about the consequences of a Hard Brexit in NI. But no. 
Ruth Davidson planning Scottish Tory breakaway as she challenges Theresa May's Brexit plan'   
EU leaders have a serious warning for Theresa May about Brexit today  
FT Weekend: "May clings to power as new front opens in Brexit battle" #tomorrowspaperstoday (via @alliehbnews) 
After imposing years of cruel austerity Tories take £143,000,000 of OUR cash so they can cost us EVEN MORE in Brexit.#MaysWasted143Million 
Brexit > Mayxit ? (Par Salles)  
May gains 10 DUP but risks losing 12 Scottish Tories with Ruth Davidson planning Brexit breakaway  via @telegraphnews 
Pleased to be reappointed SoS for Exiting the EU. Looking forward to getting on with job of negotiating a Brexit deal that works for all' 
The mentality of the anti-referendum protest voters in Scotland revealed: if they are moronic enough to vote Conservative, it says it all. 
Having promised Britons Brexit, Single Market & sovereignty, @DanielJHannan complains "people vote for free stuff" 
You seem to have forgotten labour manifesto called to leave the EU and SM? So 84% voted for Brexit  
May vows to stay the course on Brexit, but resignation pressure builds after stunning loss  
PM's plans for hard Brexit in disarray as opponents say she has no mandate  
Ruth Davidson planning Scottish Tory breakaway as she challenges Theresa May's Brexit plan  
No matter who forms a government this is the end of hard Brexit  
We were warned #ProjectReality #Brexit 
1. Too cautious, Jon - it WILL have a cost . It also seems May has been covering up what she knows about the subversion of the Referendum... 
#WeakAndWobbly I will negotiate for the very sort of Brexit that my masters in the DUP require from me as long as I stay in No 10  
At this point Westminster woke up. The idea of Northern Ireland slipping back to Direct Rule months before Brexit negotiations = NOT GOOD. 
Remember when Cameron messed up the referendum and mens' roles in politics were called into question? No?  
Far from overwhelming us in a hard Brexit surge, millions of pro-European voters have voted to utterly reject the Govt’s hard Brexit agenda 
Extra referendum turnout disproportionately leave didn't turnout. Extra election turnout young students/Remainers. Net net: majority remain 
Theresa May refused to spell out what exactly she wanted to do on Brexit. She even skipped debate w/ opponents. #UKElection2017 
So do I. We argued Referendum cross Party- why not the aftermath? That would be a true national endeavour.  
FT WEEKEND FRONT PAGE: 'May clings to power as new front opens in Brexit battle' #skypapers 
Add in the inherent sectarian tension in Northern Irish politics, plus heightened fears over a hard border post-Brexit, and it's paralysing. 
#News #Iran May to form fragile government after #UK election debacle, uncertainty over #Brexit talks  
Catalonia To Hold Referendum In October On Leaving Spain  
Brexit would not have happened if Corbyn had campaigned to stay in the EU in the same way he campaigned to get into no 10. 
Brexit explained.....  
The breakdown of costs for keeping benefits of the EU after Brexit may be higher than expected  
My pleasure. After last night, I have regained a tiny amount of hope that Brexit might somehow be averted. Or at least softened. 
There are some who think that there is a MAGIC #TORY #BREXIT #POLITICIAN that can replace #TheresaMay! THEY DO NOT EXIST! WAKE UP EVERYONE! 
If she's prepared to trade with the DUP just for a little power, think what she's prepared to give away for brexit 
I am here! In Barcelona! About to speak about the deliberative process of the referendum in Scotland, in anticipation of the Catalunya ref!  
Even this election didn’t shake Britain’s Brexit denial. Europe must act alone  
What does Theresa May's stunning set-back mean for culture?  #UKElection2017 #brexit 
Whilst those who take part in a SPORT called #MayBashing! Our BREXIT is being DELAYED & UNDERMINED! Let her get on with #BREXIT on the 19th!  
Tories are their own coalition of chaos already: 13 soft Brexit Scots + 70 Steve Baker hard Brexiteers + 10 10 DUP + submerged ex-Cameroons. 
.@Aiannucci  thinks the leaders of the main political parties should put their differences aside to negotiate the best Brexit deal #bbcqt 
Worrying about brexit when there's a nuclear war on the horizon is like stressing over what the food will be like at your wake. 
Buckfast v Brexit  
The farmers aren't going to be pleased about you fucking up Brexit either you wheat killing Fuck pump #resignmay 
don't tell me its "throw the toys out the pram" time : fecking hell thought we had seen the last of that childish behaviour after brexit  
3) The impending line "ScotGov has no mandate for indyref2 because the SNP need Green help. Btw, we welcome the DUP's support for Brexit" 
UPDATE UK Election: FTSE 100 closes UP, PM May Forms Gov't w/DUP  #StockMarket #UK #Brexit #investors #investing 
Jeremy Corbyn has been handed the chance to stop a Brexit disaster. He won’t.  
Puerto Rico's governor to hold Sunday referendum on possibility of island's statehood.  
We'll be sending the Conservative & Unionist Negotiating Team to Brussels for #Brexit negotiations? I've got a great acronym they could use.  
Oakshot points out 80% of people voted for Brexit parties. Not a murmur from the audience.  Audience hear soft Brexit & go mental #bbcqt 
Armando Iannucci has said there's been a final push for hard Brexit today from Theresa May and the DUP #bbcqt 
She already had the "best deal" for the Tories and threw it away. And you think she can do better in Brexit negotiations? 
It's true now as it was in weeks leading to #GE17 when the cost of Brexit comes to light; it's  right Scotland has a choice #brexitshambles 
Simultaneously screwing up Brexit and the Northern Ireland peace process on the same day is pretty impressive #GE2017 #bbcqt 
Hang on Isabel...I thought you said this election WASN'T to do with Brexit?You don't have a coherent idea in your head do you?#bbcqt 
Isabel Oakeshott was born with a silver spoon up her arse. She won't be living on the streets if Brexit goes tits up. Awful woman. #bbcqt 
What is abundantly clear from tonight's #bbcqt is that even now, almost a year later, nobody is able to explain what is meant by Brexit. 
Chris Grayling  says he does not believe in the concept of a 'hard' or 'soft' Brexit and says the aim is to collaborate with the EU #bbcqt 
All this talk of "soft" Brexit and "hard" Brexit. Is Brexit a tyre make?  
If the people had rejected Brexit, they would have voted for the Lib Dems in their hoardes. They didn't, not even slightly. 
Catalonia Calls October Referendum on Independence From Spain. 
Before Brexit negotiations, EU #citizensrights have to be protected. When will @theresa_may make it happen? #bbcqt 
The next question tonight asks if the General Election result spelled the end of Brexit #bbcqt 
Bottom line: May panics & makes decisions set in concrete w/o thinking through. She shouldn't be within 100 miles of brexit negs. #bbcqt 
Pro-European Tories supporting alliance with party they can't agree with on grounds that will facilitate Brexit they don't believe in. Odd. 
But I think we'll start by realising how bloody awful hard Brexit would be; then in time we'll realise soft Brexit's not brilliant either.  
We need to make sure our #BREXIT happens those taking part in an anti-#TheresaMay campaign, are not thinking about BREXIT or #BRITAIN! 
Oh dear, these #Brexit #Snowflakes really have to understand how democracy works, 56% voted against the Brexit Gov't, you lost, get over it!  
Our statement on the #GE2017 result.#brexit must, can and will be stopped.  
The hard Brexit/soft Brexit thing is basically a myth. The choice is between Brexit and staying in 
NI voted remain taking DUP the only NI brexit party into goverment and giving them favour means all hell is going to break loose in Ireland 
May knows full damn well what the people voted for in the referendum & nothing has happened which gives anyone any right to change anything! 
May clings to power as Tories threaten to split over Brexit  
Just so I'm clear, the whole Brexit thing was allegedly about Britons being in control and not being dictated to from abroad, right? 
Here is #JeremyCorbyn conﬁrming #Breⅺt means leaⅵng the #SingleMarket!  #Labour #LabourParty #BBC #SKY #UK #BREXIT 
May must resign. She spent £113 million on a vanity election & has left UK looking a laughing stock before Brexit negotiations #bbcqt 
This is our Times letter from May 2015, just after the last Conservative win. Replace "referendum" with "negotiation" and it reads fresh...  
84% of #GE2017 voters backed parties pledging an end to #FreeMovement/leaving the #SingleMarket. Huge endorsement for a clean #Brexit!   
.@theresa_may's mandate to take the UK into #Brexit talks has been "rejected by the people", says @timfarron 
The Brexit Negotiations #Brexit #Tories #dupcoalition 
Useless Theresa May has put Brexit in peril. Ukip won't be irrelevant for much longer, writes @Nigel_Farage #Premium 
Serve the country. Get us out of #Brexit. Not hard, soft, mushy, half or quarter Brexit, but Brexit. Restore normalcy. Let's progress.  
Fox hunting, Brexit, school dinners, dementia tax, DUP alliance: A retoxification platter to fill your appetite. 
The EU reads this election as: the British people would like a rethink on Brexit.And that's absolutely correct. 
1)Ban Burka2)Cut Foreign aid3)Invest in Police & NHS4)Hard Brexit5)Target bogus benefit scroungers6)Invest in our Armed Forces Simple 
Dire Brexit warnings about London Clearing called into question  
"Brexit in jeopardy," says U.K. Independence leader  
With DUP going into govt (which all but precludes govt role in talks) & Brexit, pol future of Northern Ireland suddenly highly uncertain 
The Tories are bankrupting this country. First the referendum, then Brexit now #MaysWasted143Million 
#MaysWasted143Million to hold a vote of confidence on her Brexit stance, got a no-confidence vote and carried on regardless. Takes the pish 
So the UK is to be run by a bust PM, whose strings will be pulled by a paramilitary organisation, as it plummets over the #brexit precipice 
We don’t want BREXIT watered down. People voted for freebies,they didn't vote against BREXIT. Pick yourself up, Conservatives, and fix this.  
Catalonia says it will hold a binding referendum on independence on Oct. 1, but that doesn’t mean it will happen  
A reminder: "What connects Brexit, the DUP, dark money and a Saudi prince?"  
May is a Manager. Director, at best. NOT a leader in any sense. She can't inspire, or think on her feet. Get her out of Brexit negotiations. 
Our joint academy report listing UK institutional dependency on EU funding highlights #Brexit implications  
This good cop/bad cop movie about Brexit and LGBTI rights sounds fun  
Nasdaq 100 worse day since brexit. -150 points (2.5%)@DonaldJTrumpJr why is this happening? Because Obama? Or her emails? Deep state? 
Scientists now hope for softened Brexit... Yes, yes we do. Stay in EU science programme & drop migration targets. 
Election result changes nothing. Three blokes on holiday and two juniors on French exchange. At least Brexit might help with that. 
It's good that the DUP will be working with the government during Brexit to give impartial advice regarding the NI border 
No indeed they didn't. This vote gives resounding support for total Brexit, not some watered down "soft" version, i.e. remain.  
19) You really have to examine this - follow the whole sorry process from the quick referendum to see off the headbangers 
BREXIT BACKLASH:Record number of women elected to British Parliament @CNN 
After-thought: the hero of the Tory campaign, Ruth Davidson, is now talking about Open Brexit. The party needs to "get it". Fast.  /ends 
Cameron: Looks like we would win it easy, better call a referendum.May: Looks like we could win it easy, better call an election.#GE17 
Given questions around competence of May - Should Brexit now be negotiated on behalf of UK by cross party group and errrr...experts? 
If Brexit has done nothing else,  it's brought into the open the sheer feral hate and intolerance of the Left. 
British election backs blacks and breaks #Brexit, Americans should take notes  
As for TMay: She needs to resign. Her Brexit "strategy" about "No deal is better..." plus megaphone diplomacy has been shot to pieces. /12 
Democracy: Poland Vows Referendum on Migrant Quota Amidst EU Pressure: 'The Public's Voice Will Be Heard'  
Quick reminder that all main parties, including the governing party with most votes and seats, are all committed to a clean Brexit. #GE2017 
UK: 2016 referendum, 2017 elections: 2 failed votes, ​2 failed PMs, 1 confused nation! #GE2017 #GeneralElection17 
Theresa May offers "certainty." A certainty that Brussels will clean her clocks in Brexit talks. By @MatthewdAncona  
Opening of Brexit negotiations.EU: "Mrs May please go ahead"Theresa May: "on behalf of the British peop.."EU: HAHAHAHAHAHAHAH HAHAHAHA 
What connects Brexit, the DUP, dark money and a Saudi prince?  via @IrishTimesOpEd 
13) And now, having dismissed concerns around the Good Friday Agreement & problems with a hard NI border during Brexit as scaremongering 
Puerto Rico could vote to become the 51st state in a referendum on Sunday! However, its path to statehood is complex  
#GE2017 | @theresa_may will storm out of #Brexit negotiations on 19 June and blame all her woes on @MichelBarnier @JunckerEU @eucopresident! 
May: "Lend me your vote to strengthen my hand during the Brexit negotiations" Me: Er...... NO!#brexitshambles 
Yes yes, last night's result will make it even more difficult to control the utter dumpster fire that is Brexit, but IT'S SO FUCKING FUNNY 
Progressive Parties 55% versus Tory/Ukip/DUP 45%Theresa May  and her hard Brexit is not the will of The People. 
Share if you want Nigel Farage to return as Leader of UKIP 
We have reached a higher, more wonderful stage of Brexit messiness.Brexit *without* a parliamentary majority.This will be brilliant. 
You're right. And for this, I'm deeply grateful. So many Britons are devastated at the prospect of what Brexit is doing to our EU friends.  
Interesting straw in the wind there from @EricPickles on @bbc5live: calls for "consensus" with Lab and LibDems and others on Brexit. 
Some unionists have literally endorsed the rape clause, the wrecking of the NHS and Brexit simply because they find IndyRef2 a bit annoying. 
Philip Stephens: The upside to the post-election chaos – it promises Britain Brexit salvation  
The EU referendum cost us £142million. Tories have wasted at least £272million of public money on unnecessary votes in LESS THAN A YEAR 
This is essential reading for those blathering on about mandates for Brexit.  
I cannot grasp how stopping a single independence referendum- a standalone vote - was worth granting years of Tory government for. 
Chances of Brexit negns ending well with UK represented by a minority Tory Govt propped up by DUP is zero. Not even infinitisemal. Zero. 
This is not the Brexit you are looking for: yesterday's results mean there is no mandate. For anything.  
In the same way lots of Leave folk quickly realised they'd done a stupid with Brexit, Tory voters in Scotland will soon realise their error. 
Absolutely! A meaningful role and vote for the Commons in Brexit process and outcome is the least we can expect. Does May understand this?  
After all this gloom and doom over Hung parliaments and Brexit were off into the woods for long walk!! #BearExit  
Theresa May can't sack any member of her cabinet for fear of them .. a leader so weakened she is a hostage of her cabinet... next #Brexit  
Strong negotiating position on Brexit? She'll be lucky if they tell her the WiFi password. 
The absolute farce. Implementing a Brexit the country just rejected.  
With a Stormont stand-off & Brexit border concerns, is a Tory-DUP deal showing favouritism to one community in Northern Ireland's interests? 
Let's have another EU referendum. Then let's have another General Election. And if there's any money left, let's have a party. #GE2017 
Brexit has become politically toxic. Labour and the Tories need to come to terms with that. 
If a Tory working majority of 17 wasn’t considered enough to get Brexit through, how can she possibly do it now?   
Reminder: Brexit talks are due to start in 10 days time  #GE2017 
"A pointless referendum, followed by needless general election, followed by chaos. Tragedy piled upon tragedy." Me  
The DUP can't even form a functioning Assembly, but sure let's give them a say in Brexit negotiations when majority in NI voted remain 
I deplore brexit & May's self-serving call for GE, but agree knee-jerk visceral misognyny from 'liberals' is halting  
She's pretending yesterday never happened: Same policies, same people, same Brexit. An insult to the result.She has a shock coming.  
Could someone please acknowledge the vital role of Tactical Voting? Many votes were not 'for' Labour; they were 'against' Tories & Brexit 
May confirms her car crash #Brexit team will rumble on as Johnson, Davis & Fox keep their cabinet posts. Nothing to worry about there then.  
David Cameron: "We need a referendum on BREXIT, I'm sure people vote remain"Theresa May: "We need an election, I'm sure we get a majority" 
Same morons, different banners. Defy Brexit....Defy Trump...Defy Tories ... Defy Democracy 
Hard #Brexit lost the election. May asked the country for a mandate, and it said no. Now: demand a progressive deal 
hello again twitter. I see the govt is doing Brexit with a party whose founder thought the EU was literally created by satan 
Catalonia defies Madrid and sets independece referendum date  
The rise of the remainers is about to begin. May’s Brexit strategy lies in ruins | Simon Jenkins  
Nicola Sturgeon's hopes for a second independence referendum took an electoral beating  
A smart British journalist finally explained to me what 'Soft Brexit' really means. It means 'No Brexit' at all, while saving face. 
Labour MP Chuka Umunna believes the EU referendum inspired a large #GE2017 turnout amongst young people#BBCelection 
so the electorate are always right in a referendum but can be wrong in an election - er? 
EU brexit leaders react to general election result: “I thought surrealism was a Belgian invention"  
The dark mystery of who funded the DUP's six figure Brexit campaign  
Theresa May insists the Conservatives are the "only party" in a position to form a government and lead Brexit talks  
United Ireland referendum 'inevitable', says @sinnfeinireland leader @GerryAdamsSF 
2. That inevitably has consequences for our negotiating position given the need for Parliamentary agreement to the final deal on Brexit 
Looking forward to chatting with Muslim haters who use the 'they hate gays' line, explain to me why Brexit under May and DUP is different. 
Catalonia announces independence referendum  
Very pleased to announce that I have been appointed head Brexit negotiator with these bloody foreigners. 
PAK Peshmerga from #Rojhelat has expressed full military support for referendum and act as full protectant for KRG  
...pop a bottle of chilled Bavarian Schadenfreude, get some popcorn in and watch the coming 2 yr max slow motion Brexit disaster movie. 2/2 
Brexit has completely fucked this country 
Congrats to @patmcfaddenmp, a proEuropean champion who will fight against hard Brexit in Parliament & who we were campaigning for in #GE2017 
Important that big election winner @RuthDavidsonMSP calls for "open Brexit" which pays attention to economic growth.  @FT editorial agrees. 
Britain proved last night that they don't want Theresa May's hard #Brexit ; they want her hard resignation. #dupcoalition 
MUST-WATCH - @ChukaUmunna is right: @theresa_may has no mandate to pursue an extreme & job-destroying Brexit. Please RT:  
To mess around with the brexit result is something which will prove very dangerous but as usual, government will have to learn the hard way! 
The #DUP on the EU, 1975 #GE2017 #Brexit via @BenRosamond1 
Memorable mural in Vilnius, Lithuania. What a humiliation having President Trump. Wish there could be a referendum.  
This is who the Torys are going to rely on for power in the Brexit discussions. Get out on the streets.  
#GE2017 was called to 'strengthen PMs hand' for EU negotiations (in 10 days!!) She lost. Surely a sign it's time for #Brexit rethink?.. 
Young voters rise up to hobble Brexit Britain  
David Davis re-appointed as Secretary of State for Exiting the European Union ('Brexit Secretary') pic.twitter.com/Fdxq5HnoLT 
What is all this bullshit about brexit being changed by the election result. Britain voted to leave the prison known as the EU so leave. 
Catalonia will hold an independence referendum on Oct 1, the region's president said, defying the Spanish government  
So,after electorate declines to endorse her #HardBrexit approach , May stays on through deal with DUP, which wants an even harder #Brexit 
Tensions grow in Spain as Catalonia independence referendum confirmed  
Nicola Sturgeon admits her call for a second independence referendum has backfired  
Theresa May weakest UK leader in decades if not a century or 2... . In 10 days time very high stakes #Brexit negotiations begin #oops 
No clear result looks like a good result if it means a less harsh Brexit, a big 'if'—Heard on the Street  
Music biz reacts to shock UK election as Brexit looms: "We will be holding their feet to the fire"  
.@ChukaUmunna: We now have a job to do to scrutinise this chaotic Government's approach to #brexit  
Here's to Jezza's landslide Labour victory in 2020 when Theresa & the climate deniers have shegged Brexit and the economy's tanked.  
Pleased to be re-appointed so we can now get on and negotiate a Brexit deal that supports British jobs, business and prosperity. 
May has formed Govt with DUP without thrashing out a deal with them. And she's the one who wants to lead our Brexit negotiations. 
84% of #GE2017 voters backed parties pledging an end to Free Movement/leaving the Single Market. Huge endorsement for a clean Brexit!   
Downing Street says Chancellor, Foreign Secretary, Home Secretary, Defence Secretary and Brexit Secretary will remain in their Cabinet posts 
Theresa May has absolutely no legitimacy whatsoever to proceed with hard Brexit ; if she pretends she has, she spits in eye of electorate 
PM reappoints Chancellor, Home Sec, Foreign Sec, Brexit Sec, and Defence Sec to their roles. Nothing has changed, one might say. 
This wasn’t the Brexit election for voters – it’s about living standards, stupid | Bruno Rinvolucri  
If Theresa May thinks she's can impose a hard Brexit with the help of DUP on a Britain which rejected her she will reap the whirlwind 
Time for Tory MPs horrified by May's dirty deal with homophobes DUP joined us to stop extreme destructive #Brexit & keep UK in Single Market 
56% of the country officially rejected hard brexit in this election, what may has done is an act of a Dictator 
Seen quite a few stories of peoples' parents being legit angry at them for backing Corbyn. The same "get over it, you lost!" Brexit folk? 
Nicola Sturgeon is expected to abandon plans for a second independence referendum after losing SNP’s seats  
Together we campaigned for a progressive outcome. Today, May’s Brexit plan backfired and she must seriously rethink hard Brexit. #ge2017 
Founder of @innocent tells me on @bbc5live "If anyone says a hard Brexit is what the people want, they are lying. It's dead."  
#UKElection2017 saw a massive youth turnout compared to #Brexit voteWatch LIVE: Prannoy Roy and experts on #UKGE2017 results 
Catalonia is headed for a showdown with Madrid over its referendum on secession from Spain  
Ladies and gentlemen, the genius negotiator who still wants to handle Brexit...  
COALITION: Theresa May says DUP deal 'in national interest' because it's best for Brexit. 
From @InFactsOrg - All to fight for on Brexit  
Hindsight is always 20:20.  IF ONLY SOMEONE COULD HAVE FORESEEN BREXIT WOULD BECOME THE MOTHER OF ALL SHIT SHOWS!!!.... oh wait.... pic.twitter.com/jZwOU3Qt7g 
.@ChukaUmunna on #LBC saying that with the election result, the Government has no mandate for hard #brexit  
Catalonia calls independence referendum for October  
#isitok to use the acronym of the Conservative & Unionist Negotiating Team for the Brexit negotiations? 
Britain has no govt, no consensus on what kind of #Brexit the country wants & no mandate to pursue it  
Ever since Leadsom dropped out I've wondered: did May sign in her blood an agreement with the Tory Brexit Headbangers? 
This is a hell of a graph. Youth hatred of Brexit may have cost the Tories a generation of voters  
If May tries a hard Brexit now, I hope we're all planning to get visibly and vocally angry about it. 
How EU & China are forging ahead without the United States, as Trump alienates his Western allies and Brexit unfolds 
#UPDATE 'Hard Brexit' must be abandoned after election result: Scottish leader Sturgeon  #GE2017 
Poland Vows Referendum on Migrant Quota Amidst EU Pressure: ‘The Public’s Voice Will Be Heard’  @3lectric5heep 
What's a hung parliament and how will it affect Brexit? Here's a quick #GE2017 guide  
"Young people have ruined the country!" -voters who elected party that in 2-years has triggered Brexit then fucked unnecessary snap election 
Whereas the moderate old people have gone for the stability of Trump & Brexit  
Conservative and Unionist Negotiating Team. Strong acronym getting us through Brexit. 
Destination Brexit! James Meek reports:  
james talked about this essay of his, which should interest anyone who wants to understand brexit or capitalism  
Secretive DUP Brexit donor links to the Saudi intelligence service | openDemocracy  
Rather than having to deal with messy and potentially party damaging brexit negotiations Jeremy can focus the next five years on - 
Does anyone else think that what with Leicester winning the league BrexitTrumpAndMayThe world, as we knew it, has gone nuts? 
There must be some who are so angry they would cross the floor to help #JeremyCorbyn get good #Brexit 
Kay Burleigh Mrs Mertonesque question there. "What first attracted you to the anti-abortion pro Brexit climate change deniers of the DUP"? 
Since announcing the referendum, the Conservative Party has been one single horrendous extended unforced error. Absolutely fascinating 
FT View: It is surely time to press the pause button on a 'hard' Brexit  
Catalonia Calls Independence Referendum for October via @guardian#CatExit #referendumCAT 
This is now an urgent political question. Who gave the DUP £425,000 in #DarkMoney for Brexit campaigning elsewhere?  
Catalonia to hold Spanish independence referendum in October  
Trump, Corbyn, Bernie, Brexit all point to a vibrancy in Western democracy, which is becoming responsive to more views, even radical ones 
This has to be right. There is no mandate for "hard" #Brexit. It isn't, and never was, the "will of the people"  
May doesn't deny her hand has now been weakened in Brexit negotiations. 
To all those dewy eyed optimists who think the election result will mean a softer Brexit, please check out the DUP. Cuddly they're not. 
1 year ago Ireland had six months to stop the abuse - no excuses - give us our referendum to #Repealthe8th  
Excellent piece by Jenni Russell on havoc Brexit is about to wreak on UK economy. Interestingly enough, this is from The Times  
Basically our government is anti-LGBT, anti-women, anti-disabled ppl, anti-foxes, pro-privatisation, pro-hard Brexit. #notourgovernment 
Catalonia defies Madrid with referendum call  
Congrats to @IanCLucas, a pro European champion who will fight against hard Brexit in Parliament & who we were campaigning for in #GE2017 
No way should Scotland have a say in Brexit says @RuthDavidsonMSP but quite happy with DUP calling the tune ? 
We need to reflect on #GE17, but Brexit is still there, more complicated than ever. Here's this week's Update.  
It's time for first past the post to goIt's time for another referendum on Proportial Representation after todays unrepresentative results  
We're sending the Conservative and Unionist Negotiating Team to Brussels for Brexit talks? If only they had a good acronym. 
UK trifecta: 1st the Eu Referendum. 2nd the unnecessary election. 3rd Boris as PM negotiating Buyers-Remorse Brexit? #bankruptgoverningclass 
The president of the European Council isn't planning to give Theresa May and the UK any more time in Brexit talks  
Next PM? The man who believes in a much softer Brexit. Said to be alienated by May and her aides  
One thing is absolutely certain. If the people wanted a hard Brexit they would have voted for Mrs May or Mr Nuttall in droves. They didn't 
they left through the fire brexit 
April 25: Corbyn's Shadow Brexit Secretary says we'll leave Single Market and end Free Movement – same as May. No mandate for “Soft Brexit”.  
We had a needless referendum and then a needless general election; both to appease the Tory Party. And now we just need to get rid of them 
Final observation: election is giving biz world confidence to speak up on Brexit negotiations without fear of "saboteur" label. Significant 
Remember when the person who made the fake two day referendum tweet got slammed for misleading the public?How is this any different?  
well at least what she did was in the spirit of Brexit: expense, unnecessary and ultimately fruitless 
Catalan leader says independence referendum will be held Oct. 1, but obstacles are abundant  
If you want to know what #Election2017 result means for #Brexit here is Brexit Secretary David Davis. Do NOT let them squirm out of this.  
Notice that #Brexit was near top of that list, even for young voters...that's partial context for this... 
Is an authoritarian Tory/DUP coalition, intent on an extreme Brexit, a price worth paying to avoid Scotland deciding its own future? 
The DUP aren't Saints, but to even start to compare them to Sinn Fein is laughable.They'll back the Tories in Brexit & security.  
This election has overwhelmingly endorsed the decision made at the referendum to leave the EU.  
this looks important #brexit #ge17 
Time for Davidson to show us who she is. Scots voted Tory to stop indyref, not to get hard Brexit. Leaving single market no longer tenable.  
"Anti-democrats are circling like vultures around this election result." Brendan O'Neill on defending Brexit  
These election results produce a climate of uncertainty, but the good news remains: #Brexit will not be derailed.  
Who would have known that Brexit refers to the British negotiating party. Time to reconsider its anti-rights platform, too.  
From Brexit to abortion, a DUP-Tory alliance could have worrying consequences, writes @SiobhanFenton  
Poland Vows Referendum on Migrant Quota Amidst EU Pressure: ‘The Public’s Voice Will Be Heard’  
Looks like we will be sending the Conservatives & Unionist Negotiating Team to talk Brexit , hope they can find a good acronym for them... 
Theresa May spent £100 million of public money to reduce her own majority.Still, I reckon she'll do a good job negotiating Brexit. 
Lib Dem Shadow Brexit Secretary admits Corbyn campaigned on platform of leaving Single Market. So did Tories – no mandate for “Soft Brexit”.  
Congrats to @MaryCreaghMP, a pro European champion who will fight against hard Brexit in Parliament & who we were campaigning for in #GE2017 
Brexit compounds the UK strategic relationship problem. Turning away from EU makes the US far more crucial but British public loathes Trump. 
We know he's better on the stump than most people thought. Question is can he orchestrate a united coordinated opposition to Tory Brexit???  
Lots of international interest for Catalan independence referendum set for October 1, 2017.  
Our #brexit team will be called the "Conservative and Unionist Negotiating Team"...I've got a good acronym if that's too long? #2017Election 
Corbyn dodges the impossible Brexit talks and only has to beat a 3 seat majority that's in a dodgy coalition. Literally perfect result. 
To be clear about this - Brexit not deliverable with this majority according to Conservative Party officials. Landscape changed completely 
Catalonia calls shock referendum on independence from Spain  
#CapitalWatch - What does the shocking 2017 UK General Election result mean for real estate? #GE2017 #CRE #Brexit  
I've always had a lot of time for UKIPers, still respect those who voted Tory for Brexit, but those who voted Lab/UKIP just greedy & dim. 
The rise of the remainers is about to begin. May’s Brexit strategy lies in ruins | Simon Jenkins  
One thing Lab must realise is that much of the increase in its vote came from the 48%. Vote won't stick unless Lab changes its Brexit stance 
#Brexit talks start in just 11 days… & EU leaders aren’t happy about UK’s new political crisis.  
It's hard to see how anything Theresa May's little apocalyptic cult negotiates on Brexit will have legitimacy among the public. 
Hilariously they're soft on Brexit so they're in it to stall May on that.  
Congrats to @CatMcKinnell, a pro European champion who will fight against hard Brexit in Parliament & who we were campaigning for in #GE2017 
They aren't, but they are stupid and greedy for choosing Corbyn's unrealistic freebies over Brexit.  
Who would trust Theresa May to steer a minority government & #Brexit negotiations given what we know of her political & leadership skills ? 
Astonishing speech. As if election she called never happened. Can't be so blinkered & survive as PM in hung parliament/ Brexit negotiations  
Britain's press barons turned against the EU because it was threatening to stop their tax-dodging. #Brexit #Remain 
Mrs May: give me a mandate to deliver hard Brexit The people: No.Mrs May: I shall now push through the hard Brexit you want  
Corbyn said he would leave Single Market and end Free Movement, here and in manifesto. No mandate for “Soft Brexit”.  
I totally agree and included those factors as well (Brexit, her overreaction to the attacks, her weird authoritarian streak...) 
Since people are suddenly interested in the DUP, here's a story from Feb on funding links between Tories/DUP/Brexit.  
1. If you want to own Brexit, say why Brexit is positive and offer specific ways you will use repatriated policies to improve economy. 
DUP have good judgement. They despise terrorist sympathiser Corbyn . They support Brexit.  They support traditional family values. 
I called Brexit right but this campaign so wrong. Here's some thoughts the Conservatives might consider for future... 
In 29 key seats where we backed the incumbent, 26 of them were returned & will be a strong voice in against a destructive Brexit. Pls RT:  
I would bet May's collapse had more to do with her poodling with Trump, Brexit fatigue and her overreaction to the terrorist attacks than 
Here's what the U.K.'s hung parliament means for Brexit  
And the first words out of May's mad mouth are "Brixit must go on !!!Curtain up for the next Act of the Brexit farce  
Dear EU, would you be kind enough to stop the Brexit clock until we have a real government & person who could be called a prime minister 
Not to mention the fact that the kind of right wing populism Trump. LePen, Wilders and Brexit represented now appears to be a spent force. 
Thank you Hammersmith for giving me a mandate to oppose a Hard Brexit and to fight for Charing Cross Hospital and our NHS  
No more referendums in Scotland or rest of UK, we've had enough & want to see Gov put our vote into action, a year wasted since Brexit ref.. 
Sorry but I'll​ take equality & tolerance over stability for brexit, any day of the week.#DUPCoalition #LoveIsLove#KeepBritainKind 
The UK election results WEREN'T that shocking. Shades of Brexit in people dismissing polls that showed a close race.  
Congrats to @BenPBradshaw, a pro European champion who will fight against hard Brexit in Parliament & who we were campaigning for in #GE2017 
Catalonia to hold referendum on independence from Spain  
The one thing I've taken away from all this election/brexit stuff is that posh people pronounce "negotiations" different to me. 
Tories did relatively well in high Vote Leave areas - The conservatives are the Brexit party  
If the DUP are to be in coalition, we *must* know who gave them £435,000 for Brexit campaigning:  #DUPcoalition 
Young voters influenced by Brexit opposition helped deliver a big surprise in the U.K. election   
May asked for mandate to hard Brexit. Country said no. May says full steam ahead. Why does she hate Democracy? #brexshit 
As Catalan leaders push for an independence referendum, what would this mean for the future of the region?  
Her statement outside No10 might just be the end of her. She is delusional. No mandate for #Brexit.No strong&stable leadership.#GE2017 
Both the referendum and this election were deeply irresponsible. They arrogantly assumed the results and had no back-up plan #Brexit #GE2017 
Catalonia announces it will hold independence referendum#BiafraReferendum loading.. #BiafraRef#Biafra 
This woman's campaign was based on an independence referendum to reject Brexit. Scottish electors prioritised union with UK above the EU.  
From @AdamRamsay & @PeterKGeoghegan's investigation..ties into all other Brexit shenanigans..illegal co-ordination, illegal data sharing etc  
Those who felt #Brexit vote stole their future turned out in droves. 72% of 18-24 year olds cast ballots in #ukvotes. Boost for soft Brexit? 
Many unfamiliar with DUP.  They are Pro union (UK) Ulster protestants.  Pro Brexit and socially conservative. 
Mrs May has spent £130 million of public money discovering that voters refuse to gve her a Brexit mandate and remove her majority:She stays! 
I wonder what snappy acronym we can use for the Conservative/Unionist Negotiating Team in the Brexit talks? #BrexitNegotiations 
APPALLING BBC bias: Reporter @BBCkatyaadler GLOATS UK election result could WRECK Brexit  
Yes & the majority of the people over-ruled them all & have again confirmed their support for Brexit in this election.  
It's amazing when TM can find the money to boost her ego before the Brexit talks,but @WASPI_Campaign have to whistle for their pension?@ 
A new question for Dom Cummings of Vote Leave @odysseanproject. The dark money funnelled into Brexit from DUP. Did it come from Vote Leave? pic.twitter.com/aFViTshdM6 
Ruth Davidson: SNP must scrap plans for second independence referendum  
Give her a chance....she seems intent on #Brexit.  Support her.  You don't know what the alternative to her could be. 
Arlene Foster: "We are as seized of the interests of the United Kingdom as a whole as we are for Northern Ireland", citing Brexit & terror  
We have a lame duck Prime Minister and an ineffective opposition leader and we Brexit in 11 days. That's where we are. 
#Kurdistan will have their #independence referendum on September 25th.#Catalonia will have their independence #referendum on October 1st. pic.twitter.com/6tSZS2ebx9 
Breitbart brands me 'fake news' for investigation showing how DUP took £425k for Brexit campaign. See what u think... 
Trump to the left of meBrexit to the rightHere I amStuck in the middle with Leo #Ireland 
To @labour MPs: last time 80% voted for TM's(hard brexit) a50. Your 'soft' brexit message got u Remainers: please use vote better next time. 
The U.K.'s stunning election may screw up Brexit  
Fuming over Brexit, youth help to swing UK election - @doberah reports from London  #GE2017 
#WeAreInternational economic imperative for learning #Languages plus greater social cohesion post-Brexit @UCML 
Labour aren't anti-Brexit. LD still in tatters. DUP are pro Brexit. What about SNP?  
Election 2017: Theresa May says Tories will work with DUP to proceed with Brexit - live  
If you don't believe in Hard Brexit, Ruth Davidson may now be your best hope.  
Very hard to see how a Brexit deal can be done with this Parliament. This is by far the most significant ramification of last night's result 
John McDonnell on the BBC last night said Labour never really campaigned on a Brexit agenda. Quite right, they knew how toxic it would be. 
This we know: there’s no majority for a hard Brexit | Anne Perkins  
Incredible - and how irresponsible to call an election when she should have been preparing for Brexit negotiations. Expensive mess isn't it. 
My daughter was 17.5 at time of ref. Gutted by Brexit. First GE vote yesterday. More like her coming of age all the time.  
Basically 10 of this guy this guy and a bunch of toffs are gonna negotiate Brexit 
So much for a "hard Brexit." #GE2017 
Chanelle's view on #Brexit...  It's not a bag that you can just take back!  Thoughts?  #BBUK 
Election cost time and money, interrupted Brexit prep and  weakened U.K. negotiating position. Corbyn gains and so maybe do remainers. 
#Language skills & #NewSpeakers are critical to success in a post-Brexit world, says @HeriotWattUni @BernORourke  
Thirteen questions on Brexit the gov has to answer in next hours and days and failed to answer during the campaign.  
Laws will not be forced through. MPs will demand proper scrutiny of the Brexit deal. The government will be accountable day in day out. 
**If EU leave me now - How might museums prepare for a post-Brexit UK? Join guest hosts @UKregistrars Mon 12 June 20:00 BST for #museumhour 
5 reasons for alarm at May's coalition with DUP - plus one hope NI need for "frictionless border" forces soft Brexit 
Can we shift the attention to conducting the referendum being asked for by our Northern neighbours? #ReferendumNOW 
BBC commentators suggest election result is negative verdict on Brexit. On the contrary the anti-Brexit parties suffered the greatest. 
Especially given DUP Brexit links to Saudi intelligence & finance.  
If you add the anti-Brexit pro-EU centrist Lib Dems, center + left-leaning opposition won a clear majority of votes  
All night long we heard May was out and #Brexit finished.  Now we find out neither is true.  Typical. 
May’s strategy: disregard the 45% of UK public who think Brexit a mistake, on theory they have nowhere to go. Yesterday, they went.  
Looks as if May has survived, and hopefully #Brexit with her. Whew.   
UK election was “huge success,” says Gina Miller. “We have the people saying we did not vote for an extreme Brexit.”  
Is this the end of Brexit? We ask Dominic Grieve and Gina Miller  via @krishgm 
BLOODY IDIOT@TheNewEuropean UK election special:All Brexit bets are off pic.twitter.com/NimWZSsVs3 
Morning Briefing: Brexit forever?  
The clock is ticking to secure successful Brexit, EU tells May  
DUP recieved £425k for Brexit, from group including Scottish Tories. 
GOD MOVES IN A MYSTERIOUS WAYNorthern youths seek #Biafra referendum#BiafraRef#BiafrExit#BiafraReferendum 
Some thoughts on what happens when Theresa May’s “stable” new government has its first brush with reality at the Brexit talks in 10 days: 
Sadly, Peter Robinson retired the leadership in 2015. Who better to negotiate Brexit than someone who LITERALLY INVADED IRELAND?  
So @RuthDavidsonMSP, having backed soft Brexit a year ago,before shifting to hard Brexit, has now come full circle to back soft Brexit again 
Will the #Tories siding with the #DUP in #NorthernIreland derail the #peaceprocess?#poll #hungparliament #brexit #politicsuk 
Ruth Davidson says we must now "seek an open Brexit" putting the economy first. You are now seeing her use her new clout. 
The rise of the remainers is about to begin. May’s Brexit strategy lies in ruins  
Gina Miller says people have "voted against a hard Brexit". Says more "flexible" negotiations will be better for the country.#BBCelection 
A major uncertainty for the EU is whether the election could soften the U.K.'s Brexit position  
How might the result of #GE2017 impact the UK’s #Brexit strategy, David #Zahn shares his thoughts. 
You are so wrong. Brexit has been saved by tactical voting. And Labour will keep Corbyn which makes them stay impotent. Excellent result. 
Catalonia will hold referendum on splitting from Spain on October 1 as they look to become breakaway republic  
Wouldn't it be refreshing if a cross party negotiation team was set up. The best people for the job. If we must do brexit, then get it right 
If you wait until Brexit deal is done the NHS will be long gone.   
Young Brits take revenge for the Brexit sin | Analysis  
As the old saying goes, one person's terrorist is another woman's ticket to cling on to power. 
UK: it says here "if I lose 6 seats Jeremy Corbyn will be sitting down to negotiate Brexit" and you've lost 13May: I AM THE WINNER 
Strong waft of Schadenfreude in European press but not at leadership level. EU needs #Brexit deal. Prospect ofweak UKPM worries them #GE2017 
The message was pretty clear at the @EU_Commission briefing thanks @A_WintersteinEC EU ready to start #Brexit negotiations waiting for UK  
(1) May has no mandate, no right, to try to force #Brexit through: discredited, unreliable, ineffective, and rejected. Disgusting. 
All border counties have chosen SF as best party to defend their interests in the face of Brexit.  
Brexit could not be delivered on a majority of 17. That's why May called an election. How will she do it now? Just won't work!!! 
P M Theresa May is now free to negotiate the type of Brexit that the DUP wants and that is just about all. #WeakAndWobbly #Hamstrung 
Unsustainable. And the DUP are not in favour of a hard Brexit. They'll be pressuring her from one side; Tory press and hard right on other.  
THIS. I am feeling so happy as Brexit had made me feel so rejected by UK. I'm so proud of this.   
May at least has a new Brexit slogan "The future's shite, the future's Orange" 
General election 2017: Theresa May says Tories will work with DUP to proceed with Brexit - live  
Catalonia calls independence referendum for October #Pep 
Defying Spanish government and courts, Catalan leader says independence referendum set for Oct. 1  
DUP want soft Brexit- or a no control, but less economically harmful Brexit. Begs the question, why bother?   
British PM May says she'll form a government that "will guide the country through the crucial Brexit talks"   
European Council President Donald Tusk: urgent task to conduct Brexit negotiations in best possible spirit securing least disruptive outcome 
#Remoaners out in force to undermine Brexit. #May would have had a large majority but for the austerity-ridden, hammer-the-poor, manifesto. 
There's been some investigation showing Saudi links to the DUP Brexit money. 
Donald Tusk doesn't mess around, writes to congratulate May but says there is "no time to lose" in starting Brexit negotiations  
Viewers want @piersmorgan in charge of Brexit. What do you think?  
May rustily cranks forwards like a malfunctioning robot screeching BREXIT BREXIT EXTERMINATE. The cliff edge looms. She has lost her sight. 
EU's chief Brexit co-ordinator called election results an 'own goal' for Tories  
So now, the only advocates for 'Hard Brexit' are Nigel Farage and a load of backward religious loons who are scared of gay people. 
UK election was “huge success,” says @thatginamiller. “We have the ppl saying we did not vote for an extreme Brexit”  
German MEP @DavidMcAllister says "#Brexit is a historic mistake" and that there still might be a way out of it.#GE2017 #HungParliament 
"Brexit in jeopardy," says UKIP leader, as his party appears shut out of Parliament  
'Brexit must be reset after election result'  
Depth of UK ignorance on Brexit "astounding", says former European Court of Justice judge | CommonSpace  
It would be the funniest election ever if it weren't for the fact that UK is still hurtling unwittingly towards very painful Brexit 
May election failure has increased both chance of better Brexit outcome and risk of complete breakdown. A mess.  
Of course it's Brexit. And it's the right kind of Brexit.  
Congratulations @theresa_may. Our responsibility now is to secure least disruptive #Brexit. No time to lose.  
Well, it looks like @duponline wants an EEA style #Brexit to me. Please let us know. @JolyonMaugham @NigelDoddsDUP  
Theresa May said her self losing a majority would ruin her authority. She CAN'T  negotiate Brexit!! 
Huge privilege to be re-elected wtih a larger mandate. As I pledged, I will do my best for constituents on Brexit, public services and more. 
New: "DUPED"(third of the day)#GE2017 #Brexit #TheMaybotIsBroken #MayMustGo #MakeJuneTheEndOfMay 
When you oppose Kurdistan's referendum, you stand against the rights of the fourth largest group in the Middle East. 
"1 year after referendum we still don't know UK position on #Brexit and it seems difficult to predict when we will" @FedericaMog #EUDefence 
May is a disgrace. She has needlessly walked us into a Brexit quagmire & now insists being propped up by DUP is 'stable' #hungparliament 
Oh okay, I've got one. Why on earth was the DUP in league with the head of the Saudi intelligence service to funnel money into Brexit?  
Theresa May is talking like she has an increased mandate. What planet is she living on?! We can't go into Brexit negotiations like this! 
Homophobic, anti abortion, support loyalist paramilitary and think the Pope is Satan #hungparliament Brexit negotiations will go well then  
Catalonia to hold referendum on independence from Spain on October 1  
NO MORE THE HARD BREXIT#UKElection #GreatBritain #JeremyCorbyn #TheresaMay 
NEW: British PM Theresa May says she will form a new government and lead her country through Brexit talks  
Fun to remind them of this every time they insist Brexit is the will of the people  
I wouldn’t want to be the Tories for all the tea in China. Utterly compromised and everything that happens with Brexit is now on them. 
British Prime Minister Theresa May says she will form a government to lead the country through Brexit  
#Corbyn was rewarded in yesterday's #UKelections2017 for standing against a hard #brexit and the annihilation of NHS. A win for the Left. 
As poorly as the SNP did last night, the biggest loser is all the UK. We're now proceeding into Brexit w/a weaker gov. than we had yesterday 
Ken Clarke is a minus one on some Brexit matters... some other Tory Brexit rebels lost seats: Mathias, Carmichael  
Lets crack on with the Brexit 17.4 mil people voted for! Juncker and Co can keep there nose out @theresa_may we demand you deliver #Brexit 
Silver Linings: -Corbyn will not be PM. -Brexit will continue. -SNP diminished. -Arrogance of Tories gone.-The Queen still reigns.  
The Scottish Tory behind a £425,000 DUP Brexit donation #GE2017  
Lib Dem leader Tim Farron calls on Theresa May to resign and for Brexit to be put on hold #hungparliament 
This is unworthy. YOU LOST THE REFERENDUM. #Brexit  
May in total denial that the UK electorate have rejected her, that's what's changed. 
You’re yesterdays man Roger. Your party is a busted flush. Brexit is the biggest disaster to befall the youth of the UK. 
DUP-Climate deniers-Anti abortion-Anti LGBT rights-Pro Brexit.And May says will govern for all nation 
Pretty good , DUP is for a hard BREXIT , not soft  
Nick Timothy and Fiona Hill out now. Rees Mogg to be a Minister to support a David Davis in Brexit talks. 20,000 new police officers today. 
Catalonia regional govt has fix oct 1 as a day for #Referendum for independence urge all to vote  @nkirukanistoran 
After last year’s Brexit vote, younger Britons look to turn the tide  
The good news is no UK politician is going to call an election or referendum that they don't have to for a very, very long time 
Theresa May, you are not a leader, you are weak, unstable, unable to hold onto a huge majority or negotiate Brexit. #NotMyPrimeMinister 
Theresa May said she will form a government that will guide the U.K. through the Brexit talks with the EU  
My thread from before election on why May is ill-suited to be Brexit prime minister.  All the more true now. 
Election 2017: Theresa May says Tories will work with DUP to proceed with Brexit - live  
The ridiculous Tory cry of #StrongandStable should now become #WeakandUncertain. 10 days before #Brexit negotiations. What a circus. 
Ok, ok, I'll negotiate Brexit. 
'Whatever happens, Theresa May and the Tories have lost their mandate for a hard Brexit' — @jennirsl 
A true leader would use this as an opportunity to reach out and create a cross party Brexit approach. May is no true leader. 
How can someone who misread UK electorate read 27 EU leaders? How can someone who is afraid to debate negotiate with 27 EU leaders? #Brexit 
Theresa May says she will form a new government to "provide certainty" ahead of Brexit talks  
.@Number10gov 'referendum' on @theresa_may she called on herself could not be clearer #resigntheresa #JC4PM 
The DUP, you say? The offshore money laundering machine & funnel for Brexit dark cash that May's govt has refused to investigate? Oh...  
Humiliation hasn't dented her arrogance. No acknowledgement of failure. No hint that Brexit stance might need to change. 
Will the story of the past year turn out to be Brexit-Trump? Or Sanders-Corbyn? Or--most likely--both? 
To reiterate. Tory min told me #Brexit not deliverable on that majority. Called election cos couldn't deliver with working majority of 17 
Theresa May shows no contrition, refuses to listen & exposed as utterly cack-handed. She's will be weak & unstable in Brexit negotiations 
What few are saying-- the vote against Conservatives is backlash vs. Brexit. 
Don't get me wrong over DUP: their new power a dark danger to any better Tory liberal instincts.But demanding soft border will change Brexit 
Cabinet minister says the 70% + turn out of young people in some areas extraordinary, & had it happened last June wd've swung referendum 
Extraordinary: May singing the same song of stability, slogans and Brexit. No recognition of result or setback 
Theresa May vows to form government that will lead Britain forward and "guide the country through the crucial Brexit talks"  
MAY: BREXIT TALKS TO START IN 10 DAYS 
Brussels is ready to start negotiating on Brexit tomorrow, according to the European Commission President Jean-Claude Juncker.  
Listening to May in Downing St can anyone seriously believe a single word she says? 
BREAKING: Prime Minister Theresa May says she will form a government that will lead Britain through Brexit talks. 
Good morning Mr Brexit  
Who advised Cameron in the Conservatives to call a referendum and was it the same team that advised Theresa May to call a snap election? 
Here is the PM: I will now form a Government that will deliver on the will of the British people on Brexit, and will crack down on extremism  
I thought Theresa May said if she lost 6 seats it would be Jeremy Corbyn negotiating Brexit??!?Oh wait she lost 12 
My guess is that talks with the EU about Brexit will be held on schedule on 19 June. 
Break: PM to say from No10 steps that Brexit talks timetable will not change #GE2017 
Labour well behind Tories on seats, but taking Canterbury & Kensington which Blair never did. Crazy nature of post-Brexit politics 
Despite the result, we all must come together & not allow the country to roll over & accept a 'soft' Brexit or no Brexit. #GE2017 
Whatever happens with the #hungparliament it's clear that people didn't vote for the kind of Brexit that would wreck our #environment 
May couldn't possibly include Sturgeon in the brexit negotiations. Look what she did to Kezia! Shes shown t be someone who can't be trusted. 
Did Saudi use the DUP (N.Ireland exempt from naming large donors) to influence Brexit vote? A more relevant read than ever right now  
Congrats to @RupaHuq, a pro-European champion who will fight against hard Brexit in Parliament & who we were campaigning for in #GE2017 
After last night's car crash of an election #Tories will now be able to negotiate #Brexit like a poor person sets terms for a payday loan. 
Only party openly declaring they would sabotage Brexit got just 7% of the vote, yet this was a rejection of Brexit?  
It is inconceivable the Brexit talks can begin in nine days time - @timfarron 
Brexit diminished our stature in the world – and now Theresa May has made things much worse  
Senior minister. "She can't continue with a minority govt, she can't deliver Brexit. Predicts..... *ANOTHER ELECTION IN OCT* 
#Ireland’s new PM, Leo Varadkar, says the indecisive outcome of the #UK election shows there is no strong mandate for a hard #brexit. 
Important thing is Brexit.Tory and Labour should form exit task force with same objectives. Priority get that done before arguing politics 
Scottish leader says Conservative Party's 'reckless' approach to Brexit should be abandoned; May should resign.  
Tim Farron has called for Brexit negotiations to be put on hold  
If @theresa_may resigns the Brexit plan won't change says @andrew_lilico 
Catalonia announces independence referendum  
Stocks mixed as U.K. election complicates Brexit talks  
EU ⁠⁠⁠citizens' rights cannot be guaranteed until negotiations begin, creating more uncertainty for millions affected by #Brexit. #GE2017 
Farage expresses anger at 'Brexit backslide' - will likely return to front line politics.  
Ultimately the Tory pragmatists posed May few problems on Brexit until now. Will that change now I wonder? 
#hungparliament May robot bore Corbyn stuck 70s, Farron 2 referendum Sturgeon hammered, Nuttall resigns worst bunch politicians of all time  
Corbyn has secured total control of Labour while weakened Tories destroy themselves over Brexit. He's the strong and stable leader today. 
Genuine possibility - noone ousts May because nobody wants to lead Brexit in this flimsy a Coalition - that poison chalice just got stronger 
Catalonia's government chose Oct 1 as the date for independence referendum. Watch our interview with President @KRLS 
The Tory party are perfecting capable of electing someone that believes in Brexit and comes out fighting. May lost this more than Corbyn won  
"Hello DUP... Do you have any puppies? Well, you see I just can't make my Brexit coat with only 318 puppies."  
I wrote a piece in today's @EveningStandard.#GE2017 was a referendum on May when it should've been an affirmation.  
The DUP, a party that spent £282,000 on a Brexit advert that didn't even run in Northern Ireland; up to their necks  
Congrats to @normanlamb, a pro-European champion who will fight against hard Brexit in Parliament & who we were campaigning for in #GE2017 
Admit it, this is the best fun you've had since the EU referendum.  
#Breaking SNP plans for second independence referendum were "undoubtedly" a factor in party losing 21 seats, Nicola Sturgeon says 
I don’t want any more shouty lectures about “hard/soft” Brexit. I’d like journalists to do justice to all sides 2/4 
Clever thing for Tories to do would be to go to electorate later under a new leader & a ditch Brexit policy, leaving Labour stuck with it. 
If May cobbles together an arrangement with DUP & continues to pursue hard #Brexit, how long before more pragmatic Tories resign or switch? 
#Cameron called the referendum to destroy ukip. Job done on that front ultimately but big mess and division the price. #Therexit #RipUkip 
May's Brexit mandate 'has been rejected', Lib Dem leader Tim Farron claims  
.@NicolaSturgeon warns hard #Brexit "must be abandoned" & urges MPs to help her keep UK in single market  #GE2017 
#BREAKING 'Hard Brexit' must be abandoned after election: Scottish leader Sturgeon 
Just emailed my reduced majority Tory MP to say this and also to request opposition to any future no-deal 'hard Brexit' negotiating position  
I voted Labour to get rid of a Tory. I did NOT vote for any kind of Brexit and believe the UK's best interest is in remaining in the EU. 
Theresa May wanted to strengthen her hand for Brexit negotiations – instead she is diminished with British people and watching world leaders 
@Nigel_Farage We are not taking a hit on Brexit full Stop. Get off your rear Nigel and come back and sort things out. Millions are waiting. 
Very much doubt the PM will be able to get any Brexit deal through the House of Commons without cross party support. 
Theresa May has been disabused of the fiction that she had or has any mandate for a job destroying hard Brexit. So pleased for our country 
Congrats to @CarolineLucas a pro-European champion who will fight against hard Brexit in Parliament & who we were campaigning for in #GE2017 
"The reckless Tory pursuit of a hard Brexit must be abandoned," says Sturgeon. Urges MPs of all parties to back single market membership. 
@NicolaSturgeon accuses @Conservatives of creating chaos on "an industrial scale" with Brexit & snap election #GE2017 
Catalonia to put independence from Spain to a referendum in October  
.@NicolaSturgeon : the damage the Tories have done cannot be overstated - a disastrous EU ref followed by chaotic Brexit agenda #GE2017 
Whoops...last line of previous tweet should have read no meaningful anti-brexit voice.  Lost in election was oppportunity to undo Brexit 
More than 80% of voters voted for manifestos which made clear there could be no reversal of the EU referendum result. 
This is absolutely right. Outcome of Brexit will outlast any term and most political careers. This should be an entirely cross party process  
Can't help think DUP coalition is just brilliant for Ireland - soft Brexit more likely now as freedom of movement and goods critical in Ire 
#ComeyDay was great in GB too, where May's #SnapElection ended w a big loss & #HungParliament. Will effect Brexit!  
One consequence of the UK election: It throws some (welcome!) uncertainty into the prospect of a hard Brexit  
Tim Farron: "The mandate Theresa May sought for her extreme Brexit has been rejected by the British people" 
Want to know more about the DUP? Check this out: "The 'dark money' that paid for Brexit"  More from @foe_ni soon 
Former Lib Dem leader Paddy Ashdown says @theresa_may should step down as she has 'lost all credibility' over Brexit #GE2017 
Paul Nuttall’s resignation and the death of hard Brexit means the end for Ukip  
.@RolandRudd: This election proves there is no mandate for hard Brexit  
The DUP paid £282,000 for a Brexit ad which didn't run in NI, partially due to donor secrecy in NI. Very dodgy. 
Congrats to @TulipSiddiq, a pro-European champion who will fight against hard Brexit in Parliament & who we were campaigning for in #GE2017 
Since you're all wondering, here's what the DUP manifesto had to say about Brexit...  
DUP. Homophobic, climate change deniers, isolationist, hard brexit, hard border in the north, God-botherers. Have I missed something? 
BREAKING: Turkish PM says Iraqi Kurds' decision to hold independence referendum is 'irresponsible' 
I am beginning to be far from convinced that the recent election was not arranged for the purpose of damaging brexit. We need transparency. 
Brexit talks are due to start on June 19 - a minority government could undermine Britain's position in negotiations  
Geert Wilders.Some stick their head in the sand but the end of Europe as we know it is inevitable.#Brexit #Nexit #EU #GE2017 
We'll need another election before Brexit negotiations finish.  Only way to maintain meaningful discussion with EU is a cross-party team.  
The whole of #Brexit is at risk: Farage warns UK faces second referendum  
How about UK calling off Brexit? That would resolve all the issues. 
There is no Mandate forArroganceHard BrexitIndependenceThere is huge Mandate forJeremy CorbynLabour ManifestoHope & Unity#GE2017 
Defeated Tory candidate tells newly elected Labour MP: "Go back to Westminster & keep us in the Single Market."#Brexit @GuyVerhofstadt 
Gulf crisis, uncertain Brexit, IS at our doorsteps. PM concerned about geopolitical risks. Malaysia needs a united govt with a track record. 
My and @SimonTilford's reaction to #GE2017. There is no stable government, no Brexit plan, and no mandate for one.   
Exactly. DUP's stance not representative of Northern Irish views on #Brexit & does not reflect the serious concerns. #GE2017 #Election2017 
My guess is that Theresa May will stay on as PM and that David Davis will take on a far bigger role in Brexit talks with the EU now. 
There's no way to spin this. We have a bunch of self loathing folk in Scotland who don't care how badly hard Brexit will destroy our economy 
Brexiters - you still get Brexit, Remainers get a more sensible and constructive relationship with the EU. That’s the compromise. Thoughts? 
Sensible head on: this feels like Brexit is now a draw. It’s time for everyone to lobby for a cross party negotiation team. Brexit for all. 
So who are the DUP? Well, they took £425k in dark money for Brexit campaign. Read @AdamRamsay and I's series 
Wish the 18-25 were this active for the Brexit vote  
The rise of the remainers is about to begin. May’s Brexit strategy lies in ruins | Simon Jenkins  
VIDEO: Catalonia to hold independence referendum on October 1, 2017  
You:BrexitHung parliament RussiagateSaudi-Qatar-Iran spatParis agreementSyriaUkraineThe Kremlin:LOL. 
@Nigel_Farage we need you as Leader to ensure #Brexit happens with no divorce feeWe get our fish backWe leave ECHRNet ZERO iommigration 
Absolutely,  think young people felt the consequences of not voting in the referendum very deeply and chose this great democratic response!  
Only 8% of Labour voters said Brexit was the most important issue, according to @LordAshcroft post-vote poll:  
'We want #Brexit, now': UK, 2016'We want #Brexit, now': EU, 2017 
***German foreign min @sigmargabriel sees #ge2017 result as rejection of Tory manifesto Brexit model: @dw_politics 
They told you only Brexit matters. But underfunding the NHS into oblivion matters. And schools. And the police. And caring for vulnerable   
.@JunckerEU #DESCOP #Brexit "Before we speak about a delay in the negotiations, they have to actually start. Would like them to start."  
Theresa May reaches a deal to stay on as a weaker UK Prime Minister when the only aim of the election was to strengthen her hand for Brexit. 
72% of young people voting is stunning for democracy. Can't help but feel it's a bit of payback over the Brexit result 
Tory @EndaKennyTD calls #GE2017  result "a rejection of hard brexit terms" (rather than a rejection of Tory austerity) #Ireland4Corbyn 
I'm not sure if Brexit still means Brexit. 
Delighted with this result, -ish. Corbyn impressive. But I still find his languid apathy during the referendum hard to forgive. 
The shocking vote may diminish the “Brexit” costs ahead by encouraging a less confrontational approach to the E.U.  
Congrats to @IanMurrayMP, a pro-European champion who will fight against hard Brexit in Parliament & who we were campaigning for in #GE2017 
Don't forget, we are being dragged into this nonsense by 27% of the country!#Brexit is very definitely NOT the #WillOfThePeople. 
The sideshow is over and there is all to play for. It's time to rise up against the nightmare of a Tory Brexit.#StopBrexit 
Britain may just have dodged a Brexit bullet, writes @jennirsl  
.@AMDWaters - strong leadership is needed now in @UKIP The UK needs clarity on #Brexit #Immigration #Islamisation.  You can deliver this. 
Those who say "hard Brexit is dead" seem to ignore this pretty fundamental point.  
Secretive DUP Brexit donor links to the Saudi intelligence service | openDemocracy  
Theresa May trying to strengthen her hand in Brexit negotiations  
Jean-Claude Juncker hopes #GE2017 result will have "no major impact" on #Brexit negotiations  #bbcelection 
From a no-deal Brexit to a No Surrender Brexit. What could possibly go wrong? 
What kind of idiot votes Brexit and then before it's implemented vote for a party who are against it??? Gina Miller having a field Day. 
Autumn for the EU = German, Austrian & poss Italy elections, Brexit talks, poss 2nd UK general election & now....  
"As far as the Commission is concerned, we can open negotiations tomorrow morning". @JunckerEU on #Brexit. We are ready. #GE2017 
European Commissioner for Economic and Financial Affairs: UK election results will likely impact Brexit negotiations  
Catalonia calls independence referendum for October  
Yes. Establishment types trying to spin this as an anti Brexit thing, but the gamechanger was the Labour manifesto  
So Northern Ireland effectively will have a say over #Brexit but Scotland will not, That is some "United" Kingdom we live in 
#DUP impt to remember has strong working class support that is anti austerity, and lots of rural voters with much to fear from hard Brexit 
1. May's Brexit Gambles - in rough chronological order. 
This is wishful thinking. They want a hard Brexit and a soft border. It's easier to fudge the latter.  
YOU, A CENTRIST COMMENTATOR: The DUP want to stop Hard Brexit.ME, AN INTELLECTUAL: DUP want to launch our flat earth directly into the sun 
European Commission President Jean-Claude Juncker says he hopes there will be no "further delay" to the start of Brexit negotiations 
Catalonia announces it will hold independence referendum  
"We hope we do not experience a further delay in negotiations" says Jean-Claude Juncker on how UK election will impact Brexit #GE2017 
A time for reflection! A very dark day for uK Poitics & a real danger for the success of Brexit. Another General Election likely in October 
Paul Nuttall is gone. Lets make sure all the hateful, divisive and deceptive policies and rhetoric go with him.Oh yes, and #brexit#GE2017 
*the DUP opposed the Good Friday Agreement and they want a hard Brexit  
This is what's worrying the Brexit fanatics. And it assumes youth vote turnout same as in the referendum.  
Message of #Brexit, @realDonaldTrump win @theresa_may defeat: Speak directly, from the gut. Authentic beats approval of media elites. 
LATEST: Britain in political chaos after election shock, uncertainty over #Brexit.  More  
when Trump said he was Mr. Brexit, was that because nobody understood what they were voting for and immediately regretted? asking for friend 
Brexit: five possible scenarios for UK after shock election result  
One one side of the Brexit debate we now have just about everyone remotely qualified to judge, on the other just drunk men shouting "Fish!". 
'Yet another own goal' – EU points to Brexit breakdown after UK election  
U.K. PM May will try to form government after losing majority. @DominicValitis on what it means for #Brexit and more  
JUST IN: Taoiseach-in-waiting Varadkar says "no strong mandate to proceed with a hard Brexit, which represents an opportunity for Ireland" 
Remember, the DUP is under investigation by the Electoral Commission for potential unlawful spending during the EU referendum 
Link of talk to @RudawKurdi on Referendum & future steps  
We have a triple mandate, majority of WM MPs, after unionists ran on a block campaign, Holyrood gov't, and Holyrood vote. #ScotRef #Brexit 
// @TommySheppard: Whatever happens over the next 24 hours, the SNP will oppose the Tories’ hard #Brexit deal. 
The mandate the British people gave was for Brexit, which meant leave.Nothing to do with 'soft or Hard' just out. 
2nd thought: we have no idea what people actually voted for here: soft brexit? Anti austerity? Remain? Non-Maybot? We have No Clue. #2017GE 
Here is the DUP's #GE2017 manifesto on Brexit  
#GE17 results are a rejection of a hard Brexit and austerity at any cost, says general secretary Mike Clancy  
If @Number10gov plans coalition... The DUP's #brexit manifesto pledges for Farming and Agri-food may be of interest  
This is going to sound horribly naive but this cld be good moment to discuss what kind of Brexit deal would be tolerable to whole country. 
“I thought surrealism was a Belgian invention” – Guy Verhofstadt (European parliament’s Brexit rep) on British politics 
I was on rainbow six siege fam, securing the area RT @dotmanldn: @JmeBBK Where were the youth when we needed you for the Brexit vote smh 
So it begins. Hopefully this election shambles will create the opportunity for a re-examination of Brexit  
#BREAKING EU's Juncker hopes no 'further delay' in Brexit talks 
Can't win an election. Doesn't turn up to debates. Won't speak to the public. Rolls over for the DUP. Negotiating Brexit on our behalf.  
Brexit: five possible scenarios for UK after shock election result  
Did the anti-British traitor Teresa May purposefully create this mess in order to derail Brexit? Remember, she campaigned for Remain!  
Catalonia defies Madrid, announces October independence referendum 
The DUP are:-anti-abortion -pro Brexit -don't believe in LGBT rights-deny climate change .. Fuck. #GE2017 
So all three relevant #EU figureheads that are dealing with #Brexit have issued the same warning, in their respective styles.  
They might, of course, have learned that lesson after calling a referendum for their party rather than their country...  
German Foreign Minister @sigmargabriel interprets #GE2017 result as message from the British people against @theresa_may's "hard #Brexit"  
How radical would it be for UK to send a Brexit negotiating team that reflects pol balance of new Parl as EP would do? Put HoC in charge!  
They lost and should get over it. Soft Brexit now the will of the people. 
In 12 months, 2 Tory PMs have called snap elections. Both lost them. The country is utterly divided & we're entering Brexit negotiations! 
Paul Nuttall has stepped down as leader of Brexit campaigning party UKIP after it failed to win any seats #GE2017  
Tories have lost mandate for hard Brexit, says George Obsorne  
After Brexit, the United Kingdom and Ireland should learn from other small economies.  
My hope, too: "Out  of the chaos, some sanity might emerge." May knows what she can do with her hard Brexit.  
Catalan government sets plans for October independence referendum  via @fastFT 
Conservatives and DUP will be a disaster for the UK going into brexit. May has messed with up and needs to resign for this #HungParliament 
Worth re-reading this today. Secretive DUP Brexit donor links to the Saudi intelligence service  
BREAKING: #Spain in chaos as #Catalonia sets date for independence referendum 
Theresa May screwed the pooch on this snap poll and allowing TERRORISTS to upend her country. #Brexit in jeopardy. 
That's the third time Andrew Neil has said 'Breakfast' instead of 'Brexit'. He has something on the mind!  @BBCNews #2017Election 
EU leaders warn of ‘hugely complicated’ Brexit talks after UK poll  
Dear British consumers, fluid state of UK politics gives opportunity to  pressure MPs to take Food Brexit more seriously. Vital stuff, food! 
#Exclusive: Theresa May warned by ministers that she will face leadership challenge if she waters down #Brexit 
We need a PM who's grown up enough to take responsibility for mistakes and who has good judgement, #TheresaMay will screw up #Brexit for us.  
People getting carried away with 'soft Brexit'. Remember both Tories and Labour committed to ending free movement which makes that very hard 
Clear message from electorate is there's no mood for a hard right Brexit. Lord Ashdown right when he says May has lost touch with reality. 
A majority of one, with no formal coalition, and no chance of hard Brexit. One by-election away from defeat. Still great. 
Hung parliament means Brexit negotiations can't be done by a small Tory cabal. Need cross party commission. Best chance of sustainable deal 
George Osborne: Tories have lost mandate for hard Brexit 
'@LeaveEUOfficial: Theresa May not fit to lead Britain into Brexit negotiations.  
The DUP’s ‘price’ for propping up Tories ? No post-Brexit special status for N Ireland - a key SF demand. 
Referendum is what we're asking for. If Arewa wants war, let them confront their own boko boys. #FreeBiafra @Amaka_Ekwo @AsoRock @UN @BBC 
I am finding it increasingly difficult to believe this whole electoral farce was not a plan. A not needed election which destroyed brexit. 
Catalan referendum date announcement does little to dispel uncertainty:  @IrishTimesWorld #Catalonia @KRLS 
Theresa May made this election a referendum on herself, then lost it. Seriously, how can she carry on as PM today? 
Sad Truth is UKIP is Nothing without Nigel Farage 
I do not see how an army of students voting for Corbyn's magic money tree means the nation is suffering from buyer's remorse over Brexit. 
FARAGE: Have a feeling we're about to see massive Brexit backsliding.  
Lots of ppl have agenda to present result as being all about Brexit.Where's the hard evidence? In the event, the campaign wasnt about Brexit 
Theresa May is  #NotMyPrimeMinister, fuck this shit, siding with an extremely homophobic party just to get a hard brexit 
Referendum on Catalan independence 1 October, 2017. Question: Do you want Catalonia to be an independent country in the form of a Republic?  
For some in the DUP the economic consequences of Brexit are a secondary matter  
Nonsense youth turnout numbers got shared after Brexit too. Ignore them! #GE2017 
German Foreign Minister @SigmarGabriel says the #GE2017 result shows that Britons "won't be played with" regarding #Brexit  
SNP arguing hard Brexit now off the table in hung parly. Senior figures think they could, ironically, now have more influence in Commons 
Here is a complete list of things Julia Hartley-Brewer knows about #Brexit.  
#EU News: #Catalonia announces #independence #referendum  #Spain 
Catalonia announces October 1st date for independence referendum  
Morning after (3): hung UK parly must vote on final Brexit deal. Means it can vote down bad Tory/DUP offer. Scot must stay in single mkt. 
BREAKING: #Spain in chaos as #Catalonia sets date for independence referendum 
Dutch member of European Parliament tweets... #ge2017results #Brexit  
My personal election take: v disappointing but not disastrous: 1 UK union saved by SNP losses 2 We're still largest party 3 Brexit underway 
"For as long as Corbyn leads Labour, we will ensure there is a Tory PM" + no special NI status post-Brexit - DUP can't say fairer than that 
UKIP leader Paul Nuttall resigns after suffering abysmal election defeat despite standing in Brexit stronghold  
"It is time for Catalans to decide their future" —President @KRLS announces the #referendum for 1 October, 2017  
Always makes me laugh."There will be no #referendum because #Spain is democtratic country/state".#Catalonia #1octubre #1OCT 
The British economy was the big winner of last night’s election – now there will be no cliff-edge Brexit  
The DUPs policies on Brexit will be an absolute disaster for Northern Ireland, nothing withstanding their other awful policies. 
[Ticker] Catalonia independence referendum set for 1 October  
There's no need for any delay in the Brexit timetable. The new government can be formed before talks with the EU begin. 
The Tories introducing their own British Rights Bill after Brexit with (potentially) the DUP could be catastrophic for LGBT+ people 
#1oct2017: Catalonia's #referendum #BallotVote:☛Do you want #Catalonia to be an #independent state in the form of a #Republic?[YES][NO] 
Tory Head Office says the chances of May staying on to do the Brexit negotiations are roughly 50-50, or to be more precise, 52-48. 
This is the first time I haven't spent the morning crying after an election/referendum in years #GE2017 
Michel Barnier says Brexit talks can wait until the UK is ready. Can I propose 31st Feb 2099? Between 10:30 and 11:15. 
A point people are missing: the EU 27 want "hard Brexit" to deter other member states from leaving. 
Hm. This means the Conservatives do not have a mandate to get Brexit (or social care) through the House of Lords. 
We'll now have a period of complete chaos over Brexit. The Scottish Parliament's vote still stands. And what then? 
Former UKIP leader @Nigel_Farage has declared that he may return to politics to guarantee #Brexit. Read more here: 
I cannot believe May is visiting the Queen and will carry on as PM. These Tories know no shame. She's lost badly. Go! #GE2017 #Brexit 
Dear @theresa_may, country first now. Please put together a cross party Brexit negotiation team. Thank you. 
Mad as it seems, this mess means basically nothing about independence. Indy != the SNP. This was not a referendum. 
FM's thread on election results - priority is to work with others UK-wide to stop a hard brexit  
The *divorce* settlement? i.e. settling up what we owe? Here's a thought. Let's stay, avoid economic armageddon & a costly divorce. #Brexit 
On a positive note, DUP want to remain in the Single Market and the Custom Union. Hard Brexit is over, lads. It’s over. 
Remainers 2016: hard Brexit wasn't what we voted for. Remainers 2017: GE result is a vote for soft Brexit.Couldn't make it up, cheeky sods 
Uh oh!Catalonia calls independence referendum for October  
4/5 UK wide, we will seek to work with others to halt hard Brexit and bring an end to austerity, where business as usual cannot be an option 
3) May was already seeking a 3-year extension to Brexit. This must be explicit now. So must guarantee to EU nationals in UK. 
- Youth engaged- Tabloid grip broken- UKIP smashed- Soundbite & nasty politics failed- Balanced parliament - Hard Brexit on ropesLove 
BREXIT CANCELLED  
DUP oppose GFA and want a hard brexit. 
That election was Theresa May's best effort. Imagine how badly she'd cock up the Brexit negotiations. #ge2017 
Erm #DavidCameron can we just look at what a mess you have left after the referendum? Just wanted to congratulate you again #slowClap 
It is a leeetle bit rich that the Liberal Democrats - 14 seats, vote down and Brexit spokesman unseated - are now pronouncing on Brexit. 
BREAKING: Catalonia will hold a referendum on independence on October 1st, says regional leader @KRLS 
#TheWillOfThePeople The 2 parties that wanted hard Brexit = 44.2% of voteThere is no mandate for hard BrexitMay must listen or go.  
WATCH: The Tories have lost their mandate, May has no mandate for Brexit negotiations, Labour does, Corbyn does...#JC4PM 
Trust me. Brexit, Nexit and the end of the undemocratic islam-loving monster called EU will all happen. There is no alternative.#Brexit 
"I think it's pretty clear who won this election," says Jeremy Corbyn  #GE2017 
BREAKING | #Catalonia's leader declares independence referendum for the 1st of October  
Kudos to pro-EU @DavidLammy who gained a staggering 14.3% swing#Brexit #Remain #GE2017 
Brexit didn't play a strong role in campaign - but it is now THE issue and as the clock ticks, we are LESS clear what Brexit means. 
Make no mistake. Brexit is now in peril. Those of us who voted #Leave must demand we get what we voted for. #2017Election 
READ | Theresa May "is not fit to lead Britain into Brexit negotiations and our nation deserves better."  
From Cameron calling the EU referendum to now must rank as the most calamitous spell of British governance since Suez? James II? Vortigern? 
Catalonia declared an independence referendum for October. Madrid says "it's not going to take place"  
Yes, all parties come together for Brexit, say for two years until deal is done, then can have fresh election.?  
I still want Theresa May to negotiate Brexit because I imagine she will bumble her way into some kind of European Superstate 
The regional government of #Catalonia has called a referendum on a split from Spain on October 1.  
Yvette Cooper, who has retained her seat, says Theresa May called the General Election as a referendum on herself - and lost. 
Catalonia Sets October Date for Referendum on Independence From Spain@mdbaccardax 
Brexit to take 250 years  
Brexit died today. Yes it did! 
Just told Sky news: the jig is up and May should go. Labour's ready to serve and ready to negotiate Brexit 
The Democratic Unionist Party are the anti-abortion pro Brexit party of climate change deniers who don't believe in LGBT rights 
DUP top priority will be soft border, saving Good Friday agreement and free movement across boundary. That absolutely rules out hard Brexit 
Theresa May's vision of a hard Brexit was thrown into doubt after voters reject her strategy  
Today's result is thanks to the work of our volunteers, leading action days & joining local campaigns against a destructive Brexit. Pls RT:  
Catalonia to hold independence referendum on October 1, 2017  
Pretty please can we revoke Article 50, Mr Tusk?#GE2017 result, although confusing, is a clear rejection of Mrs May's hard #Brexit 
Both sides need to negotiate Brexit together. Cross-party team should be formed to start the talks. Mad idea? Politics IS mad just now. 
Spain's autonomous region of Catalonia unilaterally calls independence referendum for October 1 
2/ A DUP coalition agreement would mean an open border with Eire. Meaning, hard Brexit would be impossible. 
SPAIN CATALONIA INDEPENDENCE - Catalan regional president announces independence referendum for Oct. 1  
Tories called #Brexit referendum to buy a few years peace in their cabinet. What a price the UK is paying for that decision. 
Catalonia calls independence referendum for October  
....Tory-DUP coalition would NOT seem to add up to Parliamentary mandate for "no deal" WTO Brexit 
A national government of unity to deal with Brexit, led by Amber Rudd & Keir Starmer, is what I've decided I'm holding out for... #GE2017 
I think Corbyn should do a deal to support May through Brexit in exchange for one thing  
It is clear today that Britain has rejected the "hard Brexit" view - out of the Single Market & customs union - there is no mandate for this 
If you're wondering what the DUP's stance on Brexit is, this archive piece explains the tensions  
So EU referendum called and lost; snap general election called and lost. Who said Conservatives were party of stability? 
Juncker tells UK "we are ready" to start Brexit talks  
The majority in the new Parliament who oppose May's destructive extreme Brexit must now work together to keep Britain in the Single Market. 
Would you trust #May to negotiate #Brexit now, following bad call after bad call in this campaign?  I’m not sure I would ! 
First reflex: a Tory/DUP coalition would have a majority of 1 MP. Good luck getting Kenneth Clarke to vote for hard Brexit, Theresa. 
Northern Ireland's Democratic Union Party manifesto on Brexit highlights aim for a "comprehensive free trade and customs agreement" with EU  
People of UK have rejected the conservative policies and a hard Brexit 
May's wasted enough time. Negotiations must start. We want positive relationship but rights & benefits can't be the same for UK post-#Brexit 
Brexit talks are due to start on June 19 - a minority government could undermine Britain's position in negotiations  
A reminder that the #Brexit clock is ticking, and many in the EU27 would like to drive home the negotiating advantage that presents  
#BREAKING EU's Tusk warns against Brexit 'no deal' after UK vote 
May will arguably be more not less vulnerable to eurosceps and DUP - not recipe for softening any of her Brexit plans 
George Osborne on the Today programme a few moments ago: "I don't believe #brexit has a majority in the House of Commons any longer." 
Catalonia calls independence referendum for October  
I would not be at all sure of Remainy hopefuls thinking this means softer Brexit (it is a daft term anyway but there you go) 
After Brexit, I felt embarrassed Wales was behind Scotland and Northern Ireland.Now they're the ones who screwed up. 
I think this result will "change the kind of Brexit we have," says @George_Osborne #bbcelection #r4today 
THANK YOU to everyone who campaigned in this election against a hard & destructive Brexit. This result is all thanks to our supporters:  
Funny that ppl speaking of DD as leader. If there was no mandate for May Brexit plan and he is the Brexit secretary... 
Osborne just now on May- Buck stops w/ leadership- Can't survive in longterm- Should she lead Brexit?- Won't lead into next voteOuch. 
Isn't it time @BBCNews simply asks independent commentators? Asking Tory YouGov & Tory Murdoch Times does not cut it for me anymore. #Brexit 
That's going to be a fun week. German elections 24th September, Iraqi Kurdistan's independence referendum 25th September, then this:  
WTF? Even with Brexit, the young vote and the crap Tory campaign - that 40% voted for Corbyn simply beggars belief.  Quo vadis Britannia? 
She called for a huge mandate to negotiate Brexit supported by the cabinet especially David Davis: she has ended up with NO mandate 
David Cameron: Maybe need to learn lessons from referendum thingy. Thought it would be a walk in the park. Theresa May. Hold my pint. 
EU's Brexit negotiator says talks should start when UK is ready''  
...The government should go back to the drawing board and negotiate a Brexit deal that puts UK jobs, decent wages and workers' rights first. 
We don't know when Brexit talks start. We know when they must end. Do your best to avoid a "no deal" as result of "no negotiations". #GE2017 
The rise of the remainers is about to begin. May’s Brexit strategy lies in ruins | Simon Jenkins  
Tenim data, tenim pregunta i surt a escena la MHP @KRLS Love Democracy Club Band . Que comenci l'espectacle! I love this game #Referèndum  
The Catalan referendum: 1st October 2017.'Would you like that Catalonia becomes an independent State in the form of a Republic?'  
Chief Brexit negotiator tweets...  
Hey guys, I just had an idea. Let’s not do Brexit. We don’t have to do it. The referendum was purely advisory. We could just not do it. 
It seems to me this result reflects fact that voters spilt pretty much 50-50 on Brexit, but split not along party lines -> no clear outcome 
#BREAKING Leader of Spain's Catalonia announces independence referendum for October 1 
Our statement following today's historic announcement of Catalonia's independence referendum.  
Yes, she never had BREXIT credibility.Moreover her ministerial record is dire.  
#BREAKING: Leader of Spain's Catalonia announces independence referendum for October 1  
Fallout for Brexit:- June 19 talks delayed- Hard brexit is probably over- Staying in single market back on table- Possible ref. on deal 
Remember: this election was called because the Conservatives didn't think they had a strong enough mandate for Brexit negotiations. Oh. 
Wow.  So good Labour stronger.  So good Brutal Brexit rejected.  So good next generation realized the stakes and spoke up. 
Top EU negotiator @MichelBarnier is being patient: he knows this is terrible for UK position - 11 days before Brexit talks  
Brexit talks can start 'when UK is ready', says EU chief negotiator  
May: "If I lose my majority Brexit negotiations will be a disaster."May: *loses majority*May: "Brexit negotiations must start right away." 
President @KRLS calls for a referendum on Catalan independence for 1 October, 2017.  
Breaking news: #Catalonia's independence referendum will be held on 1 October 2017 
Guy Verhofstadt, European parliament’s Brexit representative, describing the result, said: “I thought surrealism was a Belgian invention.” 
If the Brexit Secretary is considering putting the single market back on the table then the whole process is now seriously damaged.  
The Brussels view. Yet May apparently wants to stay on to handle Brexit negotiations.  
Theresa The Remainer's Cunning PlanProclaim hard Brexit.Run awful campaign.Alienate core voters.=hung parliament delivers soft Brexit. 
Tory voters in my office are LIVID! I'm enjoying this so much. Talking about how they regret voting for Brexit. THE TEARS ARE SUCCULENT 
"I've never been particularly worried by what you call Hard Brexit," says Daniel Hannan, who is a moron. 
So: Brexit negotiations over the sensitive issue of a "hard" Irish border may be conducted by a government dependent on DUP for majority. 
Now all MP's cross Party need to stand up and be counted . Brexit madness has  cost both parties the election . Stop Brexit . 
Don't see how they ditch a referendum when it's our only chance of escaping Brexit catastrophe. This about national interest not SNP votes.  
Actually this is a rejection completely of Brexit . Both labour & Tories stood on platform of Brexit . Neither won a majority . 
The thing is this election and the Brexit referendum are different consequences of the same thing: this version of capitalism isn't working. 
Well, the only one who has been delaying #Brexit talks has been #TheresaMay. We area ready to negotiate since Oct 2016. #GE2017 
Brussels delaying Brexit talks is flatly untrue. Tories still briefing like they are in a fact-free vaccuum.  
Dutch MEP on Radio 4, reflecting on the state of British politics going into Brexit negotiations: "Chaos seems to be complete now." 
When you get a referendum that is 2% shy of 50/50 guess what happens when you call an election. 
How many times is Andrew Neil going to say Breakfast instead of Brexit? I'm running out of fingers. Someone, please, get him some toast #BBC 
Pretty sure the very tired - and possibly hungry - BBC anchor just asked whether there's a mandate for breakfast (rather than Brexit)... 
Official Statement by President @KRLS and Vice-president @junqueras on the Catalan #referendum. Live:  
It's amazing how vile people are. Actually I think Tory would handle brexit better & be tougher on terrorists.... but thanks lovely   
Will Brexit undermine the Premier League, cutting it off from footballing innovations in continental Europe?  
Reminder that to soften Brexit, MPs need to back at least 1:-Free movement -Continued cash to EU-EU trade policy-ECJ jurisdiction 
BREAKING NEWS Nigel Farage says he has "no choice" but to make a political comeback  via @CityAM WELCOME HOME NIGEL 
#Brexit has made idiots out of the Conservatives. It is a foolish dogma which warps minds and clouds judgement. #GE2017 #GE17 #Remain 
Aha, so it's possible that electorate got it wrong on Brexit then?!  
Farage is right, we did vote for a particular sort of brexit. One that does not involve him or his party. 
60% of Leave voters voted Tory, & Labour won back large numbers from Ukip coz it supported triggering Art 50. No mandate for diluting Brexit 
'The anti Brexit sentiment has roared'. BBC 
I hope even Tory voters finally grasp that the #Brexit Tories are currently the party of incompetence, idiocy & instability. #GE2017 #GE17 
#GE2017  Good news: 1. Democracy works. 2. Softer Brexit, better for UK & EU. 3. Maybot crashes.  4. Interesting. (& locally 5. @laylamoran) 
#Brexit negotiations should start when UK is ready; timetable and EU positions are clear. Let's put our minds together on striking a deal 
Hearing less than 35 votes between lab and con in #Kensington - extraordinary. Brexit MP loathed in v cosmopolitan area 
Remainers who think election in which 80% voted for parties pledged to leave EU means we must overturn Brexit are playing with fire 
The woman who has made one of the most catastrophic political decisions of my time still thinks she is person to broker best Brexit deal. 
The key to some degree of normalcy is a binding promise of a 2nd Referendum. Every indicator makes this absolute. 
"and it seems difficult to predict when we will." @FedericaMog #Brexit #UKGE2017 
"One year after the referendum, we still don’t know the British position in the negotiations on Brexit," says @FedericaMog #Brexit 1/2 
Labour MPs in London who opposed Lab's official Brexit line on leaving Single Market did very well. In north Euroscep Lab MPs lost 
Breaking: EU wants Corbyn!!!Germany congratulate @jeremycorbyn on GE and invite him to talk about Brexit!! 
Can we do a really soft Brexit where we actually stay in but just tell yer da that we've left? 
Can we please have a second Brexit vote now cause it's clear this country doesn't know what it wants smh 
No-one can govern without the promise of a 2nd Referendum. 
Eating hard Brexit for breakfast. 
BREAKING: Turkish foreign ministry says #Kurdistan Region's independence referendum set to take place in September will be a "fatal mistake" 
Absurd. Brussels has been trying to start the talks since the referendum.  
The hung parliament must not be allowed to delay Brexit, says @isaby 
Turkey calls #Kurdistan Region's referendum plan ‘grave mistake’  
May's authority fatally damaged. More turmoil is bad for the country and bad for Brexit, but I simply don't see how she can hang on long. 
Retweet: if you want @Nigel_Farage to become UKIP leader again.He is the person the country needs now hard brexit is in danger.  
Brexit-campaigning Sun editorial this morning. Lol  
Hearing David Davis has been in to see Theresa May this morning. He's keen to shore her up to ensure Project Brexit is on track, I'm told. 
The young learned their lesson from Brexit. The older vote will arrogantly disregard them. Not any more.  
This guy, Guy, is an EU Brexit negotiator...  
Hung Parliament welcome re hard Brexit, but am sorry: whenever I hear Corbyn being impassioned I recall how little he did during #euref 
Brexit: House of Lords will feel emboldened re single market etc, as there is no majority for Tory manifesto 
All the more surprising as Wales is very much Brexit territory  
On eve of Brexit talks,UK has no secure govt and no negotiating position that commands  consensus in Parl. Time to stop clock on Article 50? 
Demand for a change of approach not just about Brexit destination, but communication. This pathetic evil-EU crap has to go. 
A dire UK election result. Country's Brexit negotiating position weakened & confused, plus there'll be no serious action on the deficit 
The New European will be out on Saturday this week.13 issues for just £13 & FREE Five on Brexit Island 
UK thrust back to political weakness of 1970s while Europe suddenly strong, self-confident. We can't expect favourable terms in Brexit negs. 
Any sympathy for May is misplaced. She wanted to crush the Labour Party. Cynical, partisan and opportunistic. Nowt to do with Brexit 
Brussels not rubbing hands w glee. Good #Brexit deal advantageous for both sides. Weak uk leadership worrying for both too #hungparliament 
Theresa May gambled for a stronger mandate to negotiate Brexit. And came out with a hung parliament  
He wants a hard Brexit, kids. Always has. Get ready for your come down  
Tories and Lib Dems said Brexit was the most important issue in their voting decision - for Labour voters, NHS and spending cuts  
@jeremycorbyn & team deserve praise for a campaign honestly carried out in the face of media onslaught. Mrs May has no hard Brexit mandate. 
#BREAKING  Turkey says Iraqi Kurds' referendum plan 'grave mistake' 
Jeremy Corbyn says the Brexit talks must begin in 11 days whoever is in government - live updates  
Revenge of the youth! How 18 to 24-year-olds furious over Brexit gave Theresa May a general election nightmare  
Our position is clear: we want good relations with the UK but #Brexit means leaving the EU and the advantages that go with it. #ge2017 
A second EU referendum is now inevitable - after whatever deal or no deal is reached with the EU. Even Farage thinks this is likely.#GE2017 
Altro  che hard brexit. 
The clock is ticking for #Brexit. Therefore the UK needs a government soon. The date for the beginning of negotiations is now unclear. 
No matter who forms a government this is the end of hard Brexit  
Dear UK ... love from chief Brexit negotiator   
may: "if i lose 6 seats scary socialist man will be in charge of brexit"voter: "im listening but what do i get for 12" 
Not even 9am and Corbyn is on BBC saying he's ready to go ahead with Brexit negotiations while May hides somewhere trying to keep her job. 
"Brexit in jeopardy," says U.K. Independence leader  
'We are ready to undertake Brexit negotiations on behalf of the country' says @JeremyCorbyn #GE2017 
EU is united, UK is deeply split. PM May wanted stability but brought chaos to her country instead. #ge2017 #Brexit 
Shall we just keep having elections until everyone forgets about Brexit? What's a Brexit lad? I think it's a jarg Kit Kat yerno. 
SNP have won the last 7 elections. Can someone tell me why that means they cannot enact their manifesto, including a democratic referendum? 
When you wanted a strong hand for Brexit but now you've to go to the Twelfth #GE2017 
60% of Leave voters voted Tory (via a @LordAshcroft poll) - dangerous therefore for Conservative sources to talk of diluting #Brexit  
THANK YOU! We've increased our number of MPs by 50% and voters have rejected Theresa May's plans for an extreme Brexit. #brighterfuture 
Bugger all chance of negotiating a good deal on Brexit now, best just to leave immediately without one. 
Germany's Europe minister: Brexit talks must proceed as quickly as possible despite hung parliament.  
Today the British public faces the reality of two competing Brexits: a Brexit for the many and a Brexit for the few. Let's win the argument 
Corbyn says Brexit negotiations will have to go ahead 
One thing we'd do well to remember is that a weak UK government delivering a bad BREXIT deal for the UK is also a bad deal for Ireland 
- Cameron organizes referendum he loses.- May organizes election she loses.- And Labour is the party with the leadership problem?  
The Brexit talks will have to go ahead whoever in Govt - @jeremycorbyn 
There's a mix of Brexit politics & domestic politics in the results. I say Remainers haven't been diminished so Nukip or NewParty needed.  
So now we've killed hard Brexit, can we take a deep breath and go for no Brexit? 
'Hard #Brexit' is over. Now let's finish the job and get 'any Brexit' over. 
Who needs a hard Brexit or any Brexit at all ! This situation might give us a soft Brexit and more european/overseas staff that we all need 
Let's be clear, #GE2017 result IS a rejection of hard #Brexit.Next step - option to remain firmly back on the table. 
Assuming 'soft Brexit' was the issue, the utter stupidity of May's position is that behind closed doors that's what she was seeking anyway. 
Today is the first day of the great Brexit unravelling. 
This shows the incredible irresponsibility of triggering A50 before calling GE. Clock continues ticking with no brexit policy in place 
With Parliament having no clear winner, Brexit is now at risk. A cross party Brexit campaign must be formed to guarantee Brexit happens. 
UK's shock election result may hamper Brexit talks, EU leaders warn  
Seems that the voters weren't fired up by Theresa May's focus on Brexit. We may be bored of Brexit - but Brexit isn't bored of us. 
Corbyn didnt win. He helped create Brexit.  Nothing changes that. 
"Tories would lose mandate to leave EU single market if they lose majority, suggests Brexit Secretary David Davis" 
Theresa May: I need you to strengthen my hand during these brexit negotiations.Young people: #hungparliament #ge2017 
It is beginning to dawn on the British political class that most of the British public doesn't give a damn about Brexit 
European Commissioner for Economic and Financial Affairs: UK election results will likely impact Brexit negotiations  
Will @theresa_may finish her #Brexit mission or resign after the devastating #GE2017 result? 
David Cameron calls a referendum Boris Johnson wins itTheresa May triggers Article 50??? negotiates #Brexit(EU-27 look bewildered) 
My report on #Kurdistan Independence Referendum in September; incl. region, #Israel politicians who support #Kurds 
You can see the outlines of the Leave response already - election all about personality, all Labour votes were for hard Brexit. 
EU says U.K. needs a government before Brexit talks start  
.@MedCityHQ & @The_NHSA call for #life-science Minister to minimise #Brexit risks and maximise opportunities @UK_Life_Science @thetimes 
As with Brexit, last night brought us an election surprise. Here’s what the results mean | Deborah Mattinson  
Farage on BBC still falsely claiming that the people voted for a particular type of Brexit. 
This is exactly what happened after Brexit (and that figure was nonsense) #GE2017 
Farage going on about 'the Brexit that people voted for' as though they actually knew what Brexit they were voting for. What. A. Knob! 
Hard Brexit is dead. It's time for the Brexiters to compromise  
What does the election result mean for Brexit? It brakes it. 
Britain has rejected hard Brexit  
Why the hell is this clown on our TV this morning? UKIP are done, not relevant. Nobody wants a hard Brexit #hungparliament #Ge2017 
The electorate have utterly rejected Farage's vision of Brexit. The end. 
Congratulations to all Britain for Europe groups who helped elect progressive pro-EU candidates! Theresa May's #Brexit is off the table! 
Now all the young people have shown up, can we re-run the #Brexit referendum? 
*ANDREW NEIL JUST SAID BREAKFAST INSTEAD OF BREXIT KLAXON* 
If we think of Brexit as a boiled egg, soft or hard. Forget it. The egg is now scrambled 
EU says start of Brexit talks may now be delayed to allow for laughing to subside#BBCelection 
Britain's shock election result deepens #Brexit confusion. Via @ReutersTV  #GE2017 
If the young had turned out in the numbers they did yesterday, last June, there would have been no Brexit 
Farage says this result throws Brexit into doubt and might necessitate a second referendum. Lots of Remainers will hope he's right 
Former Liberal Democrat leader Nick Clegg: I lost my seat because of my Brexit views  
Any Tories whining about Brexit chaos today probably shouldn't have triggered Article 50 then called a general election. Probably. 
Yet again the voters nailed it: didn't want PM Corbyn, or PM May & bit iffy about hard Brexit. Pretty much only seat combo that does all 3 
Election should make ppl in Ireland question the received wisdom that Brexit was all about racism. It was start of working class revolt. 
The Remain campaign underestimated the anger of voters in the referendum. May seems to have made the same mistake  
Then it was just a slogan, now it's a scenario...  #Brexit #GE2017 
From 33% turnout in the EU referendum 2016 to 72% in #GE2017. 18-24 year olds you have just made history! 
Many young people regretted not voting in Brexit Referendum. They made up for it in #Ge2017  Great turnout 
Big up to the socialists* of W8!            *Naffed off anti-Brexit bankers  
What's with all the sadness on your Twitter Scotland?Brexit is banjaxed and Britain is weak.Did you think we'd have 56 forever? WE WON! 
I happen to know one of these 48 voters who won Crewe & Nantwich for Labour. A lifelong Tory. First ever vote for Labour. *Hates* Brexit.  
Imagine if the young vote had mobilised with such force for the Europe referendum... 
Ok then....Brexit? 
Brilliant that 72% of 18-25 yr olds voted. Revenge for pensioners who fucked their future with the Brexit referendum. The kids are alright 
Or to put in another way, soft brexit, and a final say by referendum, could well be back on the table 
Well, Northern Ireland certainly voted overwhelmingly to remain, but the DUP are in favour of a hard brexit anyway ¯\(°_o)/¯ 
Sky were completely wrong about youth turnout after EU referendum. It's likely too early to know. 72% figure coming out of nowhere. 
Facing #brexit it seems to me that a minority government, that will be held to account by parliament, may be no bad thing 
'Labour have put hard Brexit on hold'  #bbcelection #r4today 
The farcical general election & Theresa May's antics have put Brexit at risk - but that's what her masters at Goldman Sachs would want!  
I agree with @YvetteCooperMP @jeremycorbyn & Labour MPs calling on Theresa May to step down as PM. Position looks untenable. Brexit on hold.  
- Tories humiliated- May finished- Hard Brexit finished- Pro-Indy SNP win Scotland- A great night for CorbynTHAT'LL DO ME!!!! 
 Wow! 72% turnout for 18-25 year oldsThx! This clip from 'The Young Ones' is for you  #EU #GE2017 #Brexit 
The young have been kicked time and time again. Brexit, jobs, housing, tuition fees. And eventually, they said NO MORE and it was beautiful. 
'Brexit must be reset after election result'  
A very happy day for the Hunting Act! Now to work across Parties to get the best #Brexit for animals #GE2107 
The Tories won but lost. Labour lost but won. The Lib Dems lost and won but mostly lost. UKIP is dead. Brexit is still horribly alive. 
No party has a majority but there is one for softer Brexit. Test for Labour is whether they can work across the Commons to deliver it. 
a huge surprise, certainly, but don't get your hopes up that the UK election will reverse Brexit -  
It's the will of the people, suck it up and respect democracy. At least an election is legally binding unlike a referendum. Keep fighting. X pic.twitter.com/EeDKLq1BOm 
And it is fair to point out, and will always be fair: looking at Corbyn campaign in this, he didn't give a damn in the referendum campaign.  
The only good that could ever come from the Brexit vote was that a whole new generation would realise how valuable their vote was & use it 
May has put Brexit AT RISK: Farage warns UK faces SECOND EU referendum with Corbyn  
.@MatthewdAncona says its absurd to think a lame duck Theresa May govmt could negotiate Brexit talks with confidence 
#BREAKING  A 'weak' British negotiating partner 'bad' for Brexit talks: EU's Oettinger 
I don't think May should resign. Brexit negotiations start in 11 days. We're in enough turmoil as it is. 
Until yesterday, Theresa May campaigned. Today she needs to start working. She needs to tell British people the truth: #Brexit weakens UK. 
Whatever happens next, if we don't confront now this "have cake & eat it" Brexit mentality, & don't confront reality ahead, spells disaster. 
This is very significant and great to see. Is it a kind of Brexit referendum revenge?  
Brussels feeling strong + stable this morning: EU united over #Brexit and Merkel + Macron looking strong politically #hungparliament #GE2017 
Whatever has gone before & whether he has to pay for that, he is excellent on Brexit & a very bright, articulate calm person. Will be missed  
Oh please spare us. Won't you listen to the will of the people? The PM asked for a huge mandate for hard Brexit and the people said no way.  
 Good morning @theresa_mayI thought this one sums it up nicely...#GE2017 #UK #Brexit #UK 
End of hard Brexit, stay in EFTA? End of grammars and school cuts? Rescue NHS? Tories forced to change from now on  
If you see this as a victory for Remain, the Labour manifesto was also committed to Brexit. Small point, worth making. 
Tories can't argue this election wasn't about Brexit. May called it PRECISELY so she had a mandate for Brexit negotiations 
What was it do you think Mrs May @theresa_may?BrexitHuman rightsDementia taxFlip flops#U turnsYou? 
Clegg confirming his class, calm authority & solid grasp on Brexit realities on #r4today. 
Only clear fact at this stage is that "mandate of the people" is patently balls. UK clearly not sure about anything rn: Brexit clearly dim. 
Andrew Marr says Brexit is set to become "more disorganised & chaotic", which given the past year of nonsense is quite an incredible idea. 
May: A personal mandate is vital if I'm to be successful in Brexit negotiations.UK: Nope.May: ..................... I press on regardless. 
If you're a Remoaner this is a fantastic result. Nobody has a clear mandate to push that button or any other. Hard Brexit is a dead duck 
I have eatenthe majoritythat wasIn parliamentand whichyou weresavingfor brexit Forgive meIt was deliciousso sweetand so Corbyn 
Nigel Farage says Ukip could "become more relevant in UK politics than ever before" if Brexit stalls #GE2017 
Irony of #Brexit vote--a protest against an unrepresentative political elite--is that UK has not yet found a political leader to act on it 
As with Brexit, last night brought us an election surprise. Here’s what the results mean | Deborah Mattinson  
Nigel Farage says he's worried Brexit will happen "in name only now" #GE2017 
What’s clear is that May's kamikaze hard Brexit should now be off the table too. 
You lost double this number. When does Jeremy Corbyn's job as Brexit negotiator begin?  
Many Remainers think a hung parliament means we will see a "Soft Brexit", staying  in single market. That option is NOT on the EU table. 
In '16, 'Brexit' seemed to be a catalyst for loads of bad sh*t happening. In '17, maybe we've seen the event that starts a chain of good.  
Bottom line: Theresa May called an election to protect Brexit having won the Article 50 Commons vote 498-114. It didn't pass the taste test. 
Conservative minority government drawing legitimacy from 43% pop vote fine but please don't ignore 48% Remainers & rethink hard Brexit line! 
#BREAKING  UK vote result a surprise but does not call Brexit into question: French  PM 
So. No mandate for hard Brexit. The negotiating team needs to be pro Europeans who will get us the greatest access to Single Market. 
Mrs May, having obtained a weaker mandate to negotiate Brexit, has let it be known she has no intention of resigning..... 
The anti-Brexit vote has punished pro-Brexit Cons by voting for a pro-Brexit Lab leader & decreasing the anti-Brexit Lib Dem vote. 
May's campaign was centred on increasing seats to give her more authority in Brexit negotiations. She failed. She must resign. #BBCelection 
Brexit negotiations in 11 days, lads.  
You made this election a mandate for a hard Brexit vote, and a vote of confidence in you, @theresa_may. You lost on both counts. Resign. 
Weird Tory campaign errors:1. May saying everyone backs Brexit thereby enraging remainers;2. Attacking her base with Dementia tax; 1/2 
Man's never been in Brexit when it's shutdown  
Agreed sadly. I pledge to carryon campaigning for softest Brexit as there is no mandate for hard Brexit. Young people are clearly against it  
Every time I remember that Theresa May threw away a Tory parliamentary majority just days before the Brexit talks, I burst out laughing. 
Theresa May promised that, if she lost just 6 seats, Corbyn &co would be conducting the Brexit negotiations.Another U-turn?#hungparliament 
 Waking up with this news:Conservatives lose House of Commons majority#GE2017 #UK #Brexit #EU MT @bbcelections 
The British people were offered Hard Brexit, grammar schools, fox hunting and more austerity. They said no. It's time for change. #r4today 
Brexit imperilled by dismal May campaign. We need her out and a HARD Brexiteer in. Now. #2017Election 
When all the young people are already mad about brexit, it's probably not a good idea to hand them a gun and ask to be shot in the face. 
Shall we just not bother with Brexit yeah?  
Glad Theresa May has been knocked off her high horse.She should have just gone through with Brexit negotiations and kept pim ,doing the most 
Sigh. Ok, I'm a dumbass. Believe it or not, my kids & I were trying to convince my wife that "brexit mandate" existed. I tried to find...(1) 
BREAKING: @Nigel_Farage tells @GMB he may run UKIP again to force through hard Brexit. 
As we always knew, Theresa May has no mandate whatsoever for a hard Brexit. She is a disgrace. 
Theresa May called #GE17 bc she needed a mandate for Brexit negotiations. She has no mandate so she should go. #hungparliament #BBCDebate 
‘I think we’re going to see a significant backslide on Brexit’ - @Nigel_Farage 
Chewing on the data:  Does this result mean that Brexit didn't mean Brexit after all? 
The absolute joy of watching the same crowd that crowed 'get over it' after Brexit vote now absolutely filling their pants in fury. 
Will Brexit Secretary David Davis, a safe pair of hands, be the next Tory leader 12 years after he was beaten by David Cameron 
What happens to #Brexit now? Fascinating and kind of hilarious!! 
Second referendum result is that the UK doesn't want #brexit.It couldn't be clearer. MP'S need now to heed the voters. 
UK: Strong and stable hung parliament. #Brexit #GE2017 
If you want a laugh watch John Redwood on BBC desperately trying to make out that this election provides a mandate for hard Brexit 
In Brussels, @MichelBarnier shakes his head in mild dismay, and then gets on with more important things.His Brexit mantle-clock ticks. 
Listen Remainers. I see you now coming out & demanding a "soft Brexit" thus subverting the will of the people. Revolution starts in that way 
Oh dear, some deluded #Tories trying to make out they've wonDisastrous result for #TheresaMay & #BrexitShe's now laughing stock in Europe 
Mrs May ensures that no one has a mandate to negotiate the biggest  issue of modern times. She said it was about Brexit: it was! 
#GE2017 ends in a #hungparliament. So what happens next & what does it mean for #Brexit? 
Voters have sent out a clear message: we reject a HARD #Brexit that distances us from Europe & forces us into Trump's suffocating embrace! 
Good to see young people voting but it would have been way better had they done so to defeat Brexit a year ago.  
UK cannot possibly negotiate Brexit. UK should withdraw article 50 until ready. 
And who negotiates BREXIT now???? 
Actual footage of the Tories on their way to Brexit negotiations:#GE2017 #BBCElection 
So essentially the Scots voted against another independence referendum and for #Brexit.@DavidCoburnUKip @NicolaSturgeon 
Key are national vote shares: Con 42.4%, Lab 40.1, Lib Dem 7.2, SNP 3.1, UKIP 1.9, Green 1.6. Con lead 2.3. No 'hard Brexit' mandate here 
This about sums things up for me ...#GE2017 #GeneralElection #EUref #Brexit #Brexiteers @Conservatives @Labour @theSNP @Libdems @UKIP 
That being said... The EU looking for someone to negotiate Brexit in 11 days....  
Will go nicely with the lack of economy post-brexit.   
Does #GE2017 mean hard/soft #Brexit? Will negotiations be delayed? Will there be second EUref? Brussels says all questions for UK not EU 
72% of 18-25 year old voted. Brexit combined with Corbyn has ignited a generation. Finally. #ge2017 
BBC now in a full Corbyn the Messiah, Brexit is dead orgasmfest....never seen so many of their hacks looking so happy!! 
Second independence referendum plan 'dead' after SNP suffers major losses 
Theresa May gone home to have a think about Brexit. 
A hung Parliament is the UK literally saying 'hang on for a minute' about #Brexit. And the UKIP share of the vote confirms that. #GE17 
If Tories rule, it will have to be with the DUP. And while the DUP is pro-Brexit, it's pro-soft-Brexit. Turbulent times ahead. 
"I will be a bloody difficult woman to #Juncker", said May 5 weeks ago. Fact is, this morning she looks bloody weak. #GE2017 #BREXIT 
Brexit talks might be delayed, says European Union official   
Meanwhile in Great Britain. #Brexit  
Couldn't have been a better result. Tories still in charge of Brexit disaster, (so they will still take full blame) but now on a leash #GE17 
Well someone has to go into the #Brexit negotiations on behalf of Britain - should @piersmorgan and @susannareid100 give it a go?  #GE2017 
2. I totally got the Brexit vote wrong, didn't in a million years think we'd vote for it and was shocked when we did. It made me realise 
Another snap election , Mrs May ? How about a snap Referendum too , but with all our Citizens - oh , and NO Russian subversion - this time 
NEW Brexit talks might be delayed, says European Union official   via @telegraphnews 
Kurdistan region sets independence referendum; Many in Israel seek to work closer with its Kurdish friends. 
#Brexit process can be extended/cancelled BUT request needs to come from UK + then be approved by all 27 EU members + EU parliament #GE2017 
Longer thread on how the Article 50 process grinds on, regardless of the result.Brexit by timetable continues  
#GE2017  1. Happy to see the end of May. 2. Expect now softer Brexit. 3. Sad about loss of @nick_clegg, talented, patriotic,pro European 
Tories and Lib Dems said the most important issue was Brexit - for Labour voters it was the NHS and spending cuts  
They will be scratching their heads in Brussels. For now, they barely have anyone to negotiate with. And the Art. 50 clock ticks on. #Brexit 
Looks like a big turnout, with a transformative youth vote. And whatever Brexit chaos awaits us, that is heart-swellingly encouraging. 
Not sure how Brexit is supposed to work, talks are supposed to begin in 10 days but there's no government now. 
Apparent death of hard Brexit an unalloyed good for universities. Chances increase of good deals on EU nationals, EU students, EU research. 
"Politics has changed... people have had quite enough," Labour's Jeremy Corbyn says  #GE2017 
The real world? We face radical Islam terror attacks, and the need for Brexit. Corbyn's world? Free stuff for all. Huge numbers go with him 
Election was billed as a referendum on Tory extreme Brexit - voters just rejected it by a far higher majority than Leave won EU referendum 
Tory options are:Keep pitiful Theresa May, who is the laughing stock of UK & EuropeorLeadership election as Brexit clock ticking 
Revoke Article 50 now. #Brexit #GE2015 
My last 3 Betfair punts:Brexit yes (5:1)Trump (6:1)Hung parliament (11:1 in April)Lesson: ignore pollsters & bet against establishment? 
EU Commisisoner Oettinger says unsure Brexit talks can start on time, weak UK negotiating partner risks poor outcome - German radio via Rtrs 
#GE2017 doesn't stop #Brexit clock ticking. March 2019 is official cut-off time for divorce deal Brussels tells London ball is in your court 
McDonnell: Theresa May doesn't have a mandate for Brexit negotiations she should stand down. #GE2017 
What a stroke of genius by Theresa May to oppose Brexit by getting elected as Conservative leader and holding snap election. 
Tories: hard brexit18-24yo: I AM MOANA 
In 25 years, Tories have won a single small, 2-year-long majority, and that was won by promising UKIP voters an EU referendum. 
I can't get over it: they were supposed to WALK this. This was supposed to be their landslide, their great triumph. The seal on Brexit. 
If May's mandate of almost 50% is too weak to negotiate #brexit, surely Varadkar's mandate of 0.001% is way weaker?@morningireland 
Cameron: "The Brexit referendum was the stupidest idea ever"May: "Hold my gin.." 
The arrogance of the Conservatives.Call a Brexit vote you think you'll win: Lose.Call an unwarranted election to boost yourself: Lose. 
Some senior Tories calling for a "softer" Brexit. DUP saying the same, as a "price" for supporting a Con govt. Not clear what that means yet 
I'm not sure about this "Corbyn inspired the young" idea. What I saw was young people furious about Brexit and wanting to kick the Tories. 
But two other things to consider:Yes voters going Tory over BrexitYes voters going Labour for CorbynIt's not simple folks.  
Can't believe endlessly repeating strong and stable, red white and blue Brexit and wanting to hunt foxes again didn't really connect 
#GoodMorning Today, President @KRLS has convened the Executive Council to an extraordinary meeting on the #referendum 
The Conservative Party lost its majority in the British Parliament, days before "Brexit" talks begin 
Here's how the UK election result affects Brexit  
Funny how Labour’s anti-Brexit David Lammy isn’t saying “we can stop this madness” after a democratic vote for his own re-election. 
Once again the @Conservatives call a vote for self-serving party political reasons and it spectacularly backfires. #Brexit #GE17 
Frankly I'll take chaos now over chaos in five years after hard Brexit. Bring it on. 
A Prime Minister calls a Referendum that back fires & fires him. His replacement calls a Snap Election & gets 'hung' out to dry? #UKelection 
David Cameron :'nothing will ever backfire worse than me calling this referendum and having to leave'Theresa May :'Hold my beer' #GE2017 
Whatever this is - it is most definitely a rejection of the May agenda of hard Brexit. That path must now be closed #ElectionDay2017 
I can't see how the Conservatives can govern when they are so profoundly divided over Brexit. They are, in themselves, a coalition of chaos 
Should we consider govt of national unity given Brexit negotiation with a final referendum on deal once concluded on in or out? 
The UK may not have a government by 19 June when Brexit talks are scheduled to begin  
Did Theresa May deliberately throw the election to cause chaos and confusion over Brexit?   I believe she has. 
Take-home:Soft Brexit more likelyHard Brexit less likelyNo-deal Brexit less likelyExtension of 2y period more likely2nd ref more likely 
Is Brexit a historic mistake being administered by idiots? 
#GE2017 huge moment in history of #journalism. The age of 'The Sun wot won it' is over. Pro #Brexit press could not deliver May a majority 
All those 'pound has plummete' stories. It's about 2 and a half cents.Unlike the 30 cents of Brexit. Sheesh. Talk about over-egging it. 
re #BernieWouldHaveWon: No.USA ≠ UK. Bernie ≠ Corbyn. BS would've faced REAL OPPO.#Brexit & #Trump HAPPENED > Shock > Mobilization. 
It amounts to this : May did a Cameron2 - bet the farm on Brexit and lost. 
SNP with IndyRef and plans to break the Union as  devisive Tories/Brexit. If Labour wasn't such a mess in Scotland, Corbyn would now be PM 
If UK goes to EU “look, we are stuck, we need more time” they’ll get it. If UK keeps up its ballistic vocab then they won’t. #brexit #ge17 
Maybe the UK will put Boris [@BorisJohnson ] in charge?  He seems like a cool and smart cat; skilled to glide through Brexit with panache.  
Wary Brussels faces Brexit conundrum after UK election vote shock:  
Since 'the people' voted for cross-party Brexit which excludes Ukip, will Farage et al be branded saboteurs when they inevitably intervene? 
Last General Election I cried because the Tories won, Brexit vote I cried - Hate won. Today I'll cry because Hope won #BBCelection #GE2017 
Staggering. First she wants a second referendum and now she won't accept the result in Richmond Park tonight.  
Almost like using marginal referendum result shouldn't be used to bring back grammar schools, herald far right politics & shut down dissent  
Theresa May - It's either me or Jeremy Corbyn negotiating Brexit.Electorate - You reckon do you? 
BREAKING Brexit delayed? EU Commissioner Gunther Oettinger says Brexit talks might not now start as planned on June 19 #hungparliament 
Labour have fewer seats than the Tories. Teresa May won't resign. The Tories will form a coalition with the DUP. Brexit is still happening. 
Hope no one minds, but now seems the right time to call every MP who backed the Brexit bill, and then the Election decision, a waste of skin 
Is there anything to be said for another referendum? #GE2017#DoubleCheck #DoesBritainReallyWantBrexit 
We now enter Brexit weaker due to the arrogance & incompetence of TM. Echoes of the damage done by Cameron's Brexit gamble. Foibles of ego.. 
As Brexit talks loom, the U.K.'s shock election leaves Theresa May hanging by a thread  
Brilliant! p.s did you all sleep in during Brexit?  
What a mess! The last 2 PMs have put the country into a far weaker position. In a parallel universe there was no referendum, & UK stronger. 
3 times there's been a democratic vote in favour of a new referendum. It's time @RuthDavidsonMSP showed the people some respect. #ScotRef 
"This is a disaster for Theresa May," SNP leader Nicola Sturgeon says  #GE2017 
Barry Gardiner says May will be a 'laughing stock' during Brexit negotiations so we all lose 
What a night! So many things to celebrate! Must be good for all opponents of Hard Brexit. And a triumph for young people,by the sound of it. 
Maybe Theresa May should call a second #Brexit vote, too #GE2017 
I'm sorry I couldn't deliver a hard Brexit. I've been under a lot of stress at work recently and I'm tired.. We can try again in five years. 
Theresa May arrogantly risked Brexit and blew it.She was a failed Home Secretary. She's a failed Prime Minister. We need fresh leadership.  
UK prob has 55 working weeks for #Brexit roughly ... who will negotiate... and when...#mess 
UK: You can't make more of a mess than Brexit.USA: Hold my beer.UK: Oh yeah? FUCKING WATCH THIS SHIT 
Early consequences: 1. No hard Brexit2. June is indeed the end of May3. We develop a whole new conception of what's possible in politics 
There’s no way British can deliver on their side of #Brexit Article 50 timetable now. What does the EU do? Carry on? Or - sensibly - pause? 
From first Tory majority for 18 years to hung parliament. How Theresa May's 'Brexit election' strategy backfired  
'thunderf00t doesnt understand politics. BREXIT..TRUMP'-1 yr later. Trump enroute to impeachment, PM who triggered brexit loses election. Oh 
Feel sad for the UK right now. The opportunity to do something amazing with Brexit is being slowly broken from the enemies outside & within. 
In a snap election SHE called, to test her power and authority to negotiate Brexit. What a rejection! Hung Parliament never even envisaged  
Calls for May to stand down as her Brexit election backfires spectacularly >>  
The producers of #Brexit present: #Therexit - the Reckoning#GE2017 
Astonishing humiliation for May and Tory/Brexit press. Vicious attacks on Corbyn in last few days suggest Sun/Mail sensed a problem (1/2) 
If May had been serious about getting mandate why did she not call snap election before triggering A-50? The Brexit clock has not stopped. 
This is an important point to raise. What the UK wants in the Brexit negotiations does matter, but what the EU wants matters much more.  
My faith in UK & its people was shaken after the referendum vote but now restored. Decent ppl took control, rejected path of hate we were on 
Well, holy shit. This *wasn't* the same as waking up after Brexit and Trump. 
Reminder: Tories didn't have to hold Brexit vote, didn't have to have the fractious leadership contest, didn't have to call the election... 
Northerners that shouted ‘leave’ now show they don't want hard Brexit. Whoever forms next govt must reflect Northern concerns more clearly 
This is silly. No panic -& medium term softer/delayed Brexit is £ positive  
New Scottish independence referendum "dead" after disastrous night for SNP  
so lemmie get this straight. PM who triggered brexit was selected NOT elected.  Now shes called an election and lost..... democracy? 
Kate Hoey and Zac - two Brexit survivors in the Remain metropolis to counter the backlash. 
Westminster's poorer for not having @Molly4Bristol     but overall result must create a rethink for Brexit. 
"It's looking increasingly likely Brexit talks will be delayed," @SvenjaODonnell says  
"It's looking increasingly likely Brexit talks will be delayed," @SvenjaODonnell says  
Theresa May’s call for a snap election to solidify her Brexit hand now appears to be a top-five political blunder of this nascent century. 
Amazing thing about result: it explodes the madcap Tory vision of hard brexit: "no deal better than a bad deal" etc. Kaput, screwed. 1/2 
An ungovernable country cannot manage an unfathomable negotiation. Therefore what the British voted for is: Brexit must be put on hold. 
Labour's Barry Gardiner goes in hard: "Any Tory will now be a laughing stock in Brexit talks. May is a busted flush"  
Streatham MP Chuka Umunna said people have rejected a hard Brexit in his victory speech  
How Theresa May and her team are feeling now is how 48% of us felt the morning after the EU referendum. 
Low information Pokemon chasing Millennials that were at Glastonbury on Brexit have fucked the UK's Brexit negotiating position. Congrats! 
If you're just joining us, Britain has a hung parliament. Here's the story of the night:  
#Delhi #CM #Kejriwal's residence. #Kapil Mishra reaches to hand over his proposal seeking fresh referendum on Delhi CM @htTweets @htdelhi 
BBC Scotland:"SNP have lost their majority Sturgeon should cancel Indyref""Tories have lost their majority May should lead brexit" Ffs 
BOOOOOOM! @CarolineLucas is the closest party leader to Europe. Can she lead Brexit negotiations now? #GE2017 
lmao what the hell's going to be happening with Brexit 
DUP wants soft Brexit and a substantial amount of Tory MPs want hard Brexit, there's no way this doesn't crash and burn immediately 
I'm not a 'shy' Remainer. Brexit is the most stupid, misguided, ill-informed, manipulated, based on false info decision the UK has made. 
The PM asked the country for a huge majority to deliver the hardest hard Brexit. The country said no. This is the end for hard Brexit. (7/7) 
May will be out, they'll have no Brexit mandate, and they will constantly be at risk of the DUP or membership churn ending their majority. 
Theresa May has officially given us a #HungParliament days before Brexit negotiationsNB: She triggered Article 50 THEN called the election 
It's official. After all the promise of a Brexit mandate, we are now faced with a hung parliament. Tories unable to reach 326 seats.  
Brexit, Trump, now this vote. When will Political class realise people are fed up with same old promises/ lies.... 
Her judgement is poor and she clearly cannot now lead us into Brexit negotiations. There is no question that she has got to go. (6/7) 
David Cameron: Wow, my EU Referendum was the greatest political suicide act in a decade.Theresa May: Hold my beer! #GE2017 #BBCElection 
What's a hung parliament and how will it affect Brexit? Here's a quick #GE2017 guide  
HEADLINESIt's a hung parliament.Corbyn says May must go.Salmond out as SNP slump.Clegg loses too.Brexit talk plans in chaos. 
Cameron: I called a completely unnecessary referendum that threw our country in chaos & shattered my reputationMay: Hold my beer#GE2017 
THERESA BLOWS IT: UK heading for HUNG Parliament and chaos over Brexit  #GE2017 
.@MaxFosterCNN: This is the second recent failed gamble by a Conservative PM, the year after David Cameron lost Brexit referendum #GE2017 
Without the Scottish Tories, we'd be looking at a progressive coalition. Anti-Brexit Scotland has saved pro-Brexit Tory government. Bizarre 
Stop the clock. How on earth can Brexit talks start within a fortnight.  
David Cameron: There's no way anybody could possibly top my political self-own with the EU referendum.Theresa May: Hold my beer.#GE2017 
Looks like we might need a time-out in the #Brexit negotiations. Time for everyone to regroup. 
EU did not want #Brexit, but has been prepared to negotiate it since last year. UK wanted it, but is still not ready to negotiate. #GE2017 
Props to @YvetteCooperMP with line of the night:"@theresa_may called a referendum on herself & she lost it"#GE2017 #MakeJuneTheEndOfMay 
Loool I remember waking up to Brexit  and then Donald Trump winning presidency. Proper thought the world was over in that moment 
Okay, back to the technical rules. So, Hung Parliament. You start by calculating Brexit's THAC0 and subtracting its AC before rolling a... 
Brexit sacrificed on the alter of Theresa May's ego. What a bloody mess! Now what? 
Brexit now looks like a Norwegian style deal to me. Hard Brexit has to be history 
Theresa May tried to win a mandate for her destructive hard Brexit and failed to get one. Hope and optimism won the day.  
Without the majority she sought, PM Theresa May will now be unlikely to push through her vision of Brexit unopposed  
Britain may struggle to persuade EU27 to prolong/pause the Article 50 process. Berlin et al have internalised Brexit & want to crack on. 
There is no mandate for hard Brexit so we need a new institutional form and new offer - Norway/Swiss type deal 
Both statements are correct:1) I have a Ph.D. in political science;2) I laugh at headlines like "Hung Parliament Blocks Hard Brexit." 
One thing is true: there is no combination here that could get through a Brexit deal *and* govern for five years.  
May had self-undermined her (Brexit) authority when she shat out debating with Corbyn. The electorate just rubber-stamped her inadequacy.  
To all those who say May made huge mistake in calling election, you're wrong. She needed electoral mandate for hard Brexit & didn't get it. 
Theresa May's authority in Brexit talks destroyed. 
RTI said this last night and I'll say it again after no sleep!The 52% need to be more united than ever.#Brexit 
Oh and #Brexit negotiations start in10 days time .... oh heck ....good luck  
If Theresa May *does* resign this morning, we could be on our third PM since the Brexit vote – which was less than a year ago. #GE2017 
Press the pause button on hard Brexit  
Tories will try to form interim govt with pro Brexit DUP. Labour ready to form minority govt with SNP/Plaid/Green 
BBC officially declares a hung parliament in #GE2017 with Conservatives as biggest party  
Two people that have done their very best to derail Brexit. Thanks a bunch.  
Yvette Cooper: "Theresa May cannot carry on as Prime Minister after losing what was basically a referendum on herself." 
UKIP's Paul Nuttall suffers abysmal defeat despite standing in Brexit stronghold Boston & Skegness #GE2017 
Election result 'a rejection of hard Brexit'  
May could do a deal with the ten MPs from the hard Brexit-supporting Democratic Unionist Party (DUP).  
And in particular, the idea of a "no deal" Brexit has been totally repudiated  
We know Theresa May can't  now negotiate Brexit for Britain because she told us losing majority would destroy her authority---and it has. 
If @Conservatives have any sense, they'll now elect a leader who is genuinely 100% behind #Brexit. For my money, that's David Davis. #GE2017 
Not very enthusiastic about a handful of DUP MP'S shaping the will of 40 million English who by the looks of it don't want hard Brexit. 
Guardiola will read the manifesto for Catalunya's independence referendum on a Sunday #Pep 
Big Q is what will these results mean for Brexit? Will there be a majority in Parliament for leaving the single market? #GE2017 
Hung parliament is now very likely. Hard Brexit will not happen. A major unexpected defeat for Eurosceptics. Second opportunity for UK & EU. 
This is huge. #Brexit secretary @DavidDavisMP concedes Britain will probably stay in customs union and single market. Great news. 
The sudden crisis of Theresa May's leadership offers hope of a different Brexit  
UK young people have turned out to get the selfish-racist-oldies back for Brexit. Nicely done all #GE2017  
The country voted for Brexit, then doesn't give the PM a mandate to execute it. Extraordinary. 
Brexit is still happening, but this means England will now charmingly stammer "terribly sorry" over and over while leaving. 
She stood to get a Brexit mandate and the country said NO. Amazing, really. 
JUST IN: JPMorgan says likelihood of UK needing to request delay in Brexit process has risen substantially.  
Theresa May's leadership — and her "hard Brexit" — look very much in doubt now.  
Wee reminder that Brexit negotiations are now due to start in 10 days.  #GE2017 
MORNING SUMMARY:➤ May likely to resign➤ Corbyn set to stay➤ Brexit on the rocks➤ IndyRef2 cancelled#GE2017 
Very difficult to see how we can negotiate Brexit seriously any time soon. No UK majority for any 1 negotiating strategy  
Prediction: It'll soon be PM Philip Hammond, heading a minority Tory govt (Amber Rudd as Chancellor) pursuing a soft EEA-style Brexit. 
Election Results: Nigel Farage warns over new referendum  
Tories called1 - Scottish independence2 - #Brexit vote3 - #GE2017Which party is causing the instability?#BBCelection#GeneralElection 
Im waiting for a Tory to say #StrongandStable..come on i dare you, I double dare you. Youve left our country weaker as we enter Brexit talks  
Scant sympathy for you, Tories. Despite 17.4m voting Brexit, you anointed a Remainer PM w/ largely Remainer Cabinet.#BroughtItOnYourselves 
Nigel Farage is complaining we won't Hard Brexit now.Sorry, snowflake, but you lost, get over it. 
Also, the case for a destructive, laborious and tedious hard right Brexit has collapsed. Bravo Britain and welcome back to your senses. 
GE doesn't change much for Brexit. Essentials remain same: UK has few cards to play & must accept the terms set by 27 or crash out. @CER_EU 
#BBCelection David Cameron: I'm gonna call a pointless referendum and cause chaosTheresa May: hold my beer....  
Theresa May gambled our #Brexit and lost. Disaster. 
Farage says there may have to be a second referendum. Challenge accepted! #UKtoStay #FightforEurope 
Amazing how the Remainer Metro-Left had vapours when £ dropped on Brexit, but is silent when £ drops on hung Parliament. #ElectionDay2017 
Theresa May has lost any authority/power to lead this country's Brexit negotiations. She has to go. #Ge2017 
Very sad about @nick_clegg. A huge talent and force for good. His insight on Brexit is so needed.  
I reckon @nick_clegg should offer to negotiate #Brexit on the side of the EU. He's the best negotiator we had, and voters couldn't see it. 
Scot #GE2017Scot defo nt getting seat @ Brexit negCorbyn gains hostile Lab MPs SNP should hold nerve til after Brexit shambles 
Theresa May anointed herself Empress of Brexit. Now her authority is shot | Rafael Behr  
It's 2025. We've been through 2 more general elections and Brexit's happened. Amber Rudd's alone in a hall in Hastings, demanding a recount. 
Before GE it was said SNP could only go down from 56. Now we have targets to aim for next time when the full horror of Brexit is clear. 
If Trump was our Brexit, maybe we can be optimistic about what comes next #organize #ForTheMany #TrySocialism 
Today wasn't a great day for the Brexit/MAGA strand uniting May with Trump.  
What the UK election result could mean for Brexit  
So likely outcome? Tories hang onto power; May gone; Corbyn persists; Brexit reduced to mush at best; Scotland goes nowhere. 
318 Tory MPs (likely) + 10 DUP = likely governing arrangement. Not great for Britain or #Brexit but it's basis for passing legislation 
Interesting to think how the cognoscenti were wrong (within 1 year) on:BrexitTrumpCorbyn.... 
The Tories are a poor second in Scotland. And, after make the election a plebiscite on a new referendum, @RuthDividson lost. 
The good news - as far as I can tell - is that no dedicated #Brexit MP who re-stood has lost their seat. #ge2017results 
Prospect of a Tory gov propped up by pro Brexit DUP w/no devolved government has potentially to radically destabilise NI. Crisis beckons  
Ruth Davidson has said a second independence referendum is now "dead" #ElectionDay2017  
Scotland who voted to remain in EU are giving votes to dem dirty Tories who want hard Brexit. WTF are u doing u sellouts? #ElectionDay2017 
What's a hung parliament and how will it affect Brexit? Here's a quick #GE2017 guide  
DUP manifesto on Brexit. Warm words, few red lines.  
The British public has swung from #Brexit anti open-borders to endorsing #Corbyn who calls Islamic terrorists Hamas & Hizbollah his friends 
Surely we are seeing a wholesale national condemnation of May's Brexit approach here. Things must now change. 
If you're still awake & a Remainer, time to stop celebrating. The "Soft Brexit" option (stay in single market etc) is NOT on the EU table. 
In rejecting Mrs May have we not also rejected her hard Brexit? Let's see if the Brexiteers who shouted about democracy now observe it 
Looks like UK has rejected the idea of hard Brexit, Scots against notion of 2nd independence poll. UK opts for stability, not on May's terms 
.@RuthDavidsonMSP says a second independence referendum in Scotland "is dead" after the #GE2017 results #bbcelection 
Brexit now in real trouble. At minimum, second referendum very possible. Negotiations a total nightmare for UK 3/n 
Large turnout by young adults. Higher turnout in Remain areas. Muddies and confuses the 'Brexit mandate'. 
Theresa May: -backs Remain-loses referendum-rules out election-triggers A50-calls election-loses majorityI'm about STABILITY guys  
Actually this is all true. Maybe the fishermen and farmers of Moray need to suffer under a hard brexit first before they learn! 
@moneillsf so so proud of you - you got Bobby's seat back - you are the anti Brexit MP that your constituency needs & deserves  
Bigots United - At this moment the most likely outcome is an alliance between the Tory Brexit Bigots and the Protest  
DUP are already outlining terms for soft Brexit as price for propping up enfeebled Tories #2017Election 
PM Theresa May hoped to strengthen her hand in Brexit talks with #GE2017 -- but it looks like the plan backfired  
Strikes me this would be 2 consecutive Tory gambits that massively failed: Cameron's Brexit referendum & May's snap election. #UKelections 
That's it, off to bed. Laughing. Huge problems ahead for Brexit but, for now, this is a joyous, hilarious self-inflicted political wound. 
My thread on how the Article 50 process grinds on, regardless of the result.Brexit by timetable continues.  
.@richardquest: Theresa May has "chutzpah" to say the UK needs "period of stability" after she called snap election ahead of Brexit #GE2017 
So what's our answer to Trump and Brexit and other challenges? I think part of it lives at Parihaka.  
Two strongest factors behind Con/Lab swing we're seeing so far are the Brexit divide and poor health:  
Brexit thrown into doubt as Theresa May's election gamble backfires  
Hard Brexit is dead. If May is ousted then nation won't have appetite for this again. If she stays she's a lame duck who must compromise. 
SNP leader Nicola Sturgeon's push for a second Scottish independence referendum appears to be backfiring #GE2017  
"The hard UKIP-style Brexit Theresa May adopted is simply no longer viable. They're going have to accommodate the 48%"Lib Dems' Vince Cable  
Sad to see this. She campaigned in referendum alongside then leader of a racist party. She's not Labour.  
Scottish independence now hinges on what happens with Brexit. #GE2017 
If this election was about Brexit then must we not conclude that Britain has rejected Mrs Mays hard Brexit? 
"Brexit means Brexit" needs something of a re-think before those negotiations start in 10 days. Can EU press pause? 
Article 50 had been triggered and we were on our way. May has put all this in jeopardy. Even David Davis is now making Brexit concessions. 
JUST IN: Leader of Brexit-backing UKIP fails to win a seat in the most pro-Brexit constituency in the UK #GE2017 
Vince Cable talks profound sense about impossibility of Hard Brexit . Good to have him back 
Vince Cable says hard Brexit 'simply no long a viable option'. #GE2107 
Whatever else, Theresa May's Brexit timetable is clearly no longer viable  
there will not be another independence referendum for the foreseeable future. the current project is fatally wounded. 
May's fundamental error was I think to choose the most right-wing, anti-immigration UKIP Brexit, rather than trying to genuinely unify. 
UKIP voters who changed and voted for labour has ruined any chance of a successful Brexit.You should be ashamed 
The world has changed, Brexit, Trump, #GE2017, but thank god...in Northern Ireland we still know there are more prods than taigs. 
Can we do our Brexit moment over again too? 
So we'll get new Tory leadership election, second General Election and more than likely a second EU Referendum 
@billybragg: WTF? Theresa May says Tories will guarantee stability. This from the party who gave us first Brexit and now a hung parliament 
Cameron holds unnecessary referendum and loses his job.May holds unnecessary general election and could now lose her job.Geniuses. 
Wales has voted against a hard & destructive Brexit. A clear message & a new mandate has been made. #GE2017 Join us:  
Post Brexit: "David Cameron is the most incompetent PM in living memory."Theresa May: "Hold my tea."#GE2017 #UKelection 
May "period of stability" promise - how? Deal with DUP? Brexit talks cannot begin on this basis 
Tories wrestling with what happens when you advocate for something (Brexit) that is wrong and have no program other than attacking the Left 
The Conservatives, who created the madness of Brexit, and the current gimpery, should be banned from ever uttering the word "stability" 
"Theresa May's election loss attributed to #Brexit and her support of Donald Trump" #TrumpRussia #FlipThe6th #gapol  
.Brexit Lost"Tories would lose mandate to leave EU single market if they lose majority, suggests David Davis". 
Theresa May says we need a period of stability.I repeat: Brexit negotiations start on June 19th and UK may not have a government. #GE2017 
Theresa May and her crack team of Brexit negotiators #GE2017 
The British election results show Jeremy Corbyn's popularity but is also, ironically, a remorse backlash for the Brexit referendum. 
Corbyn is unthinkable, no? He's Bernie Sanders without the curmudgeonly charm. But Trump was unthinkable. Brexit was unthinkable. Odd times. 
Brexit is over Toby before it happened  
Whatever the final result, tonight restores some faith in the process. After Brexit and Trump, young people turned up today. Bravo. #GE2017 
Bet Theresa May is glad she spent that night in focusing on Brexit. #GE2017 
Tories would lose mandate to leave single market if they lose majority, Brexit Secretary suggests  
"Politics has changed... people have had quite enough," Labour's Jeremy Corbyn says  #GE2017 
BBC confirm: Corbyn played #Brexit exactly right. Dugdale must resign #GE17  
My oh my. It's reverse Brexit...  
And the UK has lost from the HoC one of the sanest voices on Brexit. What a mess of an election.  
2/ What they're overlooking is that there doesn't seem to be much appetite for a "soft Brexit" within the EU. 
Congratulations to @RossThomsonMSP who backed Brexit and has been elected as the MP for Aberdeen South 
Tory arch-Remainer Ben Gummer booted in Ipswich.Also no loss: said Brexit vote made him "physically sick”.Good riddance.#ElectionDay2017 
If the young had turned out to vote in the Referendum as they have in this election, wouldn't #Remain have won? Worth pondering. #GE2017 
1/ Plenty or Remainers cock-hoop-tonight, convinced the #GE2017 result means we're heading for a "soft Brexit". 
Hard Brexit is deadMaybe Brexit is dead 
This is the first time in many years I've felt optimistic about Britain. After the referendum and 2015 things look on the up. 
Ben Gummer, tipped to be next Brexit secretary, is gone. That was the YouGov prediction that made me think poll was wrong. But they got it. 
I think one error many made was in assuming UKIP/Brexit converted people to Tories, when it was home for anti-EU, anti-Tory Labourites.  
Story beginning to emergeScotland: revenge for indyref2London: revenge for BrexitEngland: revenge for austerity?#2017Election 
.Sky Reports - The NEXT Tory Brexit Secretary has LOST his seat - Ben Gummer loses by just under 1000 Remain votesSAD.....Ahem - 
Labour gained Peterborough. This is extraordinary as a real Brexit heartland 
.@DavidDavisMP says election all about getting mandate for Brexit - but very difficult to see vote as it stands as any kind of mandate 
David Davis, Brexit Secretary: "Well I... well... nobody said we'd get an increased majority. I certainly didn't" 
Losing people like Nick who actually understand the EU, and what Brexit might entail, is a big blow - especially in a hung parliament. 
I hope @nick_clegg remains involved as a vocal opponent of Brexit & continues to speak out courageously & knowledgeably. 
Canterbury Cons claim there's been strong student movement on social media, 8,000 new voter registrations this year & anti-Brexit reaction. 
Nick Clegg has been a voice of sanity throughout Brexit and I hope he doesn't leave front-line politics. 
David Davis saying UK cannot now leave the single market – no appetite for it in the country. Remain has won the second referendum! 
Clegg defeated. Now maybe he will stop lecturing electorate about their stupidity on #Brexit or will he call for a 2nd vote #GE2017 
Agreed. Scotland would have had a fierce voice on Brexit calling for constant accountability. @AngusRobertson provided such #GE2017 
Former UKIP leader Nigel Farage says that if Jeremy Corbyn forms a government there could be a second Brexit referendum #GE2017 
Nick Clegg losing puts paid to this 'revenge of the remainers' nonsense. Labour have promised to deliver on #Brexit #GE2017 
Nick Clegg out. Regret that to be honest. Give him a job negotiating Brexit 
Not a popular view, but Nick Clegg has been a good MP and talks a lot of sense on Brexit. A loss to parliament. 
Clegg was a big asset to the Brexit debate. Hope he keeps speaking up #GE2017 
If you suggested a year ago that the power vacuum brought on by Brexit would strengthen Corbyn, you were called a lunatic. Just sayin' 
Is the Tory bloodbath in London an anti-Brexit vote? Which leads to this Q: If Corbyn forms a government, is Brexit still happening? 
@Sargon_of_Akkad from "Very Brexit Problems"  
Scotland votes overwhelmingly to remain.Scotland then votes in the hard Brexit Tories to gain a majority. Get utterly fucked, Scotland. 
If you want "fucked up" in this election..Scotland, which voted to remain, is voting Tories who want hard Brexit.Work that out! 
2) Labour has done better than expected in Leave areas because it promised to honour Brexit vote, & also quit single market 
Brexit now a total mess, because 1) @theresa_may has failed to get her mandate for her Brexit "vision" (if that is right word); and 
Anyone have any idea what Brexit means? Asking for a friend. 
David Davis says election was about buying two or three years for longer Brexit. Belated admission of reality. 
The only possible outcome of the general election is a change of tone on Brexit: Guarantees to EU citizens now  
Pretty clear hard Brexit now off table. Lab gains + Scottish Tory MPs being elected all more pro-Remain than English ones they're losing 
"Post Brexit Britain will need to put money into theatre" excellent article Nick Hytner @LondonTheatreCo 
Farage acknowledges prospect of 2nd referendum ("looking down barrel of")Thank you @LibDems & @nick_clegg for keeping this prospect alive. 
Trying to get my head around the concept that Remain-voting Scotland might deliver enough Tory MPs for May to deliver Hard Brexit. 
Picking a Remainer to lead a Brexit party in a Brexit election was a huge error.  
In 24 hours Trump maybe on way to impeachment and Corbyn maybe on way to PM. Whatever next? Brexit on way out?  
Never mind 'will Theresa May be the PM to see through Brexit?' She'll be lucky to be the PM to see through breakfast.#GE2017 
A Level question in 2050Who made the bigger miscalculation - David Cameron (2016) or Theresa May (2017)? Discuss with reference to #Brexit 
Theresa May is toast, says Farage on @itvnews. Predicts a Corbyn coalition and a second EU referendum 
It’s going to be hilarious when Boris Johnson stakes his government on another Brexit referendum next year. 
Nigel Farage now desperately trying to pretend that this vote somehow vindicates hard Brexit. Hilariously he is attacking Theresa May. 
Farmers will lose out from Brexit & tories would sell fishing industry for 30 pieces of silver again, but yeah, vote tory guys  
Good for British future that democratic politics can deliver custard pie  in the face of smug triumphalism. Also Brexit debate wide open now 
Brexit may be canceled it looks like. There is a serious snapback to the white trash movement in EU 
FARAGE: If Brexit in trouble I'd have no choice but to come back. 
At a very minimum this means a softer Brexit. 
A second Scottish referendum seems to be slowly dying... 
Feeling things are going our way.  Brexit now the issue!! 
Fam I'll never forget waking up to the brexit madness 
Brexit in trouble, Trump's obstruction detailed. #AGoodDay 
Ken Clarke holds onto seat. I'm sure he'll making his feelings about the Conservative campaign heard... particularly where Brexit concerned 
A few hours ago it seemed the next generation was going to be sacrificed on the altar of May's Hard Brexit. Young voters had other ideas. 
We have 22 months left to negotiate Brexit, and there is a significant probability we're about to not have a prime minister again. 
More fundamentally, you wonder what the hell any of this means for the sort of Brexit we are hirpling into. 
consensus hardening that there will be no majority in the Commons for leaving the single market #Brexit 
I switched over to ITV. Do you know there are women who can comment on economics and Brexit? You wouldn't from watching BBC. Refreshing. 
I thought that 30 years of Tory civil war over Europe had come to an end after last year's Brexit vote. Turned out it was just on a gap year 
2017 continues to be an excellent year for Brexit commentators. 
BREAKING. Theresa May says she’s always been for Remain and thinks we should have a second referendum.#Election2017 
The irony of UKIP voters voting Labour and losing Brexit. #GE2017 
Tonight is defeat for Mays interpretation of Brexit. Single market up for grabs again 
Revenge of the Remainers means there is clearly no mandate now for May's Hard Brexit. 
Nigel Farage suggests 2nd EU referendum now a possibility. Says would be  forced to return to politics if hard #Brexit threatened #GE2017 
Even if she ends up with a small majority this is a disaster for May, confusing for politics of Brexit and awful for future of moderate left 
May's campaign:Strong & Stable-You're not Brexit means Brexit-It doesn't Trust me-We don't  
Can we have a second referendum given that May has triggered article 50? #GeneralElections2017 
"Brexit in jeopardy," says U.K. Independence leader, as his party appears shut out of Parliament  
Farage has slammed May and has already mentioned a second referendum! Where am I? Who is this? WHAT ARE LOVE?? #GE2017 
and now Farage says might be looking "down the barrel of a 2d referendum".And actually Farage quite sober. 
I don't think he wants Brexit. I think he just wants to be fighting for it forever. 
Farage thinks Brexit voters voted for somebody less Brexit than May because May wasn't Brexit enough. Go to bed. 
Theresa May anointed herself Empress of Brexit. Now her authority is shot | Rafael Behr  
Nigel Farage on the BBC conceding Brexit now in "some trouble". 
BREAKING: Nigel Farage vows to return to U.K. politics and fail to get elected for an eighth time if Brexit looks to be under threat. 
We are living in quite a world when Nigel Farage of all people is raising the prospect of a second referendum #GE2017 
We may well be "looking down the barrel of a second referendum" says Farage.Ye Gods. 
Astonishing. Liberal London is taking its revenge for Brexit.  
Farage absolutely does not want to come back to frontline politics.But I know he never trusted May to deliver Brexit. 
Theresa May has got out of being the person who goes down in history as the one who took us through Brexit. Great plan. Well executed. 
Guess who's back: Farage says he would have "absolutely no choice" but to return to active politics if this result means Brexit under threat 
Nigel Farage: tells BBC he will have 'absolutely no choice' but to come back and lose more elections if Brexit derailed  
Calls snap election. Hides from country. Proves to be poorest campaigner in memory. Brexit talks in 11 days. Has May taken one for Remain? 
Nigel Farage if Corbyn becomes Prime Minister: "Brexit is some trouble" #GE2017 
Farage: id have absolutely no choice but to come back into uk politics if brexit in trouble. 
Nigel Farage says "Brexit is in some trouble." 
"Amber Rudd" demanding a third recount when she didn't want a second referendum....#ExitPoll #Hastings #ElectionDay2017 #BBCelection 
."Theresa May anointed HERSELF Empress of Brexit. Now her authority is shot"#GE2017 
Hard Brexit dead; May on life support, democracy alive and kicking - a great thing 
Another telling fact from the post-vote poll: Brexit the most important issue for Tories (& Lib Dems); but NHS & austerity for Labour voters  
BRITAIN: Brexit is most self-inflicted wound a country can makeUSA: Hold my beerTHERESA MAY: Hold my pint, I'll take it from here#GE2017 
Right said that Brexit forecast Trump. So, um, guys, what does Corbyn forecast? 
How the political agenda was set online in this election: Fox hunting was talked about more than Brexit on Facebook.  
the global Brexit-Trump right-wing populist wave not looking very impressive today compared to six months ago 
I want to go to sleep, but remembering how I felt waking up to brexit and Trump is enough to put me off... #BBCelection #ElectionDay2017 
Brexit has to be delayed? Probably. 
The evening is feeling better and better.  Cd hard Brexit be over? 
Surely Brexit does have to be delayed. Who would negotiate with us when they don't know who will be in government? 
Brexit has been a disaster. Austerity has failed.The politics of prejudice and division is rejected.Time for change. #ElectionResults 
RIP Hard Brexit. 
US: Our election was totally more surprising than your referendum. UK: Hold my pint mate. 
This was an information campaign much like Brexit, where vulnerable voters were bombarded with fake info about the impact on healthcare etc. 
Looks like the third act of Brexit and Trump is Corbyn #GE2017 
9. And A50 can only be paused at expense of weakening UK's overall Brexit negotiating position, if EU27 agree at all.What a mess./ends 
Europe - pls don't worry. Everything is absolutely fine, but there's been a minor hiccup, may need a small extension on the Brexit deadline  
Get Lord Buckethead in charge of Brexit negotiations  
If the weak and wobbly Prime Minister can't negotiate a majority with a 20pt lead, how can she be trusted to negotiate Brexit? 
8.  May doing that is perhaps most irresponsible political decision. At least Cameron's referendum was (at law) non-binding. A50 is binding. 
If Theresa May does this well in the Brexit negotiations, the UK will be a province of Luxembourg by 2020. 
Tory MPs. If May gets back, her advisers must go. The Cabinet must take charge.  Her Brexit plan will be overhauled.  
My thesis that nationalist movements (Brexit) are almost always followed by socialist successes (Corbyn) might gain another data point. 
The anti-EU party that terrified the Conservatives and was instrumental in forcing Brexit looks like a spent force  
Postpone Brexit until more old people are dead and more young people are born 
It’s time for a constitutional convention to look at our democracy and promote public involvement in Brexit #GE2017 
Cameron calls a referendum he knows he can't lose. Career over. May calls an election she knows can't lose. Career over. 
It does look a lot like the British people have rejected Theresa May's hard and destructive Brexit vision for the country. 
How reckless to trigger A50 before holding an election. Has left the country in even more of a mess than the referendum did 
Imagine if you'd bet against the wisdom - Brexit, Trump, May. You might even have enough to pay your taxes under Corbyn #topical #despairing 
Brussels already stated that if there is a new PM, they are prepared to delay start of #Brexit negotiations#ge2017 
Scared to go to sleep. Last two times I went to sleep confident in victory I woke up to Brexit & Trump! #Corbynforthewin 
Whatever happens. I want Brexit. Hard Brexit. Real Brexit. Not this opt in SM, ECHR, FoM bullshit. We voted to leave! #GE2017 
Andrew Marr is now discussing how a Labour/SNP government might hold #Brexit talks. 
The way Brexit hit me that morning yeah   
the BBC is talking about how Labour might negotiate Brexit what world do I live in this week and please don't wake me up 
My number one priority in #GE2017 is a Govt/PM who will deliver a genuine Brexit. How can that happen now? 
Brexit brushback in London.  
This is not a Remain thing - Labour could not have held north, take Broxtowe, unless it guaranteed a Brexit with social justice 
I'd say London is a bit angry about the that whole #brexit thingy 
Hung parliament could jeopardise Brexit timetable  
If the Conservatives hadn’t taken such a hard line approach to Brexit, would the crucial Remainers have stayed on side? #GE2017 
Very bad for Conservatives if this goes, shouldn't be close. James Wharton, the original sponsor of EU referendum legislation  
Anti-Brexit backlash takes out, er, nick clegg and Anna soubry... 
I reckon: Grey vote angry with TM + young inspired by Corbyn + UKIP split Tory/Lab + Remainers v hard Brexit + wobbly May = Tory disaster. 
Really disappointing if @nick_clegg loses his seat since been such a coherent voice on #Brexit. Ditto @Anna_Soubry 
Gina Miller: 'Hard Brexit has swung this election' #GE2017 
Lib Dem President @SalBrinton says any coalition with the Conservatives or Labour would be impossible due to both parties’ stance on Brexit  
Never thought I would say this, but Tsipras liquidated his stupid referendum in 48 hours and went on to win an election; May ran with it... 
Either we have a grand coalition or Brexit negotiations impossible until country sorts itself out. Meanwhile time running out. 
Tiny violin is out. Your hard Brexit insanity has boomeranged right back at you. 
It's certainly a disaster for the disaster that is Brexit  
The key thing about this election. Hard #Brexit has been rejected. That is good news for everyone in this country 
Maybe it was a Brexit election after all. #GE2017 
If Lab unseats Clegg, it'll redefine Pyrrhic victory: he's the only MP who understands Brexit and can navigate us out of it #BBCelection 
OMG - this is HUGE news!  Feels like Brexit and Trump caused a boomerang shift all over!   
Labour should reward the young people voting for them by promising a new European referendum after the next election. In a few months. 
Well, since that referendum one, anyway.  
It was indeed a second referendum on Brexit, even if other side didn't fight it  
In a rare moment, I agree with you - or a cross party institution to negotiate Brexit  
Goodbye second Scottish referendum, hello second Euro referendum? A boy can hope. 
This all suggests we are going to get a softer Brexit. This election is the prune-juice to our constipated digestive tract 
Make no bones about it: this is an absolute disaster for the Conservative Party and Brexit so far. 
A picture from tonight's event in #Duhok city in support of #Kurdistan referendum for independence.  
So Robert, will you ask the questions?What will Brexit cost us?Which Brexit (if any) have a mandate?Why call GE AFTER A50 trigger? 
it's super telling that for so many liberal pundits Labour's fates were absolutely a referendum on leftism until they suddenly weren't 
Labour predicted to comfortably hold #StokeNorth which is interesting given it was Labour's most Brexit seat 
Bye bye Theresa? Bye bye Brexit? At least I've something in common with the PM now. No man date. 
Pound plunges amid fears over Brexit delays  
Striking that this looks as if this is a lot more of a Brexit election than people thought:   
Election 2017, the day that stalled Brexit, the day young people stood up and voted, and the day the new grammars plan died? I hope so. 
The word is Kensington is going labour- a decisive vote against the hard brexit incumbent. Even if held by tiny majority Hard Brexit is dead 
Tory majority likely to be too small to push through hard Brexit. Discuss 
May/Cameron made a big presumption: that government should negotiate Brexit. Now we need a cross-party institution to do it otherwise chaos 
We need a cross party institution to negotiate Brexit - Select Committee scrutinised by Commons.  
Theresa May's Brexit mandate just got destroyed  
Could this be the first time that Paul Nuttall is right when he says #brexit now in jeopardy?  
Britain walking into Brexit negotiations in 11 days.  
Putting together my post-vote poll on why people voted as they did. Tories voted on Brexit & best PM; others on motives & promises  
Our election guru John Curtice on how Brexit is shaping the character of the #GE2017 result  #BBCelection 
Remember - EU team for Brexit negotiations been in place and ready since before new year.  This is what UK is against.  UK still unready. 
Ken Clarke on "idiot talk" about hard Brexit & soft Brexit and need for cross party discussions  #BBCelection #GE2017 
One Tory MP said: "Tell me, which is sovereign, the referendum or this new parliament?" 
It is key why Tories thinks this has gone so wrong. If Brexit backlash, Boris not the answer. If vote against charisma free politics, he is 
Folks cheering UKIP's demise. Aye, their vote dropped but they got what they wanted: migrant hate, Brexit, isolationism. #everysilverlining 
.@fpleitgenCNN: Post-#GE2017, "the strength in Brexit negotiations seems to be with the EU; it's uncertain where Britain will stand"  
Brexit means Brexit.  
Globalists pushed ISIS to attack soft targets in UK.#BrExit talks in 11 days.PM May gets blame>hung parliament. 
One thing seems clear already: next senior politician who says country is "coming together" over Brexit is talking bollocks. 
7) goodness only knows what this means either for the timetable for Brexit or the nature of Brexit 
May's Brexit policy now will be ripped up - whatever 
You know those Brexit talks in 11 days? Ya think asking for a bit more time to work out what the electorate meant by this is a good idea? 
In one fell swoop, Theresa May's mandate for a hard Brexit has been destroyed  
#GE2017 #Brexit 1) Q to be asked repeatedlyTory Gov-Why did you trigger A50 with tight 2 year limit THEN call a GE to waste more time? 
f*ckin around with brexit for 12 months cost her a lot. 
Whoever ends up as Britain's new prime minister faces a daunting tenure, with Brexit talks topping the to-do list  
now's a good time to bring back my mainplayers of Brexit as Monster Factory creations  
What a weird night. It didn't turn out to be a Brexit election and yet it looks like Remainers are winning it for Labour 
BREXIT really was UK self harm propelled by massive Tory miscalculation and racist UKIP opportunism 
The exit poll is broadly right. Theresa May is finished. So is the hard Brexit. Another election soon. And who knows what else. 
Election results could mean that Brexit is over, says Ukip's Paul Nuttall  
Suspect confusing swings around country are legacy of Brexit splits - North v South, old v young, graduates v non graduates 
Twice now the TORIES have put party before country - first the Referendum and then this unnecessary  election. It may have a cost.... 
Brexit butt-hurt continues one year later.  
Ed Balls: Theresa May not 'credible' to lead Brexit talks after #ExitPoll #GE2017 
Hard Brexit on life support. 
If no party has clear majority, start of face to face negotiations with EU (planned for 19 June) may have to be pushed back #GE2017 #Brexit 
For Theresa...BREXIT MEANS EXIT 
May is finished - her Brexit negotiating position is f***ed. First of several updates   
Presumably if all these younger people who've voted today had voted in the referendum, Remain would have won. #Election2017 
Lib Dems saying Nick Clegg is in trouble. "In voting against Brexit young people may remove one of strongest anti Brexit voices" 
WATCH | @Nigel_Farage: "Whatever happens in the next few hours, the Conservative party needs a leader who believes in Brexit." #GE2017 
In two weeks, Brexit negotiations begin. #2017Election 
It's over for the Brexit  
Regardless of this result folks we stand together for Brexit right? 
FARAGE: If we believe the polls, Brexit could be under bit of a threat. 
WATCH | IRA crony Gerry Adams calls Corbyn a man of principle, and wants to stop Brexit.This vile man could crown the next Prime Minister  
Tonight's drinking game:- drink when you hear "exit poll"- "Brexit"- "uncertain"- when @theJeremyVine looks like he's alone in a disco 
Is Hard Brexit, is Brexit, being stopped in its tracks... The people have voted on @theresa_may's #Brexit mandate poll, and it ain't pretty 
Yes, the pound plunged after the exit poll - but Corbyn could never hurt our economy more than a hard Brexit  
UK PM Theresa May called elections to get more support for Brexit. Seems to have backfired as left-wing Corbyn won huge 
NB. If in 9 days time no one commands confidence of Commons, Tory government continues but under "purdah" rules so no Brexit negotiations 
Just imagine if Corbyn had brought this level of energy and enthusiasm to, you know, the EU referendum. 
Just last month Tories were gaining 100s of council seats. Awful campaign. Theresa May put #Brexit at risk. Arrogant refusal to even debate 
Here is veteran Cabinet minister Ken Clarke absolutely tearing apart Theresa May's election Brexit strategy - it doesn't exist, he says.  
Here's my thread on what a Hung Parliament would mean for Brexit (tl;dr - it's good for Remain).  
On @LBC, @Nigel_Farage ---  If we believe the Exit polls, "#Brexit is under a bit of threat"  
So refreshing to hear @KenClarkeMP: frank,sensible stuff. #Brexit: "I hope we never hold referendums on anything again" #GE2017 #BBCelection 
Does #ge2017 hail- end of @theresa_may- end of Hard Brexit- end of Brexit@EUflagmafia @GuyVerhofstadt @MichelBarnier 
A great thing. And this is because of the Brexit referendum. Serious choices get people seriously interested.  
.@KenClarkeMP speaking abt #Brexit: 'I hope England never has a referendum again'Not the UK, EnglandSee, #Wales? We are ignored 
Just hope when the dust settles on all this monkey business the outcome is a second referendum. #ElectionDay 
It'll be the Tory vote being split to Lib Dems. Those bankers don't like Brexit. 
'Brexit is a dead man walking' after the disastrous 'Brexit election' has destroyed @Number10gov 
I would be perfectly happy with Ken Clarke leading a post May Tory govt going into Brexit negotiations. Just sayin' 
“I don’t know in any detail what Brexit policy we’re supposed to pursue” says Kenneth Clarke. Too right! #ge17 
'I never liked the idea of a referendum. I hope we never hold any more referendums on anything ever again' - classic Ken Clarke #GE2017 
Ken Clarke calls for more cross-party discussion on Brexit, and less "exchanging slogans and trying to score points off each other". 
Ken Clarke: "Perhaps a little more cross party discussion, particularly on Brexit, and a little less shouting slogans." 
UK election looks interesting. Supposedly strong Brexit hand looks weak. Not clear whether UK will climb out of the crazy food hole it's in. 
On Brexit night I said that G Osborne would become *the* voice of the liberal centre right and I was exactly right. 
Ken Clarke calling for more cross-party discussion on Brexit, 'time for our politics to change a little' #bbcnews 
Ken Clarke says need cross party discussions on Brexit not exchanging slogans. Time for politics to change. Wise words. 
The British people are speaking - do you hear them, Putin and Mercer ? They are saying NO BREXIT 
Goodnight I'm praying for anything but a Tory majority but knowing how Brexit and 2015 went overnight imma be disappointed 
My prediction.Another election this year and a Tory leader committed to a clean Brexit and immigration control opposing Corbyn 
Brexit effect. Shocking loss for Tories  
If the exit poll is right, this election may have just stopped Brexit  
It looks as though Theresa May has, at best, a small majority. Would that make for a harder or softer Brexit?  
Just about to go on to UTV. Too early 4 predictions. Brexit is big issue coming out of this. May sought mandate 4 hard Brexit and failed  
Exchange of the night so far between Ann Widdecombe and David Mitchell on Brexit negotiations  
Lots of residents who work in the City who are seriously angry about Brexit and who don't want to move to Frankfurt.... 
The referendum has caused absolute chaos - we now contemplate minority/hung. Thanks Cameron #GE2017 
Brexit: @RealDMitchell Vs Widicombe  
.@Nigel_Farage on LBC now: "I think the Tory party needs a leader who believes in Brexit" #BritainDecides #GE2017 
the tory leadership contest is going to be hilarious. 11 days to brexit negotiation but i imagine the membership will *demand* a vote 
A DUP/Tory coalition govt could, actually, be FANTASTIC for brexitBring it on!DUP r UKIP-esque PATRIOTS. We can depend on them #ExitPoll 
Theresa May's authority shattered. We need a cross-party institution tonnegotoate Brexit  
Some people just don't have it.Theresa May's poor campaign sure wasted a strong winning hand.We CANNOT afford such poor #Brexit choices!  
From the Scottish referendum to the London Mayorality, to Brexit to now - the negative Crosby campaigns have delivered less and less 
Terrific to see 80% of voters voting for parties promising in their manifestos to deliver Brexit... 
I think everyone in the media should make arrogant-sounding predictions on the UK election cause that worked so well with Brexit and Trump. 
"If I was PM I would say its shit idea, and I'm not bloody doing it" David Mitchell, talking about Brexit. Class. #AlternativeElectionNight 
I want David Dimbleby to do the Brexit negotiations. He's taking no prisoners #GE17 
Those who use the phrase "soft brexit" mean staying in single market, controlled by ECJ and pay EU etc ie Not Brexit at all not even soft 
We just don't want Brexit ... is that clear yet ? 
So - did the Ukippers decide Brexit is job done - but my hospital/school/social care is in trouble so cue Labour? 
Big swing for Labour in Swindon. No one knows anything. Not just about UKIP to Tories, it's also about Brexit. 
We should hold a referendum to remove Swindon from the uk 
Young people realised after #Brexit their vote is important and wasn't going to let it go to waste during this #GE2017 
#GE2017: Labour holds Sunderland Central, but the Conservatives have increased their vote share. @marcusaroberts says it's the Brexit effect  
Paul Nuttall has just said if the polls are right, May has put brexit in jeopardy. Let's hope we've just saved the UK from itself. Hope Pray  
Basically, you're arguing over the odds on the deck quoits tournament on the Titanic while steaming full-tilt into the Brexit iceberg. 
If hung parliament, hope smaller parties make revisiting Brexit a precondition of their joining/supporting either of the two major parties. 
First results have sent me to bed in a tizz. Last three times this happened, we awoke to Brexit, Trump and Tory majority  Here's hoping... 
I went to bed last year at this time of the night and woke up with Brexit. Hmmm.  
Drinking game here. Shots for any Labour seat, Coalition Of Chaos, Magic Money Tree, Brexit Means Brexit, Strong & Stable. Already wasted. 
Quote of the day: Voter at Fife polling place. "Is this where I can vote in  favour of another divisive Independence Referendum?" #VoteSNP 
At least unlike the referendum I won't find out the results by some drunk dude waking us up at 7am ranting around the Glastonbury campsite! 
Anyone else too afraid 2go 2 bed. I remember the #brexit referendum goin fine went 2bed woke up & was like wha da bumbaclart. #Election2017 
Brexit Back in Play?My next guest says " its a possible scenario" 
Anyone still saying " Brexit Means Brexit" after all this madness is utterly ridiculous 
For what it's worth, any coalition is probably a good thing right now. Provides cover for softer #Brexit which most MPs want. #Election2017 
Meanwhile in the EUMacronMerkelMay#GE2017 #GeneralElection #Brexit #BrexitShambles 
Tory lady on the telly says "Brexit means Brexit" and its like watching newsreel from another era. 
within those cities you have seats full of students, seats with strong ukip/brexit elements, seats racially mixed. swing will vary massively 
May didn't have to push a hard Brexit nor did she need to hold a general election. The hubris of these people might be their end #GE2017 
#GED17 trends - In a nutshell:Tories higher than expected in Brexit seats.Labour higher than expected in Remain seats. 
"Brexit means Brexit" DRINK 
Tories already furiously trying to assert on TV that this was in fact NOT an election about #Brexit 
Strong, stable and bloody difficult woman on her way to the Brexit negotiations..#BBCelection 
The great Priti Patel on BBC news now. "Theresa May has been very clear on her plan for Brexit. There were her 12 points." She means these.  
It is down to Ukip to get BREXIT not the Tories Some have short memories 
Well done the young! You voted and you changed things. Stuffed apathy; now let's stuff Brexit... 
This isn't an election about Brexit it's about austerity. Let's see #GE2017 
Whatever the result, if anyone thinks the country will roll over & accept a 'soft' Brexit or no Brexit, think again! Not going to happen. 
Theresa May purposely tried to torpedo BREXIT. How can it be read any other way? There was zero cause for early elections 
There never was a majority for #Brexit. The truth is, no matter what the outcome of this election, Brexit can & must be stopped or reversed.  
May called this election to gain a mandate for Brexit negotiations. She failed catastrophically, and now everyone is mad at the Tories. 
BBC'S  Katya Adler suggests EU has been transparent about BREXIT? Really? you could have fooled me - dictatorial - yes! 
Live footage of next several months in Westminster, Brexit negotiations. #GE2107 
Wise Labour owl says this is the young turning out to oppose Brexit a year late 
What is the bloody point of the Lib Dems if they don't even want to work with Labour to avoid Hard Brexit? Utterly ridiculous 
It's ok folks - tomorrow Bobby will come out of the shower and none of 2016 will have happened. No Trump, Brexit, May.  
Gina Miller, lead claimant for the Brexit legal challenge, says a hung parliament would "bring some sort of sanity" to Brexit negotiations.  
If the DUP think they can deliver hard Brexit, they live in la-la land. Mrs. May's position is politically impossible. She has no mandate. 
NUTTALL: If exit poll true, May has put Brexit in jeopardy. 
Dimbelby nails it. EU knows how to do Brexit but UK doesn’t. Too right. #ge17 
Ironically, if the exit poll is even close, we might not even have a government when Brexit negotiations begin on June 19th 
At this rate, Gareth Southgate may have to lead the Brexit negotiations in 11 days. 
Ok, I've emailed Brussels with the new Brexit negotiating team @NickCohen4 @IanDunt @WomaninHavana and @JolyonMaugham. Let the talks begin. 
It's potentially a liberal coalition vs a Tory minority gvt. You'd be mad to pass up your chance to shape brexit/save nhs/human rights etc 
The right-wing press has won every election for decades including the EU referendum. Is this their first major setback in modern times? 
The Mail,Sun,Express and Telegraph will say retreat from Hard Brexit a betrayal. Big lesson today.They speak for the right not the country 
For 'no #Brexit'.  
Progressives alliance would be a whole different story for LD! Negotiate - insist on 2nd referendum on the deal. Make that the clincher x 
I KNOW I could Google this but it's more fun to ask you: what (if anything) can happen with Brexit with a hung parliament or Labour win?? 
#UPDATE British PM poised to win vote but lose majority as Brexit looms   
Will Theresa May be leading the UK's Brexit negotiations team in just over a week? #GE2017 
Many of us do not want ANY brexit. Will campaign to STOP it 
I realise this will upset many but I hope the next election in six months has a party who says that brexit is a disaster. They'd get my vote 
If we end up with a hung parliament, how about a proper referendum on proportional representation? #Election2017 
Exit polls showing no clear winner in Thursday’s U.K. election raise big questions about Brexit  
Hope that #ExitPoll is wrong, if only to wipe the smirks off the faces of the universally smug, lefty, anti-Brexit media.#ElectionDay2017 
Remember the Referendum night when the first few results came in and we thought Remain had it in the bag? Yeah. #ge17 
Can we have a second referendum please Can we have a second referendum please Can we have a second referendum please Can we have a seco.. 
Talked to @HannahRLynch1 @RudawEnglish on political developments, independence referendum, role of the diaspora & KRG policy in this regard.  
Good news on the Brexit nonsense if May's gamble has failed embarrassingly. Bad news on the Brexit nonsense if hard Brexiter Corbyn stays. 
Brexit negotiations in 11 days.  
Rejoice! ( to coin a phrase).The long overdue death of UKIP. Another reason why hard Brexit dead. What a bunch of charlatans. 
If these exit polls are correct the possibility of a hard Brexit is dead and gone... 
If the Scottish referendum and Brexit results nights are anything to go by, I won't be sleeping much :P *constantly checks news* 
That's really not a big swing in Brexit heartland. Good.  
On @ITV: @PCollinsTimes says Tories have left UK with no government 11 days before Brexit talks & "that is an appalling thing to have done" 
Farron ruled out a coalition with either party, but Labour, who takes a softer line on Brexit, is a more natural ally 
Boris got us a Brexit he didn't believe in and will lose an election in order to become Tory Leader.Hapless genius.#ExitPoll 
Theresa May has picked a fight she wrongly believed she'd win so easily. What a grave error of judgment! And she wanted to lead #Brexit ??!! 
They got fucked so bad by the coalition and ran on a staunch anti-Brexit platform. It's hard to see them propping up a rightwing government.  
#ExitPoll#GE2017Theresa May has always been a #remainerUK Voters did not trust her to deliver #Brexit#UKIP is more needed than ever 
there's no majority for a destructive Brexit (again assuming exit poll correct) 
Whatever the result, the next government will almost certainly be weaker than the last one. Which is v bad for Brexit negotiations. #GE2017 
Things I have called incorrectly since 2015: Brexit; Trump; Tory landslide; George Osborne's journalism career; the British weather 
Minister for Brexit: St Boniface 
I hope I wake up to good news tomorrow, unlike the times I woke up and saw that Trump had won & Brexit was confirmed #GeneralElection17 
We will keep fighting against an extreme #Brexit. It's not the end, it's the beginning. #GE2017 Join us at  
Nigel we need you back leading the Party 
disappointing waking up to brexit, disappointing waking up to trump being president, lets hope we wake up to good news- a labour government 
Whatever happens May is most definitely toast. Sun & Mail can drop the Brexit Boudicca piss. Need abacus to count ways she's fucked this up. 
Whilst an exit poll of 30,000 plus is far more than normal polls, there could well be many hidden 'shy' Conservative voters, as with Brexit 
I wonder if history will look back on the Brexit referendum as the perfect example of all the reasons not to hold referendums. 
If UK exit polls are right and there is a hung parliament, there is a much greater chance of Brexit not happening after all. Fingers crossed 
@LesleyRiddoch hits nail on head A parachute re brexit for Scotland 
#Duhok initiates a campaign to support #Kurdistan independence in the 25 September referendum  
I'm afraid to to bed now. Bad things happen when I sleep. #trump #brexit #2017Election pic.twitter.com/Jiz374ZPZ1 
Brexit negotiations begin in eleven days time! 
We still don't have a complete picture, but pretty safe to say @theresa_may has no mandate to pursue a extreme hard Brexit 
Whatever happens, May doesn't have the mandate she wanted, pretty much everyone regrets Brexit, and UKIP is confined to shithistory. 
May is a brilliant strategist who PLANNED to lose her majority so she wouldn't take the blame for failed Brexit negotiations. Genius! 
Still don't believe the exit polls. We had the EU referendum where we thought it was all okay until later that night... 
Brexit negotiations kick off in 11 days. It's probably fair to say that we arent very well prepared 
Sinn Fein could find themselves in a fascinating position. Sit it out and let DUP/Con coalition and hard Brexit or take seats to help Corbyn 
May likely to go, another election on the horizon.Domestic chaos in face of Brexit negotiations.Strong and stable it ain't. 
UKIP Needs the Return of Nigel Farage So he can lead us into a Brexit Victory  
Hey @MichelBarnier - now’s a good time to take a quick holiday. #Brexit negotiations are not starting in 11 days! #GE17 
New Scottish Tory Mps will not support hard Brexit. So even if tory headcount rises from exit poll forecast the message is: no hard Brexit 
within a year, tories:- called for brexit vote, believing they'd win by a mile- called for early election, believing they'd win by a mile 
If only people had felt this empowered about Brexit... 
If Brexit is the most important UK issue since the 2nd World War, why not have a Government of National Unity to deal with it? Eh? 
So, when I first heard May was calling a June election, I was like, "the gits, they're ruining Glastonbury again. After Brexit last time." 
#GE2017 latest:- Hung parliament forecast- May could lose majority- Pound slides 1.6% 
It is becoming ever clearer that this country was completely fucked by that stupid bloody referendum 
Gleeful Labour sources pointing out Theresa May herself said that if she loses 6 seats it will be Jeremy Corbyn negotiating Brexit 
"Brexit means Brexit.""Shut up, May, you weren't even elected.""Oh yeah? Watch this."  
Just did interview with Deutschlandfunk. All anyone in Berlin wants to know is: what does this mean for Brexit? 
I now have the hat-trick of election shocks:In London for Brexit.In NY for Trump.In London for DisMay.#MeNerves #GE2017 
Brexit? Hung Parliament? Potential secession of Scotland? Kind of feels like British democracy is just checking things off its bucket list. 
Brexit negotiations begin in 11 days. Looks like a Costanza is still the best option on the table -  
Whatever happens, even worst case, May is finished and Tories in chaos.Brexit talks will be a joke as government is humiliated 
The U.K. appears to be learning from our mistakes here in the U.S. (and theirs in Brexit).Plus Trump is toxic: 
Big questions now: Will May be pressured to resign? How will this affect Brexit talks? 
Maybe #ge2017 and #Brexit ref will together teach the UK Conservatives the value of having a strategy alongside tactics. 
Comment of night so far on  @itvnews - 'Is this the revenge of the young for #Brexit on older generation?' #2017Election 
This election is a rejection of May and hard Brexit. A vote for one to go and the other to be revisited. 
Too late now Nigel,the constant bashing of Theresa May from yourself & UKIP didn't help,If Exit polls r correct expect a soft Brexit,Cheers! 
If it's not a Tory landslide, and it looks like it's not a Tory landslide, May's gone, and #Brexit isn't a done deal. Massive#BBCelection 
It's becoming a pattern. Respective UK prime minister shoots him/herself in the foot just before summer comes around. #Brexit #GE2017 
"First of all they called a referendum and lost, now they've called an election and might lose!" #GE2017 
Exit poll looking like the revenge of the young and the beginning of the end of Brexit! #brexitrevenge 
May's arrogance & failed leadership over Muslim immigration & terrorism cost the greater #Brexit movement dearly. That's truth to power. 
Brexit taught the young that voting matters. That's a good thing, irrespective of the result. 
Maybe time for a national government all BREXIT supporting MPs of every colour stand together with David DAVIS as leader 
Nice line from @MatthewParris3  - this is the revenge of the young for Brexit. 
To sum up: May loses even if she wins a majority, Corby wins even if he loses the election. And Brexit now more confusing than ever. 
David Cameron: I've just owned myself so hard with that referendum, biggest self own of a generation Theresa May: HOLD MY GIN 
I'm not counting on anything. If I see this at breakfast tomorrow morning then of course it will be another step towards busting #brexit  
May calling an election and losing her majority is the biggest Tory disaster since Cameron called a referendum, lost and resigned  
If we end up with a hung parliament, Theresa May should call a snap election in order to strengthen her hand for Brexit negotiations. 
The exit poll does "not bode well" for Brexit negotiations #ElectionDay2017  
If the exit polls are right Brexit is done best news ever 
So- let's look forward to-tory leadership election- second Brexit referendum- another general election- Scottish referendum#ExitPoll 
Meanwhile in Brussels, Donald Tusk lights a massive cigar... #GE2017 #Tories #Brexit #ExitPoll 
Breaking NewsPound at 7 wk lowTheresa May coming up short in exit pollsWhat means for your portfolio & BrexitMaking Money @FoxBusiness 
If we're going to make Brexit work, we need ALL the clever people. Country first, parties 2nd now. Unleash Starmer. He is formidable 
Before yiz get too excited remember that at this stage of  recent counts everyone thought Brexit was doomed and Hilary was a dead cert. 
I don't like it. I went to bed when it looked like a sure fire Remain and woke up with Brexit, same when Trump became president... #ExitPoll 
Theresa May has suffered a huge setback in #GE2017. Follow our LIVE coverage here on Twitter  
Our best hope for a soft #Brexit and #Leveson2 and a clean up of our offshore kleptocratic element depends on this #GE2017 result 
Still, calling that referendum and this election. They're not very good at reading the mood, these Tories. 
This was supposed to be an easy win for PM May who was seeking a mandate for Brexit negotiations. 
Can we just start again? New parties, all MPs sacked, different voting system, what happened in the referendum stays in 2016... 
Just a reminder the Brexit negotiations start week Monday, yes that's even less preparation time than  for a Lions tour! #Election2017 
If I was Tories I'd now ask for a cross party negotiation team for Brexit. The country needs @Keir_Starmer fighting our corner. 
UK: Google 'Shy Tory Effect'. It tells you why #May might get a majority tonight. #Brexit #UkElections2017 
If this exit poll is right the Brexit result must be back in play. Simply unbelievable.  #GE2017 
David Cameron goes for Brexit and then... May then goes for this snap and then... Maybe stop calling for elections you don't need to? 
Exit poll looks too good to be true: clear rejection of divisive Tory politics of hate - public spending cuts. No mandate for hard Brexit! 
Just time for a quick look at plans for the Brexit negotiations.  
If Exit Poll close, mood of insurgency goes on Brexit, Trump, Corbyn 
Only the British public could vote to leave the EU and then go into Brexit negotiations with a hung parliament, genius! #ExitPoll 
If #GE2017 exit poll is right, UK goes into #Brexit negs politically weakened, fragmented. The reverse of May's election calculation. 
If UK gets a hung parliament it'll probably be cos young people who got burnt not voting on Brexit wanted their voice heard this time. 
"Hello, Nicola? About that referendum you wanted.. "Theresa May, Nicola Sturgeon #ExitPoll #ElectionDay2017 #hungparliament 
If this exit poll is right, or even close, there's no chance of #Brexit negotiations starting in just over a week as planned? #GE2017 
For those that want a 2nd referendum; if it's a repeat result, will they want a 3rd? And so on and so on until the result is one they want? 
“There’s no question” that May has weakened her Brexit negotiating position with this election, says @anneapplebaum. 
If this is right, who do Tories turn to: David Davis or Boris? Do they look for a PM to handle Brexit, or a vote-winner for a 2nd election? 
Whatever happens now there is no parliamentary majority or political legitimacy for hard Brexit. Game on. 
If exit poll correct EU will wring its hands. Wants #Brexit done + dusted now. Hung parliament means confusion, delay #GE2017 
Whatever final result this is the electorate's verdict on needless election, a terrible Tory campaign, Corbyn's passion and Brexit #ge2017 
So far as I see it Britain got to the brink of the Brexit abyss with May and decided it wanted to live #GE2017 
Brexit is a game where hundreds of Englishmen chase economic benefits and in the end the Germans always win. 
Exit poll makes formal/informal coalitions unworkable:Con+LD: majority +6 (but Brexit chaos)Lab+LD+SNP+PC: 9 short of majority #GE2017 
"Pound falls sharply against the dollar..."First image: short time scaleSecond image: shows drop after #Brexit vote.Context matters.  
Macron is about to win a big mandate. Merkel is heading for a fourth win. Which side of the Brexit negotiations is strong and stable? 
ANOTHER REFERENDUM PLEASE THANK YOU. 
Sinn Fein could hold balance of power. Will they really let the Tories in with hard Brexit and hard border at stake? 
This is what happens when you take the public for mugs. #Exitpoll #Brexit 
From Brexit thru calling this election, thru refusing to meet the people, the guiding error is entitlement, presumption of invincibility 
For the referendum I went to bed with good news then woke up in a nightmare alternative universe...and now I'm terrified of going to sleep 
Four horrifying words... hung parliament Brexit negotiations. #GE2017 
If exit poll is correct this is without doubt a massive rejection of Brexit and all it entails. 
Brexiter: "Safe to say we are in panic mode. 20 seat majority could still mean clean Brexit. Under that and we are fucked." 
Lib Dem sources claim position on coalition (not interested) hasn't changed. BUT one suggests a second EU referendum could swing a deal ... 
*David Cameron after calling the Brexit poll* : "Well I fucked that one up"Theresa May: "Hold my beer"#UKElection2017 #UKelection 
Has the country just voted to reverse the referendum result? there is definitely no maj for hard Brexit 
#GE2017 | BBC poll: Tories lose majority; @theresa_may quits Friday; soft Brexit; Election after EU negotiations; and bad for @PutinRF_Eng 
Doesnt seem to be an massive endorsement of hard Brexit.#exitpoll 
So Britain seems to have enough of:-Hard Brexit-More austerity-NHS cuts-Tearing up of Human Rights 
Conservatives: "Let's do a Brexit vote." Conservatives: "Oops."Conservatives: "Let's call a snap election." Conservatives: "Oops." 
Whatever the true result, the Conservative party needs a leader that believes in Brexit. 
Theresa May will now head into Brexit talks with a likely weakened position after losing her majority. 
Scenes in the @BreitbartLondon office. @RaheemKassam and @oliver_lane drowning their #Brexit sorrows. #GE2017 
CARRIE (V/O): "Parliament was hung — and so was Samantha's new British lover"SAMANTHA: "My Brexit is on fire!" 
So excited about the closeness of the exit polls but too early to get carried away but just like Brexit night Sunderland & Newcastle crucial 
I'm  but expecting the balls up that is Brexit to be blamed on hung parliament and not just a shit original decision 
I agree Nigel, and if Labour hadn't backed the wrong side in the Scottish referendum, 50 seats there could have sealed it  
Cameron only offered brexit vote to get a majority in last election.  He never seriously thought it would win. Now Cons may lose majority. 
Coalition of chaos rocking up to Brexit negotiations like  
If the #ExitPoll is right:Tories 314LD / Lab / SNP 314Therefore - a second EU referendum is a distinct possibility.#GeneralElection 
If you have snatched #Brexit from me UK, I won't forgive you for it. 
UK election: Here's how Brexit could be affected if exit poll prediction is correct  
Trump roasted in the Senate & the Brexit-loving Tories savaged by British voters.Today's the day when 2017 took revenge on 2016. 
The pound's fall tonight is nowhere near as sheer as the plunge on the night of the EU referendum. Then again, the night is still young... 
Remember this was the Brexit election. If exit poll correct, this looks like a resounding no to reckless departure from EU 
As someone who thought Brexit was a galactically stupid idea, my reaction to this exit poll:  
I feel that the case for entrusting the governance of the UK - & the Brexit negotiations - to the corpse of St Cuthbert is now irrefutable 
Ming Campbell talking down prospect of any kind of progressive alliance - differences over Brexit btw them and Labour too great 
Pound is now down 1.7% against dollar after #GE2017 exit poll forecasts hung parliament  
why don't they call another vote and undo brexit 
I love this summary by David Dimbleby on the #ExitPoll#GeneralElection17 #Brexit #brexitshambles 
Cameron loses a referendum he didn't need to hold now May effectively loses an election she didn't need to hold. 
When you ignore Northern Irish matters throughout Brexit and then your political survival hinges on its parties. #ge2017 
KILLER Fact below: exit polls don't lie (much).  This may have big implications for Brexit but - I repeat - it's early  
Theresa May has made the biggest political mistake since all the way back to 2015 when David Cameron called the Brexit Referendum 
If this is true you can kiss hard Brexit goodbye. #GeneralElection17 
When the Brexit clock is ticking, you blow £143000000 of taxpayer money on a snap election after years of austerity, & get #HungParliament 
It is a wondrous moment when, after ignoring Northern Irish issues throughout Brexit, #GE2017 might hang on the Ulster parties. 
Pound plunging. But it will go up again when the markets work out this makes hard Brexit less likely 
If exit poll is right, will give credence to conspiracy theories that Remainer May deliberately threw election to stop Brexit.#Election2017 
So if this was a second Brexit referendum, does that mean we won't leave the EU after all? 
Barnier's June 19 start for Brexit talks might be a bit optimistic at this rate 
What Brexit, Trump and #GeneralElection17 teaches us is that none of us have a clue what is going on and predictions are useless. Useless. 
If this will mean another election for the UK, it might just as well hold a second EU referendum along with it. 
Theresa May can't deliver Brexit if she can't deliver a government... #GE2017 
Team Juncker thought a big Tory win was the only way to get a Brexit deal through. Catastrophic for both sides. 
Corbyn seems like a good guy but I'm praying for a conservative majority otherwise brexit will be mess & the £ will drop  
Memo to the EU: Will you put Brexit on hold please? We haven't got a clue what we're doing now 
If the exit polls are to be believed, Brexit is in jeopardy, and the economy and even English identity could be completely fucked. 
I'm dreaming of a soft Brexit. 
This jubilation so early is terrifyingly familiar to Brexit. Same time of night, same happiness. Let's settle. 
Among other things, this completely, completely screws the Brexit negotiations 
Cameron holds referendum he didn't need to hold. Loses power.May held election she didn't need. Loses control. 
This is best of all worlds. Corbyn won't be in charge but May's far right hard Brexit approach has been repudiated by the people 
If the exit poll is correct, you can kiss any clean Brexit goodbye. 
Brexit u-turn 
You can't unscramble scrambled eggs.#Brexit#Mayday 
The bigger issue was that May couldn't pointedly rebuke Trump because of the need to woo him post-Brexit  
I think exit poll is flattering Labour in small towns. But if right, May has to resign - she has squandered a majority. Brexit - shambles 
Hung Parliament negotiating Brexit is like  
Argh but I went to bed on Brexit night feeling cautiously upbeat & checked the news in bed at 5am & lay awake in horror. Not that again pls 
Hard Brexit? No thanks. 
Can we have a second referendum on Brexit now? #GE2017 
Just to spell it out: this is a complete and utter disaster for Theresa May, Brexit and any hope of Labour regaining its sanity. #ExitPoll 
A disastrous election result for Theresa #May. Clear indication that any hard Brexit has no legitimacy in the UK. #GeneralElection17 #GE2017 
Brexit ....what Brexit !?! 
Astonishing exit polls @uklabour performing better than I could have hoped hopefully it is vote against the hated Tories Brexit & austerity 
Looks like I'm staying up all night. After 2015 GE, Brexit & Trump, I can't face going to bed hopeful & waking up in despair AGAIN. 
If the exit polls are right, Theresa May has blown it, she gambled and lost. She's not fit to do Brexit. RESIGN NOW  
EVERYBODY SHUT UP AND DON'T JINX REMEMBER BREXIT 
If this exit poll is correct, @Conservatives have had one of their worst nights ever. Hung parliament, Brexit at risk and Marxists at large. 
I am only a year in the UK and I have lived a referendum, snap elections, hung parliament. Feels like Balkan politics 101. #GE2017 
Exit poll. Hung parliament. Total rejection of hard brexit. Bye bye Theresa May. 
Well. If this exit poll is true Parliament can and will play a big role in stopping a hard Brexit. 
May: I want the British public to strengthen my hand for the Brexit negotiations. British public: Nah. We're good. #Election2017 
Looking forward to going to bed and waking up to a fucking heartbreaking disaster, just like the Brexit and Trump votes. It's tradition! 
Look at what happened to the pound when a hung parliament was forecast in #GE2017  
Fully prepared to wake up to "May Is primeminister". Waking up unexpectedly to Trump and Brexit on the phone screen was traumatic & awful 
Brexit means Exit. 
If exit poll is correct, hung parliament, May's majority down 17 from before, her gamble a massive fail, chaos for Brexit, FUN TIMES FOR ALL 
So, the exit poll, usually reliable, suggests Labour has gained 34 seats. Brexit and Trump were nothing by comparison. Blackest swan yet. 
UK: General election exit poll, wins for anti-Brexit LDEM (ALDE). PM #May (CON-ECR) loses majority. #GE2017 
Could be a hung Parliament! Dream result for stopping Brexit. 
Please, please, please, please. Do not let this be another EU referendum night. Let the exit poll be correct. I just want it to be true. 
If the exit poll is true, anti-Brexit parties hold the balance of power. 
Exit poll. Blimey. Although remember they got Brexit VERY wrong.Con - 314Lab - 266LD - 14SNP - 34OTH - 22= no overall majority. 
BREAKING: Conservatives to be largest party but no majority, #GE2017 exit poll suggests  
'Brexit and the Border in the Mind': my new journal article with Prof Arthur Aughey was published today .... thanks @BritJPIR 
UK elections: May holding on to lead as British voters weigh terror, Brexit and immigration   
BREAKING: Citing exp w successful Brexit (1534!) & heads-will-roll leadership style, Henry VIII offers to accept role of PM #ElectionDay2017 
Only 15 minutes left to #VoteConservative for a strong economy, strong leadership, stable government and the best Brexit deal.  
"Oh Lord Dimbleby. Give us this day the Exit Poll we desire that we shalt not be truly gutted like with Brexit and Trump" #ElectionDay2017 
My cartoon - #Brexit in a nutshell #GeneralElection17 
So ... In half an hour the polls close, and we'll see if the attempt to completely ignore Brexit during this election has worked. #Vote2017 
Could the UK election stop Brexit? Unlikely – but anything less than a clear win for Theresa May could disrupt it.  
“A Conservative win plunges us into years of Brexit chaos, a Labour win brings me a higher tax bill” — British voter  
Half an hour to vote. Don't make me send @JamieHolePunch round dressed as Bad Santa, to explain Brexit using voodoo dolls and a staple gun. 
Polls close at 10pm, so #VoteConservative now for a strong economy, the best Brexit deal and a brighter future!  
US says it supports a unified Iraq in response to Kurdistan referendum  
Remember if you are in the queue before 10pm you can still vote! Have your say to stop extreme Brexit #TurnUp #GE2017 
If you voted for Brexit, suck it up! #ElectionDay2017 pic.twitter.com/jTr6bFIYGv 
Love it, the fight to stop #Brexit cannot stop, in fact it must accelerate before we lose too many of our wonderful EU citizens 
Travelled all over England and I haven't seen any crop circles yet. Where did all the aliens go? Did they BREXIT already?  
VIDEO: Referendum date and question to be announced on Friday  
To get the best Brexit deal and a stronger Britain, #VoteConservative. Polls close at 10pm 
Me before a Tory government versus me after 7 years of a Tory government and Brexit vote.  
The meanness of Britain's new politics: How Brexit damaged democracy 
Less than an hour to go folks! Please #VoteConservative to keep our economy strong and get the best possible deal from Brexit. Thank you! 
LESS THAN ONE HOUR LEFT TO VOTE. Let's achieve our clean Brexit, deliver the changes we deserve, and make our country prosperous. #GE2017 
ONLY ONE HOUR LEFT to vote for a strong economy, the best Brexit deal & secure a brighter future. #VoteConservative before polls close at 10 
Pound Volatility Spikes To Post-Brexit Highs Ahead Of UK Election Results  
If @timfarron and @nick_clegg fall tonight I'll have a champagne breakfast!#GE2017 #Brexit 
people say "can u trust labour to negotiate brexit?" i say: john mcdonnell is singlehandedly keeping jaeger in business, germany loves him 
OK. This is getting serious now. Just over 1 hour left to vote. Don't leave it until the last minute to vote for Brexit., #GE2017 
Corbyn had 6 weeks to campaign & slashed the Tory lead by 20 points according to most polls. Imagine if he had 6 months like Brexit/Trump. 
After Brexit & Trump surprises, hard to shake PG Wodehouse: 'Unseen in the background, fate was quietly slipping lead into the boxing glove' 
8 great reasons to #VoteConservative today - from getting the best Brexit deal to more housing and more funding for schools and health.  
For the sake of Britain, Brexit and the free world, let's hope the Conservatives win tonight. 
#UKElection2017 | Britain votes in shadow of terror, looming #Brexit talks #UK #UKGE2017 
Just been to vote. Imagine my surprise when there was a guy outside with a billboard stating "say no to tory brexit" arrrrgghhhh 
Yippee. A repeat of that horrific early morning feeling post-Referendum and post-Trump is just hours away. 
Nah he was on about brexit 
Polling station staff reporting huge turnout "bigger than Brexit" where I've just voted. This isn't over. GO VOTE. #ElectionDay2017 
Extraordinary that KRG independence referendum will take place whilst parliament suspended, surely priority should be getting house in order 
Democracy didn't end on 24 June 2016. MPs should vote on the final deal. #VoteLibDem to resist a hard Brexit. @sarahjolney1 #RichmondPark  
Ireland complains of "black propaganda" in Brexit bank fight  
Why should I #VoteLabour? Where Jeremy Corbyn stands on the NHS, Brexit, immigration and other key issues #GE2017 
where's the women? just the men participate the #Referendum ? this photo yesterday, when Masoud barzani decided for #KurdistanReferendum 
The night of the Brexit vote I went to bed hoping people wouldn't be stupid enough to vote leaveI'm going to feel the same way tonight 
How #brexit, and the general election, look from Washington. They're not impressed.  
Through Brexit we can create a new global Britain and better society at home. Vote @Conservatives this evening. 
woken up to a tory government, brexit and donald trump in the past 2 years and i really cba waking up to 5 more years of the tories tomorrow 
Meanwhile, the EU collapse every Brexit Dunning-Kruger has told you about gathers pace...Or maybe not. 
Never been more depressed to vote: my vote won't change Brexit which will shaft living standards + lead to an exodus of talent and friends 
Whether you voted Leave or Remain you deserve a chance to check the final terms of the Brexit deal. #VoteLibDem: your future, your choice. 
Just 2 hours left to back @theresa_may & her team to get the best Brexit deal for you & your family. Make sure you #VoteConservative by 10pm 
Greg Dyke:If Corbyn was the next prime minister, I think he would get a better deal on Brexit,cause he's not Theresa 
There's lots of "who do you want negotiating Brexit" from Theresa. Who gives a fuck. Did Anne Boleyn ask who was swinging her axe? 
For a strong economy, the best Brexit deal and Theresa May as Prime Minister #VoteConservative. Polls are open until 10pm. Every vote counts 
LOL BREXIT means we leave the European Union we ain't and can't go and form another continent 
From Australia to Chile and from Brazil to Colombia, our friends in Australasia and South America stand with us as we Brexit. 
Calling all #Remain voters. 2 hours and 15 mins left. Your chance to fight this hard, disastrous #brexit. Make your vote count. #VoteLibDem 
From Sri Lanka to Oman and from Dubai to Jordan, our friends in south Asia and the Middle East stand with us as we Brexit. 
UK economy falls to bottom of EU growth league. Better get a move on and get a GOOD #Brexit deal after #GE2017!  
When whichever govt (doesn't matter which) is unable to deliver on their promises because of Brexit, be sure to hold them to account. 
Don’t be fooled by the U.K. election: There’s nothing democratic about #Brexit 
Brace yourselves, we're about to make the worst decision since brexit. 
This is probably the most important, and most depressing, analysis of Brexit you can read:  
if y'all have done a Brexit again I'm gonna be so pissed 
Just lent my @UKIP vote to the @Conservatives. Brexit first. This is our ONLY chance!  
Every vote counts to strengthen Theresa May's hand in the Brexit negotiations. Polls are open until 10pm. #VoteConservative 
A hard Brexit is the British economy's death warrant. Don't sign it #VoteLibDem  #ge2017 
Less than 3 hours to vote for our future. Vote for the NHS. Vote for equality. Vote for an opposition to hard Brexit. #VoteLibDem #GE2017 
I want to be able to say to my kids, Brexit, not in my name.  
Antwerp ready to welcome Brexit refugees  via @AbrahamVillanus 
Still plenty of time to vote Wales! 3 hours to go. Back @theresa_may and your local @WelshConserv candidate for the best Brexit deal #GE2017 
Liberal Democrats will offer second Brexit referendum  
RETWEET to show you back Theresa May to get the best Brexit deal & secure a brighter future. Polls are open until 10pm. #VoteConservative 
Only a few more hours until we find out who will lead us to slaughter on the Brexit beaches. Exciting stuff. 
You wouldn't sign a contract without reading the terms would you? Only @LibDems will let you check the #Brexit terms. #VoteLibDem #GE2017 
I'm telling everybody, I am the only lifelong candidate ALWAYS for #Brexit VOTE #UKIP before 10pm TODAY 
We have GEs because people have a democratic right to change their minds. What's so different about Brexit that people can't change mind?  
Blind old lady at the polling station just asked, "Which box means Brexit?" Huge cheer went up. We all dabbed. 
The only Brexit we'd ever get from May is one that's good for the City & no-one else. I urge UKIP supporters 2 bear this in mind when voting 
All im gona say is this. Most ppl hated Corbin when he wanted brexit. Now all of them who hated him are voting FOR him.  
who would you vote for ?? #GeneralElection #GeneralElection17 #Vote2017 @divaliciousuk @bustycookie @laceystarrxxx ? #HardBrexxxit #Brexit pic.twitter.com/t8sFChFc6Z 
The U.K.-election campaign has suited the Labour leader, Jeremy Corbyn, far more than the Brexit campaign ever did:  
What I said. For a lot of swing voters, fox hunting more important than Brexit  
Corbyn backed Tory Hard Brexit. That's not broadening the debate within the country. It's acquiescencing to the Tories.  
She is not the one to negotiate a good Brexit. 
Please @churchnw6 encourage those undecided to look at @BestForBritain #tacticalvotewebsite  to stop extreme Brexit  
Before you vote today, remember what a Tory hard #Brexit would mean #LeaveWatch 
I'm dreaming of a hung parliament, it's clear we get Brexit & unsustainable promises either way. LibDems/Greens/SNP hold them to account. 
#VoteConservative for a strong economy, the best Brexit deal and Theresa May as Prime Minister. Polls are open until 10pm.  
ex miner here,couldn't vote for Corbyn..Brexit.. 
If Northerners (mostly Muslims) truly want the Igbos (Biafra: Christians) out of their region, they should support #Biafra referendum now. 
Exit polls!Impact of Brexit, if it happens, will be a mass exodus from UK of 'able & capable' of making new lives 
Initial findings:-Facebook still a (growing) left-wing echo chamber-Fox hunting bigger than Brexit-Tories nowhere 
Theresa May's Brexit vision is what would put your security at risk   
Voting closes at 10pm..counts.5yrs-NHS,economy,cuts, poverty, Brexit & so much more.Use ur vote! #electionday2017 
We saw what happened with Brexit, we saw what's going on across the pond.Your vote matters-voting closes at 10pm, use it. #vote2017 
Brexit has managed to do what two civil wars and numerous conflicts didn't - it has undermined the spirit, values and cohesion of the UK.  
I think you would have got the same odds for a Pakistan /Sri Lanka double this last 2 days as you would have got for Trump & Brexit ... !! 
Good grief - given the cataclysm of Brexit you could have had the decency to abstain from voting 
Superb article. Key point for future is May disguised in election that what's coming "isn't what Brexit voters thought they were choosing"  
In only 7 weeks, according to YouGov, Theresa May has lost a Tory lead of over 11 million eligible voters. Do you trust her with brexit? 
The prospect of Brexit woke a sleeping giant. Brexit will re-invigorate it. The UK is back on the world stage: partner, trader, influencer. pic.twitter.com/tQeocYfFmU 
BBC issues instructions to staff in the event that they fail to block Brexit in #GE2017 
#VoteConservative today for a strong economy, strong leadership, stable government and the best Brexit deal. Polls are open until 10pm.  
'You will let the EU walk all over us' Andrew Neil SAVAGES 'desperate' Brexit deal tactics  
I deeply regret my Leave vote in last year's EU referendum and am proud to have just voted for the @LibDems 
I don't want best Brexit deal,I want no BrexitI want my cosmopolitan, tolerant country backI want my NHS to stay publicI don't want you 
Brexit, Russian interference with the help of some major UK media employers  
David Davis: Brexit is the defining issue of our age. The choice today to lead us through it is May or Corbyn  
Leavers please note; #Brexit Britain now has the worst performing economy in the EU #GE2017 #GeneralElection #Vote2017 #Election2017 
The majority of voters support a progressive alliance against Conservatives, poll says. Stop Extreme #Brexit.  
Remain sceptical but I know a lot of Labour folk who'd happily say Tally Ho! to Farage's Brexit ally  
"Brexit means Brexit. Best deal for Britain. Strong and stable. It has been the lobotomisation of democracy."  
From the Gambia to Ghana, from Kenya to South Africa, our Commonwealth colleagues and friends in Africa stand with the UK as we Brexit. 
Tomorrow #GE2017 is over, but the fight to #StopBrexit continues. We will fight, and grow stronger & the reality of #Brexit will be our ally 
#VoteConservative today to secure our #BREXIT for #BRITAIN! #Polls are open until 10pm! #BBC #SKY #ITV #UK #RT #NEWS #TORY #GE2017 #UKIP 
#VoteConservative today for the best Brexit deal for Britain. Polls are open until 10pm.  
So they endorse voting Tory and then publish an article saying what a terrible campaign they ran and what a disaster Brexit will be? Idiots. 
Nigel Farage spotted jetting out of the country on day of Brexit election  via @psbook 
Today's election in the U.K. was supposed to be Brexit. But something changed, @IanDunt writes 
9 out of 10 voters reject May's claim election is about Brexit and say it's about public services  
I agree with every word of this article. It will take us 50 years to recover from a so-called 'hard' Brexit.  
#Kurdistan leaders sets date for Independence Referendum on #25/09/17 ,this is 4 #stabilisation better relations regionally &Internationally 
8 great reasons to #VoteConservative today - from getting the best Brexit deal to more housing and more funding for schools and health.  
#GE2017 shouldn't be all about #Brexit. I spoke to @AnimalAid & @BDCH re forgotten animal issues during the election  
UK will suffer for #Brexit. Tories opened the door & caused this - don't reward them with your vote. #DontVoteTory #GeneralElection #GE2017 
Not all older people are anti EU. Most older people I know like myself dread the outcome of Brexit and will continue to fight against it 
@LibDems have ruled out a coalition with May or Corbyn, but every Lib Dem MP will be a voice in parliament against Hard Brexit #votelibdem 
There are just six hours left to vote Labour.✓ Reject a second independence referendum.✓ Investment in schools and local services.#GE2017 
We demand a referendum NOW. 9 days to go. Rally for repeal. Dame street. 3pm run by the coalition to @repealeight 
Britain begins voting with terrorism, Brexit in mind  pic.twitter.com/FZY0o2VYTu 
My new essay for @The_Rumpus, on racism, Brexit, Trump, and the Manchester & London attacks. @NotoriousREL 
Egg sit doesn't mean Brexit! (Thank you @jack_oakley for teaching Egg politics) #dogsatpollingstations #GeneralElection #pug 
A stagnant #Brexit economy, falling living standards, Russia-Trump - 3 huge reasons why May has rushed #GE2017#GeneralElection #Vote2017 
#VoteConservative today to support Theresa May and her team to get the best Brexit deal for Britain. Polls are open until 10pm  
Theresa May's Brexit vision is what would put your security at risk #VoteLabour #GE2017 
Must read: erosion of EU nationals' #citizensrights even before #brexit. Residence rejection rate up from 17% to 30%  
His reasons: NHS cuts, police cuts, education cuts, Dementia Tax, and Theresa May's bad handling of Brexit. He trusts Labour with Brexit. 
I suspect something big is happening. It is chaos at my polling station and it's never busy, not even for Brexit. Young seem to be out today 
#VoteConservative TODAY for a strong economy, strong leadership, stable government &amp; the best Brexit deal. Polls are open until 10pm  
#Comey is a BIG story - let's not forget it in amongst #GE2017.  It has repercussions for #Brexit. 
I come from a generation that understood Britain needed to stand united with Europe as an equal partner. #Brexit  
If we get that we get similar to #Brexit which means we WILL get a @UKLabour Gov with the power to look after UK Public please #VoteLabour 
So I just did it. Voted for Tories. #GE2017Voted for my party and for #Brexit. Not for Theresa May.  
Catalonia poised to call referendum on split from Spain  
Epic - @rideox4 take on Brexit and hope for a brighter future with huge new single 'Lannoy Point'  
Young people & migrant votes denied, while Scots, Welsh & Irish voices irrelevant. #Brexit is NOT democratic referendum.  
This is the Qriously poll out last night - not well known, but the only pollster to predict last years referendum result 
#VoteConservative today for a strong economy, the best Brexit deal and Theresa May as Prime Minister. Polls are open until 10pm.  
Shadow Brexit Secretary blasts BBC bias to reveal real reason for May’s attack on human rights   via @thecanarysays 
Britain votes in election torn between terrorism worries and Brexit strategies  
OECD sticks to "Crash and Burn Brexit" predictions as UK goes to polls -  
Theresa May's extreme Brexit plans could damage Britain's economy. Don't let that happen. Vote for a #brighterfuture, vote for the Lib Dems. 
When challenged on his lack of preparedness, Davis has chirpily admitted it. As though we'll be carried through Brexit by Blitz spirit alone 
Don't forget the #Brexit billionaire press campaign of hate & lies against the EU, refugees & migrants#Vote2017 #GE2017 #GeneralElection17 
Nice story @sarahjolney1 my parents in their eighties who have voted tory all their life voted @sarahjolney1 as so let down by tory brexit 
Much like my Tory opponent's policies his posters have disintegrated. And they expect us to let them run the #Brexit negotiations?! #VoteSNP 
Iraqi Turkmen Front calls referendum decision by KRG admin a clear constitutional violation and calls on Gov to prevent partition of Iraq.  
Davis: We need to be prepared to leave with no deal. Davis, *in same piece*: Everything depends on getting a good Brexit deal.  
Just took 93yr Mum to vote, she’s registered blind. In a very loud voice she said, “Which box for Brexit?” A cheer went up. 
Vote for Theresa May’s @Conservatives today to ensure we see Brexit through and keep our nation secure and prosperous  
Note the support from Saudi Arabia at news of Kurdish independence referendum in Iraq.Seems like Saudi subjects are big fans of democracy.  
Britain's economy, post-Brexit  #GeneralElection17 
Jeremy Corbyn is the only man who can solve Britain’s post-Brexit problems #VoteLabour #GE2017 
The Brexit catastrophe is only just beginning  > by @jennirsl - free to read 
We are allowing Terrorist into our country 
IS It still the case Enough is Enough? 
Brexit has turned out to be group therapy, with the therapist missing, and Paul Dacre’s unconscious is running amok. 
Today's election in the U.K. was supposed to be about Brexit. But something changed, @IanDunt writes 
corbyns plans to scrap brexit- yes because not only has he got to finance his pledges he also has to find a extra £90bilion to finance eu 
Rochdale Labour councillor's home raided by anti-terror police 
uk slowest growing G7 country plus slowest growing country in the EU28 oh dear so much for tories & Brexit 
To all young people out there who wonder how Brexit, Trump happened, and didn't bother to vote:You. You are how that happened.Go #vote 
For a strong economy, we have to get Brexit right. #VoteConservative today to back Theresa May’s Plan for Brexit.  
In which David Davis, after a year managing Brexit, still shows he has absolutely no understanding of even its most basic principles  
Honestly -Feels like we're living in some Twilight Zone reality with Terrorists feelings being put before ours. Truth is the new Hate Speech 
.@David_Cameron you know what's anti-democratic? Running an advisory referendum and pretending its was mandatory #fuckbrexit 
Why the U.K. election is really about Brexit  #GE2017 
Great to have you with us Greg! If you too think the people should have the final say on #Brexit, #votelibdem today.#ge2017 #tactical2017 
Saudis pushing to overthrow Qatari govt, Kurds calling a high risk referendum, China putting bases in Pakistan. It's a global free for all.  
The low youth turnout was blamed for #Brexit. Will youth vote in large numbers this time to take back control of our politics #forthemany? 
For a strong economy, the best Brexit deal and Theresa May as Prime Minister #VoteConservative today. Every vote counts. #GE2017 
Is Edgar Wright’s Hot Fuzz the ultimate anti-Brexit film? We think so...  
Brexit negotiations begin just 11 days after polling day, only @Theresa_May and her team are ready to go! 
'They're FANATICS!' Swedish MEP destroys Brussels for using 'Brexit to push for EU army'  
Brexit negotiations ominously awaiting the new Government by Ben Jennings - political cartoon gallery in Putney  
Brexit taskforce finds vast majority fear for future cross-border research  via @siliconrepublic 
Voting Tips: Remember to get your vote loyalty card stamped. Collect 6 stamps since 2014 and get a free referendum on any subject you choose 
@jennirsl tells some home truths about the coming #Brexit catastrophe in @thetimes  
If only Mr Corbyn had shown the same amount of energy during the European referendum, we wouldn't be in the mess we are in now. 
RETWEET to show you're backing Theresa May to get the best Brexit deal - and secure a brighter future. #VoteConservative today. 
The anti-Brexit campaign is dead and four other lessons from the election.  
Twitter is cack at predicting election results if it were accurate, there'd be no Brexit and Hilary would be in the White House #justsaying 
Treasury knows ‘Hard Brexit’ cuts GDP by 10% & may cost £66bn but Theresa May doesn’t want you to know  #Vote2017 
UKIP leader Paul Nuttall claims: I’ll fight for ‘real Brexit’  
Catalonia poised to call referendum on split from Spain  
'They're FANATICS!' Swedish MEP destroys Brussels for using 'Brexit to push for EU army'  
Depth of UK ignorance on Brexit "astounding", says former European Court of Justice judge  
Look what marched into my office on Election Day. @StuartMaconie's brilliant journey through #Brexit Britain looking handsomely austere  
The 'best Brexit deal' will result in free trade agreements with the USA, the EU, China, Brazil, S Korea, Canada, Australia and c.30 others. 
Hard Brexit means losing 40,000 nurses but Theresa May doesn’t want you to find out:  #GeneralElection17 
#GE2017 who's got your #vote? I have voted #Conservative! For #BRITAIN & #BREXIT!  #BBC #SKY #ITV #RT #TORY #NEWS #RT 
Theresa May started her campaign with Brexit. She ended it promising to rip up human rights laws to fight terrorism.  
Rubes been to a local election, a referendum, and now a general election with me #dogsatpollingstations 
If we get Brexit right, we can build a brighter future. #VoteConservative TODAY for a strong economy and the best Brexit deal.  
Think before you VOTE! THINK ABOUT #BRITAIN? THINK ABOUT #BREXIT? NEVER #VOTE #LABOUR! #JeremyCorbyn #LabourParty #Tory #UKIP #GE2017 
Just had my Dream Gig - talking  about Brexit to a room full of law librarians.  Paradise.See  #BIALL2017 tag for snippets from the talk. 
Top 10 challenges/opportunities for #FinancialServices in 2017. {#ai #blockchain #brexit #cybersecurity #regtech #fintech #insurtech} 
"I'm voting Brexit bc I'm against the mainstream,against the status quo, for the change..." - and they go and vote Tory  
If you were offered a bad deal why would you take it? #VoteLibDem if you believe the people should have the final say on the Brexit deal.  
Remember the big red Brexit bus? £350 million for the NHS? The FT on head of Vote Leave, @matthew_elliott's great revelation on that... 
#VoteConservative today for a strong economy, the best Brexit deal and a brighter future for Britain. Polls are open until 10pm.  
Brexit catastrophe is only just beginning—appallingly dishonest election campaign leading UK towards economic abyss 
If you voted Brexit cause you wanted change, voting Conservative would seem counter productive. 
It’s now clearly a two-horse race in Kensington!Vote @AnnabelMullin to free us from Brexit Borwick!  
Sturgeon refuses to rule out THIRD independence referendum if she loses a second, or even agree a 25-30 year break.  
Thank YOU Barry, a real hidden treasure - till you burst onto the campaign scene! You'll be GREAT in Labour's Brexit team!#Hope#VoteLabour 
"Brexit has stirred up a political rage inside me that didn’t exist before!"— British voters on the coming election.  
So,voters & journalists have allowed the Tories to get through whole #GE2017 campaign with no projected costs or details of Hard Brexit  
Rupert Murdoch can control both "wings", but he cannot control Corbyn.That's also why he lobbies for #brexit  
Voting is open until 10pm tonight!  Please cast your vote for those who will deliver the #Brexit we voted for last year #GE2017 
Brexit.  
Obviously you should vote. But. Brexit will kill the next government’s plans dead in the water | Prospect Magazine  
Vote to save Charing Cross, protect local schools, prevent a Hard Brexit & build affordable housing. Vote for me to be MP for Hammersmith! 
since it's the uk general election today im bringing back the video of kit being distraught over brexit last year. DON'T FORGET TO VOTE  
5 scenarios for how the U.K. election could play out, and what it means for Brexit  #GE2017 
83.4% for parties who either support Hard Brexit or who aren't prepared to stop it...A nation voting itself down the toilet of history...  
My pal's @c_kahler Qriously is only one to call #GE17 for Lab. (They were only poll to call Brexit for Leave.) Interesting day ahead.  
#VoteConservative TODAY for a strong economy, strong leadership, stable government & the best Brexit deal. Polls are open until 10pm  
Don't block or unfriend social media friends for opposing political views. This is how Brexit echo chamber was born. Discussion is healthy. 
This is an opportunity to take a stand against Tory cuts, to take stand against Brexit, to take a stand for their rights - @moneillsf #GE17 
The sorts of elections that picked Brexit and Donald Trump matter to investors  
Theresa May sold weapons to ISIS sympathising Saudi Arabia, changed her Brexit opinion 3 times and refused debates, not a flawed character? 
If Labour win today, watch the pound plumit, brexit be a failure, unemployment rise, important factories/companies (like JLR) move abroad... 
Just did my democratic duty. Crazy busy morning according to the people in the polling station. "Busier than Brexit" 
BBC News  "Is NHS rationing a possibility?" <-- Yes, absolutely. It's happening already and Brexit will ensure more.  
My rescue #dogsatpollingstations@AllDogsMatterBrexit means ... Step back in time   
'We need your tourists!' Spanish fear bad Brexit deal for UK will damage THEIR future  
Feeling the same feels I had before Brexit and Trump. Don't necessarily trust your timeline...  #WeShallSee 
Before you cast your vote, look at what #Brexit is already doing: UK was the worst-performing member of the EU in Q1 
On election day, please #VoteLabour#Brexit#Vote2017#GeneralElection 
It would be understandable if it'd turned out that Brexit had taken over the campaign, but it just...didn't. What are the issues of this GE? 
So terrorist who came from Italy was monitored 24/7 in Schengen zone but moment he was here he went off radar. So much for Brexit security 
Voted! Remember to get out and vote today for a progressive candidate that will fight a hard right brexit! #GT4MP #GE2017 
Did Trump administration encourage, oppose, or get blindsided by hugely consequential Kurdish decision to hold this referendum?  
#VoteConservative today to secure the best Brexit deal and build a stronger Britain. Polls are open until 10pm  
Voters lose, have had to endure yet another election/referendum campaign. 5/n 
The Brexit catastrophe is only just beginning | Comment | The Times & The Sunday Times  
Leavers lose, May exposed as lightweight ahead of Brexit negotiations. Pollsters lose, all over the shop and some badly wrong. 4/n 
Don't let today be another brexit, don't stay at home because you think your vote doesn't matter. We are the majority,we can win #VoteLabour 
Back @Theresa_May and the @Conservatives to get the best Brexit deal for your family  
Blue is the colourBrexit is the aimDon't vote for commiesWho would make the UK lame#VoteConservativeAndUnionist#GE2017  
Brexit. Next question?  
just saw an interview with the monster raving loony party leader..he said he doesnt want a hard or soft brexit he wants an al dente one haha 
Just read your time line. Another Muslim hater. Remember me when brexit ultimately fails. Here's one I planted earlier today. Hope u spot it  
Corbyn is the only man who can solve Britain’s post-Brexit problems  
Every vote counts to strengthen Theresa May's hand in the Brexit negotiations. Polls are open until 10pm. #VoteConservative 
I still have an overriding feeling that part of May’s purpose for this election was to delay having to answer real questions on Brexit. 
Today's election in the U.K. was supposed to be Brexit. But something changed, @IanDunt writes 
Whoever you decide to vote for, just make sure you vote. No point in whinging afterwards if you didn't even take part. Remember Brexit?  
The Brexit Election That Wasn't: I again try to explain to an international audience what the hell we're doing  
Smash the poorSmash the disabledSmash the children into povertySmash our economy with a hard brexitSmash our welfare stateSmash our NHS  
Telegraph says vote for Corbyn is vote for hard Brexit, which will wreck economy. I have clearly missed a key Cons speech about soft Brexit 
I want a real #Brexit I'm voting #Conservative#GE2017 
Once more,because he's worth it .... #NHS #tuitionfees #housing #socialcare #education #policing #Brexit #ForTheMany #GeneralElection 
Yes. Terrifying fact is; politicians are learning from Brexit and Trump that electorates prefer not to hear uncomfortable truths.  
They are Brexit voting, Tory bellends. Let's just batter them 8-0 every week and sign all their scouts instead. The tramps. 
Don't know why you're sounding so smug. They won the referendum, sending @TheEconomist into hand-wringing hysterics. 
Nice to see JK Rowling retweeting someone explaining why they're voting Lib Dem because of Brexit :)  
I'll #VoteConservative to honour the result of the referendum, and make a success of Brexit. 
Who has the bottle for the Brexit negotiations? The guy vilified by the media for years and shrugs it off, or the coward who won't face him? 
Theresa May has just voted. Have you? Vote @Conservatives today to ensure we see Brexit through and keep our nation secure and prosperous  
#VoteConservative today for a Prime Minister who will get the best Brexit deal.  
Polling day is upon us. Vote today for the best Brexit deal for you and your family and a brighter future for Gower. #FromGowerForGower 
Limp Brexit #BritishABand 
If your candidate won't support #Brexit, don't support them #VoteForDemocracy #GE2017  
New post: Why has the US resisted Trump but the UK acquiesced to Brexit?   
The reason why Britain's National Debt is growing out of control is we are importanting welfare 
Share if you Agree 
Every vote for the Conservatives today will strengthen Theresa May's hand in the Brexit negotiations that follow #VoteConservative #GE2017 
We woke up to Brexit. We woke up to Trump. Let's stop the rot here and not wake up to the Tories tomorrow. #Vote2017 #VoteLabour 
Theresa May jeopardises UK-EU relations and her approach to Brexit is secretive. That's not good for the UK.  
Your vote to 'stop brexit' will mean nothing if 3million of you split the left and keep the Tories in power. Come on, people. Tactical vote. 
Make sure your vote is counted not just tonight but on all key votes in Westminster. Vote SDLP, against Brexit & for Stormont restoration 
8 great reasons to #VoteConservative TODAY - from getting the best Brexit deal to more housing and more funding for schools and health.  
Remember, this is the #Brexit election. pic.twitter.com/hyEncwRp09 
Your future, your choice. If you want the final say on Brexit Lib Dems will stand up for you #VoteLibDem #GE2017 
Brexit Britain has a bright, prosperous future and only Theresa May and the Conservatives can and will deliver it. Don't let Labour ruin it! 
Whatever the outcome of the election, the fight against #Brexit will not stop. Indeed it's only really beginning. 
Voting #UKIP TODAY ensures that Theresa May's Brexit negotiations & implementation of other policies have the right balance & support.  
I'm telling everybody, I am the only lifelong candidate ALWAYS for #Brexit VOTE #UKIP before 10pm TODAY 
Only Theresa May has a plan for Brexit and beyond. #VoteConservative TODAY to get the best deal for Britain. Polls are open until 10pm. 
Some voters still regard a conveniently ill defined Brexit as their 'change' of choice. Today will be last day T May is grateful for Brexit. 
Every UKIP vote today will stand as a reminder to Theresa May to deliver a clean #Brexit. No backsliding. #BlabyBrexiteer 
For a strong economy, the best Brexit deal and Theresa May as Prime Minister #VoteConservative today. Every vote counts. #GE2017 
The #Brexit catastrophe is only just beginning, so vote tactically today  
Does May's #StrongandStable #Brexit woffle amount to a hill of beans or is it just hot air? Corbyn's recipe is for a healthier UK@eddwilson 
WESTMONSTER POLL: MAY WINS- 62% backing Tories on Brexit- 20% voting Labour, 16% UKIP- Nearly 7,000 voted  
For the sake of these Frenchies, vote against Hard Brexit & Vote Labour. They are not a bargaining chip. #dogsatpollingstations 
Theresa May is a liar - she can't tear up the Human Rights Act, that's the one thing the EU will draw the line on re any Brexit negotiations 
Only the @Conservatives & @theresa_may offer the leadership Britain needs to see us through Brexit & beyond. #VoteConservative. #Meriden 
Huge day for Britain today as voters elect the government that will lead Brexit negotiations & navigate the special relationship with Trump. 
UK: Labour (S&D) now more trusted for #Brexit negotiations than Cons (ECR) am Remain voters (Opinium poll). #GE2017 
The #Brexit squeeze is real. A vote against a #Brexit candidate is a vote for the economy & jobs. #Votetactical  
#VoteConservative TODAY for a strong economy, strong leadership, stable government & the best Brexit deal. Polls are open until 10pm.  
#Brexit is not about patriotism it is about a transatlantic clique of businessmen and politicians pursuing their selfish ends.#Vote2017 
Scottish Labour is not like Corbyn's Labour. I actively study politics and haven't heard a single policy other than "no 2nd referendum". 
Pep Guardiola @maticatradio "Each country has the right to choose their own future. The right to vote" #Catalonia #referèndum #8june 
How to vote tactically today to boost the Tories - and get a strong Brexit #GeneralElection17  
Great chance of completing the Bell End Hat Trick today: Brexit, Trump and Theresa May, all within a year. Well done good people of Earth. 
Are you standing with Theresa May? RETWEET to show you're backing Theresa May to get the best Brexit deal - and secure a brighter future.  
Kate Hoey helped deliver Brexit. And voting for her in Vauxhall will help deliver a harder Brexit. 
Vote @Conservatives today to ensure we see #Brexit through&keep our nation secure&prosperous #VoteConservative 
Vote Leave's spindoctor is grateful for Corbyn's help winning the referendum...An early leader for wittiest trolling  
I did not vote Leave for Labour to crash & burn #Brexit. Vote wisely to keep Labour out. #GE2017 
Thread on voting for a government hell-bent on delivering Brexit, at any cost, without examining the evidence or explaining what it means.  
Election Day: take nothing for granted, save Brexit, don't vote Corbyn #Vote2017 
VOTE TODAY for Theresa May & her team to get the best Brexit deal for you and your family. Every vote will strengthen her negotiating hand  
"The way you call them MY Brexit negotiations,defines exactly how you've run this campaign-me, mine, me, Theresa May" .@jonsnowC4#Vote2017 
If you're older, please don't rob young people of the freedom to live and work in Europe.Stop Tory #Brexit#GeneralElection17 #Election2017 
RIGHT i'm off to VOTE @LAYLAMORAN in OXFORD WEST because NHS CUTS & EDUCATION CUTS.Also Brexit will harm British science.JOIN ME. VOTE. 
21. I want to know that we can pull back from the brink if needed. If #Brexit negotiations go brilliantly well then fine; but if not.... 
My voting anecdote. In Lewisham, voting was sluggish. Not the queue we had in the referendum. 
20. I am voting @LibDems today. i want clarity about #Brexit, what it will mean, who it will affect - and who will be at risk. 
OECD ignores Conservative & @FT deficit hawks & warns: UK economy projected to slow in 2017 and 2018 due to Brexit. 
18. I could give many examples of how high stakes are. But this election - like #Brexit - is about details, not about 'getting rid of laws' 
16. ...the profound unhappiness with the EU, I would much rather understand what the (likely) consequences of #Brexit are before we leave. 
If we get Brexit right, we can build a brighter future. #VoteConservative TODAY for a strong economy and the best Brexit deal.  
13. I do not believe voters realised this when they voted for #Brexit. And I don't believe voters realise this today in #GE2017. 
Best of luck to @timfarron & the @LibDems today! So proud of the campaign they have fought against Brexit and the Tories #pollingday #GE2017 
Weak post referendum pound and Brexit fears mean that foreign labour shortage has already begun  
A dishonest election campaign, timed to maximise on Brexit delusion and minimise on Brexit fact.Sharp warning from @jennirsl in The Times. 
Hard Brexit will drive the UK off a cliff. Voting for May is like voting to set fire to your underpants while your hands are tied. #GE2017 
Come out & make history again! Ring your family & friends - Vote against Brexit, vote for unity, vote for rights - Vótáil Sinn Féin!  
I'm voting today for the #SNPBecause the Tories have been a disaster for Britain & they will be much worse after Brexit. Don't empower May!  
Had enough of May? Want to hinder Brexit?Vote tactically Vote tacticallyVote tactically But most of all - vote#GeneralElection17 
Only by voting for Theresa May & me as her local candidate will ensure we see Brexit through & keep our nation secure & prosperous. 
Polls are open. Please #VoteConservative for a brighter future, a strong economy, security, and the best Brexit deal pic.twitter.com/qxDKIbbWkd 
#Qriously have Labour in the lead. They were right on EUref, US election and Italy referendum.#GeneralElection17 
It is time for the older people of Britain to show respect & care for the young. Vote against a crippling Tory #Brexit.#GE2017 #GE17 
POLLS ARE OPEN: For a strong economy, we have to get Brexit right. #VoteConservative to back Theresa May’s Plan for Brexit.  
You've not been listening. Labour has a clear 6 point plan for Brexit.  It's May who has none! 
Brexit - Dementia tax - 2 Tr debt - Rape clause - Elite Tax cuts - Low tax global brands - U turns - Rise in terror - #GeneralElection2017 
In 1975 we voted to join Europe. The EU evolved & the UK flourished thanks to itIn 2016 we voted Brexit. Guess we got tired of flourishing. 
If you are planning to vote for @theresa_may thinking she will get the best Brexit deal - please take 30 seconds to watch this. #Newsnight 
Every vote counts today. Polls are open 7am-10pm. #VoteConservative for a strong economy, the best Brexit deal + a brighter future. #GE2017 
Good luck to all Conservatives today. Here's to our party leading our great country to a bright Brexit future. Fingers crossed & God willing 
David Davis, who keeps smiling as his #brexit expectations plummet via @tony_nog 
Tory Party forced to declare Laura Kuenssberg's salary as an election expense  -  
British agriculture, our farmers, fishers and food producers have a bright future ahead after Brexit!  
Polls open in 30 minutes - only Theresa May and her Conservative team can get the best Brexit deal for Britain. #VoteConservative 
I don't want to wake up to a Tory Brexit Britain. #ExitPoll 
No, silly, the culprit is Islamophobia, marginalisation, Western imperialism, Trump, Brexit & Russia.  
The party that wants mass immigration 
If there is a bad deal or no deal on #Brexit then for our own good we should stay in the EU. Please vote for MPs who understand this #GE2017 
#VOTE #UKIP TODAY PLEASE. @UKIP supports REAL #Brexit and more money for #NHS from cuts in huge Foreign Aid budget. #GE2017 #GeneralElection 
After Brexit and Trump I dread voting days. I hope the UK changes that. For humans and animals everywhere I hope the Tories go crashing out. 
The Iraqi Kurds have announced that they will hold a referendum on independence from Iraq on September 25. 
Brexit: Nick Clegg is first senior UK politician to back calls for Britons to retain EU citizenship  
"Brexit has stirred up a political rage inside me that didn’t exist before!"— British voters on the coming election.  
Bonjour @EmmanuelMacron may it please your excellency: people of #FreeSouthernCameroons are facing persecution. Help! Call for referendum  
Romania is at a turning point because of a proposed referendum to rule out same-sex marriage.  pic.twitter.com/pWTuOfFR4U 
May's bid for stronger Brexit hand at stake in UK election  
I'm voting #SNPbecause now more then ever before Scotland needs to be heard in WM or Scottish resources will become brexit bargaining chip 
Northern elders should advise Buhari to call for a referendum and allow Igbos have their way. No one can stop Biafra again. @Amaka_Ekwo 
Exposed: the Nazi roots of the European Union.  World War 2 continued by other means... #EU #Brexit  
But the blind, deaf & dumb will go to #GE2017 ballot box on Thursday believing same #Brexit BS as a year ago*sigh* 
I voted Brexit and it's clear the Tories have no strategy.Britain needs a people's Brexit that will benefit everyone.#VoteLabour #GE2017 
If u #VoteLabour today, u are voting for:1. #brexit betrayal2. FLOODS OF CALAIS immigrants that Tories refused3. turning UK into Greece 
Today is a historic day for Kurdistan. The referendum date is set. On September 25, the people of Kurdistan will determine their future.  
Has either party actually said how they'll deliver #Brexit or just said "We'll do it better than that other lot" #GeneralElection17 #GE2017 
Pep will lobby for Spain to allow a referendum on Catalan Independence at a rally in Montjuïc  this Sunday.Heavy.  
The company that predicted #brexit correctly is saying Labour now leads in the polls.  
I just wanted to remind you that there are fuck all benefits to Brexit. Not a one, nada, zilch. Don't want it? Don't vote for it. #ToriesOut 
The only polling company that predicted #brexit correctly has now predicted a Labour lead in #GE2017 read:  
I can live with 5 years of Corbyn, I may even give a thumbs up to some of his policies. What I can't live with is a lifetime of Brexit. 
Kurdistan 2hold independence referendum on Sep 25-If anyone deserves it, these guys do.They stopped ISIS marching on  
#Brexit3) If you want Brexit slowed or stopped, then vote for an anti-Brexit partyThat is not Corbyn's Labour, though it should have been 
#Brexit2)-When Brexit hits there won't be any money for the Labour manifestoSo please,don't kid yourself that Labour=Soft or no Brexit 
Guardiola wants Catalonia to get its independence.He is demanding a referendum.  
TODAY! After Trump & Brexit, I'm not setting myself up for . NHS, housing, social care, uni fees... Vote & vote wisely #VoteLabour #GE17 
Latest poll by Qriously gives Labour a 3-pt lead They correctly predicted Brexit, Dutch general election &Turkish constitutional referendum 
The #KRG has announced a referendum on independence for Monday, September 25. Let's hope for unity & wisdom for our Kurdish friends.  
Fellow tweeters, we desperately need a strong Conservative government to take us through Brexit and beyond. Please vote and get the vote out  
Corbyn giving a top job to Lyn Brown, who voted against Article 50, proves Labour can't be trusted on  Brexit  
The many international treaties and agreements that will need to be renegotiated after Brexit – 759, to be exact  
Key take: OECD says, "The overwhelming majority of economists expect that a cliff-edge Brexit would be highly damaging for the UK economy." 
Brexit: One third of small businesses want new government that will reverse decision to leave EU 
Young people's life chances may be limited by Theresa May's Brexit plans. Don't let that happen. Vote for the Liberal Democrats today.  
My latest: Iraqi Kurds affirm referendum for independence  
Bullshit.Brexit is useless.See Tories.No he isn't.For the 1%.Better than Murdoch's puppet.Good.Bullshit.Bullshit.Bullshit. pic.twitter.com/AoCUetrB1K 
I don't mean to share this in a defeatist sense but I've just looked back on some texts my dad sent me after Brexit and they're comforting  
There you have it. The paper that speaks for Nicola Sturgeon says the election is about whether you want a second independence referendum.  
Every #VOTE counts to secure OUR #BREXIT! #Polls open 7am – 10pm: #VoteConservative for #Britain! #GE2017 #BBC #SKY #ITV #NEWS #UK #TORY 
Social media is 'anti-conservative' just like it was 'anti- Brexit' and 'anti- Trump'........ social media is NOT political research 
I for one am glad we had this deep discussion on Brexit and am now, no matter what happens tomorrow, fully prepared for what is to come. 
Iraqi Kurds to hold independence referendum in September  
You all know the #GeneralElection17 drinking game by now: Start drinking now, don't stop until Brexit makes alcohol completely unaffordable. 
To have one Brexit campaign without informed debate may be misfortune. To have two such campaigns looks less like carelessness. #GE2017 
You wouldn't sign a contract without reading the terms would you? Only @LibDems will let you check the Brexit terms. #VoteLibDem #GE2017 
4 (big) reasons Jeremy Corbyn is too radical for Great Britain #GE2017 #brexit  
Tomorrow, defend Brexit and the Union. Vote WILSON  for a strong, experienced and dedicated MP. Every vote in every seat will count!  
If you vote Conservative you're giving May a blank cheque for a bad Brexit & the dementia tax #VoteLibDem #GE2017 
Eric Pickles on Newsnight says Theresa May “is the worst person in the world to do a deal with.”Bodes well for Brexit. 
Last June Brits voted for Brexit because we wanted freedom & to run our own country. Any vote for #Labour & #JeremyCobryn undermines #Brexit  
I'm voting Tory for the first time ever because of Brexit. I don't trust any other party to deliver. I hope they won't let me down. 
once Brexit is achieved, the next great backwards-looking British political cause will be restoring the Heptarchy  
#YouShouldVoteBecause a lady who stands by a bus and says "strong & stable" 50 times a day is far from it, and not fit to negotiate Brexit  
If Tories win as expected, take heart in the fact that the disaster of #Brexit will be on their watch. It could finish them for a generation 
Greg Dyke:If Corbyn was the next prime minister, I think he would get a better deal on Brexit,cause he's not Theresa 
Brexit: disbelief, anxiety, embarrassment.Trump: shock, horror, loathing. Tory landslide tomorrow: SHAME 
This is it. Your Second Referendum. Don't screw it up! #WeakAndWobbly #GE2017 #dontvoteblue #stopbrexit #theendofmay 
If you want more mass immigration & no Brexit vote Labour or Liberal.if you have confidence in Britain to prosper vote Conservative. 
Why this election largely ignored Brexit: mainstream journos didn't ask tough questions, I say in @CER_EU podcast: 
Polls open at 7am. Back @theresa_may and her excellent team of @Conservatives. Brexit needs May not Corbyn. Vote @WelshConserv tomorrow! 
September 25 #Kurdistan region has selected date for referendum  
Murdoch; "When I got into Downing Street they do what I say; when I go to Brussels the take no notice."#GE2017 #GE17 #Brexit  
If you vote Tory tomorrow you might as well be voting for Murdoch and Farage. #GE2017 #GE17 #Brexit  
not worried about tax. I worry about this pillock Corbyn  being our PM and having to nego brexit and deal with education and the NHS  
Remember when you didn't want Brexit, but your nana did?And how you didn't​ vote, but she did?That. Again.Get out and vote this time. 
It is totally pointless for 17.4m people to vote to leave last June and not back it up now. VOTE BREXIT, VOTE INDEPENDENCE, VOTE TORY  
" When we look into Brexit negotiations " it's been almost a year since 52% of us voted for it. What you been doin ?  
Apparently @NicolaSturgeon reveals that, in a private conversation, Corbyn said if he wins then Scotland can get Indy without a referendum. 
BBC news lets cat out of bag - if Labour win they will scrap Brexit white paper and stay in single market this means no Brexit at all 
2/3 3. Tories will let May do Brexit then she is out. 4. Socialism is back, no matter what happens the standard has been raised. 
#Kurdistan political parties decided to hold referendum on  Sep. 25. #KRG supports this decision & will facilitate all necessary measures. 
If you decide to vote Tory based on a Sun or Mail headline you've read on the morning of polling day,FUCK YOU. I hope Brexit fucks you too 
.So May = good sorting out sock-drawer but NOT Brexit?"PM does not have a 'brilliant' mind but is 'organised'". 
EU launches new multibillion-euro defense fund amid Trump pressure, Brexit  
WATCH: Why @AndrewRTDavies is urging you to back @theresa_may to deliver the best #Brexit deal for you and your family #GE2017 
Iraqi Kurds plan independence referendum on September 25 | Article [AMP] | Reuters  
A gentle reminder that the day of the  Brexit vote looked like the apocalypse with cars being flooded and all sorts. YOUNG PEOPLE, WELLY UP.  
May hasn't told us enough about Brexit to get a mandate & even if Lab lose horribly, Corbyn loyalists will see it as first step to victory 
130 economists have urgently backed @jeremyCorbyn to avoid an economic catastrophe under #conservatives with #brexit  
Every vote counts to keep our economy strong + secure the best Brexit deal. Polls open 7am – 10pm: vote Conservative for a stronger Britain.  
For an election meant to 1.give clear mandate for Brexit & 2.settle Labour's internal argument can't shake the feeling this will do neither 
#PMBarzani & #Italy's Defence CoS #GenGraziano discussed military campaign, political prospects, referendum & future of #Erbil #Baghdad ties 
I wouldn't want Teresa May negotiating me out of a phone contract let alone Brexit #GeneralElection17 
Theresa May whose party has increased the deficit by £600bn & taken us to the brink of ruin thanks to Brexit wants you to trust her #bbcnews 
Kurdistan Region formally announces independence referendum on September 25 #KurdistanReferendum 
Best wishes to @SDLPlive tomorrow - the only genuine anti-Brexit party who will #TakeOnTheTories.@columeastwood 
For a strong economy, a stable Britain and a PM who will lead a sensible Brexit, please vote Conservative tomorrow @Conservatives 
Please vote Labour in Thursday's General Election to help avoid a disastrous Tory hard Brexit. Good luck to all @UKLabour candidates! 
Boris Johnson is a walking PR disaster. God help the country if he has anything to do with the Brexit negotiations  
True but is should be compulsory  - that is how we ended up with Brexit & the will of the people representing 27% of people. 
#GeneralElection17 So who wants #TheresaMay to negotiate #Brexit?God! They won't even look at her, let alone talk to her. #BillyNoMates 
Remember the Vote Leave bus and its false promise of £350m a week for the NHS post-Brexit? Nick Clegg reveals how...  
Brexit matters:  Britain's best negotiator: Keir Starmer.  Will be getting the vote out for him tomorrow 
Even tho she's Labour, really hope @KateHoeyMP retains her seat in Vauxhall. A great #Brexit supporter, under serious threat from LibDems. 
Anyone looking for facts for #GE2017  ? Here are facts! Vote Tory  For everyone For aspirationFor fairnessFor BrexitFor Britain   
#YouShouldVoteBecause instead of developing a Brexit plan, Theresa May rushed off to suck up to dangerous tyrants pic.twitter.com/mZLp1Yx53N 
This hour-by-hour guide explains how election night could unfold  #GE2017 
#GeneralElection17 DIANE ABBOTT REPLACEMENT IS A HARD-LINE EU FANATICBREXIT WILL BE DEAD IF YOU VOTE LABOUR  
A Conservative govt will see NHS staff leaving in droves, compounded by Brexit. Vote wisely #GeneralElection17 
Brexit trashed UK economy £ falling & toxic 1 year imagine what will happen globally nowBrexitHuman rights EU citizenship all thrown away  
Proud to support Theresa May, proud to support Brexit and Great Britain!  
Corbyn's ability to pull in a crowd is impressive. But where was this during the EU referendum? The defining issue of our time and he did FA 
This. #Brexit #GE2017 
A united Ireland can only happen through a referendum, the UUP negotiated this in the GFA.  
I think @jeremycorbyn is what the UK needs right now, especially after Brexit. 
Pres. @masoud_barzani announces that the date for the Iraqi Kurdistan independence referendum is September 25, 2017 pic.twitter.com/SEyz9wYloP 
No one can "make a success of #Brexit"  and especially not you. #Brexit  is a delusional, grossly damaging act of national self harm.  
I will hold my nose and Vote Tory for Brexit as our candidate stood down to let the Tory's WIN , but UKIP any other Time .  
An angry woman. With no answers. And it hasn't even started yet. #Brexit  
UPDATED: Kurdistan to hold independence referendum on Sep. 25 
Part of me, the demented part, almost wishes for Brexit. Then all I have to do is tweet "I fucking told you so" 10 or so times a day. 
Look, they're just cheaper, ok? Brexit means Brexit.  
Christ! Talk about empty rhetoric. Here's the two parties' Brexit negotiation teams...you choose. #VoteLABOUR 
Iraqi Kurds to hold independence referendum in September  
'Brexit is not safe with Corbyn!' Labour's new Home Secretary voted AGAINST Article 50  
130 economists have urgently backed @jeremyCorbyn to avoid an economic catastrophe under #conservatives with #brexit  
I'm politically not aligned. I'm voting Tory tomorrow as it's the only way we can get the Brexit we voted for. May will do it for us.  
Theresa May's Brexit plans could limit the chances of Britain's young generation. Only one party offers you an alternative. #VoteLibDem 
When someone proudly tells you they voted for Brexit do you just think 'Thick Idiot' like I do? 
If you voted for #Brexit make sure your vote tomorrow goes to a Brexiteer candidate. And remember, #UKIP are the only true Brexit party!  
A year since we were in the news with this call to action. Voting for a certain Brexit is equally important tomorrow.  
UK economy to slow in coming years as Brexit uncertainty hampers growth & consumers become more cautious, says OECD  
I've always voted Tory all my life, but not tomorrow. A Tory Brexit is too much of a gamble  
The Shadow Brexit Secretary blasts through BBC bias to reveal the real reason for May’s attack on human rights  
#Brexit mess is of the Conservative party's makingPick a better team to sort out the muddle tomorrow#GE2017 #GE17 #votesmart #tactical2017 
Final chance to face facts and ignore the hype! #Jobs, #NHS, #Security, #Economy.We simply cannot afford a hard Brexit. Vote @LibDems 
I've spent months slagging off Corbyn for his Brexit stance. But I know my enemy, and it is Tory. And there's only one Slayer out there. 
Theresa May will win biggest Tory landslide since Thatcher, final election poll predicts 
Labour's Emily Thornberry becomes latest MP to suffer 'car crash' interview  
WATCH: Brilliant @SebDance on why a vote for @coyleneil tmrw is a vote for the strongest anti-brexit voice for Bermondsey and Old Southwark  
If you are in #StAlbans the tactical anti-Con, anti-brexit vote is @libdemdaisy !!!! 
#VoteConservative tomorrow for a strong economy and a Prime Minister who can get the best Brexit deal. Polls open at 7am.  
If re-elected, I'll fight against Theresa May's hard Brexit and fight for a fairer, safer and stronger East End:  
As Britons head to the polls Thursday, Brexit will be the defining issue for many voters.  
Plus Corbyn engages with mere mortals 'the voters' whilst May only goes for staged shows. Brexit negotiations demand 27 nations to approve. 
Red Brexit Blue Brexit Left BrexitRight Brexit Extreme Brexit Hard BrexitBrexit means BrexitBrexit SchmexitBrexit BrexshitFuck 
Don’t be fooled by the U.K. election: There’s nothing democratic about #Brexit  
Tories negotiating Brexit?I've had a leaflet from Tories with the wrong Tory candidate from another constituency asking for my vote? Clowns  
130 economists have urgently backed @jeremyCorbyn to avoid an economic catastrophe under #conservatives with #brexit  
2.3. Austerity resentment will increase4. Hard Brexit will be disastrous5. Scot, Irish, Welsh independence claims will strengthen 
Nick Clegg: There has been a pact of silence on Brexit between Theresa May and Jeremy Corbyn  
All this talk of "Britain""Britain" "Britain" in context of #Brexit by Theresa May & not "UK" seems to unwittingly concede a united Ireland? 
Derry needs an MP to take the seat & take a stand for us. Mark Durkan will oppose Tory Brexit, cuts and war.   
A vote for Labour means huge tax rises,mass unemployment,betrayal on brexit,and a weak leader don't vote Labour. 
Theresa May doesn’t deserve to win this election. Get out and vote tomorrow #GE2017 #Brexit  
The verdict of @Channel4News is a vote for either Tory or Labour is a vote for hard Brexit.Only @LibDems trying to limit damage of Brexit.  
Last year young people woke up to Brexit - the shocking future older voters wanted for them. Tomorrow is payback time. Vote Labour. 
Iraq's autonomous Kurdish region plans independence referendum on September 25  
Only @theresa_may can deliver on Brexit and get us the best possible deal. Back the @WelshConserv and @Conservatives candidates tomorrow. 
Four big memes: 1) Why no Brexit regret?, 2) "Global Britain" as post-colonial neurosis, 3) The underfunded British state, 4) Wobbly T May. 
The problem with @kezdugdale claiming to have "always" opposed independence & a 2nd referendum is that there's plenty of evidence otherwise. 
Reason #brexit was not an issue this #election is people just want the govt to fix it. Not face up to the choice they made. 
."Everyone against a hard Brexit should vote tactically for the candidate who is best-placed to beat the Tory". 
Fellow #Brexiteers .. this might be the last time we mean anything as a group. Tomorrow our #Brexit dream may be over. Vote T-May to WIN !  
Plymouth Herald asks Boris if he's worried about losing seats there to Labour... also he promises completely frictionless trade post Brexit  
Exclusive: 9 out of 10 voters reject Theresa May's claim election is about Brexit and say it's about public services  
#GE2017 @Theresa_May and most of her cabinet were against #Brexit. Don’t vote for their two-faced Brexit. Read why:  
I can't wait for my port of Liverpool to once again send merchant ships around the world, Brexit will bring such dividends to Britain. 
May's tactical genius turned 24 pt election lead into 3 pt one in 6 wks. Hardly someone you want as a brexit negotiator #GeneralElection17 
Today is a historic day for Kurdistan. The referendum date is set. On September 25, the people of Kurdistan will determine their future. 
Eve of Poll! Going home from superb #TeamMay rally in #Birmingham.  Vote #Conservative - support Theresa May to make success of #Brexit !  
Goods news that @BCABforEU awarded EP Citizens Prize 4 standing up 2 Tory Brexit agenda. Nominated by SF MEPs @MarianHarkin & @NChildersMEP 
Brexit Tory wanting migration cut is caught paying for a Hungarian to deliver her election leaflets  
History tells us you can never trust a Tory#GE2017 #VoteThemOut #VoteLabour 
.@theresa_may at a rally in Birmingham calling on voters to give her the authority to speak for Britain through Brexit and beyond #GE2017 
Vote for Theresa May and her team to get the best Brexit deal for you and your family. Every vote will strengthen her negotiating hand.  
Iraqi Kurds to hold independence referendum in September  
Anything else but a huge Tory victory will be a disaster tomorrow. They need to get on with Brexit & deliver it for us. #GeneralElection17 
There are few certainties in life.This is one: NEVER LABOUR.Anti-British, Marxist loonies who will scrap #Brexit and trash the economy.  
The Brexit catastrophe is only just beginning, writes @jennirsl  
Brexit legal challenger @thatginamiller says she's 'aghast' at lack of detail in 'no deal better than bad deal' argument 
We endorse @labourlewis as @UKLabour candidate for Norwich South. Here with @thatginamiller talking about the dangers of an extreme Brexit.  
So Brexit debate in whole campaign (small parties aside) was only about who shd get blank cheque  via @politics_co_uk 
Exclusive: 9 out of 10 think Theresa May should focus on public services not Brexit  
If Cameron had stood up to the racists, we wouldn't have Brexit. 
Iraqi Kurds to hold independence referendum on Sept 25  
If we get Brexit right, we can build a brighter future. #VoteConservative tomorrow for a strong economy and the best Brexit deal.  
."Lend May your vote for Brexit, and she'll keep it for EVERYTHING else"#GE2017 
#UPDATE Iraq's autonomous Kurdish region set to hold statehood referendum, despite opposition from Baghdad  
Last June Brits voted for Brexit because we wanted freedom & to run our own country. Any vote for Cobryn undermines Brexit & our vote.  
.@M_AndersonSF welcomes EU Citizen's Award for Border Communities Against Brexit 
Hard to get a word in, but @LPerrins didn't let @RachShabi shout her down completely. Laura NAILS #Brexit.#GE2017 
Says the spineless coward who lost to brexit and he done a runner ..... p**s right off and go get piggy with it you clown. #VoteLABOUR . 
All Scottish Conservative candidates including myself signed Scottish Fishermen’s Federation Brexit pledge to leave EU & CFP. #GE2017 
4. Meanwhile, the party supports Trident & Brexit, and the only mention of Scotland in their manifesto refers to, yep, no 2nd referendum. 
If re-elected, I'll:- Fight an extreme Brexit- Protect local school funding- Defend St George's and our NHSSupporting me? Retweet this.  
If we can have a vote on fox hunting, why not the Brexit deal? This from our trip to meet voters in St Albans with @libdemdaisy @LibDems 
You lot deserve brexit, you really do.  
Congratulations President @masoud_barzani and Minister @FalahMustafa. On Friday, date for Catalan Independence Referendum will be announced 
What reasons has May given for us to trust her with Brexit - or anything else?Genuine question 
Vote for Theresa May and her team to get the best Brexit deal for you and your family. Every vote will strengthen her negotiating hand.  
This, its almost comical how the cost of Brexit doesn't even feature in debate when the reality is it will make any new spending impossible  
Mayhem - the weakest link.  Too frightened to face her own electorate, how can she deal with #Brexit?  
Today's historical moment. President Barzani along w/ all political parties who decided to have referendum on September 25.Founding fathers  
Kurdistan Referendum for independence will be held on 25/9/2017.  
I am pleased to announce that the date for the independence referendum has been set for Monday, September 25, 2017 
.@Molly4Bristol is the candidate for #ourNHS; to defend our schools; to oppose an extreme Brexit; to put forward the bold ideas the UK needs  
Final push to secure a conservative majority make Brexit work for Luton North people are supporting @theresa_may #StrongAndStable #GE2017 
Party loyalty has the advantage of providing political stability, but in the present context it is a disaster for Britain#GE2017 #Brexit 
Idea: An OTT show called "Brexit Wounds" where the Brits have to fight in a tournament for the prize of Irish Citizenship!!#Genius 
Talking to staff at Dunelm in Nottingham about Brexit and the opportunities it can bring. I'll get a Brexit deal to help businesses grow.  
Brilliant. Depressing.He sharply exposes the gross irresponsibility that is Brexit & our failure to talk about itI'll vote @LibDems thanks 
Regarding trade, Theresa May has no answer because there is no answer. As she made clear in her Remain speech before the referendum.  
looking forward to switching my previous #Conservative vote to #LibDems @libdemdaisy tomorrow in #StAlbans for proper represention #Brexit 
Opinion | Don't be fooled by the U.K. election: There's nothing democratic about Brexit  
For a strong economy, strong leadership, stable government and the best Brexit deal, make sure you #VoteConservative tomorrow. 
Is @edgarwright’s Hot Fuzz the ultimate anti-Brexit film?  
#Osborne points out that Tories - after calling election on #brexit - have utterly failed to reveal their stance on its key problems :  
After campaigns with no proper discussion of Brexit we're going to get a Govt that will claim its win as a mandate for whatever they want. 
#BREAKING Iraqi Kurds to hold independence referendum on September 25: statement 
I as a Kurd from Bakur fully support KRG independence referendum.An independent Bashur will strengthen Kurds in all parts of Kurdistan.  
Kurdistan to hold independence referendum Sept. 25. Historic day for all people of Kurdistan & all who have fallen along the path to liberty 
U.K. SEEN ABANDONING BREXIT NEGOTIATIONS OVER SUMMER - EU SOURCE 
Meanwhile... outside the Bank of England... a man dressed as Boris Johnson is singing an anti Brexit song. I salute you whoever you are  
Are you standing with Theresa May? RETWEET to show you're backing Theresa May to get the best Brexit deal - and secure a brighter future.  
City of London recovers from Brexit disruption as job volumes jump 21 per cent.  
'History haunts this place': how Brexit is fuelling Ireland's sectarian debate  
It's because both May & Corbyn are in a pact of silence about economic cost of Brexit.Both putting political survival above interests of UK  
Those final pitches in full. May: "I can negotiate Brexit." Corbyn: "Diane Abbott won't be Home Secretary." 
There's no debate cos Brexit's a religion. It's based on faith, not facts. You can't overturn irrational beliefs with rational arguments 
Really do dislike it when ppl say lack of debate on Brexit is because it is too hard to understand. It is not too hard to undrstand. 
@GermanyDiplo's task force discussing with @The3Million and @BritishInEurope how to save #citizensrights after #brexit.  
Superb piece by @IanDunt highlighting the cost of the pact of silence on Brexit between May & Corbyn 
Lovely stuff from @IanDunt on the Brexit-shaped hole in this election. And by lovely, I mean it made me want to cry.  
Tory MPs won't stand up to @theresa_may & her 'no deal' Brexit. WTO would damage farming due to subsidy limits & cheap food imports #VoteSNP 
Only 47% of young people voted in the decision of Brexit. BUT young people were the loudest on twitter when we ended up leaving. Pathetic 
OECD: UK GDP growth slowing due to Brexit, "uncertainty undermining investment", despite £ plunge "export market shares have not risen". 
Brexit Explained:  
It is official: #Kurdistan to hold independence referendum on September 25, 2017 and presidential and parliamentary elections on November 6. 
"It’s like trying to explain trade to Dougal in Father Ted." #Brexit  
Catalan president and vice-president will announce referendum date + question on Friday #CatalanRef2017  @Catalannews 
Not enough chaos so... IRAQI KURDS PLAN INDEPENDENCE REFERENDUM ON SEPT 25, RUDAW SAYS 
Brexit is a house built on sand. It will collapse sooner or later. And we are pushing. #Therexit #Remain #EUloudandproud #DontVoteTory 
Brexit is the most important national issue to voters, but health is the most important local issue #GE2017  
Exclusive: May, Rudd ‘stripped anti-extremism unit to focus on #Brexit’ #GE17  
#BREAKING: #Kurdistan political parties agree on holding independence referendum on September 25. - @K24English 
Business leaders when asked to publicly support the Tories.(No letters in the press etc. Because they know her Brexit will be a disaster)  
Kurdistan sets date for referendum for independence on 25th September this year. 
#BREAKING: The #Kurdistan Region independence referendum will be held on Sep. 25, Kurdistan24 reports.  #TwitterKurds 
The Independence referendum is simple: YES. The real vote is parliamentary elex 6/11/17: incompetent, corrupt, useless KDP rule or CHANGE  
#BREAKING: Kurdistan's referendum on independence scheduled for 25 September 2017. 
BREAKING - Kurdistan Regional Government to hold independence referendum on September 25, 2017. via @RudawEnglish 
Back me and together we can make a success of Brexit and build a stronger Britain. Vote Conservative tomorrow.  
Big news. Kurdistan Referendum for independence is on 25/9/2017. 
After the September independence referendum, the Kurdistan Region  to hold parliamentary elections on November 6. 
Seems like sound advice. The vast majority of our supporters believe the best chance of achieving Brexit is a Tory government.  
Should more teams have home and away kits? And what's the Pakistan team's Brexit connection?All in #CT17 chatter:  pic.twitter.com/wsNpoj1ibq 
Kurdistan Region to hold independence referendum on September 25, 2017. Reported after President Barzani met with political leaders today.  
Preparing #Brexit negos w/ 24 EP committee chairs. Committed to working hand-in-hand & in full transparency@GuyVerhofstadt @CeciliaWikstrom 
What sort of Brexit do you want? Your vote will help decide that. @thatginamiller here in Vauxhall to tell you why.  
Shift across the board towards the Tories on the betting markets. Just like with Brexit and Trump. Oh...  
Today @The3Million & @BritishInEurope met with @GermanyDiplo in Berlin to discuss German & EU stance on #citizensrights post #Brexit  
After a referendum campaign that passed without leavers coming up with a plan, this election is also passing w/out scrutiny of Brexit negns 
First bit of Brexit plan news of the election: Corbyn would invite Merkel to watch Arsenal as negotiating tactic  
130 economists have urgently backed @jeremyCorbyn to avoid an economic catastrophe under #conservatives with #brexit  
Unemployment to rise, growth to fall, savings falling, borrowing rising. Thanks to Theresa May's Hard Brexit:  
Be in no doubt that the Tory Brexit is bad news for Ireland north and south. Secure your future - Vote Sinn Féin @MaryLouMcDonald 
My message to undecided voters worrying about Security, Brexit & Leadership. This is why you should vote Labour:  
Sick of Theresa. May's shallow rhetoric on Brexit? Labour's @Keir_Starmer & team have the credibility to deliver 
Twitter makes it seem like everyone is voting for labour but there's a whole world outside of this app. Remember BREXIT? 
Tomorrow's Election is a rerun of the Referendum I Urge all who Voted Leave to vote for your Brexit candidate to make sure Brexit happens 
Many Tory & #Brexit voters seem to have forgotten Britain's struggle to cope with it's declining power during their childhood years#GE2017 
Yes I will be voting Tory tomorrow. I hate May, but loathe Labour with every fibre of my being. And brexit more important. Here come dat boi  
Tech firms fear a #Brexit brain drain #LeaveWatch  
#VoteConservative tomorrow to secure the best Brexit deal, protecting your family’s economic security.  
Don't know what the fuss is about? Here's  @kezdugdale 3/4/16 saying she'd consider backing indy after Brexit  
The election is 2m people! The final countdown begins, vote smart & vote tactically. #GE2017 Stop extreme #Brexit  
A bus associated with a lot of false promises, rabid illogical fans and dark times ahead. also Brexit  
Big push from the Tories in #Chorley - the biggest issue they say is Brexit, this is Peter from Hungary delivering their last minute leaflet  
Tactical voting to oppose Brexit could still have a huge impact on the General Election >>  
If the Tories win, the NHS will be sold off, hard Brexit will ruin science and universities, human rights will die on the altar of populism 
Make your plan to vote now. Your vote decides who will be PM & lead our Brexit negotiations-Theresa May or Corbyn:  
Sharp article on 'Hot Fuzz' & Brexit. Don't forget Frank Butterman actually says 'Whatever The Cost, We Would Make Sandford Great Again'.  
Vince Cable: Voters should listen to this eve of poll warning on major economic risk posed by May’s extreme Brexit  
#Brexit supporting businessman asks that Brexit be reversedGovernment are not capable of making it a success 
Too scared to do interviews but apparently she's strong enough to handle Brexit negotiations   
Vote Brexit! If UKIP are not putting up a candidate, it means they stepped aside for a Tory candidate but don't let Labour in the back door!  
As reported by @Cricket_Ali, Pakistan's team bus was formerly the infamous £350m NHS Brexit bus #CT17 
8 great reasons to #VoteConservative tomorrow - from getting the best Brexit deal to more housing and more funding for schools and health.  
Tories' secret NHS cost-cutting plans sound 'death knell' for British healthcare.Major warned us!#Brexit #GE2017 
It'll not survive at all if May turns the UK into a tax haven when she gets laughed out of the room during the brexit negotiations. 
Wrote a little essay / appreciation of @edgarwright's Hot Fuzz and its prophecy of Brexit Britain for @LWLies: 
Surprise echoes around the chamber as Ruth Davidson moves onto NO SURRENDER TO A SECOND REFERENDUM. #fmqs 
Things Jeremy Corbyn is lying about to get your vote:TridentShoot to killImmigrationBrexitBorrowingTaxesIRAHamasNATOHezbollah  
Again on BBC #wato, govt minister Gauke won't explain cost of Dementia Tax or Brexit w/o a deal. Yet they accuse Labour of not doing sums! 
Theresa May gives the answer everyone wanted - no Election or Referendum for another 5 years 
Fermanagh South Tyrone has a choice tomorrow between a Tory or a Progressive - a Brexiteer or only anti Brexit candidate @gildernewm X her 
Told by a police officer outside Edgbaston that the Pakistan team bus is formerly Boris Johnson's "£350m back to the NHS" Brexit bus... 
Dont worry I will negotiate #brexit for you #GE2017 
And that is what Brexit is all about. Reducing the rights of British citizens. May has said as much with her comments on human rights law. 
I can't predict this General Election. I'm just going on gut. I predicted Brexit, Trump and Richmond Park fyi on 'gut' too. Here goes  
Who is going to protect #citizensrights of the 1.2m @BritishInEurope post #Brexit if there is no common court to enforce them.  
I didn't see the urgency or need for a Brexit vote but hey, Cameron put it in his manifesto & won an election. That's how it works.  
The day before an election, just heard Theresa May on radio.Policies: 0Magic money tree mentions: 1Coalition of chaos: 2Brexit: A lot. 
#British brewing and #beer sector should also be worried about #TheresaMay 's #Brexit plans : (via @InFactsOrg): 
Trying to gain favour by appeasing Trump has given no bonus. Theresa May failed to lay groundwork for successful #Brexit #ToriesOut #GE17 
Massive mobilisation in support of Catalonia's independence referendum next Sunday in Barcelona. Pep Guardiola will read the manifesto.  
Do you remember that you didn't even bother to turn up to the Brexit vote?!  
If you want to stop Theresa May's extreme Brexit then you need to vote tactically | @eloisetodd  #GE2017 
Theresa May says that in #GE2017 voters have to decide who has "the will and the plan to deliver #Brexit"  
#VoteConservative tomorrow for: a strong economy, strong leadership & the best Brexit deal. #GE2017 
If #Brexit is your main concern in #GE2017 then consider this#VoteLabour 
She’s too busy thinking about Brexit, silly! Whoever called the General Election obviously didn’t think about that… 
#TheresaMay: #Brexit is an opportunity to shape a better, brighter future for the #UK. Back me and I’ll work every day to make it a success! 
May " We have to get #Brexit right "WHAT ? with the team you haveBojo -the clownFox- disgraced former DSDavis - neo conSo HOW exactly ? 
We need a hung parliament to reverse Gadarene stampede over Brexit cliff & expel the most pigheaded PM since Mrs T 
I am backing #TheresaMay & her #Conservative team tomorrow for the sake of #BREXIT! #VoteConservative #BBC #SKY #ITV #RT #NEWS #TORY #UK 
UK would have to declare state of emergency to change human rights laws  HA ! AND MAY WANTS TO LEAD BREXIT ? 
Grayson Perry draws inspiration from #Brexit—and The Art Newspaper—for @SerpentineUK show  @Alan_Measles 
Voters back Sturgeon over Brexit talks | Scotland | The Times & The Sunday Times   
Tory Govt? Labour Govt? Doesn't really matter.  Brexit will blow either manifesto to smithereens. 
Waiting patiently for "Professor who predicted Cameron majority, then, Brexit, then Trump, then Macron, predicts Corbyn landslide" story 
I'm voting #SNPBecause they're working hardest to protect Scotland from disastrous Brexit, & @StephenGethins for championing our place in EU 
The rise of Sadiq Khan​, the Muslim mayor who rattled Donald Trump​  
There is no one better suited and qualified to represent our country in EU Brexit negotiations than @Keir_Starmer 
#Brexit architect @Nigel_Farage says that Muslims in the UK should be put into camps. 
I'm in that liberal internet bubble I was in before brexit and Trump where I was positive they'd lose. Trying not to do the same for Corbyn 
When you go to the ballot box, think first of Brexit | Timothy Garton Ash  
#Brexit & Traitors-patriotism & Brexiteerssome additional material including a bonus comedy @DanielJHannan image 
The General Election is about who can best manage Brexit - and it's not the SNP!  
Someone on my bus is eating meat paste out of the jar with a spoon. And to think I was surprised that Southampton voted Brexit. 
This election we are being offered a choice between two second rate politicians leading dysfunctional parties committed to a Hard Brexit. 
Labour Claim they look after the poor 
Being concerned about the safety of your friends and family and country 
Remember Osborne Treasury's "extraordinary claim" that Brexit would lead to lower house prices?  
#Brexit is like the Suez crisis in 1956 when a Britain with an inflated sense of its power was brought crashing to earth#GE2017 #Remain 
Tory asks "do you want jeremy corbyn to lead the Brexit negotiations" listen to the response  
Well said, John Major. Brexiteers seem frightened of or determined to end discussion on Brexit.  
Cynical attempt by May:diverting attention from threat to continued UK access to EU security databases.Extreme Brexit makes us less safe 2/2 
The Colonial School District's second attempt to pass a $10.9 million referendum was successful Tuesday #netde  
The idea that Britain becomes stronger by giving up its influence in the economic superpower next door is utterly insane.#GE2017 #Brexit 
I'm #SNPBecause I want our views represented in WM and don't want Scotland's voice to disappear into the background during Brexit 
When I was young Britain withdrew from East of Suez, now it withdraws its political influence from East of Dover. #Brexit #GE2017 #GE17 
P37 of manifesto said Tories would keep Human Rights Act until after Brexit and be EU Convention signatories for whole of next parliament. 
Vote tactically against Brexiters. #Brexit is the overriding issue: it threatens security, NHS, economy, the future of the young. 
Many on the continent still don't quite understand why Brexit happened, sending them copies of this would clear all of that up  
I'm #SNPbecause they will stand up for the people of Scotland and our right to choose our own path post Brexit #VoteSNP #GE2017 #indyref2 
NO international currency+Productivity lower than Italy+Skill shortage+ almost NON EXISTENT manufacturing sector=#Brexit is economic suicide  
Show this to anyone who thinks Theresa May's offering 'strong and stable leadership' on Brexit  
After campaigns of fear, remember to vote for who you believe in #GE2017. It's not just #Brexit, it's your future & your children's future  
It's hardly a confidence. Dugdale revealed the "secret" meeting herself, and has repeatedly refused to rule out a second referendum. 
Most uninspiring election I can recall, but one of the most important. For Brexit’s sake, looks like we’ll reluctantly elect Theresa Plank. 
What Labour (and their media enablers) offer is a Marxist putsch which will wreck the economy, derail #Brexit and encourage terrorism. 
How is Britain going to complete the complex task of Brexit in 2 years, when it cannot produce a half-decent White Paper after 6 months? 
Divided Britain: #Brexit art show by Grayson Perry opens in time for UK election. Via @ReutersTV  #GE2017 
Unlike Theresa May, Daesh (ISIS) understands perfectly that #Brexit harms our security #GE2017 #GeneralElection 
Fantastic endorsement in North Norfolk News. Helen backs me to stand up for North Norfolk in Brexit negotiations and on schools, NHS & care.  
OECD unkind to Tories - hard Brexit notions will harm Britain's economy, which needs Labour-style public investment  
May claimed that #Brexit was the defining issue for #GE2017 but has been surprisingly silent on the details 
Number of European nurse registrations has fallen by 90% since referendum. Not good.  
I say vote *strategically* to prevent disastrous Brexit  #GE2017 @InFactsOrg @BestForBritain @NSoames @BestForBritain 
Plans? Tory Manifesto is an uncosted shambles. Brexit plan unworkable. NHS plan will privatise it. #ToriesOut #GE2017 #SaveOurNHS #Ge17 
BloggedThe general election and BrexitComparing party manifestos:  
Lyn Brown, the new Shadow Home Secretary, also voted against Article 50 and wants Brexit to be reversible  
.@RuthDavidsonMSP : "We have one last chance tomorrow to say No to a second referendum" #GE2017 
The Tories conjured this Brexit bullshit and I will vote against them to the day I die. Then I will vote against them in zombie elections. 
Voting #SNPbecause they're the only party I trust to give Scotland a voice in Brexit negotiations, and will fight to end austerity  
Theresa May has a plan for Brexit and beyond. #VoteConservative tomorrow for strong, stable leadership in the national interest. 
Protocol 1 Article 3 violated in EU referendum re expats >15 years residence abroad. Referendum result void.  
I'm #SNPbecause they are the only Party that will stand up for Scotland against a hard right wing Tory brexit.  
A final reminder before the #GE2017  to #Oxford commuters of their #European identity @OxfordStays @EUflagsinOxford @EUflagmafia #Brexit  
Voters back Sturgeon over Brexit talks  
An end to austerity, a strong Scottish voice in Brexit negotiations, a challenge to status quo and no to Trident renewal #SNPbecause 
May can't even condemn a leader who slanders the Mayor of London hours after a terror attack, and she's going to be tough on Brexit? #GE2017 
Illuminating detail from today's YouGov poll in @thetimesscot: voters back Sturgeon's demands for a seat at table in Brexit negotiations. 
Watch watch watch! Nothing else matters more than this... Sod Brexit negotiations, 5 more years of austerity & cuts etc...SAVE THE NHS!!!! x  
Even #DailyMail promoting tactical voting! But recommend @BestForBritain website to vote against an extreme Brexit 
UK election shld be debate about Brexit taking UK into uncharted food zone. UK doesn't feed itself. 29% food from EU. Where next? Silence! 
This is how to vote to stop Brexit  
'United by a healthy suspicion of human rights': Alan Partridge on Britishness post-Brexit – audio  
"Put country before party. Vote strategically, to prevent Britain crashing on to the Brexit rocks."  Please RT.  
For a strong economy, we have to get Brexit right. #VoteConservative tomorrow to back Theresa May’s Plan for Brexit.  
Brexit crucial election issue.  Vote to get Keir Starmer as our negotiator:  that's Labour! 
Regardless which poll is right #CurseTheresaMay has worked. Jeremy Corbyn or Boris Johnson will be prime minister for Brexit. May is over  
This is from April. Isn't it, um, exactly the same as Nicola Sturgeon's position? (Indyref2 when "there is clarity on what Brexit means".)  
#r4today ridiculous interview of Tory attack lines from Humphrey. Only proves that we absolutely need Kier Starmer in charge of Brexit 
Only Theresa May and her Conservative team can get the best Brexit deal for Britain. #VoteConservative tomorrow. 
Sturgeon demands a seat at the Brexit negotiations.Who on earth would trust her with ANY confidential information?#kezgate 
This letter to FT on Brexit transition periods (and money)  
.@MarinaHyde brilliant on Boris:"the only untruth he corrected in the referendum campaign was that he dyes his hair"  
Brexit for me is the big one. Terrorism and security thing is a side issue and I trust Labour MPs and Keir Starmar over rabid David Davis 
We need my good friend @RupaHuq back in parliament to fight for our NHS services, school funding, and against a Hard Brexit. #VoteLabour 
Column: On the eve of a poll called to accelerate Brexit our affinity with Europe feels more compelling than ever  
Does leave you wondering what would have happened in the EU referendum if he'd done all this back then  
Roll on Thursday..... we need to crack on & focus on getting the BEST BREXIT deal....  
Tory manifesto: We won't repeal Human Rights Act until Brexit.May 2 days to election:I'll rip up HRA#GE2017 
Bloomberg exclusive: Labour is understood to be privately preparing to lose the election  
LibDem leader Tim Farron will take aim at Theresa May's plan for Brexit in a speech in Oxford.  
'Speaking in tongues': in an age of Brexit and closing borders we need to embrace multilingualism  via @Independent 
Could an anti-Brexit Independent unseat the Tories in their rural heartland? #GE2017 
Theresea May is a Muppet. "She's lying to you"#Brexit & Human Rights aren't your concern. You'll get your P45 on June 8#JC4PM #GE2017 
Theresa May has a plan for Brexit and beyond. #VoteConservative tomorrow to get the best deal for Britain. 
When you go to the ballot box, think first of Brexit | Timothy Garton Ash  
To secure Brexit, we must re-elect the Conservatives tomorrow, write @matthew_elliott and @isaby 
If this is right - and we've been told Brexit wouldn't affect security - this alone is reason to stop Brexit immediately.  
Even the weather knows that nothing's strong and stable and that Brexit is for overturning.  
Make your plan to vote now. Your vote decides who will be PM & lead our Brexit negotiations-Theresa May or Corbyn:  
Nick Clegg cogently explaining why May's Brexit will make us all less safe. Besting John Humphries too, which is a rare sound. #r4today 
Nick Clegg says Brexit will mean UK will lose access to the EU Schengen database that flagged up London Bridge bomber tried to go to Syria 
Tim Farron's cooking a Brexit-themed breakfast for reporters this morning in Solihull on the final day on the trail  
"In security policy, a successful Brexit requires navigating a load of hazards caused only by Brexit." @rafaelbehr 
Ruth Davidson: Jeremy Corbyn's views on second independence referendum 'naive and dangerous'  
May's last minute U-turn. How she vowed to rip up human rights and her manifesto pledge not to scrap Human Rights Act before Brexit.  
Voices on @bbc5live this morning. Not one so far making obvious point: no party citing ANY benefit of Brexit anymore. Just disaster control. 
This should have been the Remain argument.It is still true.#Brexit  
Ruth Davidson: Jeremy Corbyn's views on second independence referendum 'naive and dangerous'  
'We need control of our borders' Theresa May gets back to Brexit after London attack  
If this is the result, we face the nightmare of May's extreme #Brexit. For the good of the nation: vote tactically against Brexit #GE2017 
This day was always coming. From the moment we voted for #Brexit & chucked Cameron & Osborne out on their arses ... Brexit needs a MANDATE.  
Brexit showed me never to underestimate the utter fucking stupidity of a huge swathe of the electorate. I fear the same tomorrow 
Excellent, a hung Parliament won't vote for it without another referendum. 
Brexit all boils down to FOM & ECJ. Corbyn and May don't want them.But without them, it's Hard Brexit & WTO rules.It's really that simple 
The radio jingles for the 1967 Referendum featuring the voice of @roryodonoghue 
On my way to College Green to debate BREXIT with the splendid Richard Griffiths & BBC WORLD'S excellent James Menendez at 5.30am 
June to decide future of May !#UKElection2017 to be held on 8th June will decide strength of PM Theresa May in dealing with #Brexit issues 
Overseas investors would be reluctant to commit cash to Britain, but over time, most would assume a softer Brexit  
They said that if I opposed Brexit then the U.K. would go full Orwell. They were right.  
I am pleased to announce that the Wheeler School and PHS Paving Projects Referendum has passed by an overwhelming majority#PlainvilleRocks 
First came the Brexit drama now it's time for the farce :(  Britain’s Voyage to Inglorious Isolation, via @nytimes 
A1:  We all worked together to help pass a referendum! #d100chat #community #d100pride 
For an election seen as a referendum on Trump, he was barely mentioned in tonight's debate >  
BREAKING: Referendum passes in the Colonial School District. Unofficial totals, 5,742 for, 3,880 against. #eduDE 
Sir Bob Geldof says Lib Dems are only party with 'the balls to oppose Brexit'  
Leaked docs show UK lobbying to weaken EU climate targets despite Brexit - Energydesk  
All Brexit has done is turn Wesminster towards Corperate America, all that will happen now is it will free up arms deals & feed Corperates 
Theresa May's Manifesto-Farce Tax-Bombshell Corbyn-Avoiding Police-Cuts NHS-Crisis Poll-Collapsing Brexit Shambles  
Is that like having Brexit in Scotland whatever people think?Doh  
."Brexit will sacrifice Scottish jobs to English prejudices".#GE2017 #ScotRef 
."Majority of voters agree with Sturgeon & her demands for Scotland to have a seat at Brexit negotiating table". 
A MESSAGE TO THE YOUNG:BrexitTrumpTerrorThis is the fucked-up world the oldies are giving you.Vote for your own world on Thursday! 
She expects a place in the Brexit negotiation room yet decides to disclose nature of a private telephone call with a fellow politician... 
Dugdale's vehement anti-referendum stance is an "evolution" from her position a year ago. Nicola's version is not hard to believe.  
Nicola Sturgeon claims Kezia Dugdale supported IndyRef2 after Brexit. Now, why would she do that? Hmmmm. :-)   
HERALD: Sturgeon referendum bombshell #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Those who love #BRITAIN & want #BREXIT to be a success! must #VOTE for @theresa_may! One VOTE One CHOICE! #GE2017 #BBC #SKY #UK #TORY #RT 
Kezia Dugdale should absolutely do what she said to the FM she would after #Brexit: embrace independence and #indyref2 #GE2017 #ScotDebates 
Voters want to move beyond Brexit - Labour’s Liam Byrne tells #newsnight #GE2017 
Give me choice between starmer & Davis on Brexit, I'll take starmer. Davis not let out as he'd have to explain his 90 days detention stance 
THE NATIONAL: 'Kezia told me Labour would back Indyref2 after Brexit vote' #tomorrowspaperstoday 
Q: With #brexit negotiations due to start on Jun 19, who negotiates if there's a hung parliament and no coalition deal? @Number10cat et al.? 
A reminder to Leavers; Farage said a 52/48 Remain victory would be unfinished business.#GE2017 #Brexit #Remain 
Another Leaver who doesn't understand that democracy is the right to campaign against any govt, majority or decision. #Brexit #GE2017 
Newspaper articles from #Brexit time support @NicolaSturgeon 's assertion on @kezdugdale contemplating independence. 
Top #FinTech hashtags!1-#Blockchain2-#Bitcoin3-#Startups4-#Payments5-#Brexit6-#RegTechvia onalytica 
Just what is the incredible plan for Brexit, the Tories are boasting about. Please tell me, I genuinely don't know! #brexitshambles 
Frit and Brexit  
Endorsements of Mrs May by the papers that championed Brexit may well be taken with a pinch of salt by their now not so gullible readers. 
On the 19th June. Which team do you want starting the Brexit negotiations?Professionals vs clowns.#VoteLabour#GE2017 
2 months before #Brexit and Kez Dugdale contemplating voting for independence. #scotnight @ScotlandTonight 
Has anyone stopped to think that everyone seems unhappy now. I think it is Austerity, Brexit, and terrorism. We can reverse all. 
Sturgeon says May is a “very difficult person to establish rapport with” and she'll struggle in Brexit negotiations.  
Nicola Sturgeon: Labour's secret plan to back second independence referendum  
Interesting that there are more calls than usual for tactical voting in #GE2017 , partly because of #Brexit  
Nicola Sturgeon says 'difficult' Theresa May will struggle with Brexit talks  
Here's a fact, Brexit is actually undeliverable.  
The best definition of #brexit I've seen.  
An international negotiator writes of Theresa May as "having less emotional intelligence than anybody I have ever observed"#GE2017 #Brexit  
The winner of tonight`s tartan tadger award for repeating the "second divisive referendum" catchphrase the most tonight is...Wullie Rennie!  
How stupid are we ? 
The Brexit Secretary triggered a by-election over extending detention beyond 28 days. So he'll resign again, I presume? Or he's a hypocrite.  
Nicola Sturgeon once told me privately an independence referendum would be once in a generation ... Shhh don't tell anyone  
when the good friday agreement is in doubt because of brexit the tories revisit the troubles and propose scrapping human rights 
Unionists were told flying the Union flag on designated days was a democratic decision, get over it. Well, here's one for you. So was Brexit 
This is an enjoyably strange row because we all remember Labour took a while to decide their position post-brexit vote. 
But in April 2016 you said it was "not inconceivable" that you could back independence in the event of Brexit?  
May was anti human rights till Brexit; then triangulated to being pro; now tacking against because of polls. "Shallow" hardly does justice 
Tomorrow's front page: Nicola Sturgeon says Kezia told her Scottish Labour wouldn't oppose indyref2 in the days after Brexit vote  
Young people should have a say in their future - Greens will give the public a final say on Brexit deal with option to remain. #BBCDebate 
Had forgotten this, two days after EU referendum ...  
Didn't  those same markets think there was NO chance of Brexit last June?  
I trust the people to decide whether the Brexit deal is good enough. So does @timfarron. Do you? #BBCDebate #VoteLibDem #IAgreeWithTim 
#VoteSNP on Thursday to strengthen Scotland's hand in Brexit talks to protect 80,000 jobs. Read more:  #ScotDebates 
The Tories are clueless they don't have a plan for Brexit, the @LibDems will give you a choice on your future #VoteLibDem #bbcdebate 
.@LibDems want you to have your choice over your future. You should have your say on the Brexit deal in a referendum #BBCDebate #VoteLibDem 
SF secured support of full EU Parliament 4 the protecting the GFA in Brexit not bad for 4 MEPs when did the SDLP win a vote in Westminster? 
3/4 of Labour MPs backed the Tories + voted to start the Brexit process. How many Lib Dems backed Article 50? Zero #BBCDebate #VoteLibDem 
Willie Rennie doesn't trust the Conservatives on Brexit. I don't trust the Conservatives on anything. #ScotDebates 
When Brexit finally dies this should be its epitaph ...  
Nicola Sturgeon says 'difficult' Theresa May will struggle with Brexit talks  
PS - above rant in blog form (1st draft)Brexit and Traitors 
The only good thing about Brexit is it is so stupid that it has united the Europeans. And still Briton doesn't get it. 
FM: “We should be demanding more of a say, as Scotland, in the Brexit negotiations. You used to support that.” #ScotDebates #VoteSNP #GE17 
.@brianpaddick says EU nurses going back to Europe: staff registering in UK falls by 90% since referendum #BBCDebate 
"You spoke with me after the EU referendum and told me you thought Labour should stop opposing a referendum" #ScotDebates Quote of the night 
Sturgeon says @kezdugdale told she'd support indyref after the Brexit vote last year. You can't trust Labour with the Union #ScotDebates 
Explosive revelation from @NicolaSturgeon post-Brexit call with @kezdugdale. #ScotDebates #GE17 
Whaaaat. Sturgeon claims Kezia Dugdale told her in person after the Brexit vote that Labour should drop its opposition to #IndyRef2. 
I've met Nigel Farage a few times and by far he's the most honest politician I've met in many a year 
The only reason we're having this bloody election now is so @theresa_may doesn't have to go to the polls after a shit awful #Brexit deal 
We didn't need the EU referendum, we didn't need a general election, but we really don't need 5 yrs more of Tories.  
#Labour's Secretary of State for #Brexit: Sir Keir Starmer KCB QCHuman rights lawyer & former DPP & head of the CPS 
no fear of that! I am a Canadian and British dual citizen,and I am very much in favour of Brexit for the sake of the UK and the Commonwealth 
Ruth 2016:Brexit will be a disaster Kezia 2016:Corbyn will be a disaster Ruth 2017:Brexit will be great Kezia 2017:Corbyn will be great 
The SDLP are having EU on regarding voting against Brexit at Westminster - Sinn Féin delivers elsewhere #GE17 
Visit by @timfarron to the farm of Mark and Helen Williams in Montgomeryshire with the hot topic being Brexit  
Theresa May's Brexit plans could limit the chances of Britain's young generation. Only one party offers you an alternative. #VoteLibDem 
Introducing the BEST GODDAMN BREXIT NEGOTIATION TEAM IN THE WORLD!  
You've got to laugh. Tories called an election when they should be focusing on Brexit. #ScotDebates #GE17 
Nicola Sturgeon said there wouldn't be another referendum unless Scots wanted one. #ScotDebates 
Because the Tories and Brexit are destroying their educational and life prospects. 
.@theresa_may with @BorisJohnson in Slough calling on people to vote Conservative for strong, stable leadership through Brexit & beyond  
A second independence referendum was already passed through the Scottish Parliament. Scotland democratically voted for it. #ScotDebates 
What does Ruth Davidson support? Rape clause Hard Brexit More austerity#ScotDebates 
Britain is being led to an epic act of national self-harm over Brexit | Will Hutton  
Juncker wants CORBYN to win election so Labour can undo Brexit, voters warned Well of course he does! 
37) That is the reality of Brexit and the “Patriots” rant off/ 
Dozens of EU uni staff quit Edinburgh after Brexit vote  
Brexit is madness  
When the SDLP say they're at Westminster protecting you from Brexit they're having EU on #GE17 
They can ban football supporters from traveling abroad But it's ok for terrorist to come back to Britain Political correctness Stikes again 
19) But of course we still have our special relationship with the USA.  Our strongest ally, our greatest international Brexit cheerleader. 
15) Foreign investors are getting (more) nervous.  Our exchange rates reflect how the world sees us post Brexit  
Nick Clegg backs plan for Britons to keep EU citizenship after Brexit if they want it  
Hi @Theresa_MayJust watched your "I believe in Brexit" broadcast.You should see a doctor. I think you may be suffering from dementia.  
Paul Nuttall is showing true British grit in asking UKIP members to back Theresa May's vision of Brexit. He knows that divided we have lost.  
.A good omen for #GE2017 on ThursdayLet's blow down May's 'House of Straw'!Let's overturn May's hard Brexit!. 
Sinn Féin have achieved much against Brexit in the Dáil & across Europe than the SDLP ever will at Westminster #GE17 
Final Q&A of the campaign in Ecclesall tonight. Taking questions on Brexit, young people, and housing.  
Brexit Q #ESHustings No reason to believe May will get a good deal, we need single market, science funding & security cooperation 
Next question asks why haven't the 'liars' in EU referendum campaign been prosecuted #ESHustings. Live Blog: 
So we're going to be living in Brexit Britain and also have no human rights. Sounds great. 
Seriously, if @LibDems have a shot in your constituency, vote for themWe were lied to about Brexit@LibDemPress 
It looks like UKIP voters are going to hand Theresa May the win- making sure Brexit happens seems to be the priority  
Tactical voting just to "to beat the Tories" isn't enough. We need it to bring about a hung parliament and coalition that can halt Brexit. 
In 2010 @rahulmansi was furious with us but this Thursday he will #VoteLibDem because we're the only party with a strong voice on Brexit.  
The reason Alliance wants a special Brexit deal for NI is to provide stability and to protect a shared society. A hard Brexit undermines NI. 
 Alternative War #snowmanMy live investigation into Russia, Trump, and Brexit in one place.Via @Byline_Media 
Brexit: One small step for control. One giant leap backward for everything else.  
Dear Theresa, tx for yr letter. The printable part of my answer is printed in tomorrow's @guardiancif .TGA #brexit #Maybot #election2017 
."EVERY objective analysis shows a hard Brexit will be followed by GREATER poverty, RISING inequality"#GE2017 
All elections are important but this feels more so, with social services in trouble, Brexit looming, & a culture where persona trumps policy 
In an age of Brexit and closing borders we need to embrace multilingualism | The Independent  
Brexit is a sham, neither government nor official opposition know what they're doing and #GE2017 a poorly thought-out unnecessary diversion. 
Remember when it was seen as absurd that Corbyn could benefit from the political re-ordering brought on by Brexit?  
Marginalisation, mental illness, climate change, Brexit, Trump...I just know it's definitely not that *other* thing.  
In 2016, UK media cast Remain as an almost-sure thing despite polls showing a very tight/uncertain Brexit vote. Then blamed polls afterward.  
The election is Theresa May's "two-month audition for conducting the Brexit negotiations." Should she get the job?  
7K views for Tory Brexit/Farming film + lots of feedback. Seems to have struck chord with Scottish farming community  
Once more for clarity. If Lib Dems, SNP & Greens don't get enough seats there's no hung Parliament. And no hung parliament means Hard Brexit 
So @theresa_may you're losing the #GE2017 on Social Care, Housing, Security & Economy, fancy making it about #Brexit again?#VoteLabour 
Another good reason we voted for Brexit, EU immigrants interfering with UK democracy thinking they can dictate to us  
For friends in rest of UK intrigued by Scottish Labour's decline, this ceaseless focus on the referendum, not challenging Tory govt, is why:  
Bob Geldof: Lib Dems are the only party with the balls to oppose Brexit  
8 great reasons to #VoteConservative on Thursday-from getting the best Brexit deal to more housing and more funding for schools and health.  
"Editorial: Keir Starmer is the right person to negotiate Brexit"  
Gina Millar has gone quiet? Where are all the Remoaners?Something afoot? #Brexit in danger?#VoteConservative, let's get it done.#GE2017 
Labour under this leadership has most popular position on Brexit nationally. But for sabotage of own MPs would have cut through earlier 
It would actually b quite nice if the Tories boasted about their Brexit plan. We might get some detail on what it is  
If St Theresa cannot run an election campaign, called by her with 20 point lead, she won't be able to secure the "best" Brexit deal. 
No doubt, equally literally, this "incredible" Brexit plan will have a "fantastic" outcome. 
Who will negotiate #Brexit:LAB: Sir Keir Starmer QC - Leading lawyer of generation.CON: David Davis - Thinks 'No Deal' is decent option. 
Brexit negotiator?  Keir Starmer's your man.  Good reason to vote labour. 
The U.K. won't un-invite Trump. Thanks to the Brexit brain snap, they need a trade deal so they need to kiss his orange ass. 
May's weak and wobbly campaign's crashed, an overturned Tory "best Brexit deal" Ad Van shutting the M6. It's a sign!  
For a Brexit that prioritises jobs, our economy and workers' rights #VoteLabour on 8 June. Take a look at our plan and RT ↓ 
I preferred Our Incredible Plan For Brexit in their early, indie phase. 
ICYMI this chap Tony Nog makes terrific sense on the case against Hard Brexit that //should// be getting airtime...  
Finally: Brexit explained.  
My (non party-political) thread on why May is the wrong person for the Brexit job.  
But you won't get Brexit right. So no. 
If we get Brexit right, we can do great things as a country. Vote for me and my team to deliver a brighter future for everyone.  
Brexit: Nick Clegg is first senior UK politician to back calls for Britons to retain EU citizenship  
A Tory source on the party's lack of celeb endorsements: "Labour can boost about celebs, we can boast about our incredible plan for Brexit." 
Clegg lets fly at the Con/Lab Brexit coalition 
Labour is understood to be privately preparing to lose Thursday's election  
Labour is now the most trusted party to lead the Brexit negotiations amongst Remain voters #ge2017  
Apparently @NicolaSturgeon admits a vote for SNP isn't a vote for another referendum but a vote for a neverendum.  
"Hi Nan, I know I wished you dead for backing Brexit but can you do me a big one and vote for a man who refuses to condemn the IRA? Nan...?"  
.@YvetteCooperMP says Theresa May risks undermining UK safety by making security cooperation part of Brexit talks  
When was Emily ever called an "ape in lipstick" by a fellow member of Parliament? Or sexually harassed by the Brexit Secretary? Fuck off. 
‘Karma’s a b*tch!’ Chuck Todd whines about GOP’s plan to make 2018 a ‘referendum on media’  
Remember this old story? President dumps press pool. Same day he meets with 2 swing state gov's & Mr. Brexit. Hmmm.  
.@nick_clegg: There has been a pact of silence on Brexit between Theresa May and Jeremy Corbyn  
UK (Scotland): Independence Referendum, YouGov poll:Yes: 43% (-2)No: 57% (+2)#indyref2 #Brexit #ScotRef 
Anything but a Conservative victory will see the referendum result “diluted", says a group of leading academics  
What's the naughtiest thing May did? She said"we used to run through fields of wheat." Wrong, it's to mislead us through Brexit thickets 
Campaigning in #Slough with @MarkVivis @Conservatives @theresa_may - Some great discussions with residents on #extremism #brexit & #aviation 
May & Corbyn have an unspoken pact of silence on Brexit, but voters deserve the truth. My @Independent column: 
People were promised a cost-free Brexit. This is starting to unravel. Vote against a destructive Brexit on Thursday:  
Labour would be bad for Brexit!  
As the #Brexit lunacy is doing to the UK.  
Vote tactically. A hung parliament gives greater purchase to anti-#Brexit. We'll stop/reverse Brexit anyway: but let's do it sooner. 
 IS there any chance that @theresa_may could talk about BREXIT ? Apparently that's why she called a snap Election 
My article w @ProfJMitchell on 'Brexit and Scotland' now available online in the BJIPR . Truly impressive turnaround. 
#VoteConservative on Thursday to help secure a brighter future, through Brexit and beyond.  
On #DDay73 I remember what my generation fought for and achieved but what was lost with #brexit  
Opinion: Corbyn's victory – still improbable – would constitute punishment of the Tories for the disaster of Brexit  
Arts education is a postcode lottery. Britain must invest for post-Brexit theatre | Nicholas Hytner  
Tories want a right wing Utopia.Labour want a left wing Utopia.I just want a ref on the final Brexit deal with an option to remain. 
Nick Clegg backs plan for Britons to keep EU citizenship after Brexit if they want it  
Only the .@Conservatives will deliver the full Brexit which the people voted for, and bring back full control of our territorial waters.  
Theresa May: we should be focusing on Brexit negotiationsAlso Theresa May: Now seems like a good time for an election  
Thread.However pro-EU your Labour candidate is personally, they're running on a Hard Brexit manifesto, with a Hard Brexit leadership.  
A deep dive into how the May-Timothy-Hill triumvirate govern Britain – can they pull off Brexit?  
So who do you want to represent Britain in the Brexit negotiations?Pic via @JillyBallantyne.#GE2017 #Brexit  
UK households cut back as Brexit effect on pound hits living costs  
My piece for @lemondefr (apols paywall) re this non Brexit Brexit election and how we should be with Macron/Merkel 
The doom-monger #Brexit catastrophists should read this excellently sensible piece by @pietercleppe 
SPOTTED: Corbyn fights rain with Brexit umbrella. 
Only Theresa May can provide the strong and stable leadership needed to get us the best Brexit deal. #VoteConservative on Thursday. 
In EU referendum 64% of young people turned out to vote. We need them to beat that. And vote tactically #ge2017  
UK business worried about Tory win‘No deal is better than a bad deal’ Brexit mantra, immigration among top concerns 
.@theresa_may in Stoke-on-Trent speaking about her plans for a secure nation through Brexit & beyond #GE2017 
This has not been a Brexit election. But the result will determine what Brexit deal we get, says @Keir_Starmer  
Whats naughtier than running in fields of wheat with friends?1. Hard Brexit2. Fox hunting 3. Lying about having friends #GE17 #GE2017 
WATCH - "Forced on to the defensive, unable to debate"@emilymorganitv damning on the woman wants to lead Brexit but can't face questions  
Nicola Sturgeon flounders when challenged on Brexit demands she "can't deliver"  
On Thursday the 8th, #GE2017 Who are you going to #VOTE for to SAVE OUR #BREXIT! #BBC #SKY #ITV #UK #UKIP #CONSERVATIVE #TORY #LABOUR #NEWS 
Brexit negotiations.... Who to pick? Hmmm.... lemme think...  
Brexit news is not just of growing risks to UK economy but also to its security, 'control' and morality. Chilling warning in The Times:  
'Bout this close to polling stations opening last year that a leading member of Twitterati claimed they didn't know a single Brexit voter. 
We don't need Brexit at any cost. We don't need tax breaks for the rich. We don't need more intrusive privacy/surveillance laws. 
Theresa May is basically my dad:"Brexit means Brexit""Enough is enough" &"Where are all the pens in this house?" 
Tomorrow @The3Million & @BritishInEurope meet with @GermanyDiplo in Berlin to discuss German & EU stance on #citizensrights post #Brexit  
HIYA, if anyone wants to talk to me about how Trump/Brexit/other elections have impacted their mental health, DM! #journorequest 
This Thursday you have a choice between an extreme Brexit, and voting for a Parliament that will represent us all.  
It is nothing than no more  election in Biafra Land,and it has been declared unless they conduct #Referendum.#Biafrexit. 
The SNP needs to address its chaotic stance on fishing as all 59 @ScotTories candidates sign Brexit pledge#GE2017 
May has crashed under pressure of the election campaign How can she be trusted to negotiate Brexit?Far better - Corbyn and Starmer 
Ex-Ukip MEP @goddersbloom turns tables on Gina Miller for having NO mandate on Brexit during dinner date  
Vote for Theresa May and her team to get the best Brexit deal for you and your family. Every vote will strengthen her negotiating hand.  
Remember folks, you can help prevent a third referendum by voting YES in the second one. 
"...Owen, you called us old and thick for voting for Brexit, now you want us to vote for that nutter Corbyn? Don't call us again..." clunk.. pic.twitter.com/1heZ3Bs8f9 
Nick Clegg condemns Theresa May for putting Britain's safety at risk after Brexit  
May's "promise of Brexit" of course lacks actual detail of who, how & -crucially- in return for what.Read @Vidya_Ram on India's 'promise'.  
Well done Hugh Grant for supporting @SimonHughes. We need him and many more @LibDems in the Parliament to stop hard Brexit. #GE2017 
What we need to do about our #SubwayWoes: Make the 2018 NYS governor's race a referendum on the plans to fix/improve our subways & buses.  
He best thing that could happen is a hung parliament. It would force pragmatism over ideology when it comes to Brexit.  
WATCH @Theresa_May needs to give answers on Brexit & our future security arrangements, trade & more. @Nick_Clegg is right to demand answers: 
Heartbreaking stories of EU nationals who decided to leave the UK post #Brexit. Must read blog by @AndyBodle 
Boris Johnson urges Brits to believe in the huge potential of Brexit  
Despite lie that @Conservatives have been selling that Abbott will negotiate Brexit if Labour win, it's actually Sir Keir Starmer QC #GE2017 
Theresa May has a plan for Brexit and beyond. #VoteConservative to get the best Brexit deal for Britain.  
#GE17 may seem less frivolous, but leaders fail the UK public on Brexit as news of financial disaster  gets worse. 
The traditional 1,000 CEOs Write To The Telegraph In Support Of The Tories letter hasn't appeared yet. Why in brexit might that be?  
First gov. needs to be very clear that the Brexit supporters were sold a pup. The remaining fight then is only with a few stubborn thickies. 
So who does he think will be ultimate guarantor of the 1m UK citizens living elsewhere in EU? Labour's brexit stance truly pisses me off.  
Boris Johnson criticising Corbyn over Brexit - this from a man so untrusted to negotiate they appointed a whole separate minister for Brexit 
PM "wants it to be about Brexit and yet again and again... what she is challenged over is this reduction in police numbers" @BBCNormanS 
The liberal Democrats bet on a Brexit election. It hasn't paid off 
#VoteConservative on 8 June for: a strong economy, strong leadership, stable government & the best Brexit deal.  
Seriously, who gives a fuck about brexit when the Tories are responsible for 30,000 deceased disabled Brits?  
RT Just imagine Labour in charge of police, brexit, armed forces, the economy. We are on the brink of 1 of the worst governments in history  
Nasty, chip on the shoulder article which confirms I was right to stop voting for Labour at last election. Tories & Brexit now. 
#Brexit Vote Green to keep free movement within EU - young shouldn't have less freedom than their elders #Sheffield  
Food and farming knowledge 'not essential' to help shape post-Brexit agricultural policy, says Defra job advert  
A principled stance, irrespective of party allegiance there's no place for a fox hunting Brexiteer in a modern world 
I am thanks. That's why I'm not voting for a party that's advocating Hard Brexit. Ta  
Boris stumbles & appears to compare terrorists to the EU, forced to quickly correct. I don't want this man anywhere near Brexit negotiations  
#TheresaMay has threatened to stop cooperation with #Europol and the #EU on #terrorattacks, as part of her negotiation strategy for #Brexit.  
#LBC FFS Nick Clegg on talking doom & gloom doing anything he can to stop Brexit ,17 million voted leave you imbecile go away you bore. 
If you think you are voting for May because she will be able negotiate a Brexit deal - get out. She can't even hold her own in a debate. 
Boris Johnson speaking now. Brexit now front and centre of Tory campaign slogan behind. You can hear shouts of "Tories out!" from outside.  
however people vote on Thursday and whatever the result the stop Brexit debate is still on. As the chaos unfolds ... 
Labour Shadow Home Secretary Diane Abbott can even have a car crash when she's "ill" with a touch of the Brexit flu @BBCWomansHour 
At conference listening to Brexit panel. Business audience asked for show of hands on Brexit confidence. Zero hands up. Can/must be stopped 
Are you standing with Theresa May? RETWEET to show you're backing Theresa May to get the best Brexit deal - and secure a brighter future.  
Avoid the division of another divisive independence referendum by turning every election into a divisive argument about whether to have one. 
With today's Brexit interview, Labour has effectively ABANDONED every UK expat in the EU, and every EU expat in the UK. 
.@thatginamiller on LBC. May can't face debates in the election she called, how can she get a good deal on #Brexit  
Brexit?  
Nick Clegg accuses Labour and Tories of Brexit 'pact of silence'  
At the local level, the effect of the Brexit referendum is hard to detect. Why?  
Great to see @nick_clegg spelling out the realities of #Brexit this morning. Both Tories and Labour full of sound bites. #VoteLibDem pic.twitter.com/VMkZXJ7JCU 
27. And so if May wins on Thursday,Tories would be sensible to replace her as soon as possible, if Brexit is to go as well as it can./ends 
Just like the Tories, Labour are chasing unicorns on Brexit. Their leaders are as deluded as Davis & May.  
26. No doubt May is a good political cavalry officer, the one to lead a charge. But Brexit requires wise generalship. Strategy not tactics. 
Brexit has already started to make UK citizens poorer | @swatdhingraLSE & Thomas Sampson @CEP_LSE 
Hard #Brexit could damage UK’s world-class #museums, say leading directors  @britishmuseum @V_and_A @Tate @UAL 
24.  No complex task is thought-through. Just loud, headline-grabbing charges at easy objectives. CSA, Qatada, Brexit - see the pattern? 
Delivering a smooth, orderly exit from the EU is central to our 12-point plan for Brexit. Find out more:  
If I'm elected I want to be on Theresa May's Brexit negotiation team.   
It was nice of them to make a visual of @theresa_may literally taking us off the Brexit cliff edge. #GE17  
.@WingsScotland using solidarity with London and Manchester terror victims and distorting it to relate to the referendum. Disgusting.  
Not to forget the prospective Brexit Secretaries. this campaign has been small in focus and weak on detail all round 
Theresa May would restore the Board of Trade to make sure the benefits of Brexit are spread equally across the UK  
A key part of our 12-point plan for Brexit is continuing in the fight against crime & terrorism. More:  
UKIP's @Tim_Aker: If elected MP I will push to be on Britain's Brexit negotiation team.  
Clegg "Negotiating Brexit is going to be a tightrope act....we are being asked to elected a leader who is ...prone to chaotic u-turns" 
A Tory vote is a vote for the #Brexit of these men.Patriotic and good for the people of Britain it is not!#GE2017 #GE17 #GeneralElection 
Brexit Weather 
.@nick_clegg talks of "grip of a growing Brexit squeeze on people’s income and public services tightening" #GE2017 
.@nick_clegg is right to say that the Brexit squeeze is upon us, with inflation outstripping wage growth 
Ensuring the UK remains the best place for science & innovation is key to our 12-point plan for Brexit. More:  
I've seen many friends speak at @skillsmatter. Today I see @nick_clegg is passionately speaking for the @LibDems on #Brexit there!  
LibDems buying @facebook ads saying in Welsh @Plaid_Cymru "is backing extreme Brexit". Looking forward to articles about "dark targeting". 
10. May's experience with discrete EU Justice and Home Affairs opt ins and outs no doubt explains why she thinks Brexit is an easy task. 
Clegg calls the situation "so desperately serious" and claims May & Corbyn have "identikit" approach to Brexit 
No Prime Minister is suited to be a #Brexit Prime Minister ... unless they go into politics specifically to destroy the UK 
this aint a 12 point 'plan' for brexit, it's a series of slogans. no certainty or clarity here.  
Securing new trade agreements around the world is central to our 12-point Brexit plan. More:  
The insane hypocrisy of Tory ministers saying 'let's get on with it' about Brexit. You already triggered Article 50 you unspeakable muppets. 
1. Some thoughts about why Theresa May is ill-suited to be a Brexit prime minister. 
Ensuring free trade with European markets is a key part of our 12-point plan for Brexit. Find out more:  
Today's @ScotNational piece on how Tory 'No Deal' Brexit rhetoric shows they aren't taking this election seriously: 
Conservatives pledge to resurrect 'Board of Trade' to build post-Brexit deals.  
DAILY REMINDER FOR PRESERVATION OF SANITY: UK voted Tory, voted Brexit, voted against electoral reform. Lets be ready for a difficult Friday 
#DianeAbbott has probably got one of her 'Brexit migraines'. She is just not up to the job of front-line politics.  
Here's what all the main parties are saying about Brexit #BBCDebate #GE2017 
2019 ... Post #Brexit "YOU MANIACS! YOU BROKE IT UP! AH, DAMN YOU! GOD DAMN YOU ALL TO HELL!!!!"  
“Enough is enough.”, “Terrorism breeds terrorism.” It’s the same baby language as “Brexit means Brexit”,  
Strengthening the Union is central to our 12-point plan for Brexit. Find out more:  
Breaking!! Well, Well, Well, Look What Was Just Discovered About London's Islamic Mayor!!  
Nicholas Hytner: Post-Brexit Britain will need to put money into theatre. Here’s why   
6 June 1975. The result of the EEC referendum revealed that 67% of the public had voted YES to staying IN the EEC.  
Can you imagine giving @BorisJohnson full reign to lead #brexit negotiations? We can't let this happen for future generations in the uk #r4 
Taking control of our own laws is a key part of our 12-point plan for Brexit. Find out more:  
Believe in the huge potential of Brexit Britain. Let's get Brexit done. Let's get Brexit right. Let's believe in Britain.- @DavidDavisMP 
My guess is #GE2017 will result in a reduced majority for May: country doesn't like the way she's translated Brexit as hard right wing rule. 
Our 12-point plan for Brexit will help us provide certainty wherever we can as we approach the negotiations. More:  
I still believe Brexit is stupid, but if I'm choosing a negotiating team from Keir Starmer or the Tory Clown Car it's a pretty easy decision 
If you want to present yourselves as the serious team to handle Brexit negotiations, don't send out Boris Johnson #r4Today 
after mess of Tory manifesto & their irresponsible campaign,idea that Boris presents Tories as only people capable of handling Brexit is mad 
#r4today I am genuinely alarmed by @BorisJohnson leading Brexit negotiations - he is a catastrophe and intellectually incoherent 
Your urgent reminder of the shambolic state of May's Brexit 'plan' 2 weeks pre-negotiations. They've had one year.  
Corbyn is in Birmingham Ladywood (Lab majority 22,000) today. Reminds me of his final referendum event: outside the Waitrose by The Guardian 
'EU negotiators steeled for post-election #Brexit crisis'  via @FT #BrexitShambles 
Only evidence Labour Brexit would be less hard than Tory Brexit is wishful thinking  
Tories want to focus on Brexit today, Labour trying to push on winter fuel allowance cuts, but security likely to be focus still 
Your economy is weak. Your leader has been exposed as dire. Your govt is second rate. Hard Brexit is a catastrophe   
"Britain is ill-prepared. One senior EU figure involved in Brexit talks called it 'a shambles'". Not good.  
...a nationally suicidal vision of Brexit fomented by a delusional mob of Press Barons & other fascists. She is simply unfit to hold office 
The EU and the UK really aren’t that far apart on Brexit says @pietercleppe 
Boris Johson says prospect of Corbyn-led coalition 'makes me shudder'.Nowt to the horror you leading Brexit, Boris!  
Theresa May ‘playing with fire’ on Brexit’s impact on Ireland  
Nick Clegg: May is failing to tell us how Britain will be kept safe after Brexit and access to vital databases kept  
Finally, the ‘scaremongers’ of Brexit are being proved right | The Guardian  
How many businesses & jobs will slide from N Ireland into the Republic as Brexit approaches? Growing businesses and high value jobs at that. 
I hope UKIP voters do tactically vote Tory this time. Brexit will not happen under Corbyn who couldn't negotiate his way out of a paper bag. 
Many of us foreigners have long looked up to US & UK as leading examples of open, liberal polities. Pity Trump & Brexit are changing that. 
Make your plan to vote today. Your vote decides who will be PM & lead our Brexit negotiations-Theresa May or Corbyn:  
Am Tory - very grateful UKIP are putting country and Brexit first 
Nick Clegg condemns Theresa May for putting Britain's safety at risk after Brexit  
RT Let's LOOK at the so called great Tory #Brexit negotiator being humiliated by #c4news @SkyNews @BBCNews @GMB @LBC 
Keir Starmer reveals details of Labour's plan for Brexit  
The Estonian EU presidency, moved earlier twice, 1st for Brexit & 2nd, the Maltese elections, shaping up as one of the most challenging ever 
*Better* #brexit deal. The "best" brexit deal is no brexit deal. We just stay exactly where we are.  
““Enough is enough” is as inept and vacuous a response as “Brexit means Brexit”.”  
Excellent thread explains how brexit puts the entire food chain, our food security, at risk. It's a basic role of government NOT to do this.  
Trump's victory wasn't about the white working class. other breaking news: Castro died, Brits finna Brexit, & Beyoncé was robbed of a Grammy  
I'm the same. Labour can't or won't deliver Brexit. Don't let us down Mrs May! 
Anecdotal, but since I left South Thanet (yeah, that one) council has messed up my GE proxy vote and referendum postal vote. 
Paddy Ashdown: Brexit is a monumental act of self-harm which will bewilder historians  
Nationalism is surging in Northern Ireland ahead of the UK election. Thank Brexit for that  
Rating down and the Loonball thinks a promise of a THIRD REFERENDUM will get the up.DON'T VOTE SNP GET OUR COUNTRY BACK#SMASHtheSNP 
To all my Remain friends on twitter: 1. Get the Tories out first; 2. If Brexit is half as bad as we believe, we'll be back very soon #winwin 
Brexit or... #Brentrance? Final bows of #HeathersUK at @TheOtherPalace. It would be so grand to continue the adventure, no? 
These people are vile, they will say anything to draw attention to their disgraceful views. 
Turkey: the rigged referendum and implications for economic fragility  via @WasHatti 
And we are being led into Brexit by a government and official opposition who really should know better.Remain in the EU with true friends.  
Let's hope and pray Labour is elected and #nhs becomes safer. Tory Brexit will be disaster for #nhs resulting in further closer & job losses 
Theresa May is said to be considering putting a vociferous remain campaigner in charge of brexit talks. Is she throwing away the election ? 
#BrexitBritain Death Bonanza?"Britain’s annual health spending lower by £7.5 billion by 2021 under hard Brexit". 
Today in #StrongAndStableTory candidate tweets fake photo of "morning talking to residents"Forgets it shows promise to hold EU Referendum  
Well the evidence is stacking up that even putting #brexit aside, Theresa May is and has been terrible. Want 5 more years of that? 
Sturgeon not only gambled on surge in support for Indy after Brexit But that UK economy would stall, its surged while  Scots economy stalled 
The year is 2019. PM Gardiner, veteran of nine gruelling GE campaigns finally sits down to start Brexit talks. "Out of time" says Juncker 
#GE2017 Yet another devastating, damning verdict on @theresa_may & her #Tory Govt. The @MayorofLondon on shocking Met #PoliceCuts #ToriesOut 
Brexit 'threatens UK-Ireland research links' 
Conservatives pledge to resurrect 'Board of Trade' to build post-Brexit deals  
Essential #GE2017 reading fm @spikedonline's @Ella_M_Whelan.The 10 anti-Brexit candidates you should *not* vote for 
LAB v Tory Brexit negotiators.You choose who you want to tackle the biggest UK negotiation in generations.#VoteLabour 
Theresa May: Too weak to debate with Jeremy Corbyn on the telly, but somehow strong enough to handle Brexit negotiations. Sssshhhhh 
All you need to know about Nicola Sturgeon's manufactured grievance over EU referendum.  
whether you love them or hate them I think we can all agree a woman's life is definitely a referendum on The Intercept 
And now, UVF & UDA linked group speaks out publicly in support of the unionist parties anti equality, pro Brexit, & pro austerity axis!!! 
75% of 18-24-yr-olds voted Remain at last summer's Brexit referendum - some say a shock result still on the cards.  
Not over until last votes are cast, final outcome may provide major surprises.Must Remain positive, 'Brexit-less'. 
Keir Starmer reveals details of Labour's plan for Brexit  
Scotland let's unite and send Nicola Sturgeon and the SNP a message on Thursday. We said no. We meant it. No second divisive referendum.  
This can't be circulated enough. @Conservatives WILL privatise the #NHS. Remember that on 8th June. #GeneralElection2017 #ScotRef #Brexit  
Simple choice in West Oxford - a hard Brexit Tory against equal marriage or progressive pro-European Lib Dem @laylamoran. Every vote counts. 
Nicola Sturgeon refuses to rule out third independence referendum if she lost second one  
Imagine promising that a referendum on Independence wouldn't happen for another 25yrs. A 15yr old wouldn't get a say until they're 40. 
I am petrified that May might win. No protection for pensions, NHS, schools, terrorism, police, Hard Brexit, Tory lies - a mess #GE2017 
just vote to keep the Tories out, then lobby MPs about brexit from 9th June - if the Tories win its game over #votesmart2017.com 
SNP wld lose a lot of votes if they *didn't* offer a referendumScotland voted RemainWe're entitled to chooseUnionists want to silence us 
1st) Brexit, 2nd) Trump, if the 3rd is Corbyn we are in big trouble! We have taken a booming UK economy and put the brakes on it. Why!? 
Sad, But true. @scottishlabour  don't know what they stand for as Kezia is so against 'Another decisive 2nd Independence referendum'.  
"I think you'll lose a lot of votes because of your desire for a second referendum."Why on Earth would you vote for a pro indy party then? 
Having Theresa May as PM for five years is an awful prospect. The mess she will make of #Brexit our #NHS & security is frightening. #GE2017 
Are you standing with Theresa May? RETWEET to show you’re backing Theresa May to get the best Brexit deal – and secure a brighter future.  
Brexit will limit the life chances of our young people. Here's one woman's story. #bbcqt #VoteLibDem 
Remember when you woke up + got brexit - but you didn't vote - as it wouldn't happen? Dont make that mistake. #turnup on June 8 
Your future, your choice. If you want the final say on Brexit Lib Dems will stand up for you #VoteLibDem  #bbcqt 
For Goodness sake! Nicola Sturgeon has explained when the referendum will be every day 4 months  #BBCQT At the end of #Brexit negotiations! 
I like how the onus is on Sturgeon to declare the end of the Brexit process. She is officially Wonder Woman #bbcqt 
".@LibDems will guarantee you the final say over the Brexit deal. Your future, your choice. #VoteLibDem #BBCQT" 
A serious generation gapThey're going to literally outlive the #Leave cohort. The young will have to live with #Brexit#TakeBackYourFuture 
Y'day @theindependent endorsed Starmer as the right person to negotiate Brexit – or at least to hold govt to account  
Please don't let Britain become like this song from Coldplay. Vote to stop Brexit on June 8th. #GE2017 
Tactical @guardian endorsement for SNP in Scotland to "thwart May’s..austerity..& Brexit..agenda of radical fringe".  
German TV channel @wdr to show documentary on the situation @The3Million in Brexit UK find themselves in (this Weds)  
"We are collateral damage. The Tories don’t care about what happens or about the implications of Brexit here" .@moneillsf #vote17 
.@NicolaSturgeon "my simple proposition is, we should have the choice" #ScotRef #Brexit #bbcqt 
#VoteSNP to strengthen our hand against an extreme Brexit that could cost Scotland 80,000 jobs. Read more. #BBCQT  
Nicola Sturgeon said Scotland must have a choice on its future when the terms of Brexit are known #bbcqt #GE2017  
FM: “My proposition is this: when we get to the end of that Brexit process…we should have a choice.” #BBCQT #GE17 
"Other parties talk about how effective their MPs are. They didn’t stop triggering of Article 50, Brexit or Tory cuts" @moneillsf #vote17 
On Thurs, vote to give @LibDems a stronger voice.We'll stop dementia tax, invest in NHS & schools & fight extreme Brexit. #BBCQT #VoteLibDem 
All Farron can do about #Brexit is to rehash his arguments we rejected last June, #bbcqt A hollow vessel who will be smashed Thursday 8th. 
The Liberal Democrats have said that there should be another EU referendum over the terms of the deal #bbcqt #GE2017  
"It must be the people" that have final say on Brexit deal - @timfarron  #bbcqt #GE2017 
Ah, the White Paper line again. We've heard this. People knew they were voting for a Brexit blank cheque, they did anyway. 
71% of 18-24 year olds voted Remain. Only @LibDems on their side in fighting May's extreme, UKIP-style Brexit #bbcqt #VoteLibDem 
Your future, your choice. If you want the final say on Brexit Lib Dems will stand up for you #VoteLibDem  #bbcqt 
.@timfarron says that surely the people of the UK should have the final say on the Brexit deal and not the politicians #bbcqt 
No, @timfarron the #EURef mandate was *not* to “negotiate on Brexit”.It was to leave the #EU.Disingenuous anti-democratic weasel.#bbcqt 
.@timfarron, about referendum on Brexit terms "Well we had a General Election two years ago and we appear to be having another one" #bbcqt 
A message from the @Col_Wilson, Emma and Pragra Groups on the Catalan Referendum (in English):  
.@LibDems offer the only real opposition on Brexit, 77% of Labour MPs voted with Tories & UKIP to trigger Article 50 #bbcqt #VoteLibDem 
'You're offering something you can't deliver!' Sturgeon flounders in Brexit interrogation  
The SDLP is the most pro-Europe party on these islands. We will stand against Theresa May's hard border & hard brexit #Vote17 @columeastwood 
"I’m asking you to reject Brexit, reject borders, reject Tory cuts. With your help, we can overcome these challenges" @moneillsf tells @utv 
#VoteConservative on 8 June for: a strong economy, strong leadership, stable government &; the best Brexit deal.  
Nationalism is surging in Northern Ireland ahead of the UK election. Thank Brexit for that  
It's your future. It ought to be your choice. @LibDems will fight for your right to have the final say on any Brexit deal #BBCqt #VoteLibDem 
'Enough is enough' is as vacuous as 'Brexit means Brexit' - @pollytoynbee on reasons to dread another 5 years of May  
With an unstable and erratic US President Britain should be pivoting closer to the EU not rashly pursuing #Brexit#GE2017 #GE17 #Remain 
Apple says it won’t announce UK pricing for the HomePod until later this year. Blatantly waiting for election/Brexit before gauging the £££. 
I go to check out the Scottish Labour candidate in my constituency, am met with 'nobody wants another divisive independence referendum' 
FM: At the end of the Brexit process – when we know what Brexit means – people should have a choice about our future. #LeaderInterviews 
Labour manifesto supports Brexit, renewal of Trident, building new nuclear power stations, and most of benefit freeze. 
#Brexit has placed us in an appalling situation internationally. We've shunned our European friends and hooked up with a moron. #Trump 
Good article "At some point, the reality will sink in that Brexit can’t be done, except at immense pain to Britain’s economy." 
16 #Brexit promises (by Johnson, Davies, Fox etc) that are now emptier than ever   #Stopthetories 
We're now isolated from Europe with an "ally" who's in bed with Russia and who makes baseless attacks on our capital's mayor #Brexit 
Corbyn's victory would constitute punishment of the Tories for the disaster of Brexit, writes NYTimesCohen  
Brexit bites: wealthy European's aren't so interested in exclusive London real estate any more  
Tim Aker reminds of Ukip pushing for Brexit and insists he will bring changes for Thurrock #ThurrockHustings 
If people are doing this to stop brexit, then they're prepared to destroy their country by coalition of chaos rather than have it succeed. x 
I have the highest regard for @DavidDavisMP and am confident he will help deliver us the #Brexit we voted for. 
Tomorrow, may I suggest, we not focus upon the massive failings of Jeremy Corbyn, but upon the gigantic benefits of #Brexit & Vote Theresa ?  
Tory tax haven #Brexit via @KitCatK#GE2017 #GE17 #Remain 
The Romanian baker on Channel 4 News. A real hero. He went out & took on the terrorists with a bread basket. And we're giving him Brexit. 
I was shocked at how much £ will be cut at my child's school yet #brexit gets billions. Check  & tell your friends RT 
Slashed taxes on business & the rich are why the Tories are so desperate to drive through hard #Brexit #GE2017 
2019: No Election In South-East Unless FG Conducts Referendum On Biafra – MASSOB  
Johnson, Davis & Fox's promises during the EU referendum were clearly deceitful. They shouldn't get your vote #GE17  
You can't lead Brexit if you can't answer a Q, can't be honest, can't stand up for Britain, can't admit to mistakes 
Numbers are in for Scottish Labour's election broadcast there; Tories: 1 mention; Hospitals: 3 mentions; referendum: 9 mentions  #obsessed 
Post-Brexit Britain will need to put money into theatre. Here’s why | Nicholas Hytner  
'When Brexit Kicks In, Will We Get Our Jobs Back Off These Foreigners'  
If true - Theresa May is preparing to undo Brexit.  
I won't vote forIraq warPfi Atos TridentWelfare cutsThe unionAnti immigrationHard brexitSnoopers charter 
'We need control of our borders' Theresa May gets back to Brexit after London attack  
Brexit is just UK's version of Make Britain Great Again. Now we haven't got the balls to call out Trump like the Germans and the French are. 
#Security is one area where failed #Brexit negotiations would be literally life-threatening  
 Hey have a referendum to kick us out  Surprised the UK government haven't done so already. Why don't you ask them why? 
Enough is enough is the same babyish language as "Brexit means brexit" #May can't be trusted to keep the UK safe. 
Would anybody trust this rogues gallery with Brexit? Pack of incompetent Tory liars.#GE2017#VoteLabour 
The calculation is that, however monstrous the conduct, we can't afford to offend him. Hard to imagine that being the case without Brexit.  
Japan, a mature economy with few raw materials is a useful comparison to #Brexit Britain - it's had 20 years of economic stagnation#GE2017 
Labours party political broadcast. Lost the amount of times snp and referendum were mentioned. Still don't know what they are offering.   
Crystal clear that, whatever your usual political affiliation, if you want a well-managed 'soft' BREXIT, your only option is to vote Labour.  
Tories, I thought Strong and Stable was about Brexit but apparently it's been resting and now it's about terrorism. Whatever, great slogan. 
Those still saying, "we have to wait and see how #Brexit pans out" - I urge you to read this:  
Barzani calls for referendum on independence and Nujaifi for greater autonomy for Sunnis  
UKIP having a go at  me for opposing their Brexit lies and attacks on immigrants. They just don't get CroydonNorth!  
Thank you to your country for leading the way with #Brexit. Now it's time we stand & fight with you against these maniacs.  #MAGA #UK 
We are sleep walking into an election no one wants caused by a referendum no one really needed towards a future that's unpredictable. 
When a UKIP/TUV member wants you to vote Sinn Fein to help Brexit and the Tories you know something stinks! Only SDLP will fight both.  
British politicians who objected to Obama 'interfering' with Brexit (with accurate analysis) will presumably be absolutely outraged by Trump 
Funny, I thought #brexit campaigners told us #Eurozone was heading for meltdown... 
Brexit in a nutshell.  
Could a hung Parliament be the best hope of stopping extreme #Brexit? #Votetactical 
Make your plan to vote now. Your vote decides who will be PM & lead our Brexit negotiations-Theresa May or Corbyn:  
This sets out that essential @tony_nog Brexit thread as a blog post - please read and share:  
So the govt HAS researched the impact of a hard Brexit but doesn't want to tell us. To stop us getting excited about the benefits, no doubt.  
It's vital the UK stays in the EU’s crime + terror fighting institutions. A Tory Hard Brexit threatens our security.  
Can someone explain how "this" Tory Brexit idea makes us safer from terrorists?...  
This Thursday may we be saved from this buffoon leading Brexit talks!If there is a God, don't let this happen #CurseTheresaMay 
This thread from last week on Brexit is outstanding.  
Theresa May has a habit of not standing up for people when they are wrongly attacked if the attack suits her - Trump/Khan & Brexit judges  
UK now bottom of G7 group of advanced economies #brexit  
The "who do you want negotiating Brexit? Boris Johnson or Kier Starmer?" question is the funniest of the whole election 
lol Boris Johnson just sent out an email to his supporters worrying that Jeremy Corbyn would "fudge Brexit". The man who invented fudge 
Brexit will mean more deals with Saudi Arabia  
Watch Boris Johnson and Derek Thomas confronted by angry voter in St Ives over Brexit promises  #GE2017 
Meanwhile, a giant @Keir_Starmer effigy is on the beach at Hove, striding off to negotiate Brexit like a grown-up who knows what he's doing  
Fear of #brexit brain drain as EU nationals leave British universities #LeaveWatch  
You know what we do, how active we are against brexit. Support us so we can step up activities Grazie  @EUflagmafia 
The leader of the party w the only economically sound manifesto producing best growth, choice on Brexit, electoral reform, drug reform... 
And who's been saying that another Scottish independence referendum would be divisive? You can't get much more divisive than this. 
Theresa May's wooden-headed, petulant & sound-bite ridden response to a constituent's questions on #Brexit #GE2017 
Things do need to change in 4 important ways Mrs May @theresa_may 1. Tories out2. Stop Brexit3. Fund NHS4. More policeEnough is enough  
Tory Brexiter Daniel Hannan MEP: "The NHS is a relic which I wouldn't wish on anyone" Tory Tax Haven #Brexit for the rich.#GE2017 #GE17 
EU circles suddenly doing their homework on what #Brexit negotiations might look like under a #Corbyn government 
@Channel4News we ask PM why she's behaving as if Indyref 2 is tomorrow - when SNP have kicked it years away post Brexit? 
All those Brits who said they didn't like Obama 'interfering' when he advised against Brexit but are silent on Chump lying about Sadiq  
Britain is being led to an epic act of national self-harm over #Brexit:   #GE2017 #GE17 #Remain 
Corbyn has admitted Labour would look to do a deal with the SNP to gain power – which would put Brexit and our economy at risk.  
delighted? euphoric? filled with glee? slightly nervous with reason for concern? take your pick.we join cabbage, healing the brexit towns.  
Not sure how to vote on Thursday, but definitely don't want Tories and/or Brexit? This should help:  
A wee reminder to all those undemocratic Scots out there.  On Sept 18th 2014, we had a 'Once in a generation' referendum.  Results attached.  
It makes perfect sense, of course. London electing a Muslim mayor and rejecting Brexit is a threat to the narrative of fear pushed by Trump. 
I'm confident that by adopting a better tone & approach & by skilful negotiation, Labour would get best Brexit deal.  
Only Theresa May can deliver the best deal for Britain, through Brexit and beyond. #VoteConservative 
'We need control of our borders' Theresa May gets back to Brexit after London attack  via @Daily_Express 
If May fails to win a majority--in other words, a mandate for her Brexit negotiations--she is going to be seriously weakened. 
Good to see some belated realism from PM on Brexit:  [as opposed to foolish/damaging "no deal better than bad deal"] 
Labour Party wants Britain 2 Remain IN EU This means we have to keep open borders so even more of these Terrorist can come to Britain BREXIT 
When will you tell the public what your no deal Brexit will cost us, @GregHands? Shouldn't we know? 
For a Brexit that prioritises jobs, our economy and workers' rights #VoteLabour on 8 June. Take a look at our plan and RT ↓ 
GOP strategists say Republicans plan to make 2018 a referendum on the Mayor of London. 
8 great reasons to #VoteConservative on 8 June - from getting the best Brexit deal to more housing and more funding for schools and health.  
Labour leader Blaims Teresa May for what happen in London over the weekend So Labour aren't to blame for letting them in In the first place 
A Conservative majority on Thursday is the only way to save Brexit, says David Davis  
This is a brilliant message for all young people! #Brexit will be terrible under the @Conservatives - but the @LibDems will give you a voice 
I thought the "No Deal" on #Brexit was better than a "Bad Deal." Now Mrs May has changed her mind AGAIN!! U-turn after u-turn! #GE2017 
"Brexit means Brexit" - May voted Remain"Strong and stable" - Nine u-turns under PM May"Enough is enough" - 19k police lost on her watch 
.@theresa_may flogged £5bn UK assets to Qatar at Brexit discount. Saudi breaks ties w/Qatar because of their support for extremists. #GE2017 
Brexit will jeopardise the rights of children and young people - @M_AndersonSF 
The strategic ineptitude of Theresa May and the people around her should concern us all if she is to be leading the Brexit negotiations 
Theresa May's Brexit plans could limit the chances of Britain's young generation. Only one party offers you an alternative. #VoteLibDem 
Farmers feeling increasingly gloomy about Brexit, says NFU  
The POTUS refers to the judiciary as "political" and the GOP wants a "referendum on the media." This is authoritarianism hitting its stride. 
Three items worth considering together.First, reports that GOP will make 2018 a referendum on mainstream media:  
We're backing @vincecable in #Twickenham. Vince is a wonderful candidate to stand up to a destructive #Brexit  
How  #UK economy works after #Brexit? Pay the same price to get less!  #GE2017 #remain @helenyg @BrexitBin @nickreeves9876 @EUflagmafia 
Brexit negotiations starting 11 days after the General Election - who do you want at the table for the UK?  
Farmers should - like many others - have thought about what Leave vote meant instead of believing jingoistic hype about "glorious #Brexit"  
#SteveHilton:Cam's guru at No. 10.Left UK.Came out for #Brexit. Cam didn't speak  to him.Just vote them ALL out. 
Spanish banker attacks terrorist with skateboard. Romanian baker smashes a jihadi on the head with a crate. Both to be deported after Brexit  
Has anyone written about how the political landscape is still dominated by Brexit but neither leader campaigned passionately either way? 
Farmers, having voted for Brexit, are now worried it's going to be bad for them. Who could have predicted it?   
UK (Scotland): Independence voting intention, Survation poll:Yes: 47% (-1)No: 54% (+1)#indyref2 #Brexit #ScoRef 
So you just can't face another referendum? You're going to have to live with the consequences of your apathy for the rest of your lives. 
May liesMay quickly reverts to personal insultMay habitually avoids answering questionsMay is unfit to negotiate BrexitMay avoids voters 
A country with common sense (except for Brexit, of course)  
Farmers feeling increasingly gloomy about Brexit, says NFU  
Tory Brexit u-turn: Theresa May said 'no deal is better than a bad deal'.Now she's changed her mind. #GE2017 
You can kiss that goodbye post Brexit #GE2017 
“Even the most innocent negotiator in EU team can see this is vainglorious posturing” Real solution is 'no Brexit'. 
That's fine because American strategists plan to make 2018 a referendum on the @GOP and its complete break with ethics, values & patriotism. 
Twitter summary:Theresa May bad!Make sure you vote! (Labour)Katie Hopkins bad!Islamists are NOT Muslim.Trump bad!Brexit whinge. 
.@Dothegreenthing attacks the Tories with Craig Oldham poster, Brexit means Oh Shit >  @OfficeOfCraig pic.twitter.com/Lod2aDblq9 
#VoteConservative on 8 June for: a strong economy, strong leadership, stable government & the best Brexit deal.  
Only Theresa May will get the best deal for Britain on Brexit. Who do you want at the negotiating table? #VoteConservative 
London's mayor is "furious" about "the faith that I belong to" being used to justify attack  
The @Express says voting Conservative is the only way to guarantee the best Brexit deal  
The choice is clear: Theresa May securing the best Brexit deal, protecting your family’s economic security, or Jeremy Corbyn who has no plan  
#TheresaMay proposing an epic act of national self-harm over #Brexit (@williamnhutton ) : 
They're still tryna figure out what brexit means init 
May began the campaign on her terms, on front foot over Brexit. She ends it on Corbyn's terms, on back foot over security. Extraordinary. 
"I have resigned. Resigned myself to delivering a strong and stable government providing a red, white and blue Brexit" May responded. 
Facebook advert was nonsense and has been removed. I value working with all against Hard Brexit, including Plaid Cymru, to whom I apologise. 
Tories wanted this election to be about Brexit and leadership. Instead it's been about police cuts, fox hunting, nuclear war and social care 
I know, let's have a referendum on it! Say... Thursday?  
.@DUPleader avoiding TV debates: running away from hard questions on Brexit ‘dark money’ and UDA support – SF Chair @DeclanKearneySF #GE2017 
Theresa May has a plan for Brexit and beyond. #VoteConservative on 8 June for strong, stable leadership in the national interest. 
Voting #UKIP ensures that Theresa May's Brexit negotiations & implementation of other policies have the right balance & support #GE2017. 
The Brexit Secretary wanted to sack 30,000 NHS staff and charge for NHS services. If you don't trust the government with the NHS, RT this:  
This violates their human rights under EU provisions. As did their exclusion from the EU referendum. A legal challenge is in process.  
Farmers feeling increasingly gloomy about future ahead of Brexit, says NFU  
Irish ID card.*waits for anti Irish sentiment**waits for calls for a hard border with Brexit**despairs a little* 
Spent a lot of weekend calling round, one thing that is clear: I hugely overestimated appeal of LD Brexit stance:  
Theresa May speech tl;dr is "Do you trust me or Jeremy Corbyn to lead the country during terror attacks and through Brexit negotiations." 
Oh dear - Kate Hoey caught calling the EU "a mafia" After she claims she supports Kier Starmer on Brexit.   
The Tories have based their whole election campaign around Brexit but still all they have to offer on it is empty soundbites  
GOP strategists say Republicans plan to make 2018 a referendum on the media. @Alex_Roarty @lindsaywise reporting 
Terror must not disrupt our way of life & democracy.This election is about our national security,our economic security & Britain post Brexit 
The state of this speech. Brexit is supposed to be May's election trump card, but her offer's still vacuous, meaningless 
Theresa May actually said 'you can only deliver Brexit if you believe in Brexit'. Firstly Brexit is not God. And second, she voted Remain. 
May opened her speech with which leader is going to keep you safe but has swiftly switched to Brexit because uh-oh police cuts 
May says Conservatives have taken time to carefully study Brexit - yet their plan is no clearer than it was a year ago 
Enough Mrs May @theresa_may Enough cutsEnough divisionEnough hypocrisyEnough liesEnough BrexitYes, Enough is Enough#ToriesOut 
This is very bad news. Brussels drive to ‘punish’ UK could end membership of EU research  via @timeshighered #brexit 
#billions for #brexit but not enough to support the police to keep us safe.  
Pollsters getting lots of criticism but more moving parts than ever: increased youth vote, ukip switchers, green switchers, Brexit. V tough. 
Make your plan to vote today. Your vote decides who will be PM & lead our Brexit negotiations-Theresa May or Corbyn:  
Steve Hilton calls for @theresa_may to resign. He was Cameron's director of strategy and is a Brexit supporter.  
Britain is being led to an epic act of national self-harm over Brexit | Will Hutton  
Tory Brexiter Daniel Hannan would ideally seek a British future as a "buccaneering, offshore, low tax nation"Tory Tax haven #Brexit#GE2017 
The offshore and tax-avoiding financial world of millionairess Amber Rudd #GE2017 Tory tax haven #Brexit 
One reason why so many are disillusioned with politics. @Plaid_Cymru OPPOSES an extreme Tory Brexit. Don't reward the Libdems for lying.  
Michelle Dewburry, Ind: "I don't want another referendum. Brexit has happened, now we need stability".@MichelleDewbs 
How can anyone continue to think Tory #Brexit is anything other than a tax haven Brexit for the rich. #GE2017 
Although Brexit is the biggest challenge for the country, it has played a surprisingly minor role in the campaign  
#GE2017 Is there anybody left in the Tory party who can answer a simple question? Certainly not Culture Secretary Karen Bradley. #ToriesOut 
Isis praises Brexit in propaganda newspaper  
Nigel Farage hints he could return as Ukip leader 'if Brexit is not delievered'. Come back Nigel the UK needs you  
Theresa May's "Enough is enough" is like "Brexit means Brexit". Tough talk concealing total absence of a credible strategy. 
Dear followers of Brassica.We’re pleased to announce the healing brexit towns experiment tour.On sale Fri 10am info@  
Labour's plans for State ownership of net & supply without competition wouldn't not be allowed by EU law. That's why they need Hard Brexit.  
Battersea is a two horse race. Voting for @Marshadecordova is the only way to stop a Hard Brexit. #GE2017 #VoteLabour 
On 8th June voters across Scotland can unite to send Nicola Sturgeon & SNP a message. We said no. We meant it. No divisive second Referendum  
NHS CrisisPolice CrisisPrison CrisisSchools CrisisSocial Care Crisis AusterityFood BanksBrexit DebtAll @Conservatives. #VoteLabour 
If Labour handle #brexit - for sure it will be in the interests of the many not the few and with Tories - vice versa#mondaymotivation 
2019: No Election In South-East Unless FG Conducts Referendum On Biafra – MASSOB  
Breaking News: South East Reps demand for referendum in Nigeria Constitution  
Watch: vote Labour to oppose Nicola Sturgeon's plans for another divisive independence referendum.  
Sky's panel show discusses who'd be the better #Brexit negotiator, May or Corbyn? Their answer explains the most recent polls...#GE2017 
Just like "Brexit means Brexit", "Strong and Stable". Soundbite = strategy. Detail is for the birds (and the Labour party)  
Farmers beginning to understand the threat of a @ScotTories #Brexit how long before the fisherman catch up?  #GE2017 
Brexit means Brexit. Enough is enough. Bollocks are bollocks 
Getting the best Brexit deal for Britain: Corbyn can’t. Farron won’t. Only Theresa May will. RETWEET  
Simply no more foolish vote in Brexit referendum than a farmer voting for Leave.  
Overwhelmingly pro-Leave, farmers now feel bleak about Brexit future ahead. Do we plough on regardless or stop now?  
And we aren't going to have a strong economy if we have a no deal extreme hard Brexit, are we Mr Johnson @BorisJohnson? 
The only people who will benefit from your Brexit are your party donors. The rest of the country will be screwed. 
For a strong economy, we have to get Brexit right. #VoteConservative to back Theresa May’s Plan for Brexit.  
Leavers whine about Remoaners. Were the Tory Brexiters & Farage going to accept the result of a #Remain victory? NO!#Brexit #GE2017 #GE17 
Relocation of finance jobs, losing EU science funding, probably paying into the EU budget anyway. #Brexit own goals 
Only Theresa May and her Conservative team can get the best Brexit deal for Britain. #VoteConservative 
Farmers feeling increasingly gloomy about future ahead of Brexit, says NFU  
Ariana Grande and #OneLoveManchester gig raise £10 million ($13 million) for attack victims  
Brexit & May caused the scales to fall from my eyes. I joined the Lib Dems @LibDems. Where I was once blinded by tribal loyalty, I now see.  
Farmers starting to get a little bit worried about #brexit. Can't say we didn't warn them.  
Labour sets out its Brexit approach - more of a committee than a single person  
In 2013 Jeremy Corbyn won the Gandhi Peace Award for a lifetime of fighting for peace and social justice. May sells arms to Isis supporters. 
Only Theresa May will get the best deal on Brexit. Who do you want at the negotiating table?  #VoteConservative 
British PM says she "had the balls to call election" after getting grilled by voters on Brexit, Trump  
Turnout rates will decide the UK Election this week. Useful reminder from @mattsmithetc of the turnout in Brexit vote  
We need a new parliament which will properly scrutinise #Brexit and throw out the government's plans if they are not in national interest 
Tfw you want Brexit done properly but you also want Theresa May to mind her own fucking business 
We need a few philosophers out there to give us some lessons in tautology as in Brexit means Brexit, enough is enough). Help on logic please 
Brexit: Are we facing a workforce crunch?  
Mexico governor's race is seen as a referendum on @EPN and his party's dynastic control  
As we head toward the polling booths, a Brexit question. When did free trade become so reliant on bureaucracy ? 
Remain said taxes would have to go up to pay for Brexit Shambles. Shouted down as Project Fear. Always Project Truth  
Farmers feeling increasingly gloomy about future ahead of Brexit, says NFU  
"We have not seen a drop of this nature before," on the decline due to Brexit of the UK's attractiveness (). 
i can't wait for people to turn this (presumptive) loss into a referendum on lebron as if he hasn't been insane 
"#Brexit is Brexit""Enough is enough"Words from our weak and wobbly PM.Why were two terrorist attacks not enough? Or even one? 
we'll just leave this here.... 
In a few days you'll vote in #GE2017  The only way to stop Brexit now is with a hung parliament. And to ensure that, you need the LibDems 
Loved Wonder Woman but it was weird when she broke the fourth wall to say "My existence is not a referendum on female directors or feminism" 
Virginia's Governor's Race Is A Referendum On Pipelines#PeopleOverOil #KeepItInTheGround #WaterIsLife #StandingRock 
Keir Starmer reveals details of Labour's plan for Brexit  
Given how little people understand about digital encryption I can only conclude that the Tories will call a referendum on whether to ban it. 
Sovereign investors raise property holdings, wary of UK on Brexit  
Leaked document shows ‘secret’ government studies into impact of ‘hard’ Brexit  
This was supposed to be the Brexit election, but voters are refusing to follow Theresa May's lead #GE2017 
.#Brexodus "A lot of interest from UK-based companies looking to establish Irish operations following Brexit". 
#ThePutinCartoons | Please @SenatorBurr ask @FBI Comey about: 'Person of interest' #ComradeFarage; Brexit; and @PutinRF_Eng in UK and Europe 
'@paulnuttallukip: "UKIP has to be there to be the guards dogs of Brexit"#BritainTogether 
the 'brexit saboteurs' who had to be crushed in a GE, the PC conspiracy that's left us open to terror despite tories being govt for 7 yrs 
Competence matters more than which side parties backed in the referendum. This gives Theresa May an advantage  
"Enough is enough" is like "Brexit means Brexit". Tough talk concealing complete absence of a credible strategy. 
The hours long barrage of right wing trolls I had today showed me once again how dangerous this Brexit mindset is. All they know is hate. 
Just a reminder that May threatened not to share intelligence with the EU about terrorism as a #Brexit negotiating tactic #skypapers 
We know, incidentally we're deeply ashamed of Brexit and whilst we're chatting we are SO sorry about Piers Morgan  
We want No #Brexit. And we're determined to get No #Brexit. The real fight is only beginning.  
Finally an MP said it. Top man.Five days to save Brexit: Vote Conservative or there WILL be 2nd EU ref, says Davis  
35. disney fucking caused brexit pic.twitter.com/Wt1NPJaZ1Z 
UKIP voters should vote Conservative this time to ensure Brexit. This election really is the second EU referendum  
After seeing her pull Liam Gallagher out on stage, I want Ariana Grande doing our Brexit negotiations 
Great audience at @AgeasSalisFest - a smattering of 'undecideds' re voting but nine out of ten pessimistic re Brexit.Thanks @MatthewStadlen 
If Noel Gallagher walks out, I want Ariana Grande doing our Brexit negotiations #OneLoveMachester 
Theresa May says the internet must now be regulated so we're leaving Europe & joining China #brexit #GE2017  
Britain's economy needs precisely the young highly educated citizens of the world who May insults and #Brexit alienates. #GE2017 #Remain 
Okay seriously, if Ariana has got Liam and Noel back together I reckon we give her all Brexit negotiations 
If Ariana has managed to negotiate a Liam AND Noel reunion I want her at the bloody Brexit table. 
If Ariana Grande has united Oasis for this, send her in for the Brexit negotiations. #OneloveManchester 
God knows, we don't want #brexit, but Sir Keir Starmer QC would be a damned sight more competent than David Davis.  
Note to Brexit wankers. These are our friends.  
if Ariana Grande has managed to get Oasis to reform she can negotiate Brexit for us 
I've heard a rumour that Oasis may show up later... If Ariana Grande has pulled that off I want her to negotiate BREXIT.Great event 
I'm biting the bullet and voting @LibDems for the first time, purely because of Brexit. Anyone else? 
Thread: why the « i’m not revealing my #Brexit stategy » position is total b/s 1/n 
Leo Varadkar has committed to holding a referendum on the 8th Amendment next year.  
#GE17 #Brexit #bbcnews #Newsnight #channel4news Will someone on TV news please ask this question, as a No deal Brexit is looking likely?  
Biafra Today: SOUTHEAST HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVE MEMBERS DEMANDS BIAFRA   REFERENDUM @UN @antonioguterres @UNGeneva  
Germany lights up Berlin with the Union Flag as a tribute - Trump insults us on social media. What have we done? #Brexit #Ge2017 
#BigQuestionsForTheresa  Are you serious about sending Boris in on Brexit? Really? No, really? 
Alastair Campbell @campbellclaret compares ISIS terrorists to Brexit-supporting papers  via @MailOnline 
You know Labour will undo our hard fought for Brexit victory  
Keir Starmer is the right person to negotiate Brexit – or at least to hold the Government to account  
#BigQuestionsForTheresa If Brexit is so important why didn't you fully integrate representatives from all parties into the Brexit team? 
Labour, who've no plan for Brexit and claim they'd not walk away from a bad deal, has the gall to criticise those seeking global FTAs for UK 
Fear of Brexit brain drain as EU nationals leave British universities  
If you want a roll over & have your tummy tickled Brexit vote LabourStarmer is right person to negotiate Brexit  
Not too late for Labour leadership to hold out an olive branch to secure a clear GE17 victory, and the potential for no Brexit at any cost.  
Devaluing the pound, leaving the single market, losing the European Banking Authority. Just a few #Brexit own goals. 
Who’s destroying England? #LondonAttacks and the war against Brexit...  
PM says enough is enough. But what does that really mean? Brexit means brexit? Please no more catchphrases. Something worth our votes. 
A piece I wrote on the upcoming #Kurdistan Region independence referendum and all that it entails. #TwitterKurds 
Official figures show costs of Brexit are more than enough to fund our NHS and schools properly. What is the bloody point? Seriously?  
Britain is being led to an epic act of national self-harm over Brexit | Will Hutton  
.@NicolaSturgeon also believed she would win in 2014, get a majority in 2016 and that brexit would move Scots to yes. Habit of being wrong  
Brexit error will be settled when it's finally dumped for good. By voting for an alliance for commonsense on 8 Jun 
Keir Starmer reveals details of Labour's plan for Brexit  
#GE2017 The Tories convinced enough people to 'ignore the experts' over #Brexit. They cannot go on shamelessly deceiving the British public.  
No one wants Another decisive 2nd Independence referendum cry @RuthDavidsonMSP @scottishlabour @willie_rennie .Aye Right tell them about it 
." As Brexit starts to exert a squeeze on schools - parents, teachers & pupils can expect more bad news". 
#brexit From "no-one talking about leaving Single Market" to "UK with no trade deals would be great!" in 1 year 
Let's bloody hope so- this brexit nightmare shouldn't be forced on Scotland #VoteSNP #indyref2 
We need Mr Brexit back.  
Brexit increasingly looks like the LAST thing we should be doing,strategically & for UK economy.A huge risky distraction from bigger issues 
Scots don't want another divisive independence referendum. At least, the ones who don't want another divisive independence referendum don't. 
My fear is the UK gov has become far too reliant on Saudi Arabia to even contemplate the stopping of arms salesMore so post Brexit 
."Brexit & 5 more yrs of hard-right govt will present SNP with opportunity to bring about Scottish independence" 
Excluding don't knows, Yes 46% No 54%. Which can't be right because nobody in Scotland wants another referendum. It's been in the news.  
."My personal perspective is that Brexit is a disaster – especially for anybody that relies on the sheep sector". 
The Indy Editorial: Keir Starmer is the right person to negotiate Brexit  
The @Independent would prefer @Keir_Starmer to negotiate Brexit: Editorial  
Tory Brexit supporting BBC presenter makes a "money tree" jibe at Labour but got a clever answer...  
Theresa May slammed for linking Brexit trade deal to UK-EU cooperation on crime + security  via @HuffPostUKPol 
.@nytimes Many Brits are "reeling" from the shock of the #Brexit vote but when it comes to resilience to terrorism we stand firm and united.  
After the #LondonAttacks it is time for another #Brexit this time the @MayorofLondon must be Sacked!##RETWEETJoin  
London mayor is protecting muzzies and Radical Muzzies in particular. Finish the Brexit and deport them all NOW!  
The  is the only one seen twice on this map. Brexit or not UK is a leader in Europe's defense and security. Always was. Always will be.  
Alastair Campbell compares ISIS terrorists to Brexit-supporting papersInsensitive, inaccurate, should be ashamed!  
Friends!Wise words from Robert!And, apart from a tiny handful of 17,410,742 Far-Right bigots, literally nobody wanted a Referendum anyway.  
Gotta the love the professionalism on #Amjoy discussing the #LondonAttacks as reporter says England "Shot their Wad" on Brexit  
This is not a general election, this is in fact a second referendum for Brexit. Do not give May a mandate for extreme hard Brexit #ToriesOut 
Stotiously apocalyptic on economic consequences of hard Brexit from @williamhutton. When matter hits rotorblade, Yessers better be ready... 
After #GE2017, new Chancellor of the Exchequer comes home to find that, instead of a #MagicMoneyTree, the deliverymen brought a Brexit plant  
Brexit is Brexit is Strong & Stable is Enough is Enough and a rose is a teapot is a gherkin. I think she does serious drugs. 
Editorial: Keir Starmer is the right person to negotiate Brexit  
This is the least informed election ever (and Brexit was awful). No NHS report, no terrorism report, climate report fought against... 
If Britain wants Indian markets it needs to open itself up to Indian migrants and Indian service providers.#Brexit #GE2017 
How much more civilised a country Scotland was until the SNP decided to call a referendum. It has been poisonous ever since  
International students bring £14bn a year into Britain and help build the future links of cooperation & trade.#Brexit #GE2017 
A repressive regime needs to be embattled and under siege, but survivably so. For Theresa May, Brexit serves that purpose. 
Does anyone get how mad Brexit is? It's idiotic to debate who will get the best deal. Do you want a bus crash or a train crash? #GE2017 
Worth repeating again & again, we can't expect to have a functioning NHS if Brexit is ever delivered.Moreover all public services at risk.  
The Brexit Toblerone#ThingsThatLeaveBritainReeling pic.twitter.com/gbQenQuphj 
Good exchange w #ItalianParliament dlgtn & @ItalyinKRI on political situation #YazidiGenocide #Italy #KRG ties, Referendum &future prospects  
Whether you support independence or not, Brexit could seriously damage #HigherEd in Scotland (+ other sectors). Please share your concerns! 
It'll be interesting to see if Trump's isolationism damages the US economy more than Brexit damages the UK's. We're both keen self-harmers. 
Observer notes SF's robust scrutiny of Brexit- no mention of SDLP despite well-worn seats in W'minster @An_Phoblacht  
I hope the 17.4 million ppl who voted for Brexit, read this & take note that Campbell from LABOUR is calling us all TERRORIST, HOW DARE THEY  
Sort out Brexit first, then get back to me. 
The odious @campbellclaret has just deleted this tweet.Equating #Brexit voters with Islamic terrorism...  
Government 'Hard Brexit' impact study concludes NHS could be hit by a shortage of more than 40,000 nurses by 2026.  
Ever since the EU referendum  
Ok I am struggling here can someone explain to me why this fanny is mentioning Trident in Brexit Negotiations? Does he want to nuke Paris?  
Thursday is seen as a vote for or against Brexit. Much more now. It's every bit vote for or against enabling terrorism Picture = 1000 words  
You're equating Brexit media coverage with murderous Islamist terrorism that YOU helped promote by waging illegal Iraq War? Outrageous.  
We have 3000 followers. We urge you ALL to watch & SHARE this shocking video of #Tory censorship to your followers: 
Brexit as a Problem for the Sociology of Culture  
Professional liar compares #Brexit supporters to Islamists running down and stabbing people in the streets. Many victims still in hospital.  
Anyone remember a Leaver slaughtering innocents on British streets because #Brexit told them to? No, me neither.  
PollWhich do you think is going to be the likely outcome of next UK elections?Result:Therexit 75%Brexit 25% pic.twitter.com/4mTbirgYOo 
In Brexit heartlands, May's election gamble could depend on turnout  
Alastair Campbell tweets Brexit extremists, or Brexitremists, in his words, are no better than #LondonAttacks perpetrators. Missed his pills 
The only referendum the South West needs right now is one that contemplates which tribe we should offer FFK to for free. 
Forthcoming article on Brexit and class  
Good one. The politics of Brexit definitely comparable to the murder of civilians. 
What the Labour Party stands for 
You, the UN, and the EU are the problem. The Unholy Alliance to take NATO and free Europe down from within. Brits are seeing this. #Brexit 
Hot take: Attacks by British extremists are the establishment  punishing voters for Brexit. DELETE YOUR ACCOUNTS.  
Boris in Tory #Brexit team & not going to give the £350mill He's international embarrassment & unqualified #BrexitShambles #GE17 #ToriesOut 
Been hearing the same line for 40 years....never happens. 
BBC News - Jeremy Corbyn 'not happy' with shoot-to-kill policy  IT WORKED LAST NIGHT NOW WE HAVE 3 LESS TO WATCH 
Did Trump just make the 2020 election a referendum on the Paris Agreement?  
And let's be real: May's Brexit antics, general authoritarianism and willingness to doing anything for power are not exactly unextreme. 
Brexit is an extremist policy  
1,300+  EU scholars left UK unis in past year.  Camb & Edinburgh most affected. Brexit blow to Republic of Letters:  
'We need an opposition which can tell the left-behind that Brexit is about to ruin their futures' - Me in the Obs  
Tories making election all about #Brexit but their team is awful,unqualified & embarrassing. A real #BrexitShambles #ToriesOut #GE17 #GE2017 
Absolutely. Extreme Brexit, extreme right, extreme poverty, extreme riches, extreme racism, extreme selfishness. Too tolerant of all these.  
Things I'm responsible for according to twitter:BrexitDonald TrumpWannaCryTerrorism 
Britain is being led to an epic act of national self-harm over Brexit | Will Hutton  
"Brexit is the biggest disaster facing this country since the second world war."   
#brexit will degrade the intelligence shared by our neighbours on the continent. Now is the time for a rethink @theresa_may 
Theresa May says "we cannot and must not pretend that things can continue as they are"  
Our country is at risk, only right Brexit comes under the microscope and is seen for what it is, bad for our country.  
No Brexit is better than any Brexit.No Conservative govt is better than a Conservative govt.Start making it happen on 8th June#ToriesOut 
Watch the Tories spin this as "60% say No to a 2nd referendum!"It's actually 73% that don't want Tories. 
No messing around in Liverpool, they know how to treat far right extremists - no matter what disguise they attempt to wear #ToriesOut 
#Brexit: the 3 million EU nationals are friends, family, colleagues. Help us fighting for their #citizensrights 
Can any Tories tell me which magical money tree got plucked to fund the £60bn cost of Brexit?  
May urging us to trust her to negotiate Brexit is like someone claiming they can fix your broken leg: WHEN THEY BROKE IT IN THE FIRST PLACE. 
Leaked document shows ‘secret’ government studies into impact of ‘hard’ Brexit  via @LondonEconomic 
Britain is being led to an epic act of national self-harm over Brexit | Will Hutton  
We need a very strong Brexit to be rid of the EU globalist control which has done so much damage to this country. 
#Pride2017 She's teaching children in the U.K. kill #LGBTQ infidelsThis is revoltingWe must move forwardSo chose #Brexit#LondonBridge 
Theresa May's 'plan' for #Brexit is at the level of "I will build a rocket car, it will fly at 1000mph" Nicholas aged 6#GE17 #GE2017 
Terror timed to coincide with election. Election called because of Brexit. Brexit happened because Cameron put party politics first. Fool. 
4get election,brexit and human rights.Take in2 custody the 3,000 under scrutiny before anarchy takes over. Enough is enough. Words no good. 
Tory tabloids saying 'Brexit at risk.' Quite right: anti-#Brexit battle is warming up. Staying in EU is best by far: for anti-terrorism too. 
Has he found any Brexit scenarios that are concretely better for UK than remaining in EU? #AskDavis 
I know no-one can face it, but we really need an "Are you sure about Brexit" referendum. So much to lose, so little to gain. 
So Tories admit they would lose a second referendum? Surely a reason to have it  
With Brexit terms still in the air, corporates are selling off non-core assets in Europe  
But Mrs May! We need continued access to the EU terror database, "Schengen Information System (SIS II)". Can you promise this after Brexit?  
Was Theresa May lying to Parliament about Brexit last year, or is she lying now? (4/5)#bbcsp #ge2017 #marr  
To clarify: last night's Tweet regarding Referendum was sent before news of the terrorist attack. It would be absurd to link the two 
How much is Brexit costing us? Wouldn't that money be better spent protecting us. Something needs to be done we can't just 'keep on' tbc 
Sir Keir Starmer tells The Independent how his party's approach differs from Theresa May's  #Brexit #VoteLabour 
Read this and retweet the hell out of it. As clear, succinct and damning take down of Brexit as you are likely to read.  
Let’s hope a hung parliament can halt the Brexit disaster  
In Brexit heartlands, May's election gamble could depend on turnout  
Tories have given up on security. Terrorism up as they threaten intelligence sharing in Brexit, and cut tens of thousands of police.#GE2017 
Editorial: Keir Starmer is the right person to negotiate Brexit  
The 3 Terrorist shot dead last night in London were wearing fake suicide belts All known jihadis suspects should be arrested immediately 
An accidental Prime Minister who can't believe her luck. A bunch of Right Wing Tories who use Brexit to their own advantage. The RW media. 
Britain is being led to an epic act of national self-harm over Brexit | Will Hutton  
I think it's time this man was sacked from @Channel4News. Linking this to Brexit is obscene.  
Fear of Brexit brain drain as EU nationals leave British universities  
UKTerror: Despite the resentments stirred by Brexit: true friendship from President Macron: 'France is more than ever at the side of the UK' 
Stop worrying about Brexit, invest in ALL our emergency services. Thousands on a 'watch list' and no-one there to watch them #LondonAttacks 
Here's my shortlist of 50 moments in 50 years to celebrate the 50th Anniversary of the 1967 Referendum  @IndigenousX 
What are the chances that all of these terror attacks in the U.K. are the globalists "retribution" for #Brexit? I'm gonna say, HIGH. #London 
Kapil Mishra demanded a referendum on Arvind government to know whether it enjoys people's faith or not. 
Malcolm Turnbull: Lets hold a Referendum on Muslim immigration & let the people decide. - Sign the...  via @ChangeAUS 
> Why is London being targeted by terrorists?> Brexit (HT @lporiginalg) 
Thoughts and Prayers#LondonBridge #London #londonattack 
Get to #MarchForTruth #Phoenix [Paradise Valley Park] tonight 'til 10pm - sign referendum 2404.The most important referendum of our time  
Remember how last year a far-right extremist stabbed and killed a sitting UK Minister to influence the Brexit vote? 
A+Nate Silver's enormously thoughtful piece analyzing Brexit snap election. Note discussion of uncertainty and seats/votes issues. #ddj 
Is that why they voted for Brexit?  
Fox News here in US still have spokesmen trying to hide identity of terrorists. Post Brexit Islamist terrorism at worst. India better 
So far Brexit and Trump have done nothing but churn up the fear and embolden the crazies. 
Once again another attack in #England. Hearts and prayers with people of #London#LondonStrong #LondonBridge #DriveThemOut #Brexit #UK 
Actual quote from Whitehall civil servant I talked to: "You realise Brexit will paralyse all departments for 4-5 years. It's all fucked." :D 
Weird that motivations behind voting for Brexit are more scrutinized than the actual outcomes of policies that result in ritual massacres. 
Everyone in the UK this is why you voted for #brexit don't let them take this away or attacks like London #Manchester will be the norm 
So far Trump and Brexit have done a stellar job stopping terror. 
Global warming won't effect me while I'm alive. Tory and Labour policies won't make a difference to my life. Brexit won't affect me. 
Remember liberals told us Brexit was the biggest threat to our economic security?In 3 months#Westminster#Manchester#LondonBridgeNah. 
Europe is toast...Brexit or not. I cant wait for May's speech telling the world again that the Brits 'will not be divided.' 
."Now we should cast our vote in whatever way best limits the worst impacts of Brexit on Britain’s future". 
So May calls Trump and within minutes he uses the information to attack the US judiciary in order to promote his illegal travel ban. Cunts. pic.twitter.com/dHpdoqCNlX 
Right wing Tory defects to UKIP, works for Le Pen, goes back to being a Tory:  #GE2017 Get these vile #ToriesOut 
Nail.On.Head. 
Sharing this again and hope other farmers sit up and think. #Brexit is not going to be good for farming in Scotland or other sectors  
1,300+ academics from EU countries (including me) have left UK universities since #Brexit vote. It's just the start.  
Exactly in June 2016 we voted Brexit border closed still open, I blame 100% Gina Miller for this with her stupid elephant in the room 
Excellent video by Clydesdale farming couple on potential impact of Brexit on them & their Journey to #VoteSNP & Yes  
Brexit isn't this wanker.  #ActiveMeasures #Nazis #LondonBridge 
This Government needs to act now before it's to lateScrew you're liberal crap Start picking all those people. The watch list 
Likely someone upset over Brexit or the Paris Accord. 
on all sides, this doesn't need to be a referendum on maher's soul. kinda doesn't matter here.   
Keir Starmer reveals details of Labour's plan for Brexit  
Somehow Corbyn is going to do more damage than Mayhem and her Brexit band of batshittery?  
Fear of Brexit brain drain as EU nationals leave British universities. 184 staff lost from @Cambridge_Uni last year 
"In a 52-48 referendum this would be unfinished business by a long way", Nigel Farage, 16 May 2016, The Mirror  
The UK was not divided before the referendum except along the lines of austerity. We have had to deal with 40 years of anti-EU propaganda.  
The referendum was not decided on the facts of the issue it was decided on prejudice, misrepresentation and misinformation. A travesty.  
UKIP have all but self-destructed, the Tory election campaign is a shambles. Useless parties pushing a useless #Brexit#GE2017 #GE17 
To Remainers worried about voting Labour, we have more chance of stopping #Brexit with a hung parliament than any other way. #GE2017 #GE17 
Brexit already harming our country. Can't be stopped too soon. IF we leave, we'll return later. No logic to Brexit, just fear of foreigners. 
Keir Starmer reveals details of Labour's plan for Brexit if they win the election  -  
Tory manifesto confirms fears that the Tories want to turn Britain into a haven for serious corporate corruption.#GE2017 #GE17 #Brexit  
So the Express now accepts that a referendum on the Brexit deal would lead to no Brexit?  
How much more civilised a country the UK was until Cameron decided to call a referendum. It has been poisonous ever since. 
Greg Dyke:If Corbyn was the next prime minister, I think he would get a better deal on Brexit, cause he's not Theresa May.#Labour #GE2017 
Does his '5 days to save Brexit' in @Daily_Express mean he knows he'd lose a second referendum?   
SUNDAY EXPRESS FRONT PAGE: 'Five days to save Brexit' #skypapers 
- Brexit - Trump - Le Pen - Doceava  
So @DavidDavisMP you admit you'd lose a second referendum?   
As we approach the election, please bear in mind that the most important thing we have for our future is brexit. forget politics vote tory ! 
Just a reminder that the presidency of the Council of the European Union would be handing over to the UK in July if Brexit never happened. 
We can't lose Brexit, is the only light in our lives   
So the choice on Thursday is tax increases, #dementiatax and #Brexit chaos or a strong #Labour team for Brexit committed to these pledges..  
I think Remainers and Leavers are now well aware what a crock of crap Brexit is, and it is high time Leavers just got over it, and moved on. 
Whilst @JeremyCorbyn4PM isn't proposing stopping Brexit - I trust him much more than May in helping negotiate a good deal for us. 
1300+ academics from EU countries have left UK universities since the Brexit vote (and I fear that's just the start)  
Brexit brain drain: more than 1,300 academics from EU have left British universities in past year  
Remembering the fallen: On this day in 2012Private Gregg Stone was killed in Afghanistan 
Fear of Brexit brain drain as EU nationals leave British universities  
Fear of Brexit brain drain as EU nationals leave British universities 
SNP already plotting Coalition with Labour, to put through Corbyn's nonsensical ideas in return for another Scotland separation referendum.  
Real benefit from the biggest deflection since Theresa May said she couldn't attend a debate because she was too busy thinking about Brexit 
These are the choices for Brexit negotiation.  
Brexit is a shit sandwich.This election is a shit sandwich on rye. 
This is why Brexit really matters: because we need the right deal to secure a better future for generations to come. #VoteConservative 
This is NOT satire.Out-of-touch Theresa May's post-Brexit plans for UK trade is to sell TEA and JAM to the rest of the world:  
.@campaignforleo has committed to holding a referendum on the 8th Amendment next year #repealthe8th 
Young people of Britain, history is watching...No point complaining older people shafted you on #brexit vote, now is your time to count  
'Brexit minister warns that a Corbyn coalition would sabotage EU exit  
The NHS must be treated as a ‘significant priority’ to avoid potentially catastrophic effects from #Brexit  
Opinion: Thanks to “Brexit,” Borderlanders will have to adapt,yet again, to what distant powers decide for them  
I can't wait for when I am killed for not voting Tory in our post Brexit-Culling, where I am identified by my limited edition Banksy print 
#Catalonia's President @KRLS ready to debate on the referendum "face to face" with PM Rajoy in the Spanish Congress  
So @RuthDavidsonMSP and @kezdugdale what's this about the Scottish People not wanting another referendum? #BillyKnoxPhotography #IndyRef2 
The EU has sapped us of our wealth, tied us up in bureaucratic knots and prevented us from trading freely with our friends. Brexit now! 
Nigel Farage could return as UKIP leader if Brexit 'unfinished'  
Theresa May's plan for Brexit will return control to Britain. Find out more:  
Reagan and Thatcher would love both brexit and Paris exit.  
Thanks @Keir_Starmer for coming to spk to local businesses, talking about Labour's approach for #Brexit to protect jobs & the economy,  
Labour shadow Brexit secretary Keir Starmer pockets £125,000 from law firm derailing Britain's EU exit  
.@nick_clegg: 'not once have either May or Corbyn been forced [by the media] to explain how Britain will look after Brexit'  
You've got a situation where both main parties are lying to us over Brexit. Lying over the cost. Lying over the impact, #wedeservebetter 
Respect to all those people in @Conservatives and @UKLabour who are joining the @LibDems to fight against #brexit 
I stand on my record-I am fighting #brexit on a progressive pro  platform, only the @SDLPLive can beat the DUP in South Belfast #GE2017 
Don’t risk Corbyn, the SNP and a #CoalitionOfChaos in charge of our country and Brexit. Vote Conservative on 8th June. #GE2017 
I don't think that Brits have quite got this yet. 12 great Commonwealth countries have offered us bilateral free trade deals after Brexit. 
In a few days Theresa May will end up with even less mandate for Brexit than before... 
#pride2017  but unfortunately #left #SJW puts  #LGTBQ community in mortal dangerStay strong. Stand up for Western Culture#Brexit #Trump 
You know any Brexit will leave us worse off. That's why you won't offer specifics & why you insult us by talking in fairytale abstract terms  
#ISupportDiversity bcoz I want 2B a minority in a low trust, high crime society lacking identity & social cohesion.#Brexit #Trump #Nexit 
Useful reminder from @tennisdenys that over £250m will have been spent by government on Brexit referendum and snap 2017 election combined. 
Why are Labour rising in the polls? A big reason is Corbyn's fair #Brexit plan. Appeals to Brexiters and to Remainers as this Sky clip shows  
A great canvass for a great candidate! Out in Blackrock for @DeclanKearneySF Vote for him 8th June & say no to Brexit, borders &Tory cuts!  
Channel 4 Factcheck: In practice, Labour are still supporting a hard Brexit along with Theresa May.  
Massive post Brexit opportunities for both sectors if we get negotiations right. Corbyn can't even get an agreement with his own party. 
16-17 year olds were excluded from the #Brexit referendum to appease the Tory right. A scandalously rigged vote.#GE2017 #GE17 #Remain 
According to this article, Hard Brexit would harm London's world class Legal Industry too.  
A useful guide to our stance on Brexit compared to the other parties. #VoteLibDem 
Here's Nigel making it quite clear a 52/48 Remain victory would have been unfinished businessSo much for getting over it!#Brexit #GE2017 
Seriously, who in their right mind would not prefer Kier @Keir_Starmer to @DavidDavisMP when it comes to running Brexit negotiations. 
Let's get one thing absolutely clear in #GE2017. Brexit and the #NHS are totally incompatible. You can have one or the other. Not both. 
This is literally making up shit. The Conservatives DO NOT have a clear plan for Brexit. Just a set of platitudes, set on repeat.  
You've sent me this @theresa_may for starters the Tories lost our AAA rating, have tanked our economy and caused an NHS meltdown - I'll pass 
Important video from Channel 4 News FactCheck. Lib Dems want the softest possible deal, while Labour and May both want a hard Brexit  
Before the EU referendum, our Grandad asked we kids how he should vote: 'because it'll affect you more than me'. IF ONLY EVERY OAP DID THAT 
Not surprising really when you think she has reneged on #Heathrow & #BrexitVote #LibDems #Maidenhead 
Theresa May has a plan for Brexit and beyond. #VoteConservative on 8 June for strong, stable leadership in the national interest. 
Leavers moan about Bremoaners while forgetting that Farage said if democracy fails to deliver "violence is the next step"#Brexit #GE2017 
So this is the kind of bungling mess the Prime Minister makes when she's the hot favourite with all the cards in her hand. Next? Brexit. 
In a one-off vote just over 1/3 of electorate has determined the fate of the nation for the next 1/2 century #Brexit 
Baby Boomer: *votes for Brexit* "WE'LL CLEAN UP THIS MESS." Millennial: "Hey! Don't do that!" Also Baby Boomer: *dies* Millennial:   
The fate of the UK is in UKIPS hands. Ukip voters need to swing blue or Brexit will be a basket case. 
This is what Europe thinks #Brexit should look like  
Brexit is NOT settled. Leavers have no plan. The economy's tanked. A50 can be reversed. And a coalition will grant a ref on the final deal. 
#EU are traitors of the vilest kind.We must dismantle the utterly failed project.Follow #Brexit#Nexit #Grexit #Italexit #Frexit #Swexit 
It's the simplest possible question, but most important facing countryWhat will no deal #Brexit cost the economy? 
Great to hear from our special guest today Sir Keir Starmer, Shadow Brexit Secretary in Ealing Central and Acton supporting Rupa Huq.  
The Conservatives want you to think they are the only show in town for the economy and Brexit. In fact their record is terrible.#GE2017 
Imagine being a yoon politician, spending weeks convincing yourself no one wants another independence referendum, then this happens.  
Not one voter in Lab W Mids seat mentioned May - negatively or positively. Brexit also non issue. They like local MP but JC still v big NoNo 
Brexit will severely limit what children will be able to do in their future, taking away from them multiple rights.  
8 great reasons to #VoteConservative on 8 June - from getting the best Brexit deal to more housing and more funding for schools and health.  
Never forget that a majority of Labour constituencies voted for #Brexit at the EU Referendum. #GE2017 
Pull the other one. Young people voted overwhelmingly against Brexit, and you want to abolish their rights to live, work & study in the EU.  
You voted for Brexit. Now let Theresa May complete it for you. She has the plan you want delivered. No-one else does: 
Who is best placed to stand up to the SNP and stop a second referendum? Here is my final essay before polling day.  
It's amazing that neither Tories nor Labour explain how a Brexit deal will be better for UK than continued EU membership pic.twitter.com/H2ERkrlw4i 
Now Foreign Secretary @BorisJohnson almost FLOORS Labour's @GwynneMP.This man is negotiating #Brexit...#GE2017 #bbcaq #Tory #TheresaMay 
Not sure how many sensible Tories actually support her leadership plus Brexit is flawed, divisive and illogical, actually our best deal = EU  
#LibDems #GE2017 #BrexitPoll: If you're Lib Dem and in a in a seat where voting for another party could keep a Tory out, will you be: 
Revealing that Mrs May's decision to concentrate on Brexit to try to get her poll ratings up has,if anything, made them even worse. #GE2017 
You forgot to mention austerity again. And £9bn cuts. Brexit GDP collapse. 80,000 jobs lost. Key EU workers leaving. Tuition fees. Tut.  
#Brexit will be like the Health & SC Act. A bureaucratic nightmare that consumes vast amounts of time & money, while services go backwards 
No, everything does not depend upon the Brexit deal. More important are the decisions in our hands on tax, competitiveness, investment etc  
"Everything depends on getting Brexit right". She's now openly admitting how dangerous the whole idea is.  
In a time of Brexit, global change and a general election, what do you think the UK's place in the world should be?  
1/3 Rather late in the day, but if any anti-Brexit parties want a slideshow of some of my cartoons, it's available. Some samples  
"No support for another divisive referendum", eating your words yet @kezdugdale / @RuthDavidsonMSP? 
Getting Brexit right is crucial to our children’s future. From jobs to our schools, everything depends on securing the best Brexit deal.  
Germany, on the other hand, has simulated the effects of eight different Brexit scenarios.  
A government which violates the principle of no taxation without representation has no right to rule.EU nationals, #Brexit #GE2017 
If the govt had treated the ref as advisory there would be no need to shout about a gerrymandered electorate and a 37% vote.#Brexit #GE2017 
"No taxation without representation!" The govt didn't give a damn about that when it excluded EU nationals from the #EURef.#Brexit #GE2017 
My manifesto Ditch Brexit! Think again. @BBCRadio4 
Agreed. Brexit election without serious discussion of Brexit.. so: how to vote? See my next on @guardian @Guardiancif #brexit  
The only certainty of #Brexit is that it will expose how mediocre, ill-prepared & incompetent our politicians are. A ten year car crash. 
Beautiful summary in FT today of how both Tory & Labour manifestos are fully delusional on Brexit...  
This is what the "select fighter" screen would look like in a Brexit video game.  
The coalition of chaos #brexit #bbcaq 
The Daily Express calls on Ukip supporters to think carefully about which way to vote to get the best Brexit deal  
Want a Labour Gov? Then you need to vote Labour! Vote against a referendum. But also vote for a society & an economy for the many #GE2017 
Journey to Yes #14 The devastating impact of Tory hard Brexit on Scotland's Farmers. Back @  
There is something about Theresa that even Sir Lynton can't fix. A great many traditional Tories simply don't like her and her hard Brexit. 
Conservatives buying up wraparound adverts on local London newspapers with a pure "Vote Theresa If You Want A Proper Brexit" message.  
Theresa May is so tactless she tells a struggling nurse there isn't a Magic Money Tree. And you want this woman to negotiate Brexit? #bbcqt 
#bbcaq Let's not forget, it was this government's recklessness that lead us to Brexit. The self serving Tories are just that, self serving 
Why can't May or Corbyn say 'we're a bit out of our depth with #Brexit, we'll do our best but some people could be much worse off'? #truth 
The UK election campaign has been amazingly empty on the choices and issues the country is facing with Brexit. Sad.   
I'm for UKIP,would love Farage to be PM but it's a 2 horse race & unless I vote May the referendum goes down the pan under EU loving Corbin 
With decent newspapers reporting that brexit will have a negative & damaging effect on UK, WTF are we doing it for? Will of people my arse! 
@dog_rates damn it dog rates this is why Brexit happened. 12/10 will still wear passionately  
Amazing to see some who shouted loudest post-referendum about democracy/the will of the people’ actively hoping turnout is low on 8th June. 
The Tories are on the ropes. The highly trained and very professional #brexit negotiator Boris Johnson! #JC4PM 
Alistair Darling: Voters want Nicola Sturgeon to focus on the day job and drop plans for another divisive referendum  
Macron does not spend much time discussing Brexit. He has bigger fish to fry.  
Council of Europe's Venice Commission tells Catalan pres: "referendum will have to be carried out in agreement with the Spanish authorities" pic.twitter.com/5Mcfw2FOuc 
Smuggling used to be a fact of life in many Irish border areas. Read our #Brexit special report -  
These are the choices for Brexit negotiation.A professional LAB team OR unqualified career politician Tory liars.#GE2017#VoteLabour 
This letter from the man lined up to do corbyns brexit talks is also damning  
Exactly, only one solution to the mess created by Brexit lies and underinvestment in our public services, we need a progressive EU alliance.  
Another hyperbolic #Brexit whinge from inside the progressive bubble. Thank God these people lost. Good riddance.  
BREXIT: The UK has among the highest fuel prices in Europe but, please, don’t let facts get in the way of your insane political xenophobia.  
On #Brexit. On the #NHS. @RupaHuq will always fight for #Ealing, #Acton & #Chiswick - after all, she's lived here over 40 years. Our latest: 
The Tories want to make their closing argument about Brexit and how Labour would raise taxes, says @JGForsyth 
Plan is still not to have a plan. See also Brexit.   
No realistic political solution to the Irish border post-Brexit currently exists, argues @cpmcgonagle  
This is no longer the Brexit election, says Sky's @faisalislam, as public spending cuts come to the fore #GE2017 
When your colleague who voted for Brexit is now thinking of moving to live in the EU because the future of the UK is bleak.  
"there isn't a magic money tree"unlesswe're bailing out bankspaying for nukesfooting cost of Brexitcutting taxes for billionaires  
'If we want someone for our NHS, schools & to make sure we don't get extreme Brexit, who do we want?' asks @SadiqKhan. The answer: @DrRosena 
When even the Russian diplomatic service thinks the Brexit timetable is nuts via @FT 
Indeed. And the irony is that some ignorant quitlings tell us to leave if we don't like #Brexit.  
Theresa May’s Plan for a Stronger Britain means securing the best Brexit deal, protecting your family’s economic security. #VoteConservative 
Why, after the Brexit vote, I’m making my family German  
and returning to an imaginary past, hence brexit 
A year ago campaigning for Vote Leave.  Don't let Corbynista chaos overturn the referendum result  
Finally, the ‘scaremongers’ of Brexit are being proved right | Nesrine Malik  
Campaigning in Crewe.Tory MP is a REMAINER.#Vote UKIP for net ZERO immigration,#Brexit with NO divorce bill & scrapping dementia tax.  
Flow of new jobs remains constant despite Brexitvia @IrishTimes 
A British town starts its own bank, in an experiment that may help others after Brexit  
Rallying volunteers this morning for the final push backing Theresa May & ensuring Cheadle gets the best Brexit deal  
British workers are currently taking a pay cut in real terms  
Why are the media still taking note of and commenting on opinion polls when they've shown to be absolute drivel! #brexit #trump 
These are fair points to make given the consequences of failure in Brexit talks. They are the points May asked us to make of her opponent.  
Brexit is worse for Britain than Europe, BlackRock CEO Larry Fink suggests  
If you're at Byline festival I'm in Brexit panel at 12:30 and the election one in the afternoon. After that I plan to get increasingly messy 
#GE2017 Compare, contrast and make a choice.Millions of public sector workers have the power come June 8th. Vote the #ToriesOut 
1) Good article but with 1 fatal flaw,@MatthewParris3 thinks #brexit is mad but still,Tory party loyalty comes first 
From the generation that brought us the worst economic crisis yet, climate change, Brexit, unequal pay, homo/bi/transphobia and much more.  
Former Vote Leave chair Gisela Stuart played an even more important role in Brexit before the campaign itself  
#May saying she wants to talk about #Brexit is a con - she still avoids spelling out the key problems & choices 
The polls are close! Hard WTO Brexit would cripple GB. Follow @BestForBritain and know who you're voting for. Vote tactically. Pls RT 
Says a lot about just how bad they expect brexit in general, and hard brexit in particular, to be... 
Matthew Parris on Brexit, now with new improved screenshot-cropping.  Thanks for the tip @miqdaad. 
The "migrants" are ferried over by the 1000s.Day in, day out.This is the great big betrayal, of unequaled proportion.#Brexit #Nexit 
... which is absolutely extraordinary given the Labour manifesto - down to one thing: Brexit  
Revealing response. Truly highlights Brexit Britain's fast-diminishing position in global diplomacy  
What does the Tory Manifesto mean for science? More money (like Lab & Lib Dem), but hard Brexit drives away talent. 
Excellent piece by @WomaninHavana on May and Brexit in Prospect magazine  = 
HARD BREXIT NOW!!!NUKES NOW!!! micropenis forever 
Theresa May is in denial about Britain’s declining power over Brexit in the age of Trump  
A damming assessment by an experienced negotiator of Theresa May as a negotiator #Brexit #GE2017 #GE17 #Remain 
... ie we havent had those Osborne letters... plenty in  business also concerned about Cons No Deal brexit & foreign worker restrictions etc 
"If there’s no deal, let’s crash in, not out. Let the people speak – again!" Ian McEwan on not giving up. #Brexit  
A delicious irony, indeed, that the same populist tide the ideologues of the right surfed to Brexit on now threatens to engulf them.  
Really superb pre-obituary for @theresa_may’s career by @IanDunt. #Brexit  
The fight against #Brexit is only getting started. 
Leavers wouldn't have accepted the referendum result had Remain won. So why should we? Well worth a read  
Craig Dalzell"Why not have a UK wide referendum on Trident.  The constituency who has the highest vote, gets to host it."Brilliant 
I'm struggling with the much-used phrase "respect the referendum result".Why would anyone respect a result so clearly obtained by deception? 
We're debunking the #Brexit myths and more in our magazine with @BellaCaledonia - get it in today's edition of The National! 
Could a legal loophole leave some EU migrants at risk of being deported after Brexit?"  
CITIZEN OF THE DAY. This woman with the hairdryer should be used in our Brexit negotiations  (via @MonarchyUK) 
Only vision May is offering in #GE2017 is a vague sense that Brexit will require us all to be shrill, self-destructive and hatchet-faced. 
May repeatedly asks us to trust her with Brexit negotiations. Why is this not challenged by the media given they'll be led by David Davis? 
Billions for #brexit but cuts for education. Have you checked how much your school will lose?  #schoolcuts #ge2017 
This hotel owner in Southend-on-Sea tells @AlexCrawfordSky he thinks Brexit "might stop millions of people coming here" #GE2017 #Vote2017 
London's Brexit apocalypse is nowhere in sight  
Just 5 days to go until we send May and her tax heaven for billionaires hard Brexit plan packing. #VoteLabour for a fair Brexit  
FWIW, it's just possible that people who happily threw all these things out the window for Brexit might not be on the strongest ground here. 
Brexit negotiations may last 5 years and will be "immensely" damaging, George Soros says  
Corbyn wants to take away our nuclear deterrent. This will significantly reduce our leverage in Brexit talks with EU. Vote Conservative! 
Disappointed #Corbyn again spread the falsehood that we wouldn't be worse off after #Brexit. Even the Tories are careful not to say that! 
I used to hate Theresa May before Brexit, but she has won me over, she's got guts to take this on and I trust her to deliver. 
Most of May’s 12-point Brexit ‘plan’ is best achieved by actually staying in EU but May & Co back a vision unpopulated by facts or figures.  
Giving up EU Freedom of Movement is not taking back control, it is the surrendering of freedom by frightened people.#GE2017 #Brexit #Remain 
We have to work with the available material, and that means tactical voting, though I'd love to say let's all vote LibDem.#GE2017 #Brexit 
How does a good #brexit deal make FMs "'job more difficult" unless she sees her job as independence campaigner rather than FM of Scotland?  
"Yeah, we WILL kneel in front of EU when negotiating #Brexit & we WON'T use #Trident to defend Britain. We're a menace to the UK" #GE2017 
. @CarolineLucas : I'll do what other leaders won't – stand up for free movement#Remain #Brexit #GE2017 #GE17 
Longstanding complacency in foreign languages risks putting UK at a disadvantage in post-Brexit talks  via @FT 
What brings politics into disrepute?Channel 4's Krishnan Guru-Murthy v Tory Brexit Secretary David Davis.Enjoy. pic.twitter.com/LGWxxzdIBB 
I'm proud to support the @LibDems, their pro EU policy will be proved correct. No #Brexit deal would be better than our continued membership 
The General Election is a distraction from the danger of failed Brexit negotiations  
9 Tory men of a certain age (out of 120 audience) grilled Corbyn on IRA/Brexit/Trident/overseas aid.= 29% of total #bbcqt questions. 
The depressing face of our once great country. A bunch of sad, pathetic, bigoted old men #bbcqt #brexit  
All this talk about nukes in the UK election, when the world already sees us as a bit mental for Brexit, is making us sound like North Korea 
Message from @Nigel_Farage in #Dagenham & #Rainham is loud & clear, for Real #Brexit vote @UKIP vote @peterjharris66 
Memo to Corbyn: If you announce "No Brexit without a deal", you won't get a deal. #BlabyBrexiteer 
This feels like #brexit  
The young complained that the old screwed them over #Brexit They'll do it again if you don't get out & vote. This is a few of them #bbcqt 
Is a Hard Brexit Gonna Fall? #TheresaMay (cartoon for @CleanAirLondon) 
Conduct referendum now, IPOB tells FG  
The nihilism that brought us Brexit is now propelling the Labour party forward too  
Almost a year has gone by since EU referendum and still the British people do not know from Theresa May what #Brexit will actually mean. 
Do you think brexit has irrevocably divided the country, or that our shared values will unite us again?Please let me know your thoughts 
I agree totally. In fact, I would like another Quebec referendum to leave Canada. If they won't call it, perhaps the West could!!  
#Venezuela Communist regime writes new constitution without holding referendum as per original constitution.  
v good thread to give u the background of how USA became a world leader & now it has created a vacuum & more on Brexit & Frexit eye opener  
Macron vows to defend French fishermens' right to use British waters after BrexitYeah OK good luck with that! 
We need to talk about the economy before it is too late. Brexit is damaging Britain, hurting the people and the economy.#GE2017 #Brexit  
If the electorate had voted in favour of the Lib Dem's AV referendum, we wouldn't be in this Brexit mess now Please RT for a bigger sample  
A. It was NOT a debate. B. Literally nobody asked you who could get the best Brexit deal.  
He could be negotiating Brexit. Even his own party must despair of this donkey at times.  
#Banksy is Back – EUpdate – #Brexit – Be ▲rtist – Be ▲rt Magazine  
#JeremyCorbyn's #Labour face a heavy rout in the #polls! Make it happen... #Vote #Conservative! Vote for a strong #BREXIT #Britain! #TORY 
If it doesn't go well in the Brexit talks he will resort to childish gestures blowing kisses,this is astonishing behavior not a statesman.  
Oppose the hard #brexit of the Tories & a Labour party taken over by the far left and vote @LibDems 
Boris Johnson acts disgracefully. Is this who YOU think should help lead #Brexit negotiations? I don't. RT if you agree.  
#JeremyCorbyn refuses to rule out continued mass migration after #Brexit. You can NOT trust him with anything! #Labour #BBC #SKY #UK #EU #RT 
Not sure they're comparableEich contributed to a referendum & sought no pub#Griffin tried to cash in on #Trump hate & triggered disgust 
Hard Brexit.  
Finally, the ‘scaremongers’ of Brexit are being proved right | Nesrine Malik  
'Those who know what damage #Brexit is still likely to cause have to start speaking up.' We @LibDems are - and we won't shut up 
Why people saddened by Theresa May’s hard #brexit and Corbyn far left takeover of Labour will be voting @LibDems 
All she's interested in her sodding referendum and getting us out of the UK. She didn't answer the Q about full fiscal anarchy. 
Brexit is a disaster for us.   
8) "Defence" - we have never been more isolated, the western alliance breaking, all because of this Brexit/Trump adventure  
"Ireland is deeply conservative" says media in Daily Mail reading, UKIP voting, Tory electing, Brexit loving United Kingdom #leovaradkar 
6) "Money" - if you were honest Iain you'd admit you are deeply worried about Brexit direction, it wasn't what you planned for  
Finally, the ‘scaremongers’ of Brexit are being proved right | Nesrine Malik  
Can someone please genuinely refer me to where Theresa May said anything, ANYTHING about what her Brexit plan is? This is madness #bbcqt 
5) I think, its fair to say, the older generation who voted #Brexit have nothing to say to the younger one other than "I'm deeply sorry" 
Plant the magic money tree in the Brexit money pit. Obvious when you think about it. 
The polls are close! - so what's the best way to keep out May's Hard Brexit madness? Here's the @BestForBritain dashboard to help. pls RT 
Dr 18-24 yr olds.Sorry my generation messed it (education, housing,Brexit).We still have free health care, for now. Please vote to keep it. 
Although Brexit is the biggest challenge for the country, it has played a surprisingly minor role in the campaign  
Government and our next Parliament must face up to the fact:Brexit is totally flawed, divisive and illogical, actually our best deal = EU.  
Nicola Sturgeon faces angry grilling from voters who say NO to second referendum  
Martin is right, @theresa_may has, sadly, avoided discussion key issues on Brexit in this campaign. @MatthewParris3 made this point last Sat 
Brexit is the UK under occupation - by Tories, UKIP, Mail, alt-right, tax avoiders & Trump-Putin. It's them against us. EU are on OUR side. 
I hate to break this to you, but a hell of a lot of us aren't basing our vote on brexit. We're interested in policy. And yours are toxic. 
May - a strong & stable leader would be brave & stop Brexit as it's going to destroy our future 
I got called a Nazi tonight all because I voted for Brexit and May. Don't let the buggers get you down Michelle 
FT Weekend: "May reaches out to business as Brexit tensions escalate"  #BBCPapers (via @hendopolis) 
It goes without saying, they slip it in, don't know how to handle a hard Brexit and pull out without satisfying anyone!#votelabour 
Exiting the Single Market & EU Customs Union is Hard Brexit.  
We'll get to it right after we've educated the old that the magical Brexit fairy isn't real. 
Is that what he's going to do in Brexit negotiations? Thankfully Theresa May will press the nuclear button before that so we'll be OK. 
May's Brexit plan:1. Make demands she knows will be rejected2. Call this "fighting for UK"3. Blame EU/Remainers for rejection4. Repeat  
Looks like a hard brexit is the way for the tories   
Neither Corbyn nor May mentioned #magicmoneytree needed for #Brexit in #LeadersSpecial. Cost of Brexit cannot be ignored as vast.#Newsnight 
Germany!Is this how you want to live?Massive police force at EVERY holidayYour country isn't safe bcoz of #Merkel#Brexit #AfD #Trump 
#Soros says #Brexit will lead to reform of EU which is in 'existential danger'  
Just can’t understand why the #Brexit voting retired feel the young must live by their rules. The future belongs to the young. #bbcqt 
#BBCQT What matters to you? NHS? NO. Education? NO. Jobs? NO.Brexit? NO. Social care? NO. Nuking millions of innocent people? YES. #shambles 
And Tory voters hope to have Boris representing us at #Brexit negotiations! They say "coalition of chaos" - they're the Cabinet of Losers! 
This is the behaviour of a brexit negotiator people #brexit 
Corbyn in meltdown as he is mauled by voters over Trident, IRA, 'fantasy' manifesto and weakness on Brexit. #BBCQT 
Theresa May torn apart by #BBCQT audience member Abigail in brutal exchange 
Apparently she's the best person to negotiate Brexit... yet refuses to debate  Corbyn or actually answer a single question. Weak and Wobbly 
Most-Tweeted topics during #BBCQT while Jeremy Corbyn was on stage:1. Defence2. Brexit3. The economy  
To take advantage of the opportunities before us, we need to make a success of Brexit. Only Theresa May can get the best deal for Britain.  
Boris Johnson making an absolute fool of himself on BBC news. And you want this volatile man to do our Brexit negotiations?!#bbcqt 
Bizarre thing about this 'magic money tree' motif is that govt is going to need a forest of them to pay for Brexit 
#bbcqt No ones voting Jeremy Corbyn after that shambles, makes it up as he goes along, need strong leader Brexit negotiations not him. 
The Brexit negotiations look set to start 11 days after the election. Don't risk Corbyn in charge of Brexit. #VoteConservative 
If you find the prospect of a right-wing Brexit England scaryMove to ScotlandVote YES Take citizenship test below#bbcqt 
Back Theresa May and her team to get the best Brexit deal for you and your family. Every vote will strengthen her negotiating hand. #GE2017 
Gosh, the Remainer who worked at VoteLeave and cried at the Brexit result is now a producer at #BBCQT. (Chloe Sarfaty) 
Corbyn tonight:1) Won't defend UK.2) Wouldn't rule out SNP deal.3) Wouldn't disavow IRA.4) No idea on Taxation.5) Weak on BREXIT#BBCQT 
Corbyn’s chaotic performance showed exactly why he cannot be trusted with Britain’s future through Brexit and beyond. #BBCQT 
#VoteConservative on June 8! Theresa May on #BBCQT showed clearly she's the only leader who will protect UK and make success of #Brexit 
I like corbyn but can't stand Scottish labour after Scottish referendum. 
Forget Brexit, economy & NHS. If Corbyn isn't willing to use nuclear weapons, he's not fit to be PM & Labour aren't fit to govern. #GE2017 
So it is confirmed that Labour offers no nuclear deterrent, no plan for Brexit and has no clue on the economy #BBCQT 
With a strong hand in Brexit negotiations, Theresa May can guarantee our economic security and deliver her plan. #VoteConservative 
Corbyn no plan for Brexit. Wouldn't answer questions. Can't say he'd defend our country. Denying his past. 
Clear win for PM. Clear plan for Brexit. Not afraid to tackle difficult issues and answer the questions. 
Corbyn was shockingly poor. No answers on defence, no answers on tax, no answers on Brexit, no answers on his IRA past. #bbcqt 
Tonight Theresa May showed she has a clear plan for Britain and is the only person to get the best deal for us in Brexit negotiations #bbcqt 
I know I'm biased on this but a clear win for Theresa May - a plan for Brexit and prepared to tackle the big issues #bbcqt 
Win for PM - clear plan for Brexit and unafraid to take on difficult issues. Corbyn a shambles who wilted under pressure #bbcqt 
Clear win for Theresa May. Sensible answers to tough questions. Corbyn floundering on Brexit, defence & the economy #VoteConservative #BBCQT 
Corbyn has no answers. Just talk. Brexit negotiations begin 11 days after polling day. It's not worth taking the risk #bbcqt 
Ultimately, Trident's a sign that we're a top nation for a lot of people. Brexit shows the importance of that, I think. #BBCQT 
Brexit means Brexit and if that means pressing a red button to annihilate millions of people well let's just get on with it. #bbcqt 
Businesses are leaving UK NOW because of Brexit. Corporation tax typically not a factor. #bbcqt 
Juncker & Barnier will be licking their lips at Corbyn's performance – they would have him for breakfast in the Brexit negotiations #bbcqt 
Corbyn on the run - don't take risk of him in charge of Brexit, our economic security and national security next Friday #bbcqt 
Corbyn showing he's just not up to the job. No safe way to vote Labour if you don't want him in charge of our Brexit, economy, security 
Let's have a referendum on Trident renewal.If it's a Yes, the constituency which votes most in favour gets to host them.#bbcqt 
Brexit types seem to fantasise about blowing up other countries quite a lot. 
In 1998 philosopher Richard Rorty forecast the rise of a populist politician like Trump. #Brexit #GE2017 #Remain 
Mrs May....you do realise this election isn't all about Brexit? What about all the services at home you are conveniently ignoring? 
Thank you to everyone who put their questions to me tonight on #bbcqt. Good debate on important topics like who can get the best Brexit deal 
FINANCIAL TIMES FRONT PAGE: 'May reaches out to business as Brexit tensions escalate' #skypapers 
It's pretty clear why May refuses to do debates; she's awful at thinking on her feet. Bodes badly for Brexit negotiations ahead. #BBCdebate 
Everytime Boris Johnson tweets about Labour not being able to negotiate Brexit, I remember this.  
Question to Jeremy Corbyn from small business owner about future under Labour - higher corp tax and Brexit uncertainty. #VoteConservative ! 
He's a wise man. It's the wisdom & life experience of our older citizens that might still save Brexit & end mass immigration.  
Corbyn is asked who would be in his Brexit negotiating team - it would be Keir Starmer QC and Barrister.Theresa May will send Boris.#bbcqt 
This erection is the most important in a generation. Don't waste your vote and risk a terrible Brexit deal! #GE2017 
Only strong SNP voices can stand up for Scottish jobs through the Brexit process.  #BBQT #VoteSNP #GE17 
Corbyn asked is he would rule out and SNP coalition. Waffle waffle blah blah. Of course he would and that would damage Brexit opportunities 
May:Uncomfortable on-schools-NHS-welfare-aidComfortable on-Brexit#ge2017 
Mr Corbyn says he will do good Brexit negotiations because of Mr Starmer. But what negotiations had he done 
There’s one way to protect this economy from an extreme Brexit. Stay in the Single Market. #BBCQT 
Corbyn talks about his team but his very own Brexit Secretary said his leadership was untenable! #bbcqt 
May threatens to turn UK into a tax haven after Brexit. Don't let her use Brexit as an excuse to give more to the richest #VoteLabour #bbcqt 
Corbyn first question an easy one - what will he do on Brexit.Doesn't mention immigration. That's because he knows it will go up with Labour 
Corbyn smart to put Keir Starmer to the front on Brexit issue. He's certainly more clued up than David "100 pages" Davis. #bbcqt 
Why should we trust you to negotiate on Brexit? Corbyn takes his first question on #bbcqt - and gets a dig in at May  
Even Corbyn is talking about #Brexit as if it is a damage limitation exercise. Remind us: what is the point of leaving the EU? Why? #bbcqt 
"Keir Starmer is one of the leading lawyers in this country" Jeremy Corbyn says : we'd rather him negotiate Brexit than Boris ! #bbcqt 
This is our plan for Brexit. Make sure people know, hit RT #bbcqt #VoteLabour 
For those questioning Labour's Brexit team, well it would be lead by the man himself, Keir Stamer, otherwise known as The Negotiator #BBCqt 
Strong performance by PM. The only person that can get Brexit right #BBCQT 
Don't bother trusting Corbyn on Brexit. He had the chance to stand up for Single Market and EU citizens' rights. Chose not to. #bbcqt 
May's lost nurses and parents of school kids. Brexit only card to play 
Let's not trust Corbyn to negotiate Brexit. Let's trust this guy. #bbcqt 
Commanding performance from PM. Exactly who we need leading us through Brexit and beyond. #bbcqt 
May: weak on standing up to Trump over our climate, will be weak on Brexit negotiations. Ignore the bluster. #bbcqt 
"we were the second fastest growing economy in the G7 last year". That is entertaining - because we're bottom so far in 2017 #Brexit#bbcqt 
Did you forget that we're now the slowest growing of the developed economies, @theresa_may? Thanks to believing in Brexit #bbcqt 
Bingo card filling up nicely. 'Only poll that counts' 'make a success of Brexit' 'Magic money tree'.Just 'strong & stable' to go.... 
If this is a Brexit election May wins comfortably. If it's an austerity election, it's going to be FAR closer. 
#bbcqt can't afford to pay nurses but we can afford to lose £50 B a year from a poor #brexit deal? 
'There's no magic money tree' says May in #bbcqt. It's been shaken too many times for Brexit which is more important to May than the #NHS. 
PM not ducking Qs on tough decisions. We can only look after the country with a strong economy + good Brexit deal. Only Theresa can deliver 
May started with the balls, did well on Brexit, but is losing the audience on social care and nurses pay.... (and that money tree) 
Theresa May's extreme Brexit is already costing us £15bn a year. Turns out there is a magic money tree when it comes to Brexit. #bbcqt 
#bbcqt The PM says we'll move ahead with Brexit becos of 52% vote. 84% back the ban on hunting so why doesn't Hunting Act mean Hunting Act?  
UK workers have fared worse than anyone in Europe except Greece. And now the PM won't rule out a hard Brexit #BBCDebate 
May's had some more media training and a lie down but still can't help but sound like a neural net fed brexit platitudes as training data 
It's worth having a grownup discussion on how the public made a decision on Brexit based on lies.May just scowls when it's raised on #BBCQT 
In case you're just tuning in, Theresa May has revealed that she wants to get Britain a good Brexit deal. #BBCQT 
Theresa May says she called #GE2017 over #Brexit not for her own "political gain" #GE2017 #BBCQT 
90% of questions to Theresa May have been about Brexit. Who's betting how many IRA questions are thrown at Jeremy Corbyn. #bbcqt 
It's clear. Watching Priti Patel on @Channel4News they have all become Lynton Crosby robots. Repetition. Repetition. Brexit. Brexit. Brexit. 
.@theresa_may absolutely right we cannot have a second referendum. Politicians should adjust when the people vote 
Rambling question on having a second EU referendum. LibDem question unravels, even as it's delivered.  #BBCQT 
May's Brexit negotiation plan is all bluster, no substance. Alienates potential allies while failing to be taken seriously #bbcqt 
You can’t trust Theresa May with #Brexit. She threatens to crash out without a deal, which would be a disaster for working people #bbcqt 
"I believe in Brexit" says Theresa May.When she says something, believe the opposite.#bbcqt 
Who can deliver on what comes after Brexit? Two words: Theresa. May. #bbcqt 
May: “Let me be clear: before June 23rd 2016, remaining would make us better off. From June 24th, Brexit will make us better off” #bbcqt 
There's no such thing as:- ethical capitalism - compassionate Conservatism- a successful Brexit  
Will of the people. Brexit means Brexit. Strong and stable. I did say at the time. Best interests of the. *malfunction* *head falls of* 
May Day, May Day, May Day, Brexit, Brexit, Brexit #BBCQT 
Theresa May's #Brexit negotiating tactic. Pig-headed unwillingness / Bloody difficult #BrexitShambles #ToriesOut #GE2017 #BBCQT 
How hard is it understand that people who believe in democracy will respect the outcome of the referendum? #bbcqt 
See why Lynton Crosby wanted to get onto Brexit. May is politically fireproof on this stuff. Just uses the voters as a human shield. 
Dimbleby quotes PM from last April "staying EU will make us more prosperous". And yesterday "Brexit will make us more prosperous" 
Theresa May says only the Conservatives will deliver a successful #Brexit #GE2017 #BBCQT 
No, Theresa May, most people who voted Remain think Brexit as a nightmare. 
I genuinely cannot work out how May could have voted Remain and now call Brexit an opportunity. It just makes no sense. #bbcqt 
"I believe in Brexit" says Theresa May who campaigned for Remain.. #bbcqt 
The Brexit Negotiation Team struggles with their new colouring in book #bbcqt 
Theresa May says you can't do Brexit unless you believe in Brexit...but she voted Remain? #bbcqt 
Theresa May is asked to explain what a bad deal in Europe is…and doesn’t. She hasn’t said anything at all so far really… #bbcqt #brexit 
You can’t trust the TMay with #Brexit. She threatens to crash out without a deal - a disaster for working people.#BBCQT 
Theresa May outlining why she is the best person to be PM. She outlines optimism for future of U.K. delivering a good Brexit deal. #BBCQT 
If you're watching #BBCqt & May talking about why only she can "get Brexit right", read my piece on the clueless reality behind her spin.  
Theresa May is clear: Jeremy Corbyn can't negotiate Brexit, the Lib Dems won't - only the Conservatives can + will get the best deal #bbcqt 
PM doesn't duck hard decisions. She wants a great Brexit future full of optimism. Only Theresa can go and fight for Britain 
No one but Theresa May can get the best Brexit deal for Britain. #bbcqt 
TM reminds us that Brexit negotiations start almost immediately after polling day #BBCQT 
When she says 'other parties want to frustrate Brexit' she means 'debate Brexit' She hates debates. Hates them. #bbcqt 
Brexit negotiations start 11 days after election - critical we have Theresa May back at work in charge of those negotiations #bbcqt 
'We need to get Brexit right' says Theresa May. Quite right. She's the right person to lead us through this #bbcqt 
Brexit negotiations begin 11 days after the election - we need a strong Prime Minister to get the best deal #bbcqt 
Real wages falling. GDP growth lowest in G7. Debt rising. Uncosted Brexit 'plan'. As strong and stable as her friend, Mr Trump.  
Very positive audience reaction to Theresa May's clear position on dealing with Brexit. Clear May is best person to negotiate Brexit. #BBCQT 
#bbcqt Theresa May explains she called #ge2017 because we need a strong hand to negotiate a successful #Brexit 
PM clear every single vote counts at this election to strengthen her hand at Brexit negotiations #bbcqt 
May: “The other parties wanted to frustrate the vote on Brexit which is why it was passed in Parliament without amendment” #bbcqt 
PM's strong record at Home Office reduced crime and made our country safer. She is the right person to lead us through Brexit.#bbcqt 
First up Theresa May - the only choice for Prime Minister to get the best Brexit deal and to lead the country #bbcqt 
Hope Brexit won't be a disaster as a consequence of Theresa May missing 2 hours preparation tonight. #bbcqt 
Clear choice tonight. Theresa May as PM - negotiating Brexit and strengthening economy OR Jeremy Corbyn putting everything at risk #bbcqt 
"I was a Conservative candidate. May’s Brexit strategy has made me join the Lib Dems"  
Unless Brexit takes a surprise positive turn, the UK is heading for decades of downhill movement to lower part of league table. 
T May kept a low profile in referendum and was not tested by a leadership contest.The election is her first prominent campaign and it shows. 
Theresa May's response to Donald Trump's climate decision says a lot about her priorities  
A key part of our 12-point plan for Brexit is continuing in the fight against crime & terrorism. More:  
Finally, the ‘scaremongers’ of Brexit are being proved right | Nesrine Malik  
What does Theresa May's boycott of European protest at Trump's withdrawal from the Climate Change accord tells us about a post BREXIT lives? 
Why Labour's Brexit negotiating team is better than the Cons - Peter Wilby in the @newstatesman  
So May won't actually face @jeremycorbyn on tonight's BBC QT #bbcqt What's wrong with her? How can we vote for her to face EU on Brexit now?  
We're debunking the #Brexit myths and more in our magazine with @BellaCaledonia - only available in tomorrow's edition of The National! 
Ensuring the UK remains the best place for science & innovation is key to our 12-point plan for Brexit. More:  
"Is May going to run Brexit negotiations better than she's run election campaign then?"Priti Patel adds Kathy Newman to her hitlist #c4news 
Punter: "If Brexit worked out well for Scotland would you take indy off the table?" FM: My job would become more difficult". Enlightening. 
Whatever happened to the Brexit election?  
Beggars belief vox pops think Corbyn a communist & May'll give them Brexit. When services go & Dementia Tax kick in goodnight Vienna #c4news 
Securing new trade agreements around the world is central to our 12-point Brexit plan. More:  
Love Ireland...decriminalised homosexuality in '93, legalised same-sex marriage by referendum 2015; 1st openly gay PM elect 2017 #lovewins 
'There is no nervousness': Spain admits how little Brexit will impact the British economy  
"When we know what the terms of Brexit are, Scotland should have a choice over its future": @NicolaSturgeon #AskTheLeader #GE17 #VoteSNP 
#VoteSNP on 8 June to strengthen Scotland's hand in the Brexit negotiations. #AskTheLeader #GE17 
.@NicolaSturgeon : At the end of the #Brexit process, #Scotland should have a choice #AskTheLeader #GE2017 
Crucially trad Labor voters who went UKIP returning as Brexit a settled issue and Tories look like the enemy of social decencies again 
After months of training from Theresa May, Tory Brexit negotiators demonstrate what they plan to do when Angela Merkel walks into the room..  
Perversely by refusing to stoop to debates etc May has made herself exactly part of the elite Brexit Tories are supposed to be against  
Securing the rights of EU nationals in the UK & UK nationals in the EU is key to our 12-point plan for Brexit. More:  
Beyond time to get on it with.It would be fitting & proper if you made announcement of referendum to #repealthe8th your 1st act as Taoiseach 
Anyone looking for facts for #GE2017 ? Here are facts! Vote Tory  For everyone For aspirationFor fairnessFor BrexitFor Britain   
Theresa May has U-turned on Brexit. How can we trust her?  @nick_clegg #VoteLibDem 
Over 11 months since the referendum & #citizensrights for @The3Million EU citizens in UK still in limbo. Nobody should be surprised by this 
Commentary: Merkel is wrong about Trump and Brexit  
Once again Brexit Britain with its bolt to 1950s social conservatism seems to be against the European zeitgeist  
Farron: 'want second EU referendum'Press: Hear hear Tim's our heroSNP: 'want second independence referendum'Press: Fuck off barmy Jocks 
Azi Ahmed: I was a Conservative candidate. May’s Brexit strategy has made me join the Lib Dems  
Protecting our strong, historic ties with Ireland is a key part of our 12-point plan for Brexit. Find out more:  
Everybody, cool your jets. British public won't elect a terrorist supporter with #Brexit negotiation skills of a lettuce to be PM. #GE2017 
13/15 doubling down on Brexit is not definitively the right strategy to win back voters who wavered over cuts, winter fuel allowances & care 
And we haven't even had the main course of Brexit yet. 
Young peopleRemember when you didn't want Brexit but didn't bother voting? And old people wanted Brexit, and voted?That.Again.#Vote 
I'm devastated - my local fish 'n' chip shop has become a Vietnamese restaurant. I'd thought life couldn't get worse after the Brexit vote. 
How good Corbyn has been the last few weeks has proven that he didn't care about the EU referendum at all. 
Omens for Brexit economy and public finances aren’t good (via @InFactsOrg ): 
Merkel is wrong about Trump and Brexit  
If you're offered a bad deal you wouldn't take it. That's why we believe you should have the final say on the Brexit deal in a referendum.  
Tories do not have a plan for Brexit. They have a deluded wish list. Don't let themruin our country. In #ge2017 vote #ProgressiveAlliance 
She's throwing the election Jez. This has always been her plan to derail Brexit. There was no other reason to call an election. Enjoy! 
A clear-sighted prediction of the populist political developments of our times by philosopher Richard Rorty in 1998#Brexit #GE2017 #Remain 
+ @LordAshcroft focus groups. Some voters have gone off May, but many will stick with her because of Brexit  
Why do you think the Tories, the low tax party, won't discount tax increases? Just as we paid for the bankers recession we'll pay for Brexit  
If you want Brexit - you've already got itIf you want the Tories to take your house, privatise the NHS & steal your kid's lunch - Vote Tory  
Make your vote count in #GE17. Our pro-European guide to voting, published in @TheNewEuropean. More details  #Brexit  
4/15 ..Most Leave voters not Brexiteers. The EU referendum forced them one way, for millions it is not the issue that defines them even now. 
it's all deliberate.,they intend 2 lose.2 sit on sideline &criticise the shit storm coming ie Brexit/recession&pretend they r not 2 blame 
Labour's @BarryGardiner calls out Tory spin on #BBCQT and says: "No deal on Brexit is the worst deal"  #GE2017 
1/15 started campaign visiting 10 Labour seats in Tory sights - Bury, Bolton, Wakefield, Mansfield, Gedling etc...May Brexit surge was there 
Pick your Brexit team:Labour: To protect the economy and everyone's rights.Tory: To make their city friends richer.#GE2017 #VoteLabour 
I do like the suggested Czech Republic word for Brexit...Czechout... 
Macron tells the French that France will continue to fish in British waters after Brexit. He must think Corbyn is going to be elected. 
"All that is necessary for stupidity to triumph is for apparently intelligent people to do something unutterably stupid, such as Brexit." 
Thank you!!! I was born in Denmark, and after Brexit I was told to go home to my own country. So here I am  
Brexit impact 'manageable' for EU economies: German government study | Article [AMP] | Reuters  
Jeremy Corbyn pledges to ban fox hunting - GE2017 Brexit speech - YouTube  
Makes his Brexit campaign look even more lethargic 
Fascinating stuff by @LordAshcroft - People impressed by Corbyn, but remember gaffes. Theresa May trusted on Brexit 
#TrippyTheresaBrexit is not a process but a rainbowYes. red and yellow, pink and blueI can see a rainbowSee a rainbowcan't you?Laura?  
Remember, kids: "you can only deliver Brexit if you believe in Brexit".  
In 1954 the idea was to have a European Defence Community, but FR voted no. After #Brexit,Trump, Putin time has come! 
The majority of MPs in the parliament just dissolved were Remainers. How badly they've let the country down. But #Brexit can be beaten.  
It isn't. Conservatives all over the world accept the science. Except here. Conservatives who wanted Brexit still believe in science. 
Tube ad for the Conservatives plans for the future of Britain after Brexit #JC4PM #GE17 #Labour. 
All the manifesto promises assume Brexit won't cost a sodding penny. Brexit will financially consume every promise. #ToriesOut #StopBrexit 
He's right: simple as that. I'm going to vote tactically for any anti-Brexit candidate - another way of saying 'any sane candidate.'  
1. Theresa May does not believe in Brexit2. You can only deliver Brexit if you believe in Brexit3. Ergo, Theresa May cannot deliver Brexit  
"Most of May’s 12-point Brexit ‘plan’ is best achieved by actually staying in the EU"  
How bad are things for May? Even Tory loyalist BBC Norman now taking May apart over her Trump cave in and it's impact on Brexit. Wow!   
Brexit denial: confessions of a passionate remainer | Ian McEwan  
My latest blogpost, on Brexit's historical amnesia and bogus patriotism here:   
Brexit: the equivalent of dog muck.  
Who wants the hardest Brexit and who wishes it wasn't happening at all? @FactCheck looks at what the main parties are offering. 
The shameful pact of silence between the Tories and Labour regarding the biggest issue facing the country: Brexit 
No Brexit. No border. No Tory cuts. Vote for Michelle X.  
Theresa May's collapse is not only due to her own weakness. The Tory line on Brexit and much else is hollow and craven, and it shows 
It's the issues, stupid? Of the 5 most important issues at #ge2017 the Conservatives 'own' three -big leads on Brexit, immigration & economy 
Back Theresa May and her team to make a success of Brexit, so we can take advantage of the opportunities before us. #GE2017 
We've got a PM who thought #Brexit would be a disaster selling it as a huge opportunity to people who won't tolerate being worse off #yikes 
Labour unveils plan to create a million new jobs as UK slips into Brexit slump  
Theresa May is a control freak who can't even control her Brexit ministers & who must feel utterly ill-at-ease in an election brawl.#GE2017 
Don't leave Brexit to an unprepared Labour and a leader who doesn't know what he wants, says @DanielJHannan  
Due to Brexit, an apparent trend is increasing the long-term growth prospects for Europe, at the detriment of the UK  
By request RT for over 10,000 Poll. Scottish people who you voting? #GE2017 #Scotland #brexit @NicolaSturgeon @RuthDavidsonMSP 
A hard #brexit will damage our economy still further. Britain needs to stay in the Single Market and Customs Union  
Do you really want #theresamay to negotiate Brexit when she is so shambolic she shrunk a 20 point lead down to 5 in #GE2017 #IpsosMori 
Anyone looking for facts for #GE2017  ? Here are facts! Vote Tory  For everyone For aspirationFor fairnessFor BrexitFor Britain   
#Debbie4Congress in London 11/11/2016 talking to British Heros about #Brexit & USAVictory! #BREIXT2 Victory! #MAGA #UT03 #UTAH #utpol 
Get your hands on our mag with @BellaCaledonia​ as we bust the #Brexit myths in Scotland and more - only in The National tomorrow! #GE17 
German press welcomes ‘inexperienced’ and ‘compromising’ Corbyn as a potential Brexit negotiator as Labour surges  
My piece for Prospect on why for all May's talk of strength & clarity, her words & actions on Brexit have revealed neither.  
KRG official says U.N. officially informed about Kurdistan referendum  
Since 1945 there has been no political project as damaging to Britain's stability & security as #Brexit#GE2017 #GE17 #Remain 
Brexit will be a disaster for the people of Ireland north and south - @DermotNicholl tells @BBCRadioFoyle East Derry debate 
[labour wins election][begins negotiating a brexit deal]foreign secretary danny devito: can i offer you a nice egg in this trying time? 
List of rich tax-dodgers contributing to the Tory #GE2017 campaign Tory tax haven #Brexit for the rich. 
Mackinlay should do the decent thing and endorse the Brexit candidate in South Thanet  
Theresa May is the only leader prepared for Brexit – Brussels would eat a Lib Dem-Labour coalition for breakfast  
We worry about #GDPR, #Brexit, #PrivacyShield & everything else, but that's assuming we'll still have a planet to live on.#ParisAgreement 
Make your plan to vote today. Your vote decides who will be PM & lead our Brexit negotiations -Theresa May or Corbyn  
'I was a Conservative candidate. May’s Brexit strategy has made me join the Lib Dems' 
 I hear the Brexit comin', it's soundin' awfully grim, I want a referendum, and I wanna win, I'm stuck in Tory Britain, and time keeps...   
Another day another Tory #GE2017 disaster.The Tories cannot be trusted on Brexit OR to run the country.#ToriesOut#toryelectionfraud 
This fellow hereon Putin payrollBrexit shenanigans. Now attacking UK journalist who exposed CA/SCL role in BREXIT manipulation  
FBI targets Brexit leader Nigel Farage in Donald Trump’s Russia scandal  
Ali Gul, 22, made a 5 minute video for “no” before referendum and now sentenced to 24 months & 17 days: the story:  
We're backing @georgenturner in #Vauxhall. George is a wonderful candidate to stand up to a destructive #Brexit  
Only way to Defeat The Tories is by tactically voting. Use your vote to sink May and The Dementia Tax, NHS and Schools cuts and hard Brexit.  
Brexit Secretary David Davis's Question Time appearance has thrown Tory manifesto into chaos #WeakAndWobbly #GE2017  
This tells you all you need to know about the people who voted for Brexit. Wake up England! Wake up Labour! Drop this Brexit madness now!  
It's not 'all-or-nothing' hard v soft. A Lab Brexit would be much better/'softer'. And at this rate with Tories we'll have no deal at all. 
That's right; Scotland will sink along with the rest of post-Brexit Little Britain if it rejects a progressive, open & independent future.  
The reckless incompetence of May's government shows exactly why Britain would benefit from a coalition government.#Brexit #GE2017 #GE17 
Well said, @colmogorman, let's have no more delay on a referendum date to #repealthe8th. @ailbhes  via @ITLetters 
Cost of uncertainty: with Brexit terms hanging on the balance, corporates are selling off non-core assets in Europe  
Pathetic response from @theresa_may to Trump  Clear Britain's place in world already diminished thanks to #Brexit 
Tim Farron tells @itvnews that the public should have the final say on the UK's Brexit deal #ITVLeadersLive  
If re-elected I'll raise my voice for human rights & oppose repeal of the Human Rights Act post Brexit. @AmnestyUK #VoteSNP #GE2017 #ge17 
#aynho - beautiful #southnorthants village - lots of support for Theresa May to get a great #brexit deal for the UK  
The German economy minister says that even the worst-case Brexit will be bearable for EU  
Theresa May, who makes great fanfare of her negotiating prowess over Brexit, running scared of local journos 
Not all referenda are bad: happy bday to the Italian Republic, born from a referendum on 2 June 1946 (first w universal suffrage in #Italy) 
If you don't want another referendum, vote for the party best placed to beat the SNP.  
Seriously, if @theresa_may cannot even cope with BBC radio interviews she cannot cope with Brexit negotiations w/ 27 countries. 
Danish FM Anders Samuelsen is in Ireland today visiting the border region to understand the impact of Brexit on the local community  
We have a Tory government dominated by fruitcakes, charlatans and incompetents. A coalition would be vastly better. #GE2017 #GE17 #Brexit 
It has been revealing how difficult the Tories have found it to make Brexit sound like a sunlit upland, even if they believe it will be. 
Enjoying a bit of gallows humour thinking about how all of this applies to Brexit  
Ttaking some pointers from religion I see. I guess when our economy crashes it will be "Brexit moves in mysterious ways".  
A coalition govt would bring a degree of care & thoughtfulness utterly lacking in this impulsive & incompetent Tory govt.#GE2017 #Brexit 
The Brexit Secretary’s Question Time appearance has just thrown the Tory manifesto into chaos [VIDEO]  #bbcqt #GE2017 
It cannot be overstated or repeated enough that the #Tory party & its #Brexit plan of walking away from the EU are fully aligned with #Trump 
Peter Wilby makes the obvious point in the second item here about how Corbyn has the best Brexit negotiating team  
'It’s no good boasting about being a "bloody difficult" woman unless we know what May intends to be bloody difficult about, & why.' #Brexit  
Corbyn outlines Labour’s Brexit deal. #GE2017 #Labour #GeneralElection 
NB. If I see anyone refer to The Kinks Are The Village Preservation Society as "well Brexit" I will explain it to them until they are dead. 
Tim Farron claims there is 'no chance' of better EU deal after Brexit in fiery TV interview  
Whatever happened to the Brexit election? My @TheNewEuropean article on the shameful Labour + Tory pact of silence: 
UKIP: Craig Mackinlay should put country before party and endorse our Brexit candidate in South Thanet.  
I'm a single issue MDMA voter. I want a Brexit in which everyone loves everyone else and also remembers to drink enough water. 
We don't want a hard Brexit or a soft Brexit, we want a psychedelic shimmering Brexit that reveals to us the oneness of being. 
fact that Brexit is an unmitigated economic disaster on the horizon is finally getting through to the Baldricks who voted for it 
Don’t risk Corbyn, the SNP and a #CoalitionOfChaos in charge of our country and Brexit. Vote Conservative on 8th June.  
Worrying yet accurate assessment by @WomaninHavana: The government has no clue how to deliver Brexit  #CluelessBrexit 
Corbyn, with net negatives on leadership, the economy, Brexit & a divided party, is 3 points behind Blair in 1997? Give. Me. A. Break.  
I normally vote Tory; but there is no Tory party now, only a big frothing rabid nationalist lying UKIP clone. #GE2017 #GE17 #Brexit 
Who would you rather have speaking for&representing Scotland during Brexit negotiations& on other affairs&issues ? 
Or, like Brexit, Trump and 2015 they get within margin of error. For this poll that's 37-43 for Labour   
If .@theresa_may can't stand up to #Trump on #climatechange the #EU will eat her alive over #Brexit#strongandstablemyarse 
UK, Ipsos Mori poll:Con-ECR: 45% ↓Lab-S&D: 40% ↑LDEM-ALDE: 7%#Brexit #GE2017 
EU27 consultations in Tallinn w Min for EU affairs, Nat. Parliament, trade unions & business: Brexit needs 2 be managed so EU27 can move fwd  
Here's Hermann Goering neatly explaining the way in which patriotism can be used to delegitimise political opposition#Brexit #GE2017 #GE17 
Theresa May wants to sell off #NHS land, and John Major's warning about the Brexiters and the NHS. #GE2017 #GE17 #Brexit  
REFERENDUM: Foreign-based Niger-Deltan activist tackles Sultan over comments, says 'no going back on referendum  
Not even surprised by idiotic comments from Brexit fans anymore...  
If Corbyn admitted that Brexit was a disaster for workers and UK, he would have Remainer votes. I stand by LibDems and Greens as opposition  
Jeremy Corbyn's right. May's weakness with Trump over the #ParisClimateDeal says much about why she's not right person to negotiate Brexit  
Our editorial @EveningStandard on Trump's climate decision, Brexit and we should remember the value of cooperation  
I find it hard to see how a Brexit deal can be prepped/ managed/ approved with a really tiny Con majority or a Hung Parl. 2/2 
The Labour Party 
Jeremy Corbyn questions the honesty of Theresa May’s Brexit team!–The Tories are not telling us the truth #GE2017 
Brexit is on the wrong side of history, maths, economics, politics, English, physics, R.E., P.E., languages, woodwork, domestic science... 
Hi, I'm from 2 weeks in the future. Its great here now the tories are gone. Trump was so sad about cancelled brexit he jumped out a window 
Brexit has brought out "lowest human impulses, from the small-minded, the mean-spirited to the murderous" Ian McEwan  
Lots of good, terrifying pieces on Brexit today, including this one.  
Labour's alternative to the economic disaster of a hard Tory Brexit - my full interview with @Keir_Starmer >> 
My statement regarding the Remain MP Ben Gummer being lined up as #Brexit Secretary  
Out in Ealing this morning with @RupaHuq. She has worked tirelessly to protect local NHS services and she will fight a reckless hard Brexit  
There are no positive statements to make. Literally, the only reason we're leaving the EU is the referendum result.  
Brexit is an opportunity to shape a better, brighter future for the UK. Back me and I’ll work every day to make it a success.  
I was a Conservative candidate. May’s Brexit strategy has made me join the Lib Dems  #VoteLibDem 
She never "demanded" anything, she said the people of Scotland should have a choice AFTER the terms of Brexit are known. Try again.  
No, it isn't. She based her timetable on that of the PM & was asked if that would move were Brexit to move & she said Yes. You were there. 
#Brexit is the most serious domestic assault on Britain's stability & security in living memory.#GE2017 #Remain #GeneralElection 
And U.K. declined to sign because post #Brexit May needs Trump. This is what it's like to have no real friends.  
UK construction expands at fastest rate since 2015.  Viva #Brexit 
MISSING: my aunt Theresa, aged 50. Last seen in Maidenhead, thinking about Brexit. She's not been seen for a week. Please RT.  
#AskTimHow can you be a Liberal Democrat when:-You're not liberal enough to support gays?-You're not democratic enough to support Brexit? 
Hear this! My book on Brexit & Ireland, the dangers + the Irish response is now available for pre-order from @easons  
Most pre-EURef Remainer MPs have totally abdicated their responsibilities as stated by Burke & reiterated by Churchill #GE2017 #Brexit  
Where's UK? #Brexit  
Seriously!!! So as not to upset our new post brexit bed partner I presume.  
FBI = liberal elite who can’t accept Brexit?  
I was a Conservative candidate. May’s Brexit strategy has made me join the Lib Dems 
Trump is on the wrong side of history and so is Brexit Britain. We will be banging on the door within a decade begging to be let back in 
What The Party Manifestos Mean For Women On Brexit "All the party manifestos are silent on this, except @WEP_UK"  # 
Corbyn refuses to rule out continued mass migration after Brexit. How can we trust him to deliver the will of the people? #ForTheMany 
So the strongest word Theresa May has for Trump is she's "disappointed!" The Brexit negotiators must be quivering in Europe right now! 
Fanatical Remainer Ben Gummer, apparently lined up for Brexit Secretary, wrote May's shambolic manifesto. WORRYING.  
The increase in annual borrowing to fund #Brexit  is nearly double Britain's net contribution to the EU.#GE2017 #GE17  
Gummer said Brexit was akin to Le Pen. The Tory right would go mad...  
Your #Conservative vote will get you @BorisJohnson to "negotiate" #Brexit.We'd do better just saying "we surrender", much less embarrassing  
‘Colonial’ EU wants Europeans to be treated as a ‘super-privileged caste’ in the UK after Brexit.  
Every time you say I don't believe in brexit a Tory loses its seat  
Climate change green taxes only benefits companies whilst the poor working classes has to pick up the billClimate Change is a CON 
In an age of Brexit and closing borders we need to embrace multilingualism  
On Theresa May's now full conversion to the religion of Brexit.  
This #maybot will answer your questions better than the real Theresa May. #GE2017 #GeneralElection2017 #brexit 
The fact that UK Labour have ran on a very popular manifesto while Scot Lab keep banging on about referendum has shown a clear split. 
The Tories insist no deal is better than a bad deal - but this is nonsense . Labour will put our economy 1st in #Brexit negotiations - RLB. 
No Brian, you've got it wrong.  After Brexit we'll be in control of our borders so won't let climate change or nature in... 
Every time May drinks her glass of water, that's her Tell. She'd be appalling at poker. Incidentally, that's what Brexit negotiations are. 
My fave moment of our @talkradio debate was when @BorisJohnson described a Corbyn government negotiating Brexit as "cackenating cockatoos".  
let's not forget, Brexit is by the few, for the few and will affect the many in ways for generations you can't even imagine yet. #StopBrexit 
The answer to the realpolitik argument that we can't criticise Trump strongly given Brexit is that Nature doesn't give a shit about Brexit. 
David Davis and T May have both now said that the SNP have been a pain in the arse over #brexit. What better endorsement to vote @SNP ? 
Another May U-turn. With Paxman she refused to say "I believe" in Brexit.Now it's "you can only deliver Brexit if you believe in Brexit"! 
This election hasn't had anything to do with Brexit. But the next one will  
Magic Money Tree false but Enchanted Brexit Fountain real  
Corbyn has admitted Labour would look to do a deal with the SNP to gain power – which would put Brexit and our economy at risk.  
HEATED: #TimFarron loses cool as #BBC's #AndrewNeil skewers him on second referendum.  #BBC #SKY #UK #EU #NEWS #RT 
May's plans, from austerity to hard Brexit to US-UK trade deal, would lead our NHS to becoming irreversibly privatised.  
I'm a lab voter but I will vote tory because NO Way will I vote for Corbyn or his crew. I want brexit 
Gina Miller: Anti-hard #Brexit campaign will 'ensure democracy' at #GE2017 
So yes after Trump and Brexit anything is possible and nobody dares predict anything. But it's still an enormously steep hill for Labour 
Keir on Brexit: Jobs & Economy come first. Also ensure Rights & Environmental standards are protected.#GE2017 
I've no doubt that Keir Starmer would negotiate a 'better' Brexit deal than David Davis. But I no more want to be stabbed than shot. 
I was a Conservative candidate. May’s Brexit strategy has made me join the Lib Dems | Azi Ahmed  
Labour unveils plan to create a million new jobs as UK slips into Brexit slump  
Brexit Britain, Alone and Ignored:  - via:@CraigMurrayOrg 
EU Member States agree European Travel Authorisation System: Will apply to UK after Brexit. EP must still agree. 
EXCLUSIVE: ‘We’ll give Scotland, Northern Ireland and Wales their say on Brexit’ says Keir Starmer  
“May said this was the most important election of her lifetime, but she has treated it like a game of hide and seek”  -On May's Brexit plan.  
If she can’t debate with leader of UK Opposition, how’s she going to fare in #Brexit negotiations with 27 hostile EU leaders? #BBCDebate 
Theresa May is too cowardly to allow the Brexit election we so badly need | Martin Kettle  
The government has no clue how to deliver Brexit -My piece in Prospect on May's claim to a 'plan'.   via @prospect_uk 
What jobs could Brexit possibly create? ... Other than a mass of London-based civil service jobs to wrestle with regulatory mess?  
Tim Farron savaged over stance on Brexit, terror and faltering campaign during brutal grilling by Andrew Neil.  
Clueless Jeremy Corbyn risks our Brexit deal with his senseless claim that a bad deal is better than no deal  
Here are the signs that #Brexit is starting to hurt the #British economy : 
UK 'voted to leave' based on the premise - and the promise - that Brexit would make us substantially richer.Not hugely poorer.  
Pay & display car parks that ask for your reg no. to stop you giving another driver the leftover parking time you’ve paid for. PURE brexit. 
Hey Theresa, this bright post-Brexit future, these opportunities, could you perhaps be a bit more specific? Maybe even offer an example? 
Liam Fox's inclusion in Brexit team is the clearest indication that the intention is to serve US interests, not ours  
Is the UK government playing on Trump in order to survive Brexit? Unavoidable question after nearly non-reaction to US climate withdrawal. 
Is everyone now clear that Brexit is the fireball which will destroy our economy? Wasn't this bloody hard really. 
Liberal Democrats to pitch themselves as ‘real party of business’ after Tory and Labour push for hard Brexit  
British trade will collapse by nearly a third if the UK leaves the EU without a Brexit deal, the Lib Dems claim  
Superb, lively discussion at @theFabians on Indo-Brit relations post-Brexit w/ex UK HC to India Sir @RichardStagg3, @rishi175  & @PratikEPG pic.twitter.com/1xjWs6cLx2 
Theresa May's last 11 Tweets in a row (since May 29th) have all been on Brexit. Nothing else. Totally obsessed. 
Make your plan to vote today. Your vote decides who will be PM & lead our Brexit negotiations -Theresa May or Corbyn  
Today's editorialsThe Scottish Sun: You can't trust Theresa May in Brexit negotiationsThe Sun: Theresa May is your only hope  
You can't put a cost on Brexit. It isn't just money, it's lives, livelihoods, jobs, our future, our international reputation, the NHS.  
Wow DUP followed the lead of Tories on #Brexit now following the lead of Theresa  May on TV debates.  
"I had to pay £3 for 6 apples yesterday in the supermarket - never paid that before !"Ma belle-mère retraitée face au Brexit 
I've just realised there is something more catastrophic than #Brexit, May's election campaign! 
Labour shadow Brexit secretary Keir Starmer pockets £125,000 from law firm derailing Britain's EU exit  
Brexit—PM May 'has never once tried to reach out to the 48% of the country who [do as she did and] voted to remain':  
PM tough with EU negotiators? She cannot even agree a line with her own Brexit minister? EU officials will be amazed at such incompetence 
The Brexit Secretary wanted to sack 30,000 NHS staff and charge for NHS services. If you don't trust the government with the NHS, RT this:  
Do you also deeply regret calling an ill-constructed referendum without proper checks and balances and procedural stages? #brexitshambles 
#May refuses to sign a joint declaration with Germany, France and Italy. #Brexit cuts us off from our closest allies. #ParisAgreement 
Brexit is driving the swing towards the Tories says @FelicityBuchan 
Brexit Britain, Alone and Ignored - Britain's pusillanimous reaction to Trump's crazed decision to pull out of the  
We'll be LIVE tonight at 10pm on @Channel4 doing our very best to make sense of the news #isitok #ParisAgreement #brexit #GE2017 #TheLastLeg 
Brexit architect is reportedly a ‘person of interest’ in the FBI’s Russia investigation  
In the past 5 years, UK has received £28 billion #investment in digital #tech - more than double any other European country.#Brexit  
It's difficult to imagine a man less likely to deliver a satisfactory Brexit deal than Jeremy Corbyn.  
Meet the Brexit haters.Is your candidate on @Ella_M_Whelan's list of the most anti-democratic candidates?  #GE2017 
Postponed, not avoided: The #Brexit slowdown is under way | The Economist  
Brexit has already started to make UK citizens poorer  
The choice is clear: Theresa May securing the best Brexit deal, protecting your family’s economic security, or Jeremy Corbyn who has no plan  
London's Brexit apocalypse is nowhere in sight  
DO YOU REALLY WANT CORBYN NEGOTIATING FOR YOU ?#GE2017 #GeneralElection #Brexit #EUreferendum #EUref #LeaveEU #leave 
Nothing shows more clearly our future direction of travel with May's Brexit: Isolated,drifting further from a strengthening EU, pointlessly.  
Global wine trade (& UK wine prices) likely to be massively affected by Brexit  @wstauk 
In a word, Brexit.   
This bank is bucking the Brexit trend and moving jobs to London  
To deal with Brexit Shambles & to try & get a deal with Donald Trump Theresa May didn't sign the joint EU statement... #LostAllControl 
Hmm ... Hopefully pro Remain Londoners are aware that Corbyn is for Hard Brexit.  
Could a legal loophole leave some EU migrants at risk of being deported after Brexit?"  
Theresa May is too cowardly to allow the Brexit election we so badly need | Martin Kettle  
We haven't even left yet #Brexit. I say #CancelBrexit. 
#Venezuela's Supreme Court deals blow to #opposition: no prior referendum needed to convene Constituent Assembly  
3/3 '#AusConstitution already has facility to #treaty with #SovereignFirstNations, without a #Referendum' #Ghillar 
May Reveals Weak Leadership & Major Problem of Falling Out With Neighbours. 
Liberal Democrats to pitch themselves as ‘real party of business’ after Tory and Labour push for hard Brexit  
Theresa May is not fit for government #VoteLabour to ensure #Brexit isn't the disaster her general election campaign has been #ToriesOut 
Striking similarity between Brexit and Amerexit: "We're leaving, and then we're going to be really tough in negotiating with all the others" 
Do you want this man leading Brexit talks? #bbcqt #GE2017 
Im a Brit expat, still reeling from the Brexit/Farage farce. I kinda feel like we sowed the seeds of dissent. 
Classic """""dictator""""" moves, the referendum and people's assembly  
Still illegitimate if the ANC is not called by the people via referendum (Art.357). President only has right to initiate call (Art. 358).  
.@DavidDavisMP gave an excellent response on Tory approach to #Brexit.#bbcqt 
The Brexit slowdown is under way  
.@NicolasMaduro has announced that the resulting text of the National Constituent Assembly will be subject to referendum approval.  
Brexit leader calls reported involvement in Trump-Russia probe ‘fake news’  via @ludacristiano 
Watch all 27 EU countries sign the one that say Brexit deal terms can not be renegotiated with May now. She is a total spanner!  
Judging by her current performance, May would never be able to handle Brexit negotiations. They'd have her for breakfast. 
in 2002, he guided Miami-Dade referendum win that raised taxes for Children's Trust now funding $100-M annually in services for needy kids  
Corbyn vows to grow 10,000 extra money trees then ride a Unicorn to Germany to meet Merkel for discussions on Arsenal.....oh and Brexit. 
EXCLUSIVE: ‘We’ll give Scotland, Northern Ireland and Wales their say on Brexit’ says Keir Starmer  
Labour unveils plan to create a million new jobs as Britain slips into Brexit slump #VoteLabour #GE2017 
Jeremy Corbyn, in light of your policy not to walk away from a poor deal on #Brexit, I'd like to sell you a car. #GE2017 
Brexit Leader Nigel Farage a "Person of Interest" in Russia Probe  
I don't know a single climate change sceptic who doesn't also support Brexit. 
#Brexit is monumentally stupid. A change of government is perfect excuse to #stopbrexit and halt the economic down slide. #tactical2017 
Brexit architect is reportedly a ‘person of interest’ in the FBI’s Russia investigation  
Brexit - it's over.  
May's the same. How can she get the 'best possible Brexit deal' if she can't even get the best possible @? Pathetic.  
Theresa May sets out upbeat picture of post-Brexit Britain  
If @theresa_may doesn't think HER TEAM can get a good deal on Brexit she should sod off and let better communicators take power  
May refused to take questions from press unless questions previously submitted. Won't happen when negotiating Brexit. Problem?#dontvotetory  
France response to Brexit:Bankers, you're welcome here.France response to Paris withdrawal:Scientists, you're welcome here.  
Do you want Labour's @Keir_Starmer leading Brexit negotiations as Sec of State -- or Tory's David Davis below? Choice is easy #VoteLabour 
I wouldn't trust Davis to run a bath, let alone a #Brexit deal. Corbyn will steer this nation away from #Tory catastrophe #VoteLabour #BBCQT 
I detest the Tories but I'm voting for them to get a full Brexit we only have this one chance to get out the EU ..Corbyn will ruin #Brexit 
This is the Europe of dignity, peace and responsibility from which #Brexit would cast us to the #ClimateChange denial of trumped up despots. 
Barry Gardiner's right, Nick Clegg is right, Angus Robertson is right... Brexit is absolutely wrong.  
David Davis & Boris Johnson are the worst MPs imaginable to negotiate Brexit. Theresa May makes MANY mistakes but this is bonkers. #bbcqt 
"Best possible Brexit" says David DavisThis is like looking for best possible second hand car when you have crashed the Rolls Royce#bbcqt 
I'd rather send a used car salesman to negotiate Brexit than David Davis #BBCqt 
"David Davis is v worried about business leaving if tax is raised to 2012 levels. They're already leaving & it's because of Brexit" #bbcqt 
#bbcqt Dimbleby - with respect you've said on 17 QTs "but we voted leave"Could you perhaps, just once, ask "but what will Brexit cost?" 
We've heard it confirmed on #bbcqt UK will be WORSE OFF with ANY Brexit deal than we are in the EU Was *make yourself poorer* on the ballot? 
David Davis' self conscious avunicularity doesn't disguise his flimsy grasp of Brexit detail. It's shocking. @bbcquestiontime #voteSNP #Ge17 
How can we trust the Tories to deliver a good Brexit deal when they don't even know their numbers when it comes to our economy? 
Nick Clegg repeatedly asked David Davis how much Brexit will cost the UK economy but he had no answers. #BBCQT #VoteLibDem @nick_clegg 
David Davis is showing that the @Conservatives negotiating a #Brexit deal would be utterly disastrous & chaotic for the UK. #bbcqt 
Nick Clegg on superb form, using Govt's own official figures to show economic disaster of a bad Brexit deal #BBCQT #iagreewithnick 
Brexit makes her weak. She is chained to the U.S. at the worst possible time.  
Barry Gardiner seems to think we will be excluded from trading with Europe post Brexit. He's either a moron or a scaremonger.   #bbcqt 
Earlier today Jeremy introduced his fantastic Brexit team: @EmilyThornberry @Keir_Starmer @BarryGardiner  #BBCQT 
David Davis brands our Scottish government 'troublesome' for trying to do the best for Scotland re #brexit. Surely reason to #Votesnp #bbcqt 
#bbcqtWe respect the result of the referendum..... but, but, but, but, but, ad infinitum. 
.@AngusRobertson of @theSNP - bad Brexit deal is one where UKGov doesn't take account of devolved administrations #bbcqt  #votesnp 
"The DUP were paid to support Brexit and the rest of us are paying the price" .@newbelfast  .@bbctheview 
"Brexit will be a success because China has Marks & Spencers" - some fucking idiot #bbcqt 
Anyone still trusting the Tories on Brexit after watching their lead negotiator on #BBCQT ?And it gets worse: Boris is his apprentice.. 
Ironically, the Brexit referendum result ties the DUP into accepting that 51.9% of voters here can end the union with Britain! 
Barry Gardiner absolutely smashing the Brexit argument what a political giant.. #bbcqt 
Angus Robertson seems unaware that it was a UK referendum and a UK result to Brexit. He is an arrogant delusionist #bbcqt 
What's saddening/maddening is that the arguments over #Brexit now are the very ones we should have been hearing before the EU vote. #bbcqt 
Cat's out of Corbyn's bag: Gardiner basically saying we should stay in the EU #Brexit #bbcqt 
The truth is Brexit negotiations will be led either by David Davis or by Keir Starmer. Starmer's stock rises each time Davis speaks #bbcqt 
Barry Gardiner: I 'respect' the referendum resultJacob Rees-Mogg: No, don't say respect, say obey the referendum result#bbcqt 
Brexit has consequences. Brits, you're stuck with us.  
"Brexit will be a success because you have to believe in Brexit and something something the English language" - David Davis #bbcqt 
So SDLP Alasdar McDonnell says "we just have to get on with it" roll over on Brexit - he'll not do much to deliver designated special status  
No Brexit deal could give us as much economic benefit as being in the Single Market, warns @nick_clegg #bbcqt 
Sadly, Theresa May was unable to comment on President Trump's statement on the Paris Agreement as she was busy thinking about Brexit. 
"What does a bad Brexit deal look like"? #bbcqtPaying the EU more than a penny? 
Problem with Brexit is that UK now has to cozy up to all kinds of loopy weirdos because we told all our sane friends to go fuck themselves. 
If it's okay to have a referendum on Brexit why is it not okay to have one on Irish unity?  Message seems to be don't upset status quo 
This is what Brexit Britain will be like: on the wrong side of history.  
.Clear-headed View of Brexit"The cake has been eaten & they are slowly discovering that they no longer have it" 
Just at the time of #brexit when we need to boost trade & investment Labour want to lumber companies with £30bn of extra taxes #bbcnewsnight 
Desperate to get a trade deal, mustn't upset Boss Trump. God, Brexit is degrading.  
love the way brexit has made the UK so independent that their PM can't criticise anything trump does, no matter how suicidally stupid 
OK, here comes #bbcqt Prepare for an hour of more BBC pro Labour anti Brexit bias. 
I'm with you on the foxes. But Jeremy, there's this existential historical crisis called Brexit: can you please promise a 2nd EU referendum?  
What Tory Brexit is doing to us. Forcing us to hold hands with the babyman extremist even as he burns up the planet.  
According to Farage the FBI are a liberal elite who won't accept Brexit. Has he consumed too much #cofveve ? 
May: “I oppose Trump every week at PMQs. Er, I’d rather talk to the public about climate change. Er…er… I’m preparing for Brexit" 
AC Grayling on how Brexit may unravel -  #GoogleAlerts 
Jeremy Corbyn's Brexit negotiation strategy... This man would get taken to the cleaners!  
Brexit does not have to mean whatever May says it means, says @Keir_Starmer 
So. Quick recap on the day we learn @Nigel_Farage is 'person of interest' in US Russian Investigation. This is best pal & Brexit funder...  
"London’s Brexit Apocalypse Is Nowhere in Sight" - Bloomberg on the UK capital's continued growth & bright future.  
The reason you know "remarkably little about what Brexit will mean" from the two biggest parties is because they're too scared to tell you. 
The wonderful Barry Gardner is on #BBCQT tonight. He's one of the members of the impressive Labour Brexit team. Preferable to this lot.  
Only the #Conservatives can negotiate a decent #Brexit deal for the UK. All the other parties have their cards facing up. #GE2017 
apologies, i wasn't aware the election was a referendum on the paris climate agreement. nor that people voted for self harm. oh wait, brexit 
."If she’s unwilling to take on the might of Woman’s Hour, what hope would she have in Brexit talks". 
France, Germany, Italy, Canada 'regret' Trump's action on Climate Change...waiting for UK...... 
Labour shadow Brexit secretary Keir Starmer pockets £125,000 from law firm derailing Britain's EU exit  
Thanks to @Feorlean for joining me in #EdinburghSouthWest 4 an excellent public meeting on #Brexit & #ScotlandsPlaceInEurope #GE17 #VoteSNP 
FBI interest in Farage with respect to Trump & Russia once again shows how this 'patriot' is tied to foreign interests#GE2017 #Brexit 
Germany has to fill EU void from $1.5/monthly billion Brexit. And enter new 2018 trade negotiations w/ Trump while anchored to Paris Treaty  
#Brexit means 40 years worth of hardwork to negotiate away in less than two years... including 759 treaties...  
Watch BBC's @afneil grill Lib Dem leader @timfarron on plans for second EU referendum  
Well give Trump credit for one thing. He's doing wonders for post Brexit European unity. 
Good. Put that little upstart in her place. She's a senior administrator only. Our PM will deal with Brexit  
Pretty sure Trump would lose a Pittsburgh referendum on the Paris accord.  
Remember Corbyn is absolutely fine with #indyref2 what else would he give into during Brexit negotiations.  
Can't you ever talk in terms of specifics? What opportunities? How will you make a success of Brexit? Why stand up?  
Brexit won. Establishment could never understand it. Now they blame it on the Russians and say @Nigel_Farage is being watched by the FBI!  
Your vote will decide who will lead our Brexit negotiations. Theresa May or a coalition of chaos under Jeremy Corbyn.#GE2017#AskTheLeader 
Don't blame Brexit - blame Theresa May who has irresponsibly ditched Brexit negotiations for a general election  
This is creepy and threatening from Arron Banks.#Brexit #GE2017 
I am sorry for Theresa RT Theresa May needs Brexit to get her elected – it’s all she has left | Anne Perkins  
Bets on Jeremy Corbyn winning the election following same pattern as Donald Trump and Brexit#VoteLabour #GE2017 
No, Theresa May. You can't scare voters into hard Brexit. EU say talks *will not* start in "11 days" if Tories lose. 
And in context of Brexit, Ukraine, and Syria, Trump means everything is possible; nightmare scenarios are genuinely plausible even likely. 
UK growth has slumped to just 0.2 per cent. The worst in the G7. Project fear is project reality #Brexit 
No one in Labour's Brexit team has fibbed to the British people (£350m lie on a bus)  
This one's a belter #GE2017 #brexit  
We discussed post-ISIL challenges. We agreed on the importance of the referendum and our people's right to determine their own future. 
Brussels prepared to postpone start of Brexit talks if Jeremy Corbyn becomes Prime Minister -  
This is the real reason why @Conservatives have called a snap election! Hard #Brexit is a disaster for UK! #GE2017 
BCC agreed my Motion tonite to call on EU to approve special designated status for North within EU POST BREXIT @NiallSF @JohnODowdSF 
8 great reasons to vote Conservative at #GE2017 - from getting the best Brexit deal to more housing and more funding for schools and health.  
Labour Party on Brexit  
The SNP Aims to Derail Brexit  Please read and RT. Don't vote SNP 
Great rally in Derby tonight, talking about the opportunities ahead if we get Brexit right.  
There are some real rising stars in Labour - some great, hard-working, passionate and intelligent people. And the Brexit team is v. strong! 
Striking similarity between Brexit and Amerexit: We're leaving, and then we're going to be really tough in negotiating with all the others. 
Dugdale frantically dodging the question of whether Nicola Sturgeon should have a seat at the Brexit table. 
@OwenJones84 thanks for joining us in Kentish Town: great to get interview with you & to get our strong Brexit message out. #VoteLabour 
Impending catastrophe for the UK. Is there a chance to abort our disastrous Brexit ? Without the 'very unpleasant' Mrs May, maybe.  Bri  
Google unveils plans for its new £1billion London HQ  #fintech #brexit  
#Brexit - Labour's clear stance #VoteLabour 
Who would you prefer to negotiate in Europe with 27 other. countries over Brexit..? I know who my choice is.. #GE2017#VoteLabour 
So who would you prefer to represent us in the crucial Brexit negotiations, out of these two ?  
Britain is approaching a very serious time where to save Brexit and protect the result of the referendum horse power is going to be needed. 
London's Brexit apocalypse is nowhere in sight  
Without EU regulations on chemicals, Brexit Britain will be a toxic wasteland | Bruce Lourie  
Paris is going to be America’s Brexit. 
Keir is our man on Brexit: Jobs & Economy come first. And ensure Rights & Environmental standards are protected. 
Brexit is a stupid thing ..division is not good..and lying about it isnt good either.. #IresponsibleGoverment 
When Labour promise billions of extra spending they are simply lying. We simply can't afford it with Brexit.  
Brexit has already cost £60 billion. It's forecast to cost another £220 billion. Labour support Brexit. We simply can't afford this.  
Greedy capitalists continue to exploit Brexit by cutting product sizes but not prices  
Courtesy of Iain Duncan Smith, there is no Brexit plan...  
British Brexit Mastermind Is A 'Person Of Interest' In FBI Russia Probe (VIDEO)  via @LibAmericaOrg 
Why did @Conservatives call snap election?Not #brexit mandateWanted 5 more years 2 smash & flog off what remains of public sector#GE2017 
The UK can't afford to jeopardise the fate of Brexit on the hopelessly weak Corbyn, says the Sun  
.@Channel4News view from Middlesbrough is dark: "Brexit's our hope & will bring jobs here" Appallingly cynical of PM to feed such false hope 
Make your plan to vote today. Your vote decides who will be PM & lead our Brexit negotiations -Theresa May or Corbyn  
Leaked document shows ‘secret’ government studies into impact of ‘hard’ Brexit  
After I investigated Brexit/Russia/Trump, and sent my findings to authorities Nigel Farage is now a person of interest to the FBI. 
I'm happy to judge the Tories on their record, they have told lies about #brexit  they are fucking liars and not getting my Vote #GE2017 pic.twitter.com/OWP7aMJqEj 
Keir on Brexit: The drivers of immigration have to be dealt with, that will lower the numbers.#GE2017 #Labour #GeneralElection 
FBI targets Brexit leader Nigel Farage in Donald Trump’s Russia scandal  
Tim Farron: I'd campaign to stay in the EU in a second referendum  
Corbyn on Brexit: Labour’s new managed immigration rule will be fair, & based on what’s best for our economy & communities.#GE2017 #Labour 
Theresa May wants to turn Brexit Britain into a tax haven. Who better to stand up to her than @Molly4Bristol? 
"I'm @timfarron & I'm incapable of accepting #Brexit or democracy in Britain. I also acted like a petulant kid on #AndrewNeilInterviews" 
ONLY THE BEGINNING: Predictably, after Britain's Brexit buffoonery, people are getting less for what they pay for  
Watch our #ElectionDebate on the @bbcasiannetwork. We talked about brexit, terrorism, hate crime, security -->  
Solid day for PM. Seems v comfortable on the reaffirming Brexit ground. Doing a bit of panto with party faithful. Read all about it at 2200  
Wonder who she will send as substitute to the Brexit negotiations? #VoteSNP #GE17 
163 Labour MPs walked through the voting lobbies with Tories and UKIP in support of May's extreme Brexit #AndrewNeilInterviews #VoteLibDem 
WATCH: Tim Farron accused of doing everything possible to reverse referendum result. 
Just as @Arron_banks, Brexit's biggest backer and top @Nigel_Farage pal has made no bones of his love of Putin.. 
Lib Dem leader Tim Farron says his party are offering a real alternative on #Brexit  #BBCElection #GE2017 
Labour will offer a real alternative on Brexit - that's what @Keir_Starmer tells me in my new interview >> 
HmmStrong and stable?Best person to negotiate Brexit?#WeakAndWobbly May was relying on Crosby, Murdoch, Dacre to do all the work for her 
Corbyn: In Labour’s Brexit team, there is no one who has fibbed to the British people;(£350 Million on NHS)#GE2017 #Labour #GeneralElection 
Theresa May: "You can only deliver Brexit if you believe in Brexit"And yet she voted against Brexit. Are you lost, hun? 
Cowardly Tim Farron gets caught in web of deceit on Brexit.He lost big last year and won't accept it. Sore loser! #AndrewNeilInterviews 
HEATED: Tim Farron loses cool as BBC's Andrew Neil skewers him on second referendum. 
No matter what question Glenn asks, on Brexit or "strong and stable", Ruth drags it back to "NO 2ND REFERENDUM!" #AskTheLeader 
.@RuthDavidsonMSP "Jeremy Corbyn said he would be 'absolutely fine' with another independence referendum"#AskTheLeader 
More bad news for #ToxicTheresa, as it transpires her adversaries in the upcoming Brexit negotiations have ears and eyes.  
Keir Starmer QC - The Negotiator #VoteLabour #GE2017 #Brexit  
Tim Farron accused of "trying to have it both ways" on #Brexit by Andrew Neil  #BBCElection #GE2017 
UK meat and dairy farmers face £709m export tariffs with May's UKIP-style Brexit - risking 476,000 UK jobs #BBCDebate #VoteLibDem 
Ruth, if we "shouldn't trust opinion polls", why are you using them as an excuse to block an independence referendum?  #AskTheLeader #ge2017 
You wouldn't accept a bad deal so why should you have a bad Brexit deal forced upon you by Theresa May? #VoteLibDem #AndrewNeilInterviews 
Getting the best deal for Brexit means standing up for the UK. Only Theresa May has the plan and ability to deliver for Britain.  
READ -> "Voting for Freedom: The 2016 Swiss Referendum on #Basicincome: A Milestone in the Advancement of Democracy" 
.Little Chocolate Bars for Little Brexit Britain...... 
With UK a week away from #GE2017, @HRW looks at what the party manifestos say abt human rights, including re Brexit  
George Soros says Brexit could last 5 years and cause "immense damage"  
Jeremy Corbyn brands 'no deal' Brexit option an ‘economic disaster’  
The EU is just beginning to face up to what Brexit will cost it  
Opinion: Deal or no deal, Britain will emerge a loser from Brexit  
How is a woman who is too scared to answer the questions of a radio host going to negotiate a brilliant Brexit deal?  
Lib Dem leader Tim Farron gets into heated exchange with Andrew Neil as he defends his #Brexit position  #GE2017 
Honest question. If Brexit means we get all fishing waters back to ourselves, catch zillions of fish...who do we sell them to if not EU? 
Remember the £350m pledge bus by the leave team? Where's that now? #brexit is making you poorer.  
And now you want us to believe in #Brexit. You jest?  
Nigel Farage, the mind behind Brexit, is now an FBI "person of interest" in Trump-Russia  
Why do the media, particularly the @BBCNews talk down the UK re #brexit.Why don't they look at opportunities & ignore minority parties gloom 
Brexit Briefing: By Her Own Logic, Theresa May Caused The Biggest Risk To Brexit  
Bets on Jeremy Corbyn winning the election following same pattern as Trump and Brexit  
“Back of the queue". Trump proves Obama right on #Brexit trade deals  
Hung parliament. Minority parties' condition for supporting Labour: a 2nd referendum. #Brexit cancelled 
Oh FFS she has put her "If we get Brexit right" speech to music... The idiot couldn't even get her manifesto right.  
Londoners welcome to a discussion on India&Britain post-Brexit at the FabianSociety,  Migration Museum SE1 7AG:  
Brexit architect is reportedly a ‘person of interest’ in the FBI’s Russia investigation 
They're now campaigning *for*Rape ClauseThe dementia taxDisability cutsFox huntingA hard BrexitNHS privatisationAgainst J Corbyn 
Kids if Mum asks you to do anything the stock answer is ‘I’m concentrating on getting the best Brexit deal and I suggest you do the same’ 
So I ask Corbyn how he'd negotiate Brexit differently with MErkel if he wins: He says "I'd go over there straight away"... @AdamBienkov 
Former Finnish Prime Minister Alexander Stubb says Brexit and Trump mean Europe has to take on more leadership  
Cash 4 Ash followed by Cash 4 #Brexit - Reckless DUP  
The #UK has the worst performing advanced economy. Tory #brexit will make it worse. Scotland can do better #VoteSNP 
This is really the only way that people who're aware of the lunacy of Brexit can make their voices heard.  
If you run the Brexit negotiations like you've run your GE campaign you'll be lucky to come back with a piss stained EU flag and a croissant 
WATCH | @Nigel_Farage responds to the fake news about the FBI investigating him for ties to Russia. The media elites can't accept Brexit!  
David Beckham and Gary Lineker lost court bid to overturn £700 million tax bill  
If we get Brexit right, we can do great things and build a stronger Britain. Back me on June 8th so I can get the best Brexit deal for you.  
Wish all countries in the family known as the Commonwealth of Nations a brilliant 2017. Hope the UK forges closer links with you post-Brexit pic.twitter.com/5fzwxdgEFt 
The UK election was called because of Brexit - but, @campbellclaret says, it's barely been discussed in campaigning 
Why #Brexit could cause 'major disruption' to flights:  
LSE: Failure to get a Brexit trade deal will cost every household at least £1,890 a year  via @BIUK_Finance 
She can't face Woman's Hour but expects us to believe that she can negotiate a Brexit deal with the EU?  
Labour and the Tories start to spell out their differences on Brexit | Dan Roberts  
The Brexit slowdown is under way  
She's totally going to boss those #Brexit negotations. And by "boss" I mean "get eaten alive."  
Chateau Brexit? Average price of bottle of wine reaches record high  
Looking good, after we Brexit. Think of our brilliant future once we secure our release from the anti-growth, anti-democratic, shackling EU. pic.twitter.com/c2aYqzQvW5 
Got to say @Keir_Starmer would be absolutely brilliant at negotiating #brexit Tories just do not have anyone of his stature. #VoteLabour 
Make your plan to vote today. Your vote decides who will be PM & lead our Brexit negotiations -Theresa May or Corbyn  
Nigel Farage's head after #Brexit and meeting his mate Donald Trump in a gold elevator. #famouslybigger 
33. Neil's No Deal Celebration34. Penny's Election Debate Panic35. Bryony's Brexit Priority36. Warren's Wealth Worries  
Talking #MagicMoneyTree, the govt managed to magic up an extra £122bn of borrowing to ease the path to #Brexit.#GE2017 #GE17 
Revealed: chocolate and drinks shrink since Brexit vote with no price drop  
I'm not cooking dinner. I am concentrating on Brexit. 
Boris Johnson pre-EURef: "most of our problems are not caused by Brussels, but by chronic British short-termism..."#GE2017 #Brexit  
Martin Wolf: The ‘no deal’ Brexit option is little more than empty rhetoric  
A call for referendum to be held let Biafrans decide their faith #PulseNigeriaNews #Biafra #Referendum  
Don't leave Brexit to an unprepared Labour and a leader who doesn't know what he wants, says @DanielJHannan 
What promise of Brexit? Isolation, impoverishment ?  
is she too busy thinking about brexit again  
The mood in Britain is switching to Labour, Evening Standard owner Alexander Lebedev says  
Causes for concern by country: America: TrumpGermany: also TrumpUK: BrexitCanada - well, you see there is this giant inflatable duck... 
Japan sounds like a model for #Brexit - low immigration, located near booming markets. Its economy has stagnated for 20 years.#GE2017 #GE17 
#GE2017 PULL and PUSH:PULL:  Vote CONSERVATIVE to get #Brexit.PUSH: Stop Coalition of Anti-Britain Brigade: LAB, SNP, PC, SF, LDEM, GRN. pic.twitter.com/EKc8nQTqhO 
Revealed: chocolate and drinks shrink in size since Brexit vote with no price drop  
Nicola Sturgeon accused Theresa May of not explaining her Brexit plan.Reminder that the SNP still haven't explained their currency plans. 
Former Finnish Prime Minister Alexander Stubb says Brexit and Trump mean Europe has to take on more leadership  
Voting #UKIP ensures that Theresa May's Brexit negotiations & implementation of other policies will have the right balance & support #GE2017 
This is what Europe thinks #Brexit should look like  
ING plans to move 40+ trading jobs from Amsterdam to London, bucking the Brexit trend  
MUST SEE:The Tories AWFUL record #Labour #ToriesOut #GE2017 #brexit #JC4PM #BBCDebate #NHS No wonder they don't want to debate. 
'Who really did give the DUP £425,622 to support Brexit in Britain?' asks MEP @M_AndersonSF  
Here are the signs that Brexit is starting to damage the economy  
Guardian Publishes Anon Source Claim that Brexit Leader Farage is 'Person of Interest' to FBI-Russia Investigation  
SNP win in Scotland can influence #Brexit talks, @NicolaSturgeon tells the BBC  #GE2017 
The Brexit train is leaving but here's what the party manifestos say about the journey ahead #BBCElection #GE2017  
Brexit leader Nigel Farage is a "person of interest" in Trump-Russia investigation: report  
“Let’s be clear: ‘no deal’ is in fact a bad deal. It is the worst of all deals” @jeremycorbyn laid out our plans for #Brexit today. RT ↓  
We now have THE worst performing major economy in the world due to the referendum result.  We need less Brexit, not more. Focus on the NHS. 
I will stand up for the UK to make a success of Brexit, so we can take advantage of the opportunities before us.  
MUST READ: After Brexit: the UK will need to renegotiate at least 759 treaties  via @FT This story will run and run.. 
Corbyn would destroy Brexit, increase mass immigration and completely wreck the economy that's being rebuilt. He's not fit for office. #GE17 
'You can only deliver Brexit if you believe in Brexit,' says PM who campaigned against Brexit  This demeans politics 
A @UKLabour Brexit means a deal that allows us to become a country that values and protects our public services & invests in our communities  
Here are the signs that Brexit is starting to hurt the UK economy  
Dear @Theresa_MayYou just said "You can only deliver Brexit if you believe in Brexit"But you voted against Brexit. Are you confused?John 
Brexit Secretary David Davis responds to whether the election is a distraction from his job.  
Can we at least agree this: that between calling the Brexit referendum, *losing* the Brexit referendum, calling this election and absolutely 
Must be great for Tories,whenever they get out of their depth,to say let's talk about Brexit,as that means they can talk pure gobbledygook. 
May needs Brexit to get her elected – it’s all she has left,leading a nasty, mean,vituperative & dishonest campaign  
EU elite still think prospect of cancelling Brexit is "attainable". They still don't get it!  
Almost as patently absurd as calling an election to deliver a Brexit process you are at that exact moment supposed to be negotiating.  
A @UKLabour Brexit will strengthen workers' rights, and regulate employers to end undercutting of wages and exploitation of migrant workers. pic.twitter.com/jHvx7yScWg 
Jeremy Corbyn set out Labour's vision for a Jobs First Brexit today. People seem to like it.  #GE2017 #VoteLabour 
May's defence that Corbyn keeps going on telly when she's "busy thinking about Brexit" is so nonsensical. If so busy, why call election? 
This must also be because we can't accept Brexit.  
Thread on the re-writing of history, & how the path to either Hard Brexit or a No Deal isn't one anyone planned & almost no-one intended.  
Corbyn being very clear on Brexit and Labour's Plan for Brexit. Wonder how the media will spin this as something else?  
Hilariously, Farage's response to FBI 'person of interest' story is that Guardian "cannot accept Brexit"  
Great news - at last UK progressive parties forced to produce consensus on post-Brexit Britain  
This is what a proper Brexit team looks like. Contrast that with Boris, May and Davis.  
A @UKLabour Brexit means a deal that will allow us to upgrade our economy through investment in jobs, industry, infrastructure and skills.  
I trust Barry Gardiner, Emily Thornberry and Keir Starmer much more than Boris Johnson, Liam Fox and David Davis. Labour Brexit. Great team. 
Sure would LOVE to see #BREXIT buffoon Nigel Farage get some much-deserved, overdue comeuppance. #ThursdayThoughts  
Former DPP+Head of the CPS Sir Keir Starmer leading a Labour Brexit negotiation team puts me more at ease than Tory one with Bozza Johnson! 
Jeremy receives a *very* long standing ovation in Basildon for his Brexit speech. #JC4PM #GE2017 
JC: It is not in doubt we are leaving the EU. Labour will be ready to negotiate a Brexit for the many not the few. Thank you! 
It's possible a minority Corbyn Government would fall within weeks. Meaning another General Election. On top of Brexit. That's chaos. 
Keir Starmer on his own would be of far more use in Brexit negotiations than the gutless May and her three stooges.  
Labour: promise us a 2nd EU referendum. 
Why the Tories are struggling in one sentence: they based a campaign around the presumption Labour would 'resist' Brexit - even when didn't. 
Jeremy Corbyn introduces his team on Brexit. This is what responsible leadership looks like, folks  
Here is Labour's team who'll negotiate Brexit. Starmer, Gardiner & Thornberry. Or you could have Boris, Davis & Fox   
A Brexit for the many not the few! A Brexit for the British people not the Banker's Brexit that the Tories are offering! #VoteLabour 
True story: I was in France on Brexit night, and when Trump was elected. If you catch me going to France next week, confiscate my passport. 
May's #Brexit pitch. We can have a strong ec AND cut immigration to sub 100k. It's simply not true, why won't she be straight about it  
The losses in the City due to quitting the Single Market far exceed the cost of UK membership of the EU#Brexit 
Corbyn's strongest speech on Brexit yet.No change on Hard Brexit but marked emphasis on his team's negotiating strength & social priorities. 
LSE: The City may lose up to £18 billion in revenue & up to 30,000 jobs by leaving the single market #Brexit #GE2017 
On Brexit -Theresa May: 'no deal is better than a bad deal.'Corbyn: 'No deal *is* a bad deal, it is the worst possible deal.' 
Brexit leader Nigel Farage is a "person of interest" in Trump-Russia investigation: report  
Labour's Brexit negotiators - Sir Keir Starmer, Barry Gardiner and Emily Thornberry vs the Tories' David Davis, Liam Fox and Boris Johnson! 
Jeremy Corbyn: Make no mistake- a Brexit for the few is being cooked up by this Tory government'#GeneralElection 
Phenomenal introduction by Keir Starmer in Basildon. Professionalism & Integrity. Really puts David Davis to shame regarding Brexit#GE2017 
Brexit and Trump are #Russia's two biggest strategic wins since Yalta. Of course there are linkages.  
Ahead of my speech about how @UKLabour will ensure Brexit works #ForTheMany, watch our broadcast → 
You have been PM for nearly a year and have created no clarity on Brexit but sown chaos and confusion through your dithering and U-turns 
Recent report claimed English literacy was worst in Europe and Ruthie attacks Scottish education. Anything instead of answering about Brexit  
BREXIT: David Wolchover argues that the Prime Minister has not triggered Art 50 of the Treaty on European Union  
Keir Starmer tells Owen Jones: 'Brexit is an opportunity for sensible immigration rules' – video  
British PM Theresa May announces, "Every time someone says "Remain", a little Brexit fairy dies." May, 2017.  
Kate Hoey claims she now supports the Labour position on Brexit. Then brings in Vote Leave to run her campaign   
#GE2017 live: Jeremy Corbyn talks Brexit in Essex - watch it here  
George Soros says Brexit could last 5 years and cause "immense damage"  
Theresa May's promise of a post-#Brexit 'land of milk & honey' risks biggest sense of disappointment & disillusionment with politicians ever 
For security reasons Britain supported East-European counties joining the EU. Leavers refuse to accept the consequences.#GE2017 #Brexit 
With just a week to go until the election, the EU crushes one of Theresa May’s main arguments  #GE2017 #Brexit 
BREAKING: Catalan President and VP will jointly announce the date and question of the independence referendum next week. 
Links to both Trump & Assange make Brexit champion Nigel Farage a "person of interest" in FBI's Trump-Russia probe.  
Jeremy Corbyn slams Theresa May's Tory team for 'fibbing to the British people' about Brexit #GE2017 
If you put your trust in me, back me, I will work every day to make a success of Brexit.  
I am confident that we can fulfil the promise of Brexit and build a stronger, fairer, even more prosperous Britain  
Just 11 days after you vote, the EU will start the Brexit negotiations with Britain. Read about my plan here:  
Leading Brexit campaigner Nigel Farage reportedly a 'person of interest' in Trump-Russia probe:  
Brexit is the best thing to happen for Russia  
This hysterical attempt to associate me with the Putin regime is a result of the liberal elite being unable to accept Brexit and Trump. 
21) but the fact remains, we're heading for a future that no Brexit leader wanted and almost no-one voted for, almost out of embarrassment  
May, the woman who, having argued passionately against Brexit, now claims, from inside Trump's rectum, that Brexit will make Britain great. 
You are in the EU. It is peaceful here.>Leave EUAre you sure you want to leave the EU?>BrexitI don't know that word>Brexit means Brexit 
JUST IN: Brexit leader Nigel Farage is a "person of interest" in Trump-Russia investigation: report  
LSE: Failure to get a Brexit trade deal will cost every household at least £1,890 a year  via @BIUK_Finance 
Labour leader Jeremy Corbyn has just arrived in #Basildon to deliver a speech on Brexit to hundreds of supporters.  
19) and the race is on to convince the public that it's the EU's fault, not the leaders of Brexit for the upcoming pain combined with 
18) so what are we left with? A Leadership who don't believe in Hard Brexit but must push it through, backed by a vote for soft brexit 
Please RT as a reminder that Theresa doesn't really believe the Futures Brighter with Brexit #StrongAndStableMyArse 
Theresa May just made a (dreadful) speech on Brexit, her flagship GE2017 issue. Not a murmur of it on Twitter. She has become irrelevant. 
On our way to Pitsea for @jeremycorbyn's #Brexit speech. #GE2017 #VoteLabour 
Justine Greening is right. Young people are better educated than ever and very few of them support either the Conservatives or Brexit #wato 
Farage slams "hysterical" attempt to link him with Putin regime by liberal elite unable to accept Brexit and Trump.  
Putin would like the EU to breakFar-right members of team Trump would too.In light of the Nigel Farage news, we should postpone Brexit 
Brexit demagogue Nigel Farage, has graduated to "Person Of Interest" in the FBI's Trump/Russia collusion probe.  
Hold on. How does May know about debate? Wasn't she too busy meeting voters last night? Or contemplating Brexit? Or installing her upgrades?  
Thread on the inherent contradictions in May flip-flopping between whether Brexit is an unmitigated disaster or bountiful opportunity.  
2) looking back prior to the referendum, there were 2 schools of thought from #Brexit leaders, and this drove 90% of their thinking: 
1) thread.1 of the most bizarre aspects of the UK's current direction is that none of the #Brexit Leadership expected this hard brexit 
Latest from #AnywhereButWestminster: the Tory revival in North East Scotland, featuring oil crash, fishing, Brexit  
"Prime Minister Corbyn wouldn't leave without a Brexit deal - but who knows how bad it could be?" #premium 
RT @jrmaidment: Theresa May: "You can only deliver Brexit if you believe in Brexit." #Brexit #GE2017 
If we get #Brexit right we can be a "confident self-governing country again", Theresa May says  #GE2017 
HORTICUNTURE: Conservatives reveal their election answer to Labour’s Magic Money Tree. Enchanted Brexit BushVenus Fox TrapYewturn Tree 
Nothing strong or stable about Brexit, a disingenuous proposition built on exaggeration, fuelled by fear, resulting in over-inflated support  
She backed Remain during the referendum.  
Impact of Brexit already hits home as UK now last of G7 nations for growth:  via @TheCommonSpace 
Interesting convos with expats over here in SpainThey absolutely hate the UK gov for Brexit 
May: "We'll be a more united Britain after Brexit"Also: "48% of you are traitors" 
Theresa May says she's "ambitious for #Brexit" and says she's clear about what has to be done  #GE2017 
Brexit is like a house on fire. Perhaps one day you'll have a new house, but before anything else, have to acknowledge it is in fact burning 
Whether you like #Conservatives or not, it doesn't matter.Only a majority Tory government can deliver #Brexit & negotiate a good dea #GE2017 
A short analogy about Brexit, and the Government's strategy to deal with it: 
'Getting Brexit right' is like crashing your car in a way that you hope detonates the airbags.  
If that utter 'stop brexit' melt wasn't standing in Battersea we'd be winning Martin Linton's old seat. Maybe competitive in Putney LMAO  
She's no longer talking about Brexit. 
This is the problem with trying to hold an election on Brexit without being prepared to divulge any details of your plan. 
Sir Keir Starmer would give Scotland, NI and Wales a say on Brexit  #bbcdp #GE2017 
Theresa May tells voters to use general election to affirm Brexit – live  
"Get Brexit right" is the new "Strong & Stable" 
We have Farage abt to have his cover blown by the FBI and a data scam used by Leave in Brexit... The referendum is illegitimate! @acgrayling 
Nigel Farage is the link between Putin, Trump and Brexit. Brexit plays directly into Putin's hands  
PM: people of Britain voted for Brexit with eyes open, knew it might be straightforward. They defied the establishment. Time to respect it. 
"We can fulfil the prospect of Brexit together." This isn't from her speech, obvs, it's from her Tinder. 
So this was just 2 days ago. Today May will say that the "promise of Brexit is great, the opportunities before us enormous". Which is it?  
We're faced with Theresa May or Jeremy Corbyn. Put Country First & lend the Tories your vote in the name of Brexit!  
Nigel Farage is 'person of interest' in FBI investigation into #Trump & Russia. #auspol #uspoli #uspolitics #brexit  
London’s Brexit Apocalypse Is Nowhere in Sight  
Lynton Crosby and the Tory PR machine are going to try & spin the Election as JUST #Brexit now...ignoring the NHS, cuts, pensioners etc...  
Jeremy Corbyn slams Theresa May's Tory team for 'fibbing to the British people' about Brexit 
Currency fucked. Growth fucked. BREXIT on election hold. U-turns aplenty. Debates Dodged. #WellDoneTheresa  
Anyone concerned about the post Brexit decline in sterling £ should be worried. Should Corbyn win the election, the pound would collapse. 
Nixon tapes himselfCameron calls a referendum on EUMay calls an election without a good reasonPolitical blunders born of arrogance 
FFS - UK now worst-performing advanced economy in the world after post-Brexit vote slump  
No deal is the bad deal! It's the final stop on the bad-deal train. #Brexit #GE2017 #votetactical 
But once again broadcasters are taking May at face value. If she wants to talk about Brexit: great. But make her actually talk about it. 
"Today May will attempt to turn conversation back to Brexit". No, she'll turn conversation back to a subject she refuses to discuss. 
full dataset from YouGov - also 45-44 Brexit wrong, Labour only party not having net negative on "honest campaign":  
Theresa May's plan for Britain will ensure we get the best Brexit deal from Brussels and a more secure, united Britain here at home.  
Voting #UKIP ensures that Theresa May's Brexit negotiations & implementation of other policies will have the right balance & support #GE2017 
Bascially, this is the evolution of the Tory's Brexit position in the last yearRemainEEASoft BrexitHard BrexitChaotic, Nuclear Brexit 
Please do your homework on Kier Starmer & compare to David Davis & Boris Johnson.I would be much happier with Starmer negotiating Brexit.  
"the big boys in the @LibDems made me call an election" says @theresa_may If 9 of 650 opposing isn't manageable how is 1 vs 27 in brexit? 
BEHAVE: Even an ex-Euro judge reckons EU's demand for Brexit ransom is crackers. Says it all!  
Theresa May needs Brexit to get her elected – it’s all she has left | Anne Perkins  
Where do the parties stand on #Brexit? Our #GE2017 manifesto guide:  
Theresa May just spouts empty words on Brexit. She has no plans. Where is the detail? #ImVotingLabour 
May's Brexit plans...nothing, nada, zilch just empty slogans and rhetoric! Where's the detail? #WeakAndWobbly won't cut it She dodged debate 
Looks even more impressive as graphic...  #BBCdebate #BBCqt #strongandstable #brexit #ge2017 
Spain's government in desperate attempt to BLOCK #Catalonia’s independence referendum plans  
Also clear nobody expected Lib-Dems to do worse than last time. Suggests 'remain' votes going to Labour to punish Tories, not stop Brexit.  
Economists agree that Brexit will have a negative impact on the economy but let's believe what Theresa May, who can't even debate, claims  
If, as Theresa May claims, the UK will be wealthier after Brexit, then Labour is the best party to deliver it as it would share the wealth 
If @theresa_may can squander a 20 point lead, with most of the press on her side, imagine what she'll make of Brexit 
Tory UK heading towards damaging hard Brexit is already worst performing advanced economy in world #voteSNP #GE2017 
Everything starts to look like  a Brexit metaphor after a while, doesn't it.  
Bryony's Brexit Priority:  
Corbyn speech on Brexit later today by far the best he's managed since referendum took place. 
Chateau Brexit? Average price of bottle of wine reaches record high  
The many international treaties and agreements that will need to be renegotiated after Brexit – 759, to be exact  
Imagine voting for Brexit before seeing what this car looks like.  
Labour's strong approach to Brexit will reset negotiations & ensure we get the right deal for Britain. #VoteLabour 
The EU and China are showing real leadership on climate change. UK won't even criticise Trump. Brexit Britain is becoming irrelevant. 
But Corbyn has blood on his hands  over Brexit.LP members should force him to honour LP policy and hold 2nd ref if Brexit deal is bad.  
Pound falls against dollar as election uncertainty continues  
Tories campaign has collapsed because  Brexit is a disaster & exposes 7 yrs of austerity as ideological rather than practical, 
My piece for @CNN on this strange strange election and what it says about Brexit Britain  
Watch @TiceRichard explain why Britain will thrive post-Brexit  
If May was asked this she'd have said both bands are good but let me be clear what is important is that we get the best possible Brexit deal  
The Brexit election that leaves Britain the loser  via @FT 
Theresa May's plan for Brexit will return control to Britain. Find out more:  
Economist Endorses LibDems in Epic Brexit Whinge:  
The UK is now the worst-performing advanced economy in the world after post-Brexit vote slump.  
I imagined Boris negotiating Brexit.  
Life after Brexit – Strengthening the EU – Maldives RelationshipBy H.E. Ahmed Shiaan, Ambassador of Maldives to EU 
Last chance Scottish people who you voting for? #GE2017 #Scotland #brexitVote.   Retweet.  Follow.  
#strongandstablemyarse you don't think that Brexit is the right thing to do. You just want to be Prime Minister at any cost.  
EXCLUSIVE:  ‘We’ll give Scotland, Northern Ireland and Wales their say on #Brexit’ says @Keir_Starmer  
Just said good morning walking down the street to 8 people and only 2 said it back. I blame Brexit.  What else is there to blame these days 
Brexit negotiations may last 5 years and will be "immensely" damaging, George Soros says  
Only Labour will protect jobs & workers through Brexit. The Tories’ Brexit deal will mean a race to the bottom on wages & workers’ rights.  
Having steered his country toward Brexit, Boris Johnson seeks to have a positive influence on his American cousin...  
Theresa May to call on voters to unite behind the “great national mission” of delivering Brexit  
I'M SICK OF EXPERTS TELLING ME WHAT TO DO! FAKE NEWS! MSM CONSPIRACY! I'LL PUT A WASPS NEST WHERE I WANT TO! I'LL PUT TWO UP THERE! #Brexit  
Consciously or not, through the campaign, the Tories have begun to describe Brexit as a monumental risk, that only T. May is able to handle. 
He's not PM so it's not his job, dick head. You should be paying attention to Brexit instead of calling an election then hiding throughout.  
7) In other words, whoever wins, this is a Brexit election. Just one that has lacked the substance that such an important issue demanded 
Me: Corbyn is a megabae and I'm excited he's giving jam to everyone Also me: could have rrrrrreally used this before Brexit, Jez 
6) Task of Brexit is immense. Whoever is in gov’t will be able to do little else, and will need to increase civil service numbers & talent 
5) May talks a lot about strength. But Brexit isn’t wrestlemania. Negotiations will mostly be about technical detail, resources & logistics 
Revealed: #JeremyCorbyn's leaked plan to allow thousands of unskilled workers into the #UK after #Brexit #premium 
One year on: the tone of the Brexit debate remains healthy, respectful and gracious  
Coalition of #chaos: more taxes, higher immigration & a Brexit shambles. Only Theresa May & her team can & will stand up for Britain.  
I spoke to @EveningStandard in Tottenham about abuse, hate crime, Brexit and the rise of knife crime on our streets.  
'There's too much scaremongering!' Banker insists UK will still 'thrive' after Brexit 
LOL.She won't tell us what Brexit means but point 1 of Theresa May's plan for Brexit is "provide certainty and clarity".#ToryShambles 
If T May appears on TV now gotta assume she's sorted out/stopped thinking about Brexit negotiations? Else her reason becomes a bit porkie 
Keen to see what @theresa_may did for Brexit negotiations last night in the two hours she missed the debate for 
Theresa May's plan for #Brexit is at the level of "I will build a rocket car, it will fly at 1000mph" Nicholas aged 6#Brexit #GE2017 
Our thanks to @peterkyle for coming to speak to our branch about his stance on equality post Brexit & for answering our searching questions!  
THERESA MAY’S CLEAR PLAN FOR BREXIT is a collection of snippets of childish wishful thinking.#Brexit #GE2017 
#Britain could reunite with the EU before the divorce is completed, says @GeorgeSoros  #Brexit #EUBEF2017 
Theresa May will call on voters to unite in #GE2017 to give her a mandate to "fulfil the promise of Brexit"  
Brexit GDP losses to dwarf Britain’s EU budget contributions  
wow just saw a white van man shout "go home, brexit!" at an asian cab driver. fella needs a geography lesson, i think. 
So negotiating #Brexit will be down to Boris Johnson or Sir Keir Starmer.  That might help a few undecided voters 
UK now the worst-performing advanced economy in the world after post-Brexit vote slump  
A Labour win could prove to be a way for the British public to wriggle out of hard Brexit with minimal loss of face 
A scientist braindrain has begun, the EUMedicinesAgency is quitting UK & EU science funding will dry up after #BrexitYOU'RE KILLING SCIENCE  
We warned you Leavers, repeatedly. Before Brexit vote we were recovering, not any more. Slow hand clap  
Chris Hazzard & SF jeered & sneered at SDLP proposal 4 Special Staus in Brexit & didn't turn up for a vote. SDLP proposal fell by 1 vote. 
So, while Theresa May was too busy slaving away on #Brexit to attend the #BBCDebate the actual #Brexit minister was free to turn up. #c4news 
First caller on Kaye AdamsMay was right not to debate because it was shouty, she's got Brexit to deal withSHE CALLED THE FUCKING ELECTION! 
Brexit negotiations must be for all of us. Not just the 51% who wanted it. Bring on a hung parliament I say. 
If #brexit forces ± 1M ex-pats to return to the UK (healthcare, residence rights) what will that do to Team Theresa's net migration target? 
Planning 4 Brexit & future of EU: @dfatirl Minister @CharlieFlanagan & @DaraMurphyFG meet EU partners in 4 capitals this week. #working4IRL 
To get the best Brexit deal, we need a Prime Minister who is prepared to take the difficult decisions and stand up for the UK.  
Yet more incisive questioning from Krishnan. This time of the UK's lead Brexit negotiator - David Davis. Strong and stable? #GE17 
PM: get behind the “great national mission” of delivering Brexit | Brussels could postpone talks for Corbyn as PM  
Allison Morris: Brexit is more pressing issue than Corbyn's Sinn Féin meetings 30 years ago via @irish_news 
Article 50 is actually reversible, author of the Brexit treaty clause says  
Delivering a smooth, orderly exit from the EU is central to our 12-point plan for Brexit. Find out more:  
How will we be able to tell that @theresa_may has got #Brexit 'right', if she won't tell us what 'right' is?#GE2017 
The man who wrote Article 50 says Brexit can still be stopped  
Manchester United say Brexit may hand advantage to Real Madrid and Barcelona, some players asked to be paid in euros  
.@nick_clegg says the Conservatives should not "go about #Brexit in such a confrontational way", saying the #NHS will suffer 
Good example of where high European standards have helped drive up our own & improved our environment #Brexit:...  
A key part of our 12-point plan for Brexit is continuing in the fight against crime & terrorism. More:  
If May can't face 6 party leaders for 90 minutes, how is she supposed to cope with 27 nation leaders united against her for 2 years #Brexit 
There should have been more challenge like this during the #brexit campaign especially the £350m lie. 
If she can’t debate with leader of UK Opposition, how’s she going to fare in #Brexit negotiations with 27 hostile EU leaders? #BBCDebate 
If May is going to be the ace Brexit negotiator she claims, you’d think she’d relish chance to show us all in debate with Corbyn #BBCDebate 
The Brexit Secretary wanted to sack 30,000 NHS staff and charge for NHS services. If you don't trust the government with the NHS, RT this:  
I recommend UKIP people to vote Tory this time in order to shut Corbyn up! Labour in Power would be very Dangerous!! Plus we need BREXIT! 
May's 12-point Brexit plan. No.12 is 'leave the EU'. 9 of remaining 11 are goals best achieved by staying in EU.  
There's a pattern emerging from the Tories & "hideaway May".Tories: Call Brexit referendum & lose.May: Calls General Election & loses.  
Securing new trade agreements around the world is central to our 12-point Brexit plan. More:  
This bank is bucking the Brexit trend and moving jobs to London  
Just imagine the Brexit negotiations........  
Ensuring free trade with European markets is a key part of our 12-point plan for Brexit. Find out more:  
On not debating @jeremycorbyn, UK PM @Theresa_May: "I'm too busy on Brexit." But not too busy to stage an election, tho. Work that one out. 
For Corbyn to govern, he’d have to have Sturgeon and Farron squawking in his ears about stopping Brexit, says Boris  
Brexit equals, at best, spending the next five years treading water, praying we don't drown.  
The Brexit Secretary David Davis :  
Theresa May wants to make the election all about Brexit again-so don't forget about the Tories  #DementiaTax 
Pls Retweet this brilliant animated #Brexit video. Securing Special Status for the North within the EU is possible!  
After Brexit: the UK will need to renegotiate at least 759 treaties!  
Protecting workers’ rights is central to our 12-point plan for Brexit. Find out more:  
May said this election was all about Brexit. Ok, let's talk Brexit! It's the stupidest idea in the history of British politics! #GE2017 
Can't a regulator demand #brexit plans from the government and opposition parties?  via @FT 
.@Conservatives keep banging on about "the right deal" but have already said they'd walk with "no deal".They don't care.#SkyNews #Brexit 
UK now equal bottom of G7 growth league with Italy - whoever said Brexit didn't have consequences?  
The Tories need to be pressed on the Brexit Bill.  No figures and no clue! 
Tories: call Brexit referendum and lose, squandering 30 years of investment in EU; call election and lose, squandering political stability 
‘NHS: The money has run out’ (Mirror splash). Context = there will be less of it post  Brexit econ shrinkage (issue dare not speak its name) 
Theresa May is asking us who we would prefer at the Brexit negotiating table: a 'naked' Corbyn or a no-show May.#GE2017 
Strengthening the Union is central to our 12-point plan for Brexit. Find out more:  
Theresa May will talk about her 'great, national vision for Brexit' today, only it isn't great, it isn't national and she hasn't a vision. 
Taking control of our own laws is a key part of our 12-point plan for Brexit. Find out more:  
If #labour winsNo #brexitNo defenceNo bordersMax taxMax job lossesMax terrorismMax immigrationMax debtMax unionsMax chaos 
To be clear, @UKLabour @TheGreenParty & @LibDems voters shouldn't automatically vote for their own party. Vote anti #Brexit Vote anti Tory. 
London's Brexit apocalypse is nowhere in sight  
The General Election is a distraction from the danger of failed Brexit negotiations  
Our 12 point-plan for Brexit will help us provide certainty wherever we can as we approach the negotiations. More:  
On Brexit, Greens & Lib Dems are usually better bet than Labour especially when, as in Bristol West, Greens can win! 
Papers - 'Corbyn accepts salt'n'vinegar pringle from communist reactionary. Decent original flavour eaters shocked. This will ruin #Brexit'. 
Yes indeed. Watching from Singapore, Brexit looks like a very costly strategic misjudgment  
UK and Australia explore plans for bilateral research fund and reciprocal academic visa post-Brexit  
The strongest Tory card is need for unassailable govt during Brexit negotiations. That's already impossible as polls narrowed 
I wonder if any journalist who meets Theresa May today can ask her for details of her preparations for Brexit between 7.30pm 9pm last night. 
But what positive values can May bring to the table? On Brexit she barely registered at G7/NATO summits. She has no leadership skills 
Here's the key page in Labour's Manifesto () and you'll see it presages a rather softer Brexit. /2  
"IP after Brexit" piece, co-authored with Arnold, Derclaye and Dinwoodie, is now published:  
If you think we are stronger in the EU you will be frustrated by Labour's policy on Brexit. But there are positives - and a prospect. /1 
Just phoned work to say I'm not coming in today because I am paying attention to thinking about Brexit negotiations 
Rachel Johnson, who switched from the Conservatives to @Libdems, says Grown-ups are needed on Brexit  
Philip Stephens: The Brexit election that leaves Britain the loser  
Theresa May "dim-witted and downright dishonest" on BrexitRT 
Stop talking crap, @BorisJohnson#Brexit is a Tory created mess that you want to palm off on the incoming @UKLabour government.#VoteLabour 
absolute rubbish, you forget it is about more than Brexit, it is about #OURNHS and your wholesale destruction of it, Security, Education, 
Sooner we Brexit the better , sick of hearing from whinging whining remoaners backed up by BBC and Sky media bias bulshit !! 
BBC's appalling covering of Brexit campaign in my view,  showed them up for what they arean EU lovey, left wing cesspitall @ our exspence 
’67 Referendum website #RightWrongs launched  #1967Referendum @NSLA @ABCaustralia 
Leaked Labour Document Shows Plan to Keep Unskilled Immigration Levels High Even After Brexit  
“Intercollegiate athletics at UCSC now have a bright future." The Athletics fee referendum, Measure 68, has passed!  
India's Referendum Results are crystal clear and Amazing . @OfficeOfRG @INCIndia @digvijaya_28 @JhaSanjay @KapilSibal @rssurjewala 
Brexit, Macron, and the European Defence Union | @FCruvi @ramenirblog  
Corybn "300,000 chose me to lead this party" #BBCDebate #brexit #JC4PM 
#Brexit is Theresa's comfort zone. She is so good at getting out of things.  Soon she'll be out of Number 10 #JC4PM  
Ireland is in the hot seat to profit from Brexit relocations. And the timing couldn't be better#Trump@kiks9 
While US voters now see through Trump’s “alternative facts,” nobody in Britain is questioning the #Brexit fantasy  
#WeakandWobblyMay #BBCDebate #MAYhem too weak to trust with #Brexit we need genuinely strong Leader, a diplomat #Corbyn #VoteLabour #GE2017 
£ goes down FT index goes up rich make lots of money right? So is that what all this Brexit/election bullshit is about? asking for a country 
Sadly we've been right all along... Brexit is a slow Train Crash.  
There are three main reasons, why I am voting #LibDem. Pro #EU, PR and more centrist policies.#LibDems #Brexit #GE2017 #GeneralElection 
'Negotiate Brexit better than Corbyn' but too scared to represent your own party? Europe won't be so kind. #wheresmay #BBCLeadersDebate 
Dirty donors back Theresa May in snap elections to secure a Dirty Brexit | openDemocracy  
They may not even get another referendum this time. 
Labelling support for another referendum as anti-democratic is a silencing manoeuvre.It's declaring your opponents illegitimate in bad faith 
We were going to have a kid and name it Harambe Brexit so people knew how old it was. 
what if Theresa May called the election to deliberately lose it and hand control of brexit and everything to Corbyn as she was a remoaner!! 
And on #Business news, reports of a hung parliament in #UK causes #sterling to dip .  #Brexit 
Certainly not me. We've got Brexit to think of. She's even scared of her friend Laura at the BBC. Catchphrases won't help at EU table talks. 
T May always looks lost when with opposing politicians. If she can't debate with fellow Brits, how can Brits trust her with Brexit ? 
My fave is the Brexit/Russia/Trump syndicate connection! WTF? 
Exception: that arse Ruth Davidson going through all sorts of contortions to back up Tory Brexit when it's clear she's against it all. 
Lab govt with LibDem & SNP in coalition would work well, resulting in Referendum on deal with either Norway option or status quo to vote on 
Tim Farron: Whether you support Brexit or not, Britain needs a decent opposition  
Doomed Brexit emoji 
2. How is it "pointing the gun" at them? They've said that, like other clubs, they will be penalized by a side-effect of Brexit. 
One week before the EU referendum, the Remain camp was ahead in the polls by 6 points. If you #DontVoteTory they can't win. 
"The promise of Brexit is great… If we get Brexit right, then together we can do great things"  British genius speaks 
